mongo db.courses.insertMany([{"_id":0, "title": "Special Topics in AAP", "code": "AAP 3099", "subject": "AAP", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "AAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1, "title": "Introduction to Asian American Studies", "code": "AAS 1100", "subject": "AAS", "descr": "This interdisciplinary course offers an introduction to the study of Asian/Pacific Islanders in the U.S. This course will examine, through a range of disciplines (including history, literary studies,\u00a0film/media, performance, anthropology, sociology), issues and methods that have emerged from Asian American Studies since its inception in the late 1960s, including the types of research questions and methods that the study of Asians & Pacific Islander peoples in the U.S. as well as politics and historical relations in the Asia/Pacific region have to offer. In this course, we will pay particular attention to the role of culture and its production in documenting histories, formulating critical practices, and galvanizing political efforts. Topics and themes include: war & empire; queer & feminist lives and histories; refugee, adoptees, transnational families, and other forms of kinship & belonging; anti-Asian violence; settler colonialism and postcolonial critique.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|AAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2, "title": "Jim Crow and Exclusion Era in America", "code": "AAS 2042", "subject": "AAS", "descr": "This seminar examines America during the overlapping eras of segregation & immigration exclusion.\u00a0 Beginning with contests over the weaning of freedom during reconstruction and running through the institution of Jim Crow legislation and immigration exclusion, the course ends with an evaluation of mid-20th century movements for civil rights and equality.\u00a0 Themes include the links between racial and economic oppression, legal and defacto restriction, everyday resistance, and struggles for equality.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3, "title": "Asians in the Americas: A Comparative Perspective", "code": "AAS 3030", "subject": "AAS", "descr": "The common perception of ethnicity is that it is a natural\u00a0and an inevitable consequence of cultural difference. Asians\u00a0overseas, in particular, have won repute as a people who cling tenaciously to their culture and refuse to assimilate into their host societies and cultures. But, who are the Asians?\u00a0On what basis can we label Asians\u00a0an ethnic group? Although there is a significant Asian presence in the Caribbean, the category Asian\u00a0itself does not exist in the Caribbean. What does this say about the nature of categories that label and demarcate groups of people on the basis of alleged cultural and phenotypical characteristics? This course will examine the dynamics behind group identity, namely ethnicity, by comparing and contrasting the multicultural experience of Asian populations in the Caribbean and the United States. Ethnographic case studies will focus on the East Indian and Chinese experiences in the Caribbean and the Chinese, Korean, Japanese, Filipino, and Indian experiences in the United States.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|AAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "AAS 4950", "subject": "AAS", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "AAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":5, "title": "Introduction to Business Management", "code": "AEM 1200", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Provides an overview of management and business. Human resource, marketing, finance, and strategy concerns are addressed with consideration paid to current issues such as technological innovation and its impact on operations, globalization, ethics, teamwork, leadership, and entrepreneurship. Opportunity to deliver an integrative group project.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":6, "title": "An Introduction to the Economics of Environmental and Natural Resources", "code": "AEM 1500", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the economic foundations for public decision-making regarding environmental quality and natural resources. Emphasis is placed on how basic tools of economic analysis can be used to identify sources of environmental problems and solutions to these problems. Topics to be covered include \"individual hand\" concepts underlying market success, market failure with particular focus on public goods and externalities, benefit-cost analysis and non-market valuation, incentive-based policies for controlling pollution, and economic aspects of renewable and non-renewable resources.", "tags": "SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":7, "title": "Foundations of Leadership Development", "code": "AEM 1700", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Dyson Leadership Development provides a rich, varied, curricular and co-curricular experience for students to equip, inspire and empower students to have the capacity to lead in their communities on a local, national and global scale. Leadership is a personal, relational, and collective learning journey for achieving goals that result in positive change. The basic premise of Leadership in Dyson is leading for a better world. The foundations of this course include self-awareness, personal development, self-management, team building, networking, and community engagement. This introductory course is geared towards students in the Leadership minor.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":8, "title": "Contemporary Controversies in the Global Economy", "code": "AEM 2000", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course aims to stimulate critical thinking, economic reasoning, and cogent writing about contemporary controversies that attract regular attention in the international press and among key private and public sector decision-makers. Students read and discuss competing arguments about current issues such as morally questionable market exchange among willing buyres and sellers, immigration policy, foreign aid, sovereign debt forgiveness, regulating genetically modified foods, etc. Students write, edit, and rewrite short briefing papers which are evaluated for quality of communication as well as subject matter content.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":9, "title": "Spreadsheet Modeling for Management and Economics", "code": "AEM 2010", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course will be developed as a data-driven, model-based approach to decision-making. Most applications will rely on the standard array of Excel functionality but other platforms (e.g., Access, SQL, presentation software) may be employed. A unique feature of this course will be applications drawn from the diverse program areas of the Dyson School: management; international development/trade; environment/resource economics; and food/agricultural economics. Case material will be contributed by the companies from the DUAC. Key topics will include: Optimization (Solver), Data graphing, Financial modeling, Ethical/social dimensions of IT, Forecasting, Pivot tables, Exponential smoothing, and Simulation.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":10, "title": "Spreadsheet Modeling for Non-Dyson Majors", "code": "AEM 2011", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course, while Excel based, will emphasize applied decision making in the business world. This introductory course is not simply a \"how to use Excel\" course, rather it covers the theory behind decision making and applying analytic tools like Excel to various business scenarios.\u00a0 Understanding the value of such skills, this course will introduce students to methods used to navigate tools and applications, or typical business scenarios where such capabilities can be leveraged in business.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":11, "title": "The Business Case for Diversity and Inclusion", "code": "AEM 2015", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Diversity is everywhere. But research and experience show diversity alone does not produce better results. To reap the benefits of diversity, organizational leaders must understand and be prepared to address the challenges of our diverse, interconnected world. One academically proven way to maximize the benefits differences bring to organizations is to combine diversity with cultural intelligence (CQ), the capability to relate and work effectively in culturally diverse situations. This course is designed to cultivate a theoretical and practical understanding and application of the business case for diversity and inclusion, and help develop cultural intelligence for working successfully in today's diverse, globalized reality. This course combines conceptual and experiential approaches to diversity and inclusion in organizations through exercises, case studies, discussions, readings, videos, guest speakers, and group work.", "tags": "D-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":12, "title": "Better Decisions for Life, Love and Money", "code": "AEM 2020", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Effective judgments and decisions are critical to success in every avenue of life. This course will explore research on the principles of sound judgment and decision making, and on the ways in which people's judgments and decisions are prone to bias and error. The course aims to improve students' critical thinking skills and to enable them to make better judgments and decisions in an increasingly complicated world. The course is taught by a team of psychologists and economists who draw on recent research in psychology and behavioral economics that can benefit the lives of students.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":13, "title": "Work and Well-Being", "code": "AEM 2025", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "What is the good life? Is it more than personal achievement, excellent health, and contentment? This course examines well-being in the context of work, with a focus on a sometimes-neglected aspect of the good life: doing good by contributing to the well-being of others and the planet. In this class, students will discover frameworks from social and moral psychology that help them identify their own ethical beacons, or what \"really matters\" (e.g., sustainability; reducing inequality), and develop a crucial skill in management: self-awareness. Through a combination of reflection and critical analysis of theory and research findings, students will build a practical understanding of a range of topics related to well-being at work, including meaning, authenticity, workplace culture, stress and burn-out, and organizational and personal values. At the same time, students will have the opportunity to envision a blueprint for their own future work as ethical leaders.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":14, "title": "Introduction to Agricultural Finance", "code": "AEM 2050", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Introductory course which provides an overview of principles and practices of agricultural and development finance, from the perspectives of the business owner, lender, and policymaker. Topics include sources of capital, financing entry into agriculture, financial analysis, capital management, financial statements, credit instruments, loan analysis, and financial risk. Applications in farm investments, the Farm Credit System, crop insurance, and risk management.", "tags": "SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":15, "title": "Financial Accounting", "code": "AEM 2210", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Comprehensive introduction to financial accounting concepts and techniques, intended to provide a basic understanding of the accounting cycle, elements of financial statements, underlying theory of GAAP, and financial statement interpretation. Topics include methods of recording inventory, receivables, depreciation, bonds, and equity. Requires two evening prelims and a comprehensive final; weekly homework assignments.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":16, "title": "Foundational Perspectives and Contemporary Issues in Entrepreneurship", "code": "AEM 2220", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course aims to introduce students to foundational theories and contemporary issues pertaining to entrepreneurship. A primary objective of this course is to broaden students' perspectives on entrepreneurship and the myriad ways that entrepreneurial activity contributes to innovation, economic growth, and society. Students will be introduced to foundational thinking, leading-edge research and key frameworks that address central questions of entrepreneurship. In addition, this course will help students develop a deeper understanding of their own interest in entrepreneurship and how it will help them to advance their careers.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":17, "title": "Financial Accounting For Dyson Majors", "code": "AEM 2225", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Comprehensive introduction to financial accounting concepts and applications. Focuses primarily on recording and communicating financial information for use by external users such as investors, creditors and regulators, and is intended to provide a basic understanding of the accounting cycle, elements of financial statements, Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, and financial statement interpretation. Topics include accounting for inventory, receivables, depreciation, bonds, equity, and cash flows.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":18, "title": "Finance for Dyson Majors", "code": "AEM 2240", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Focuses on the mathematics of finance, valuation, and the economics of managerial decisions, corporate financial policy, risk management, and investments. Topics include the time value of money, bond and stock valuation, capital-budgeting decisions, financing alternatives, the cost of capital and the capital-structure decision, distribution policy, mergers and acquisitions and restructuring, options, forward and futures contracts, market efficiency and market anomalies, strategies of successful investors, and personal finance.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":19, "title": "Finance", "code": "AEM 2241", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is a survey of topics in finance. It focuses on the mathematics of finance, valuation, the economics of managerial decisions, corporate financial policy, risk management, investments, and personal finance.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":20, "title": "International Trade and Finance", "code": "AEM 2300", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "One-semester introduction to international economic principles and issues. Begins by surveying key topics such as the elements of comparative advantage, tariff and nontariff barriers, and multilateral institutions. The second part of the course treats selected topics in international finance, including exchange rates, balance of payments, and capital markets. Discusses current issues such as the effects of trade liberalization, trade and economic growth, and instability in international capital markets. Designed as a less technical introduction to concepts developed at a more advanced level in AEM 4300\u00a0and ECON 4510-ECON 4520.", "tags": "SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":21, "title": "Business and Economics of Food", "code": "AEM 2310", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course will examine the food system from an economic and business perspective. In the first part of the course, students will study the key economic and regulatory elements that affect the production of food. The second section will focus on the business aspects of food and beverage processing, distribution and retailing, and the material in the final section will focus on a range of contemporary business and economic issues that are relevant to consumers of food and beverages.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":22, "title": "Marketing for Dyson Majors", "code": "AEM 2420", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Provides a broad introduction to the fundamentals of marketing. Explores the components of an organization's strategic marketing program, including how to price, promote, and distribute goods and services. Industry guest lectures and current marketing applications from various companies are presented and analyzed. Students will complete a marketing plan.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":23, "title": "Food and Consumer Packaged Goods Industry Dynamics", "code": "AEM 2480", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Covers merchandising principles and practices as they apply to food industry situations. Examines the various elements of merchandising such as buying, pricing, advertising, promotion, display, store layout, profit planning and control, and merchandising strategy. Considers the consequences of food industry trends and initiatives for other industry members, public policy makers, and consumers.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":24, "title": "Strategy", "code": "AEM 2601", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course analyzes the sources of firms' competitive advantage and develops the knowledge and skills necessary to be an effective strategy analyst. The course is grounded in microeconomic concepts taught in AEM 2600\u00a0in terms of discipline, and draws from corporate finance, marketing, human resource management and organization science. This course uses both lecture, discussion and case studies to encourage students to develop skills in formulating strategy in a practical context.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":25, "title": "Management Communication", "code": "AEM 2700", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Management Communication is intended to help you think strategically about communication and aid you in improving your writing, presentation, and interpersonal communication skills as a future manager. We will look at a set of \"best practices\" or guidelines that have been derived from both research and experience, give you the opportunity to put those guidelines into practice, and provide you with feedback on your work to help you strengthen your abilities. More often than not, we will be using a workshop format that will rely heavily on discussion and in-class exercises.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":26, "title": "Excursions in Computational Sustainability", "code": "AEM 2770", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Balancing environmental, economic, and societal needs for a sustainable future encompasses problems of unprecedented size and complexity. Computing and information science can play an important role in addressing critical sustainability challenges faced by present and future generations. The goal of the course is to introduce students to a range of sustainability challenges and to computational methods that can help address such challenges. Sustainability topics include sustainable development, biodiversity and wildlife conservation, poverty mitigation, food security, renewable resources, energy, transportation, and climate change. In the context of these sustainability topics, the course will introduce students to mathematical and computational modeling techniques, algorithms, and statistical methods. The course is at the introductory undergraduate level. Students are expected to have basic knowledge of probability theory and calculus.", "tags": "SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":27, "title": "The Economics of Vice and Corruption", "code": "AEM 2810", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This writing course is designed to explore the important but largely undocumented role of vice and corruption in modern economies. A particular focus of the course will be learning how to identify activities, such as corruption and creating, that are designed to avoid detection. Techniques to uncover nefarious behavior are an important tool to understand the nature and extent of bad behavior and to prescribe policy treatment to minimize it. Students will write essays reflecting critically on weekly readings of recent literature on vice and deception.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":28, "title": "VBA for Data Analysis and Business Modeling", "code": "AEM 2830", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is an introduction to programming with Excel Visual Basic for Applications (VBA) for students aiming to enter the world\nof business analytics. Using business applied cases students will increase decision making efficiency and productivity through a\ndetailed understanding of VBA programming languages.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":29, "title": "Grand Challenges Pre-Project Immersion", "code": "AEM 3000", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Part of the Grand Challenges program, the Pre-Project Immersion prepares students to work with a team during their senior year to solve a societal problem. The Immersion is an intensive learning experience with reinforcements throughout the semester. Students will build skills in working as part of a team, presenting to a client, reflecting on their experience, and demonstrating cultural humility.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":30, "title": "Explorations in Analytic Modeling", "code": "AEM 3030", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Explorations in Analytic Modeling will be developed as a deeper exploration and model based approach to quantitative decision making within a spreadsheet platform. Applied decision making using primarily Microsoft Excel as a business analytics tool will focus on using applied cases requiring various financial and other models. As the course explores models, emphasis will be placed on the exploration and application of the tool to enhance decision making and improve outcomes. This data-driven course will move the student into the most complex functionality available in the Excel platform. Key topics will include: data management, data visualization, financial modeling, forecasting, optimization, pivot tables, and simulation. The course will also employ macro recording with introductory visual basic for applications programming.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":31, "title": "Dairy Markets and Policy", "code": "AEM 3040", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is a survey of topics related to: 1) the structure and performance of U.S. dairy markets; and 2) federal and state policies that regulate market activities. This is not a course in how to market or sell farm milk or dairy products, although we will discuss some topics related to marketing and dairy demand analysis. Policy sections emphasize understanding why regulations were created and how they impact market activity, as well as describing what they do.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":32, "title": "Practitioner's Overview of Securities Markets and Asset Management", "code": "AEM 3060", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "A broad overview of various aspects of the Fixed Income and Equities Markets and the role of Investment Banks. Topics, amongst others, will include: Securities Sales and Trading, Fiscal and Monetary Policy effects on Markets, Asset Management, Private Equity and Leveraged Buyouts, Mergers and Acquisitions, and Risk Management. Course will focus on real life practices and may include guest speakers, role playing and trading simulations.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":33, "title": "Business Statistics", "code": "AEM 3100", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Focuses on techniques used to analyze data from marketing research, business, and economics. Topics include experimental design and ANOVA, contingency-table analysis, quality-control methods, time-series analysis, and forecasting. Also includes brief introductions to nonparametric methods and multivariate analysis. Involves a research project designed to give experience in collecting and interpreting data.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":34, "title": "Introduction to Branding and Brand Management", "code": "AEM 3120", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Branding has become one of the most important aspects of business strategy. Developing brand identity and strategy are critical steps in successful marketing of a product. Developing a brand strategy requires an understanding of: what is branding, how to develop brand equity, how to reach the target audience, the importance of consistent communications and brand planning. This course includes the concepts of brand, brand equity and strategic brand management. Topics covered include Brand Equity, Consumer Communications, Reaching Consumers and Brand Planning. Post this class participants will understand the importance of building brand equity and communicating throughout all consumer touch points. Class work includes a combination of case studies, lectures, and class discussions. Topics discussed will relate to real life business situations.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":35, "title": "Marketing Strategy", "code": "AEM 3125", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "A strong business leader has to make smart, strategic marketing decisions, create and present a plan to get people on board, and then execute. Through business cases and a marketing simulation game, this course will teach how to effectively make these steps in a variety of industries. Students will get to pitch their version of what they think a company should do strategically by analyzing cases and bringing their ideas to class. Additionally, through the marketing simulation game, students will also get a chance to make actual strategic decisions as a business leader and respond to market reactions in an evolving and interactive business simulation environment.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":36, "title": "Ethics in Business and Organizations", "code": "AEM 3205", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course will survey ethical problems that arise in business and other organizational contexts, and develop theoretical resources\nto help address them.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":37, "title": "Managerial Accounting", "code": "AEM 3230", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the basic concepts, analyses, uses, and procedures of accounting and control used by internal company managers when they are faced with planning, directing, controlling, and decision-making activities in their organization. Topics covered focus on the relationship between strategy and decision-making and include product and service costing, budget setting, decision-making, profitability analysis, pricing, investment analysis, management control systems, and performance measurement.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":38, "title": "The Business Laboratory and New Venture Management", "code": "AEM 3251", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is a team oriented approach to allow students to understand through a simulation what happens when a new business is launched with funding in place. During the course of the implementation they will be presented with obstacles that often occur in \"real-life \" situations and learn how to develop creative ways to solve and overcome those obstacles. By the end of the term, it is expected that each team will have experienced (through simulation) managing a new venture.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":39, "title": "Cooperative Business Management", "code": "AEM 3260", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "An evaluation of the fundamental principles, structure, finance, management and governance associated with the cooperative business model, with a focus on agricultural cooperatives. Analyses of the cooperative business organization within the modern economy are emphasized through a mix of lectures, guest speakers, case study discussions and, and experiential learning projects with cooperative businesses.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":40, "title": "Corporate Financial Reporting II", "code": "AEM 3370", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Continuation of the in-depth study of accounting theory, generally accepted accounting principles, and the techniques involved in measuring, recording, summarizing, and reporting financial data for business organizations. Learn the GAAP accounting for revenue, investments, pensions, taxes, accounting changes, and statement of cash flows. Understand accounting alternatives within GAAP and accounting alternatives to GAAP for the topics covered so that students are prepared to understand and use future changes in GAAP. Course objectives will be achieved by a combination of lectures and analyzing and discussing articles from the financial press and cases that are based on actual financial statements.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":41, "title": "Social Entrepreneurship Practicum: Anabel's Grocery", "code": "AEM 3385", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "AEM 3385 is a hands-on learning experience that serves as an entry point for new Anabel's Grocery team members, introducing them to social entrepreneurship, food justice, systems thinking, collaborative leadership practices, and the day-to-day operations of Anabel's. No prerequisites and no previous experience with Anabel's required. The course is open to students regardless of major. We are looking for students with diverse interests who are passionate about making healthy food accessible to everyone through practical actions that further racial, economic, and ecological justice. This experiential-based course meets once a week. It includes small group discussion sessions and a practicum commitment of about 4 hours per week.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":42, "title": "Research Methods in International Development", "code": "AEM 3390", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is a research methods course that uses basic statistics and quantitative techniques to analyze selected topics in international development. The aim of this course is to expose students to the various methodologies used by researchers in the field of international development: (i) core concepts such as poverty and inequality measurement (use of basic statistics); distributive justice (use of basic game theory) and governance issues in developing economies (use of basic public economics/welfare theorems/voting theories) and (ii) study of specific topics that are at the frontier of international development research where students will be required to gather data, design surveys and use basic econometrics tools in their assignments.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":43, "title": "Financial Statements Analysis", "code": "AEM 3520", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The course will focus on developing a framework for analyzing financial statements to make business decisions. The framework is intended to enhance the ability to qualitatively and quantitatively assess financial information. Goals of the course include learning to read financial statements for relevant information, understanding the impact of a business' accounting choices and estimates, analyzing financial ratios and cash flow measures and methods for valuation of a business. Cases are incorporated in class discussions and assignments in order to illustrate concepts and allow students to put into practice the tools presented.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":44, "title": "Customer Analytics and Strategy", "code": "AEM 4015", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Aimed at students who are interested in pursuing activities in customer strategy and analytics built around the notion of customer centricity. The primary objective of this course is to provide students with how customer relationship management (CRM) can help accomplish strategic initiatives, improve firm profitability and build lasting competitive advantage. Students will be exposed to the practical side of CRM through case studies and hands-on exercises. This course is particularly relevant for students interested in careers in consulting, strategy, marketing and retailing, as well as for entrepreneurs.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":45, "title": "Risk Simulation and Monte Carlo Methods", "code": "AEM 4060", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is a computer-based course that deals with the concepts of randomness and risk in financial management, capital budgeting, stock valuations, derivatives, and investment portfolios. The focus of the course is on applying realistic probability using Monte Carlo simulation to solve a variety of problems in finance.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":46, "title": "Environmental Finance and Markets", "code": "AEM 4090", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course considers the ways in which the tools of finance are used to address environmental challenges and how market mechanisms can be used to ensure the long-term sustainability of ecosystems. Following an introduction to the prevailing environmental policy framework, the course explores the uses of such products as debt-for-nature swaps, green bonds, structured notes, and environmental impacts bonds, and illustrates both their potential and their limitations through a review of market transactions. The course also explores how investment decisions can influence environmental outcomes and the role that sustainable asset management strategies can have in achieving desired conservation objectives.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":47, "title": "Behavioral Economics and Managerial Decisions", "code": "AEM 4140", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Behavioral economics integrates psychology and economics by identifying systematic anomalies in decision making. These are now recognized to be an important source of error in business decisions, and they provide the foundation for both behavioral marketing and finance. The course compares rational choice theory with behavior both in lecture and through a series of economics experiments in which students face situations that are likely to lead to anomalies such as \"the winner's curse,\" the status quo bias, hyperbolic discounting, and bias in assessing risks. Students have the opportunity to evaluate their own decision making.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":48, "title": "Strategic Pricing", "code": "AEM 4160", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This quantitative course explores various pricing strategies by taking into consideration the role of consumer behavior, economics, statistics, and management science. Topics include: product tying and bundling, peak load pricing, price matching, warranty pricing, advanced booking, and the 99-cent pricing perceptions.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":49, "title": "Futures, Options and Financial Derivatives", "code": "AEM 4210", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Covers the pricing of derivatives and how derivatives can be used for the purpose of risk management and speculation. A portion of this course involves the use of spreadsheet or other computer programs.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":50, "title": "Systems and Analytics in Accounting", "code": "AEM 4225", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "An investigation of the systems and software that capture and store accounting and economic information, and of the tools and techniques that support a robust use of that data for the benefit of individual enterprises and greater society. Topics include \"Big Data\", Data Visualization, Optimization Tools and Accounting Support Systems and Databases. Students taking this course at the graduate level will have a semester project related to the extension of the utility of large data sets beyond their initial purposes.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":51, "title": "Fixed-Income Securities", "code": "AEM 4260", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Focuses on fixed-income securities including corporate bonds, default-free bonds, and floating rate notes. Other topics include related financial instruments such as forwards and futures on fixed-income securities, interest rate swaps, bond options, and mortgage-backed securities. In addition to the analysis of specific types of fixed-income securities, there is an examination of the tools used in bond portfolio management.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":52, "title": "Valuation of Capital Investment", "code": "AEM 4280", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is about the analysis of financial information for making decisions to invest in businesses. The primary focus is on quantitative stock selection and equity (share) valuation. Various valuation models will be examined in detail and applied in cases and projects involving listed companies. First, the issue of market efficiency will be explored. Second, important quantitative stock selection methods will be examined. Third, discounted cash flow models will be examined. This include models of shareholder value, the analysis of profitability, growth and valuation generation in a firm, forecasting earnings and cash flows, pro-forma analysis for strategy and planning, analysis of risk, and the determination of price/earnings and market-to-book ratios. Advanced topics on valuation including valuation by multiples and earnings management will then be discussed.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":53, "title": "International Trade Policy", "code": "AEM 4300", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Examines the economic principles underlying international trade and monetary policy, and the policies, practices, and institutions that influence trade and foreign exchange markets. Also emphasizes applications to current topics in international trade policy, to trade in primary commodities, and to both developed and developing countries.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":54, "title": "Economics of Developing Countries", "code": "AEM 4315", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The goal of this course is to expand students' understanding of the economics of developing countries. We will address questions like: why do some countries grow quickly and others slowly? What factors prevent countries, households, and individuals from escaping the cycle of poverty? How do policymakers balance economic growth and environmental sustainability? Why don't financial markets work well in most developing countries, and do informal institutions fill the gap? How do we analyze the challenges facing small-scale farming households, and how do decisions by those households influence migration, labor markets, and the growth of industry? How do we evaluate policies and programs in order to understand what works for development? The approach in this course will be primarily microeconomic, although a basic understanding of macroeconomics is important for some topics. Emphasis will be on theory, real-world examples, and reading and interpreting research and policy papers.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":55, "title": "Political Economy of the WTO", "code": "AEM 4350", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The politics of the WTO and trade policy are explored. Examines what the WTO is, how it operates, how much power it really has, why it was created, and incentives for governments to cooperate. Also explores how WTO rules affect domestic politics and foreign policy goals and how WTO rules and agreements are enforced. Students also debate the effect of trade on growth and poverty.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":56, "title": "Healthcare Entrepreneurship: Perspectives and Controversies", "code": "AEM 4355", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":57, "title": "Entrepreneurial Strategy for Technology Ventures", "code": "AEM 4380", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course explores the concepts and tools needed to manage a technology-based entrepreneurial business. Through this course, students will develop an ability to think strategically about the fundamental issues facing technology ventures, including how to choose markets and business models, when and how to compete with incumbent firms, how to leverage IP, and how to identify and develop the resources and capabilities required for success. This is not a course in how to start a business. Instead, the emphasis is on the acquisition and application of the analytical tools critical for the development of an entrepreneurial strategy. This course is relevant to students interested in founding or working in technology ventures, as well as students interested in related careers in consulting and venture capital.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":58, "title": "Technology Strategy", "code": "AEM 4390", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course introduces the fundamental strategy concepts and tools that enable firms to manage technological innovations for competitive advantage. It does so by first considering the sources of technological change, how technologies create value for firms, and how to manage and motivate knowledge workers. It then examines the various mechanisms for extracting value from technologies, both legal (e.g., patents, trade secrecy, etc.) and strategic (e.g., lead time, complementary assets, etc.). We will explore the fundamentals of technology strategy through readings and case studies in both entrepreneurial and established firms across a range of technology-based industries. This course is designed for students who intend to pursue careers in consulting, new product development, entrepreneurship, and finance where technology and intellectual property are important sources of competitive advantage.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":59, "title": "Marketing Research", "code": "AEM 4410", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course provides a fundamental understanding of marketing research methods typically employed by firms. It is primarily aimed towards the manager who must decide the direction of research activities and focuses on how one should design research, construct questionnaires, and collect and analyze data. The course will primarily focus on the interpretation and use of results rather than mathematical derivations. Students will be exposed to the practical side of marketing research through problem sets and projects.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":60, "title": "Research and Strategy in Emerging Markets", "code": "AEM 4421", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The course complements the Student Multidisciplinary Applied Research Team (SMART) Program administered by CIIFAD. The goal of the course is to offer students a unique learning and service team experience, working with entrepreneurs and civil society organizations in emerging markets and economically disadvantaged communities. Students will learn about the challenges and opportunities of doing business and implementing development interventions in emerging markets. During the semester, students explore theories of economic and community development, analyze the projects on which they worked, write up case studies, and develop strategic recommendations for the enterprises or organizations they have partnered with.", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":61, "title": "Economics of Food and Malnutrition", "code": "AEM 4485", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course focused on the economics of food and malnutrition from the perspective of individuals and households; that is, a micro-economic approach. Topics include characteristics and constraints associated with food production in both developed and developing countries; the determinants of household food security; the social and economic causes and consequences of undernutrition; the social and economic causes and consequences of obesity; intervention design to reduce food insecurity, undernutrition and obesity.", "tags": "D-AG|SBA-HE|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":62, "title": "Resource Economics", "code": "AEM 4500", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course introduces students to the economics of renewable and nonrenewable natural resources. Topics covered include the valuation and use of land; the extraction and management of nonrenewable resources such as minerals, rare earth elements, and energy resources; renewable and nonrenewable sources of energy; forest management; water and groundwater economics, management, and conservation; and sustainability. Students will learn how to use dynamic models to analyze decision-making over time, and to solve dynamic optimization problems analytically and numerically. Students will also learn how to analyze and explain the intuition and logic behind the theory and concepts. Students will apply the methods, quantitative tools, and concepts to analyze natural resource issues at global and local levels; to introspectively reflect on their own lives and future aspirations; and to draw lessons and implications for leadership, management, and policy. A solid background in calculus is required.", "tags": "SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":63, "title": "Environmental Economics", "code": "AEM 4510", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This class will focus on the role of the environment in the theory and practice of economics. It will make use of microeconomic analysis at the intermediate level and will incorporate real-world examples. It examines market failure, externalities, benefit-cost analysis, nonmarket valuation techniques, and cost-effective policy instruments.", "tags": "SBA-AG|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":64, "title": "Federal Income Taxation of Real Estate Ventures", "code": "AEM 4534", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course presents the tax skills necessary to make business, and personal, decisions as it relates to real estate ventures. Emphasis is placed on such areas as acquiring ownership of real property, the various entity structures that a real estate venture can create, and the operational rules surrounding a real estate venture, including the sale and/or exchange of real estate. In addition, securitized real estate investments, such as limited/master limited partnerships and real estate investment trusts (REITS), will be introduced in the later part of course. Practical application of the tax law will be emphasized with proper consideration placed on the historical, economic and political perspectives of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC). The content and design of this course is, only, suitable for advanced undergraduate students and graduate students.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":65, "title": "Economics of Advertising", "code": "AEM 4550", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is an analytical and quantitative course focusing on advertising strategy. How does advertising affect product demand and competitive responses from rival products? Why and how do consumers respond to advertising? What is their sensitivity to advertising expenditures, if any? Can we measure that sensitivity? These are some of the questions analyzed during this course.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":66, "title": "Federal Income Taxation of Business Entities, Estates and Trusts", "code": "AEM 4560", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course presents the tax skills necessary to make business decisions regarding Corporations, Partnerships, Estates and Trusts. Emphasis is placed on such areas as organization and capital structure, earnings and profits, dividend distribution, redemptions, liquidations and reorganization of corporations. In addition, flow through entities such as partnerships and S Corporations will be studied along with estates, trusts, family tax planning and exempt entities. Practical application of the tax law will be emphasized with proper consideration placed on the historical, economic and political perspectives of the Internal Revenue.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":67, "title": "Predictive Analytics for Business Strategy", "code": "AEM 4600", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to teach students how data analysis can inform strategy, within a framework centered on logical reasoning and practical communication. In doing so, we will develop the analytical tools and hands-on experience with data and economic models to optimally utilize information in decision-making, often in the context of economic consulting. The focus of the material will be on a subdivision of predictive analytics, called active prediction, which is most appropriate when evaluating business strategies. We will explore the implications and interrelationships between the use of prediction, business processes, and firm strategy. In addition, students will develop presentation and communication skills, particularly with regard to quantitative outputs, and learn valuable, targeted computer programming skills. Finally, students will learn the basics of identification in order to better understand which data is most useful to collect when answering a given empirical question.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":68, "title": "Digital Platform Strategy", "code": "AEM 4615", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Business platforms are a set of business and technology building blocks that serve to facilitate the creation of complementary products and services. They are an essential feature of modern economies, particularly among products and services created by software. The emphasis of this course is on how to create, grow, gain value and capture market share from platforms. Course content will draw concepts from network effects, information asymmetry, pricing, and game theory. Students will apply these concepts to make decisions on how to manage platforms in case studies drawing from social media, entrepreneurship, enterprise software, and mobile services, among others. The course will be useful for students interested in founding new businesses, managing technology ventures and investing.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":69, "title": "Business Simulation", "code": "AEM 4660", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Course is required for completing the Dyson Business Minor for Engineers, but is open to all majors. By participating in a business simulation, students get experience applying key business principles, such as finance, accounting, marketing, economics and management in dynamic marketing settings. Participants make team-based and individual decisions based on imperfect information and aggressive time constraints. Through analysis, coaching and facilitation, the experience leads to learning the ways specific business decisions influence firm performance in a dynamic marketplace.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":70, "title": "Business Management Simulation", "code": "AEM 4665", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The Business Management Simulation (BMS) is a course in which each student works as part of a team to manage a simulated manufacturing company. Each team is responsible for making yearly decisions in four broad areas: sales, marketing, operations, and finance. Depending on class size, there will be one or two different industries, each operating in its own competitive space, and there will be four or five companies in each industry. Your competition, therefore, is limited to the other three or four teams in your industry. You will all start in the same position, competing with one another to gain market share, generate revenue, and increase profitability. Performance is measured by the relative success of each firm in creating shareholder value by paying dividends and increasing share price.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":71, "title": "Investments", "code": "AEM 4670", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is designed to further the understanding of institutional investment management. The course covers key concepts in risk return trade-offs and asset allocation. Students are expected to implement various techniques using real world data. The course also covers select topics in portfolio risk management and current regulatory adjustments.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":72, "title": "Dyson Leadership Development Program", "code": "AEM 4700", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This capstone course will only be open to students who have completed 75% of the required elements of the Dyson School's Leadership Development Program. The course will provide a structured environment for students to apply lessons they have learned through Program offerings with leadership experiences they have gained over the past two years (e.g., in a student organization).", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":73, "title": "Undergraduate Special Topics in Applied Economics and Management", "code": "AEM 4940", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the beginning of the semester.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":74, "title": "Applied Economics and Management Internship", "code": "AEM 4960", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Evaluation of internship experience requiring the following written submission at the end of the term. 1) Internship job description and copies of training materials provided. 2) Weekly diary including descriptions of job responsibilities and reflections/insights on those experiences. 3) Three to five page paper reflecting on how the internship related to the academic program. All internships must be approved by the internship coordinator before the work experience segment.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":75, "title": "Individual Study in Applied Economics and Management", "code": "AEM 4970", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Used for special projects designed by faculty members.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":76, "title": "Supervised Teaching Experience", "code": "AEM 4980", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduates experience through actual involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of department faculty. Students cannot receive both pay and credit for the same hours of preparation and teaching.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":77, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "AEM 4990", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Permits outstanding undergraduates to carry out independent study of suitable problems under appropriate supervision. Students cannot receive both pay and credit for the same hours of work.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":78, "title": "Undergraduate Accounting and Tax Research", "code": "AEM 4992", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Permits outstanding undergraduates to carry out independent study of suitable problems under appropriate supervision. Students cannot receive both pay and credit for the same hours of work. This course meets one of the educational components of the New York state CPA exam.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":79, "title": "Systems and Analytics in Accounting", "code": "AEM 5225", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "An investigation of the systems and software that capture and store accounting and economic information, and of the tools and techniques that support a robust use of that data for the benefit of individual enterprises and greater society. Topics include \"Big Data\", Data Visualization, Optimization Tools and Accounting Support Systems and Databases. Students taking this course at the graduate level will have a semester project related to the extension of the utility of large data sets beyond their initial purposes.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":80, "title": "Finance", "code": "AEM 5241", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is a survey of topics in finance. It focuses on the mathematics of finance, valuation, the economics of managerial decisions, corporate financial policy, risk management, investments, and personal finance.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":81, "title": "Valuation of Capital Investment", "code": "AEM 5280", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is about the analysis of financial information for making decisions to invest in businesses. The primary focus is on quantitative stock selection and equity (share) valuation. Various valuation models will be examined in detail and applied in cases and projects involving listed companies. First, the issue of market efficiency will be explored. Second, important quantitative stock selection methods will be examined. Third, discounted cash flow models will be examined. This include models of shareholder value, the analysis of profitability, growth and valuation generation in a firm, forecasting earnings and cash flows, pro-forma analysis for strategy and planning, analysis of risk, and the determination of price/earnings and market-to-book ratios. Advanced topics on valuation including valuation by multiples and earnings management will then be discussed.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":82, "title": "Global Citizenship Seminar", "code": "AEM 5305", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Through this two-day immersion seminar as part of the broader CEMS curriculum, students will learn and gain skills related to participating in (and leading) teams of diverse individuals. The seminar-and our classroom time-will be approached as a partnership. Questions will be posed regularly and frequently throughout the course to support learning from each other. The main themes for the two-day sessions are: What is leadership? How do organizations (mis)identify leaders? What is the difference between ascribed and achieved leadership? What are the benefits of teamwork (and why is it increasing in the workplace? How do effective teams operate? What skills are most helpful for successful team participation?", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":83, "title": "Leadership and Management in Global Environments and Organizations", "code": "AEM 5315", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Business firms with global operations and activities present unique layers of managerial and leadership challenges on top of those already associated with running a successful business. This course identifies those challenges at the industry, organizational, team and individual levels and indicates available solutions and implementations of solutions to those challenges. The course emphasizes the organic nature of the growth of the global enterprise and the challenges it presents to organizational citizens and leaders; the difficulties associated with creating coherent organizational structures and cultures across national and regional borders; the potential and actual differences in institutional and cultural practices across national and regional borders; and finally the ethical challenges posed by both the large institutional and cultural distances across organizational units in a multinational enterprise as well as by the nature of cross-cultural and cross-institutional business contacts in an environment of global firms.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":84, "title": "From Labels to Lab-Grown Meat: Consumer Behavior and the Food Industry", "code": "AEM 5480", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Through reading, writing, and discussion students will broaden their understanding of the food market and its components. The course will introduce students to current research on consumer perceptions and behavior with regard to food. Topics will be covered with an eye toward understanding the landscape of the food industry and how consumer behavior shapes opportunities within this space. Students will write short case studies relating to each of the course modules exploring the current trends in the industry. This will include assessing the market potential for novel and controversial foods or food services. It may also include researching food companies that have either successfully or unsuccessfully attempted to innovate, or policies that have attempted to change food behavior.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":85, "title": "Digital Platform Strategy", "code": "AEM 5615", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Business platforms are a set of business and technology building blocks that serve to facilitate the creation of complementary products and services. They are an essential feature of modern economies, particularly among products and services created by software. The emphasis of this course is on how to create, grow, gain value, and capture market share from platforms. Course content will draw concepts from network effects, information asymmetry, pricing, and game theory. Students will apply these concepts to make decisions on how to manage platforms in case studies drawing from social media, entrepreneurship, enterprise software, and mobile services, among others. The course will be useful for students interested in founding new businesses, managing technology ventures, and investing.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":86, "title": "Risk Management and Optimization", "code": "AEM 6030", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is a half-semester course course in mathematical programming designed to deepen an understanding of the role of risk in a portfolio choice framework. As a complement to AEM 6050\u00a0, Agricultural Finance and Development, this course should be of particular interest to students in, agricultural finance, agricultural economics, development economics, financial economics, or any other related discipline. The focus of the course is in the design and structure of mathematical programming models that include risk. Core to this is the understanding of primal and dual structures and the importance of Kuhn-Tucker conditions in the economic interpretation of mathematical programming solutions. Topics may include, but are not limited to 1. An introduction to linear programming and model structure 2. Portfolio choice and quadratic programming in investments and agriculture. 3. Direct Expected Utility Maximization 4. Semi-variance and non-convex models of risk.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":87, "title": "Agricultural Finance and Development", "code": "AEM 6050", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course is a seminar course dedicated to understanding the role of agricultural finance in developed and developing economies. Weekly instruction will include lectures on key issues as needed and discussion of scholarly research. Topics may include, but are not limited to: the role of credit in agricultural productivity, financial inclusion and rural transformation, the role of microcredit in agricultural development, agricultural credit policies, risk and credit.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":88, "title": "Risk Simulation and Monte Carlo Methods", "code": "AEM 6061", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Risk Simulation and Monte Carlo Methods deals with the concepts of randomness and risk in financial management, project analysis, capital budgeting, stock valuations, derivatives, and investment portfolios. The focus of the course is on applying realistic probability models through Monte Carlo simulation and optimization to a wide variety of relevant problems in investment, agriculture and other applications. In a addition to lectures, weekly seminars will This seminar will explore the development of Monte Carlo simulation from a historical point of view, examine in greater detail stochastic processes, and understand the basic structure of Ito processes and the stochastic calculus and how to employ these techniques in Monte Carlo simulations.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":89, "title": "Business and Management Fundamentals for STEM Graduate Students", "code": "AEM 6145", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Basic business and management skills are necessary to advance your career no matter what area of STEM discipline you plan to pursue. The purpose of this course is to provide the skills necessary to present a strong business case for any new biomedical or life science technology. Like any foreign language, \"business eeze\" has its own vocabulary, grammar principles and culture. The course will be presented in a similar fashion utilizing STEM case studies to emphasize and immerse the student in business and managerial principles.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":90, "title": "Policy Analysis: Welfare Theory, Agriculture, and Trade", "code": "AEM 6300", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The first half of the course surveys the theory of welfare economics as a foundation for public policy analysis. Major issues addressed include the problem of social welfare measurement, the choice of welfare criteria, and the choice of market or nonmarket allocation. Basic concepts covered include measurement of welfare change, including the compensation principle, consumer and producer surplus, willingness-to-pay measures, externalities, and the general theory of second-best optima. The second half focuses on public policy analysis as applied to domestic agricultural policy and international trade. The domestic policy component examines major U.S. farm commodity programs and related food and macroeconomic policies and analyzes their effects on producers, consumers, and other groups. The international trade component examines the structure of world agricultural trade, analytical concepts of trade policy analysis, and the principal trade policies employed by countries in international markets.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":91, "title": "Entrepreneurial Strategy for Technology Ventures", "code": "AEM 6385", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course explores the fundamental strategy concepts and tools needed to manage a technology-based entrepreneurial business. Through this course, students will develop an ability to think strategically about the choices facing technology ventures, including how to choose between different markets, technologies, and business models, how to identify and develop the resources and capabilities required to commercialize new technologies, whether to compete or cooperate with incumbent firms, and how to protect ideas in competitive markets. This is not a course in how to start a business or how write a business plan. Instead, the emphasis is on the acquisition and application of the analytical tools critical for the development of an entrepreneurial strategy. This course is relevant to students interested in founding or working in technology ventures, as well as careers in consulting and venture capital.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":92, "title": "Research Methods in International Development", "code": "AEM 6390", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is a research methods course that uses basic statistics and quantitative techniques to analyze selected topics in international development. The aim of this course is to expose students to the various methodologies used by researchers in the field of international development: (i) core concepts such as poverty and inequality measurement (use of basic statistics); distributive justice (use of basic game theory) and governance issues in developing economies (use of basic public economics/welfare theorems/voting theories) and (ii) study of specific topics that are at the frontier of international development research where students will be required to gather data, design surveys and use basic econometrics tools in their assignments. Graduate students will be required to undertake an original survey, write an analysis of their findings, and present their research to the class.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":93, "title": "Technology Strategy", "code": "AEM 6395", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course introduces the fundamental strategy concepts and tools that enable firms to manage technological innovations for competitive advantage. It does so by first considering the sources of technological change and how to leverage technologies to create firm value. It then examines the various mechanisms for extracting value from technologies, both legal (e.g., patents, trade secrecy, etc.) and strategic (e.g., lead time, complementary assets, etc.). We will explore the fundamentals of technology strategy through readings and case studies in both established and entrepreneurial firms across a range of technology-based industries. This course is designed for students who intend to pursue careers in entrepreneurship, consulting, new product development and finance where new technologies and intellectual property are important sources of competitive advantage.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":94, "title": "Commodity Futures and Options", "code": "AEM 6410", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course focuses on markets for agricultural futures and options contracts. Lectures address hedging and risk management with futures and options as well as the structure of risk and random walks.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":95, "title": "Food and Consumer Packaged Goods Industry Dynamics", "code": "AEM 6480", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Covers merchandising principles and practices as they apply to food industry situations. Examines the various elements of merchandising such as buying, pricing, advertising, promotion, display, store layout, profit planning and control, and merchandising strategy. Considers the consequences of food industry trends and initiatives for other industry members, public policy makers, and consumers. A 3-4 page (max) report on each of the Guest Speaker presentations focusing on identifying links to behavioral economics principles and solutions to problems/issues raised by the speaker is required. Students will also meet outside class to discuss guest speaker presentations in the context of their own ongoing projects.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":96, "title": "Economics of Food and Malnutrition", "code": "AEM 6485", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course focused on the economics of food and malnutrition from the perspective of individuals and households; that is, a micro-economic approach. Topics include characteristics and constraints associated with food production in both developed and developing countries; the determinants of household food security; the social and economic causes and consequences of undernutrition; the social and economic causes and consequences of obesity; intervention design to reduce food insecurity, undernutrition and obesity.", "tags": "D-AG|SBA-HE|AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":97, "title": "Natural Resources and Economic Development", "code": "AEM 6600", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Examines selected topics in natural resources, agriculture and economic development, technology assessment, ecosystem management and the environment, with a focus on developing countries. Topics include production, poverty, and environmental trade-offs; sustainable technology development; ecosystems and agro-ecosystems; valuation of ecosystem services, and PES programs; trade and environment linkages; economics of conservation and development; and alternative methodologies for analyzing these interactions. Readings emphasize the economic literature, but also draw from the biophysical sciences, ecosystem management, and the broader social sciences.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":98, "title": "Development Economics", "code": "AEM 6620", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course introduces students to the key theories, canonical papers, and current frontiers in the microeconomics of international development. Most of our time will be spent reading, analyzing, and discussing empirical research, as that reflects the current priorities of the field and the interests of most students. Theory will also play an important role. As we move through topics, we will read and discuss the key theoretical models that motivate empirical research in the microeconomics of international development.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":99, "title": "Empirical Methods for Applied Economists", "code": "AEM 6850", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The course introduces students to various empirical methods and practices necessary to conduct applied research and analysis in microeconomics in a data-rich world. The course format is \"hands on\" and students will conduct most of their work on computers in R. Students will be graded on 1- participation, 2- weekly empirical exercises and 3- final project (chosen by the student). Topics covered include: 1- basics of R programming 2- efficient coding practices for replication, team work and debugging 3- data gathering and manipulation 4- effective data visualization 5- basic analysis of spatial data and networks 6- numerical methods (Monte Carlo simulations, bootstrapping techniques).", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":100, "title": "Graduate Special Topics in Applied Economics and Management", "code": "AEM 6940", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the beginning of the semester.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":101, "title": "Perspectives in International Development", "code": "AEM 6960", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "A variety of speakers present seminars on international development topics relating to sustainable development throughout the world. Students attend each seminar and submit a five-page essay at the end of the semester reflecting on the speakers' presentations and analyzing connections between topics.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":102, "title": "Supervised Graduate Teaching Experience", "code": "AEM 6980", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Designed to give graduate students teaching experience through involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of departmental faculty members. The experience may include leading discussion sections, preparing, assisting in, or teaching lectures and laboratories, and tutoring. Students are expected to actually teach at least one hour per week for each credit awarded. Students may not receive both pay and credit for the same hours of preparation and teaching.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":103, "title": "M.P.S. Research", "code": "AEM 6990", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Students complete a problem solving project addressing practical issues in applied economics and/or management.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":104, "title": "Research and Methods II", "code": "AEM 6992", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Applying economic concepts to managerial decisions addressing substantive issues requires operationalization of concepts, finding appropriate samples of a population from which to generalize, and determining the causal inferences that can be draw from any relationships observed. This core course for MPS students mentors students through the execution of practical research projects. Students will work in teams and focus will be given to effective research strategies and effective communication of results and progress.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":105, "title": "CEMS Masters in International Management Project", "code": "AEM 6993", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The CEMS Masters in International Management Project requires students to work in culturally and functionally diverse teams to solve real international business strategy and management problems for actual organizations engaged in activities that span national borders. Student teams are matched with corporate and social partners and given a consulting assignment, which the teams resolve with interaction with their corporate and social partners and supervision from the professor. In addition to the actual consulting work, the course includes a set of skill building and debriefing meetings referring to information acquisition and analysis, critical thinking in an organizational environment, consulting practice, project management, and processes of team formation and management. The result of the project is a comprehensive report and formal presentation to the corporate or social partner.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":106, "title": "Individual Study in Applied Economics and Management", "code": "AEM 7000", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Used for special projects designed by faculty members. More than one topic may be given each semester in different sections. Student must register in section appropriate to topic being covered; section number is provided by instructor.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":107, "title": "Applied Microeconomics III: Applied General Equilibrium Analysis", "code": "AEM 7021", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is a semester-long course on general equilibrium theory and its applications, in- tended for doctoral students who plan to conduct research using the tools of microe- conomics and general equilibrium. The objectives of this course are three-fold: (i) to provide students with a systematic grounding in the fundamentals of general equilibrium modeling, (ii) to prepare students to use these tools in their own research, and (iii) to expose students to a broad (though necessarily selective) array of topical areas in which general equilibrium modeling is at the research frontier.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":108, "title": "Graduate Seminar", "code": "AEM 7030", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Students are exposed to the cutting edge research by visiting lecturers in applied economics and management. Additional lectures cover important skills for success in graduate study in applied economics and management.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":109, "title": "Econometrics I", "code": "AEM 7100", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is an applied econometrics course with an extensive \"hands-on\" approach. Covers linear and discrete choice models and estimation methods such as GMM and MLE. Programming using Stata or Matlab is expected.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":110, "title": "Dynamic Optimization", "code": "AEM 7130", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This is an applied course in computation for economists. The course covers an introduction to coding, version control, rootfinding, optimization, function approximation, high dimensional estimation problems, and methods for approximating and estimating dynamic models. Programming in Julia, Python, or R is expected.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":111, "title": "Applied Microeconomic Research II", "code": "AEM 7151", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":112, "title": "Resource Economics", "code": "AEM 7500", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course covers analytic methods for analyzing optimal control theory problems; analytic and numerical methods for solving dynamic programming problems; numerical methods for solving stochastic dynamic programming problems; structural econometric models of static games of incomplete information; structural econometric models of single-agent dynamic optimization problems; structural econometric models of multi-agent dynamic games; and advanced topics in dynamic structural econometric modeling including unobserved heterogeneity, identification, partial identification, and machine learning. The course also covers economic applications of these methods that are relevant to the environment, energy, natural resources, agriculture, development, management, finance, marketing, industrial organization, and business economics. These applications include firm investment, nonrenewable resource extraction, optimal economic growth, fisheries, subsistence agriculture, investment under uncertainty, optimal stopping, (S,s) policies, petroleum production, water management, environmental policy, engine replacement, nuclear energy, wind energy, land use, rural labor supply, incentive schemes, health, and education. The methods covered in the course enable one to analyze the strategic and dynamic decision-making behavior of individuals, households, organizations, firms, and countries; to analyze how different institutions and policies (and changes in these institutions and policies) affect this behavior and its outcome; and to design institutions and policies so that the decision-making behavior and outcome that are realized increase net benefits to society.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":113, "title": "Environmental Economics", "code": "AEM 7510", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The objective of this course is to provide a graduate-level survey of the two prevailing contemporary themes in environmental economics: the measurement of the demand for environmental resources as input into benefit-cost analyses, and the design of incentive-based, cost-effective policy instruments to achieve environmental goals. Core topics include market failure, conceptual foundations for valuing changes in environmental quality, empirical applications of nonmarket valuation methods, and cost-effective market mechanism design for reducing pollution. Additional topics include information asymmetries and mechanism design for nonpoint source pollution, and international/global environmental issues.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":114, "title": "Microeconomics of International Development", "code": "AEM 7620", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Focuses on models of individual, household, firm/farm, and market behavior in low- and middle-income developing economies. Topics include agricultural land, labor, and financial institutions; technology adoption; food security and nutrition; risk management; intra-household analysis; reciprocity networks; and product/factor markets analysis. Emphasizes empirical research.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":115, "title": "Development Microeconomics Graduate Research Seminar", "code": "AEM 7650", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Graduate students and the instructor present draft research proposals, papers, and preliminary thesis results for group review and discussion. Students who actively participate by offering written and oral comments on others' work receive 1 credit. Students who also present their own proposal or paper receive 2 credits. Presentations last 75 minutes and thus represent a substantial investment of time. Students who present a second proposal or paper receive 3 credits.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":116, "title": "Advanced Graduate Research Workshop", "code": "AEM 7675", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "This course showcases academic research presentations by students in the fourth year of the AEM PhD program. Attendance by first- and fourth-year students is required and active participation is expected. The course has two primary goals. 1- to provide detail feedback to presenters on the form and substance of their academic talks in preparation for the job market, and 2- to provide first-year students with an idea of what would be expected of them a few years later.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":117, "title": "Sustainable Environment, Energy and Resource Economics Research Seminar", "code": "AEM 7852", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "The goal of this weekly seminar is to provide a formal and organized venue for PhD students and faculty to interact and discuss\nresearch on environmental, energy and resource economics and the economics of sustainability, and to be exposed to the frontier\nin the area.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":118, "title": "Graduate-Level Thesis Research", "code": "AEM 7900", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only before A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":119, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "AEM 8900", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":120, "title": "Doctoral-Level Thesis Research", "code": "AEM 9900", "subject": "AEM", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "AEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":121, "title": "Lasers and Photonics", "code": "AEP 1100", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Lasers have had an enormous impact on communications, medicine, remote sensing, and material processing. This course reviews the properties of light that are essential to understanding the underlying principles of lasers and these photonic technologies. There also is a strong, hands-on laboratory component in which the students build and operate a nitrogen laser and participate in several demonstration experiments such as holography, laser processing of materials, optical tweezers, and fiber optics.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":122, "title": "Physics II: Electricity and Magnetism", "code": "AEP 2170", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Second in a three semester introductory physics sequence. Explores quantitative modeling of the physical world through a study of electricity and magnetism. More mathematical and abstract than a typical introductory electricity and magnetism course. Topics include electrostatics, behavior of matter in electric fields, circuits, magnetic fields, Faraday's law, AC circuits, and electromagnetic waves. Makes substantial use of vector calculus. At the level of Electricity and Magnetism by Purcell.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":123, "title": "Engineering Quantum Information Hardware", "code": "AEP 2550", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "This course examines the physical hardware of quantum information processing, quantum communication, and quantum sensing technologies. Topics include an analysis of qubit attributes and an introduction to the operational principles of physical qubits. Specific systems will include photonic circuits, trapped ions, superconducting quantum circuits, isolated solid-state spins and quantum dots.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":124, "title": "Introductory Mathematical Physics", "code": "AEP 3200", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Covers review of vector analysis, tensor calculus, Dirac Delta functions, complex variable theory, Cauchy-Rieman conditions, complex Taylor and Laurent series, Cauchy integral formula and residue techniques, conformal mapping, calculus of variations, Fourier Series.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":125, "title": "Intermediate Electromagnetism", "code": "AEP 3550", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Intermediate-level course on electromagnetic theory with a focus on statics. Vector calculus, electrostatics, conductors, dielectric materials, boundary conditions, solutions to Laplace's equation, magnetostatics, quasistatic conditions, Maxwell equations, Poynting theorem, Maxwell Stress tensor, EM wave, polarization, energy, momentum. Emphasis is on developing proficiency with analytical techniques and intuitive understanding of fundamental electromagnetism.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":126, "title": "Intermediate Quantum Mechanics", "code": "AEP 3620", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Continuation of AEP 3610\u00a0covering more advanced material in quantum mechanics. Topics include operator formalism and matrix representation, angular momentum and spin, the hydrogen atom, techniques for solving Schrodinger's equation including perturbation theory, two- and three-level systems, interaction with radiation, and identical particles.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":127, "title": "Electronic Circuits", "code": "AEP 3630", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Practical electronics as encountered in a scientific or engineering research/development environment. Analyze, design, build, and test circuits using discrete components and integrated circuits. Analog circuits: resistors, capacitors, operational amplifiers, feedback amplifiers, oscillators, comparators, passive and active filters, diodes, and transistor switches and amplifiers. Digital circuits: combinational and sequential logic (gates, flipflops, registers, counters, timers), analog to digital (ADC) and digital to analog (DAC) conversion, signal averaging, and computer architecture and interfacing. Additional topics may include analog and digital signal processing, light wave communications, transducers, noise reduction techniques, and computer-aided circuit design. At the level of Art of Electronics by Horowitz and Hill.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":128, "title": "Intermediate Mathematical Physics", "code": "AEP 4200", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Covers Fourier and Laplace transforms, ordinary and partial differential equations, separation of variables, Method of Frobenius, Laplace transform techniques. Green's functions, wave and diffusion equations, Solutions to Laplace's Equation, Hermitian Operators, Sturm-Liouville operators, Bessel functions, Legendre Polynomials, spherical harmonics.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":129, "title": "Advanced Mathematical Physics", "code": "AEP 4300", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Covers integral equations, Friedholm equations, kernels, complex variable theory, branch points and cuts, Riemann sheets, method of steepest descent, method of constant phase, tensors, contravariant and covariant representations, group theory, matrix representations, class and character.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":130, "title": "Fluid and Continuum Mechanics", "code": "AEP 4340", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Intro to elasticity (including stress and strain tensors and their linear relations for isotropic materials), very brief intro to plastic deformation, fluid properties and some hydrostatics, conservation laws with applications (including pipes), dimensional analysis, vorticity, ideal flow (including forms of Bernoulli equations and potential flow), flow past objects (including boundary layers, drag, lift, and model aerofoils), instabilities, a brief introduction to turbulence (including Reynolds stress from time averaging), some topics in compressible flow (including choking and shock waves).", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":131, "title": "Nonlinear and Quantum Optics", "code": "AEP 4400", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Introduction to the fundamentals of the interaction of laser light with matter, including a survey of phenomena and photonic devices based on these processes with relevance to modern science and technology. Topics include the origins of optical nonlinearities, propagation of laser beams and ultrashort pulses, harmonic generation, parametric amplification, nonlinearly guided waves and self-focusing, solitons, spontaneous and stimulated scattering, optical resonance and two-level atoms, multiphoton processes, and ultra-intense laser-matter interactions.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":132, "title": "Introduction to Controlled Fusion: Principles and Technology", "code": "AEP 4840", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Introduction to the physical principles and various engineering aspects underlying power generation by controlled fusion. Topics include fuels and conditions required for fusion power and basic fusion-reactor concepts; fundamental aspects of plasma physics relevant to fusion plasmas and basic engineering problems for a fusion reactor; and an engineering analysis of proposed magnetic and/or inertial confinement fusion-reactor designs.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":133, "title": "Independent Study in Engineering Physics", "code": "AEP 4900", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Laboratory or theoretical work in any branch of engineering physics under the direction of a member of the faculty. The study can take a number of forms; for example, design of laboratory apparatus, performance of laboratory measurements, computer simulation or software developments, theoretical design and analysis. Details TBD with respective faculty member.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":134, "title": "Independent Study for Honors", "code": "AEP 4910", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Laboratory or theoretical work in any branch of engineering physics under the direction of a member of the faculty. The study can take a number of forms; for example, design of laboratory apparatus, performance of laboratory measurements, computer simulation or software developments, theoretical design and analysis. A written report, an oral presentation and at least a grade of A- is required for successful completion of the Engineering Physics honors requirement.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":135, "title": "Symmetry in Materials Physics", "code": "AEP 5510", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "This course concerns various phenomena occurring in low-symmetry, dispersive media, i.e.,those lacking space-inversion (I), or time-reversal (T), or both, or having only TI. This is of renewed interest due to its relevance to novel Hall/topological effects (e.g., AHE, Chiral anomaly, bulk photocurrents) and to novel functionalities (magnetoelectricity, current-induced magnetism). Emphasis will be on the symmetry of the constitutive relations, and in particular how electric, magnetic, and toroidal multipole-order mediates/induces novel couplings. Throughout the course I will connect atomic-response Cartesian tensors that one usually sees in chemistry literature, which provide simple & intuitive pictures, to calculable (via Kubo), irreducible tensors of the solid-state.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":136, "title": "Nanocharacterization", "code": "AEP 6610", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Graduate-level introduction to the tools used to image and probe optical, electronic, chemical, and mechanical properties at the atomic and nano scales.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":137, "title": "M.Eng. Project", "code": "AEP 7510", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Independent study under the direction of a member of the university faculty. Students participate in an independent research project through work on a special problem related to their field of interest. A formal and complete research report is required.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":138, "title": "Special Topics in Applied Physics", "code": "AEP 7540", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Special topics in applied science, with focus on areas of applied physics and engineering that are of current interest. Subjects chosen are presented in a seminar format by the students. A major goal of this course is to provide training and experience planning, preparing, and presenting proposals, progress reports, technical talks, and research papers.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":139, "title": "Graduate Thesis", "code": "AEP 8200", "subject": "AEP", "descr": "Thesis research for engineering physics graduate students.", "tags": "AEP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":140, "title": "Internship in Agricultural Sciences", "code": "AGSCI 4960", "subject": "AGSCI", "descr": "In this experiential learning opportunity, students participate in an agriculturally-related work and learning experience equivalent to a minimum of six weeks of full-time effort. Internships and learning goals are arranged in consultation with the Agricultural Sciences Coordinator by the student in conjunction with an internship faculty advisor and the internship host. Details are outlined in a learning agreement. All AGSCI 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at cals.cornell.edu/academics/student-research/internship.", "tags": "AGSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":141, "title": "Indigenous Issues in Global Perspectives", "code": "AIIS 1110", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "This course attends to the contemporary issues, contexts and experiences of Indigenous peoples. Students will develop a substantive understanding of colonialism and engage in the parallels and differences of its histories, forms, and effects on Indigenous peoples globally. Contemporary Indigenous theorists, novelists, visual artists and historians have a prominent place in the course, highlighting social/environmental philosophies, critical responses to and forms of resistance toward neocolonial political and economic agendas and the fundamental concern for Indigenous self determination, among other topics.", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":142, "title": "Indigenous Ingenuities as Living Networks", "code": "AIIS 2100", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "This course explores Haudenosaunee (Iroquois) knowledge and its application across the disciplines and through time. In particular, it offers a glimpse into Cornell's local indigenous culture through Haudenosaunee understanding of themselves as a unique people, maintaining traditional teachings and fulfilling ancient responsibilities in the world. Students will engage multiple primary sources including: art, archives, material and expressive culture and interact with Haudenosaunee knowledge holders, intellectuals, and elders.", "tags": "CA-AG|KCM-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":143, "title": "Native American Languages", "code": "AIIS 2240", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "This course explores the wide variety of languages indigenous to the Americas. There were thousands of languages spoken in the Americas before the arrival of Europeans and hundreds of these languages are still spoken today. We will look at several of these languages in terms of their linguistic structure as well as from social, historical, and political perspectives. No prior linguistic background is required and no previous knowledge of any Native American languages is presumed.", "tags": "CA-AG|SBA-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":144, "title": "Everything You Know About Indians is Wrong: Unlearning Native American History", "code": "AIIS 2660", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "One thing many Americans think they know is their Indians: Pocahontas, the First Thanksgiving, fighting cowboys, reservation poverty, and casino riches. Under our very noses, however, Native American history has evolved into one of the most exciting, dynamic, and contentious fields of inquiry into America's past. It is now safer to assume, as Comanche historian Paul Chaat Smith has pointed out, that everything you know about Indians is in fact wrong. Most people have much to \"unlearn\" about Native American history before true learning can take place. This course aims to achieve that end by (re)introducing students to key themes and trends in the history of North America's indigenous nations. Employing an issues-oriented approach, the course stresses the ongoing complexity of Native American societies' engagements with varieties of settler colonialism since 1492 and dedicates itself to a concerted program of myth-busting. As such, the course will provide numerous opportunities for students to develop their critical thinking and reading skills.", "tags": "D-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":145, "title": "Indigenous Representation in Still and Motion Photography", "code": "AIIS 2850", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "From the moments of contact, the representation of Indigenous peoples posed problems. This course will examine still and motion photographic practices within colonial contexts. These modes of representation will be analyzed in relation to political and economic power, in both their constraining and potentially liberating aspects.", "tags": "CA-AG|LA-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":146, "title": "Cayuga Language and Culture II", "code": "AIIS 3325", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "A continuation of LING 3324, with further exploration of Cayuga (Gayogo\u0331h\u00f3\ua789n\u01eb\u02bc) language and culture. Language instruction continues in an immersive learning environment with a focus on plants and growing in the spring.", "tags": "AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":147, "title": "Culture, Politics, and Environment in the Circumpolar North", "code": "AIIS 3422", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "This course examines the cultures and histories of the circumpolar North. The primary emphasis is on the North American Arctic and Subarctic with some attention to northern Eurasia for comparative purposes. The focus is on the indigenous peoples of the region and the socio-political and ecological dimensions of their evolving relationships with southern industrial societies.", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":148, "title": "Thinking from a Different Place: Indigenous Philosophies", "code": "AIIS 3560", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "The Western nation-state has failed to solve the two most pressing, indeed catastrophic, global problems: poverty and climate change. This failure is due to the inability of national policy to imagine a world beyond a boundary drawn by the formative capitalist ideas of property, production, and profit. The course will begin by discussing the historical origin and continuing force of these ideas while raising questions about their limits. Then it will look at a range of alternative ideas about how the world should work if we want to keep it socially, economically, and ecologically in balance. The alternatives we will query come from a range of Indigenous writers of fiction, poetry, and theory, who locate themselves in Native American (north and south), Aboriginal, and Maori communities.", "tags": "D-AG|LA-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":149, "title": "Critical Approaches to American Indian and Indigenous Studies: Intellectual History", "code": "AIIS 4000", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "An interdisciplinary survey of the literature in Native American Studies. Readings engage themes of indigeneity, coloniality, power, and \"resistance.\" The syllabus is formed from some \"classic\" and canonical works in Native American Studies but also requires an engagement with marginal writings and theoretical and historical contributions from scholars in other disciplines.", "tags": "CA-AG|HA-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":150, "title": "Contemporary Native American Fiction", "code": "AIIS 4625", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "If you haven't read contemporary U.S. American Indian fiction, then it might be fair to ask how much you know about the United States, its origins and its current condition. Since the 1960s, American Indians have been producing a significant body of award-wining novels and short stories. In 1969, for example, N. Scott Momaday, from the Kiowa nation, won the Pulitzer Prize for his novel House Made of Dawn and in 2012 Louise Erdrich, who is Anishinaabe, won the National Book Award for her novel The Round House. In between these two notable moments and since we can list an impressive number of Native storytellers whose work is aesthetically powerful, offering us a narrative of the United States that counters the official history. Centrally the course will focus on the various formal approaches Native writers take from surrealism to realism in representing the (post)colonial situation of Indian country and the ongoing resistance in Indian country to the U.S. legal and political regime.", "tags": "CA-AG|LA-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":151, "title": "Haudenosaunee - New York State Relations", "code": "AIIS 4770", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "The Haudenosaunee (People of the Longhouse) have occupied present-day New York State and Southern Ontario for hundreds of years. Over the years, the Haudenosaunee have lost nearly all of their historic lands along with regional political power and wealth. Leading this predatory effort has been the colony and state of New York. This course is focused on the modern-day relationship between the Haudenosaunee and New York State. The first three weeks of the course will introduce students to the historical relationship. Four weeks will be dedicated to the exploration of foundation legal and political principles. And the remaining 8 weeks will focus on case studies of contemporary issues and conflicts. Students will be graded based on class participation and completion of a research paper. Undergraduate students will be expected to write a 20-page paper and graduate students a 30-page paper.", "tags": "AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":152, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "AIIS 4970", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "Topic and credit hours TBA between faculty member and student.", "tags": "AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":153, "title": "Critical Approaches to American Indian and Indigenous Studies: Intellectual History", "code": "AIIS 6000", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "An interdisciplinary survey of the literature in Native American Studies. Readings engage themes of indigeneity, coloniality, power, and \"resistance.\" The syllabus is formed from some \"classic\" and canonical works in Native American Studies but also requires an engagement with marginal writings and theoretical and historical contributions from scholars in other disciplines.", "tags": "AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":154, "title": "Native American Languages", "code": "AIIS 6240", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "This course explores the wide variety of languages indigenous to the Americas. There were thousands of languages spoken in the Americas before the arrival of Europeans and hundreds of these languages are still spoken today. We will look at several of these languages in terms of their linguistic structure as well as from social, historical, and political perspectives. No prior linguistic background is required and no previous knowledge of any Native American languages is presumed.", "tags": "CA-AG|SBA-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":155, "title": "Culture, Politics, and Environment in the Circumpolar North", "code": "AIIS 6422", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "This course examines the cultures and histories of the circumpolar North. The primary emphasis is on the North American Arctic and Subarctic with some attention to northern Eurasia for comparative purposes. The focus is on the indigenous peoples of the region and the socio-political and ecological dimensions of their evolving relationships with southern industrial societies.", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":156, "title": "Haudenosaunee - New York State Relations", "code": "AIIS 6770", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "The Haudenosaunee (People of the Longhouse) have occupied present-day New York State and Southern Ontario for hundreds of years. Over the years, the Haudenosaunee have lost nearly all of their historic lands along with regional political power and wealth. Leading this predatory effort has been the colony and state of New York. This course is focused on the modern-day relationship between the Haudenosaunee and New York State. The first three weeks of the course will introduce students to the historical relationship. Four weeks will be dedicated to the exploration of foundation legal and political principles. And the remaining 8 weeks will focus on case studies of contemporary issues and conflicts. Students will be graded based on class participation and completion of a research paper. Undergraduate students will be expected to write a 20-page paper and graduate students a 30-page paper.", "tags": "AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":157, "title": "Independent Study in American Indian and Indigenous Studies", "code": "AIIS 6970", "subject": "AIIS", "descr": "A student may, with approval of a faculty advisor, study a problem or topic not covered in a regular course or may undertake tutorial study of an independent nature in an area of interest in American Indian and Indigenous Studies.", "tags": "AIIS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":158, "title": "Heritage and Values of the United States Air Force II", "code": "AIRS 1102", "subject": "AIRS", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 1101. This is a survey course designed to introduce students to the United States Air Force and provides an overview of the basic characteristics, missions, and organization of the Air Force.", "tags": "AIRS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":159, "title": "Initial Military Experiences II", "code": "AIRS 1142", "subject": "AIRS", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 1141.", "tags": "AIRS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":160, "title": "Team and Leadership Fundamentals II", "code": "AIRS 2202", "subject": "AIRS", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 2201. This course focuses on laying the foundation for teams and leadership. The topics include skills that will allow cadets to improve their leadership on a personal level and within a team. The courses will prepare cadets for their field training experience where they will be able to put the concepts learned into practice. The purpose is to instill a leadership mindset and to motivate sophomore students to transition from AFROTC cadet to AFROTC officer candidate.", "tags": "AIRS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":161, "title": "Intermediate Military Experiences II", "code": "AIRS 2242", "subject": "AIRS", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 2241.", "tags": "AIRS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":162, "title": "National Security Affairs: Preparation for Active Duty II", "code": "AIRS 4402", "subject": "AIRS", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 4401. This course is designed for college seniors and gives them the foundation to understand their role as military officers in American society. It is an overview of the complex social and political issues facing the military profession and requires a measure of sophistication commensurate with the senior college level. The final semester provides information that will prepare the cadets for Active Duty.", "tags": "AIRS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":163, "title": "Precommissioning Laboratory", "code": "AIRS 4442", "subject": "AIRS", "descr": "Factors that facilitate transition from civilian to military life are reviewed. The need for military security, base services and activities, personal finances, travel regulations, and social obligations are introduced.", "tags": "AIRS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":164, "title": "Veteran's Seminar", "code": "ALS 1100", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "Many Veterans experience challenges when transitioning from the military to civilian life, and from a community college to Cornell University. The seemingly disconnected and unstructured environment of a large, Ivy League university can further exacerbate these challenges and result in student Veterans not taking advantage of all the opportunities available to them in college. ALS 1100 is a seminar that aims to assist Veteran students during the transition from military service or smaller college experience to collegiate life at Cornell and later, a civilian career. Students will engage in experiential learning opportunities, reflections, excursions, discussions, and seminars aimed at helping them explore their transition to Cornell, academic opportunities and various available resources on campus and in the local community.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":165, "title": "Information Chaos: Navigating Today's Information Landscape", "code": "ALS 1200", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "In 1987, a weekday edition of the New York Times contained more information than the average person was likely to encounter in a lifetime in seventeenth-century England. Now more than 30 years later, it is hard to imagine how much more information we encounter in our daily lives. Access to quality information is at the heart of an informed and engaged citizenry, yet as more information floods the information landscape, worrisome information also spreads. What makes information worrisome? What makes it valuable? This course includes the theoretical, methodological and practical concepts and skills needed to understand and evaluate today's vast information landscape. The course will focus primarily on information systems in the U.S., although several prominent examples of international information systems will also be included.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":166, "title": "CALS Global Fellows Program Pre-engagement Course", "code": "ALS 2300", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "This course is designed to equip CALS Global Fellows with the tools and knowledge to be prepared, effective, and cross-culturally competent during their summer internship placement abroad (and beyond). The course will encourage students to critically reflect on the objectives of an international experience and how it can influence academic and personal development. We will explore the invisible boundaries of working in global business and NGO settings and examine cultural intelligence and cross-cultural dynamics, encouraging students to develop as future leaders in a variety of environments.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":167, "title": "Developing a Reflective Tutoring Practice", "code": "ALS 2400", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "This course provides tutors with an opportunity to reflect on and refine their own tutoring practice, in the context of literature and theory about peer teaching and learning in an inclusive environment. Participants complete readings, participate in group discussions with hands-on practice and role-playing, conduct peer observations and debrief about those observations, and practice reflective journaling. Most sessions include discussion or sharing of e-Portfolios. Topics discussed in class include developing an active, student-centered tutoring practice, fostering a growth mindset and enhancing resilience in tutors and tutees, managing the unexpected, problem-solving, leading groups, and communicating productively across difference.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":168, "title": "New York State Government Affairs", "code": "ALS 3920", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "This course is part of the Human Ecology Capital Semester Program. Students live and work in Albany as legislative aids to a NYS Senator or Assembly Member, take a course in NYS Government, and participate in discussion forums with key legislators and policymakers. In addition, students are mentored by on-site Cornell Government Affairs staff that provides opportunities to work on legislative priorities that align with students' interests and their legislative assignments. On-site staff connect interns to state government officials working in their areas of interest, including Cornell alumni and dignitaries, advise students in their office work and internship coursework, and provide background to the policies and politics of Albany and state government, especially as it pertains to higher education and Cornell's role as a NYS Land Grant University. A relocation and living stipend is provided.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":169, "title": "Community-Based Research in DC", "code": "ALS 4100", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "In this experiential, community-based research course, Cornell in Washington program participants will design, implement, evaluate, and reflect on a semester-long community engaged research and service-learning project with an established community partner. Students will receive training and grounding in community-based research theory and practice as well as reflective learning skills. Early in the semester, students will chose from a few optional projects that they will then further co-develop with the community partner, creating clearly defined project deliverables that they will carry out through the semester. The course will meet weekly for seminar instruction to ground students' work, and then students will develop their research products and timelines, committing to 50 hours of work with the community partner.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":170, "title": "Immersion and Engagement in DC", "code": "ALS 4200", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "In this community engaged course, Cornell in Washington program participants will explore and deepen their understanding of their experiences living and working in D.C. The course will ground students' knowledge in critical social theory, place-based learning theory, and explorations of contemporary issues facing D.C. Students will also learn critical reflection techniques to further develop their knowledge and experiences while in the program. The course will consist of weekly class meetings, discussions, guest speakers, and field engagement activities.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":171, "title": "Internship in Agriculture and Life Sciences", "code": "ALS 4960", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "All 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at cals.cornell.edu/academics/student-research/internship. Students planning internships related to the discipline of a department are encouraged to enroll in the departmental internship course.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":172, "title": "Independent Study in Agriculture and Life Sciences", "code": "ALS 4970", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "Independent study for undergraduate students.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":173, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching Assistant", "code": "ALS 4980", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "Students learn and experience assisting in a course under the direction of a course instructor.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":174, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Agriculture and Life Sciences", "code": "ALS 4990", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "Independent research for undergraduate students.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":175, "title": "Career Readiness: Engaged Learning for CALS Professional Master's Students", "code": "ALS 5211", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "This course will provide CALS professional master's students with career readiness, an integral part of achieving success upon degree completion. Career readiness can be defined as the attainment and demonstration of competencies that broadly prepare graduates for a successful career transition. This course will be taught with the Engaged Learning framework, which will give students the opportunity to integrate professional development skills into career and life experiences.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":176, "title": "International Teaching Assistant Program Course", "code": "ALS 5780", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "Designed for international teaching assistants. This course focuses on oral communication, cross-cultural classroom dynamics, and teaching techniques. Through small group seminars, conferences with instructors, audio journals, and a teaching practicum, students work to expand their communication and pedagogical skills.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":177, "title": "Master of Professional Studies Project Development", "code": "ALS 5900", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "The MPS project is a degree requirement which showcases a student's knowledge on a particular topic in their field of study. This project may be an action program, the development of a plan to address a pertinent problem, the development of materials or methodology suited to the student's situation, or the development and execution of research appropriate to the profession. The project is the integration of coursework and skills acquired during the degree program.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":178, "title": "Master of Professional Studies Project Completion", "code": "ALS 5910", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "The MPS project is a degree requirement which showcases a student's knowledge on a particular topic in their field of study. The student will analyze and summarize the results of their work conducted during the development of the project. The successful completion of this course indicates the completion of the MPS project.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":179, "title": "The Practice of Teaching in Higher Education", "code": "ALS 6015", "subject": "ALS", "descr": "For the foreseeable future, higher education faces grand challenges that will call upon those in faculty positions to demonstrate a commitment to innovation, diversity, evidence-based teaching, assessment of student learning, and educational technology. This course addresses selected aspects of these challenges to better prepare current and future instructors (i.e., graduate students, teaching assistants, and post-doctoral fellows) in higher education. Course activities and assignments will allow for the exploration of learning theory, as well as the practical application of instructional design, technology, and assessment frameworks.", "tags": "ALS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":180, "title": "Introduction to American Studies", "code": "AMST 1101", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course is an introduction to interdisciplinary considerations of American culture. Specific topics may change from year to year and may include questions of national consensus versus native, immigrant and racial subcultures and countercultures; industrialization and the struggles over labor; the rise of leisure; the transformation of (the frequently gendered) public and private spheres; the relationship between politics and culture; the development and distinctions among consumer culture, mass culture and popular culture. These themes will be examined through a variety of media, such as literature, historical writing, music, art, film, architecture, etc. The course will also give attention to the many methods through which scholars have, over time, developed the discipline of American Studies.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":181, "title": "American Society through Film", "code": "AMST 1290", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Introduces students to the sociological analysis of American society through the lens of film. Major themes involve race, class, and gender; upward and downward mobility; incorporation and exclusion; small town vs the big city; and cultural conflicts over individualism, achievement, and community. We match a range of movies like American Graffiti (Lucas), Ace in the Hole (Wilder), The Asphalt Jungle (Houston), Do the Right Thing (Lee), The Heiress (Wyler), High Noon (Zinnemann), Mean Streets (Scorsese), Nashville (Altman), The Philadelphia Story (Cukor), and A Streetcar Named Desire (Kazan). Each film is paired with social scientific research that examines parallel topics, such as analyses of who goes to college, the production of news, deviant careers, urban riots, the gendered presentation of self, and the prisoner's dilemma.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":182, "title": "History of Rock Music", "code": "AMST 1312", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course examines the development and cultural significance of rock music from its origins in blues, gospel, and Tin Pan Alley up to alternative rock and hip hop. The course concludes with the year 2000.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":183, "title": "A Survey of Jazz", "code": "AMST 1313", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course addresses jazz from two perspectives: the various sounds of jazz, as well as the historical streams-musical and cultural-that have contributed to its development. Listening and writing assignments are major components of the course.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":184, "title": "Introduction to Cultural Analytics: Data, Computation, and Culture", "code": "AMST 1350", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course will prepare students in the humanities to analyze, interpret, and visualize cultural data with computational methods. After a basic introduction to the programming language Python, we will cover topics such as data collection and curation through web scraping and data retrieval, text mining, image analysis, network analysis, and data visualization. We will survey and discuss how these computational tools are applied in humanistic research. We will also reflect on the specific problems, challenges, and ethical dilemmas posed by the computational study of culture.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":185, "title": "Introduction to Africana Studies", "code": "AMST 1500", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the study of Africa, the U.S., the Caribbean and other diasporas.\u00a0 This course will examine, through a range of disciplines, among them literature, history, politics, philosophy, the themes - including race/racism, the Middle Passage, sexuality, colonialism, and culture - that have dominated Africana Studies since its inception in the late-1960s. We will explore these issues in the attempt to understand how black lives have been shaped, in a historical sense; and, of course, the effects of these issues in the contemporary moment. This course seeks to introduce these themes, to investigate through one or more of the disciplines relevant to the question, and to provide a broad understanding of the themes so as to enable the kind of intellectual reflection critical to Africana Studies.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":186, "title": "Indigenous Issues in Global Perspectives", "code": "AMST 1601", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course attends to the contemporary issues, contexts and experiences of Indigenous peoples. Students will develop a substantive understanding of colonialism and engage in the parallels and differences of its histories, forms, and effects on Indigenous peoples globally. Contemporary Indigenous theorists, novelists, visual artists and historians have a prominent place in the course, highlighting social/environmental philosophies, critical responses to and forms of resistance toward neocolonial political and economic agendas and the fundamental concern for Indigenous self determination, among other topics.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":187, "title": "From Subjects to Citizens: The Making and Unmaking of Early America", "code": "AMST 1985", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "On the eve of the American Revolution Britain administered 26 colonies\u2014not just the 13 that would become the United States. British North America's dramatic struggle for independence has led many history textbooks to read the revolution back into colonial history, focusing on those 13 North American colonies that would become the United States, often at the expense of global connections that defined the colonial and revolutionary periods. As this class will explore, key elements of early American history can only be understood through a broader perspective, from the economic growth of New England as a result of the African slave trade and exchange in the Caribbean, to the use of citizenship as a category of exclusion in response to the myriad inhabitants\u2014European, Indigenous, and African\u2014who neighbored or lived within the original 13 colonies. In this course, we will explore the history of early America from the 1490s through the 1800s from a global perspective. Voices usually peripheral to the narrative of American development, from enslaved African mariners to Spanish American nuns, will become central to processes of cultural encounter, labor exploitation, revolutionary upheavals, and state formation that shaped the making and unmaking early America.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":188, "title": "Introduction to Visual Studies", "code": "AMST 2000", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to modes of vision and the historical impact of visual images, visual structures, and visual space on culture, communication, and politics. It examines all aspects of culture that communicate through visual means, including 20th-century visual technologies\u2014photography, cinema, video, etc., and their historical corollaries. The production and consumption of images, objects, and events is studied in diverse cultures. Students develop the critical skills necessary to appreciate how the approaches that define visual studies complicate traditional models of defining and analyzing art objects.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ETM-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":189, "title": "The First American University", "code": "AMST 2001", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Educational historian Frederick Rudolph called Cornell University \"the first American university,\" referring to its unique role as a coeducational, nonsectarian, land-grant institution with a broad curriculum and diverse student body. In this course, we will explore the history of Cornell, taking as our focus the pledge of Ezra Cornell and Andrew Dickson White to found a university where \"any person can find instruction in any study.\" The course will cover a wide range of topics and perspectives relating to the faculty, student body, evolution of campus, and important events and eras in Cornell history. Stories and vignettes will provide background on the current university and its administrative structure, campus traditions, and the names that adorn buildings and memorials throughout campus. Finally, the course will offer a forum for students to address questions on present-day aspects of the university.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":190, "title": "Jim Crow and Exclusion Era in America", "code": "AMST 2042", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This seminar examines America during the overlapping eras of segregation & immigration exclusion.\u00a0 Beginning with contests over the weaning of freedom during reconstruction and running through the institution of Jim Crow legislation and immigration exclusion, the course ends with an evaluation of mid-20th century movements for civil rights and equality.\u00a0 Themes include the links between racial and economic oppression, legal and defacto restriction, everyday resistance, and struggles for equality.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":191, "title": "Indigenous Ingenuities as Living Networks", "code": "AMST 2108", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course explores Haudenosaunee (Iroquois) knowledge and its application across the disciplines and through time. In particular, it offers a glimpse into Cornell's local indigenous culture through Haudenosaunee understanding of themselves as a unique people, maintaining traditional teachings and fulfilling ancient responsibilities in the world. Students will engage multiple primary sources including: art, archives, material and expressive culture and interact with Haudenosaunee knowledge holders, intellectuals, and elders.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":192, "title": "U.S. Immigration Narratives", "code": "AMST 2251", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Americans are conflicted about immigration. We honor and celebrate (and commercialize) our immigrant heritage in museums, folklife festivals, parades, pageants, and historical monuments. We also build fences and detention centers, and pass more and more laws to bar access to the United States. Polls tell us that Americans are concerned about the capacity of the United States to absorb so many immigrants from around the world. How often have we heard the laments \"Today's immigrants are too different. They don't want to assimilate\" or \"My grandparents learned English quickly, why can't they?\" The assumption is that older generations 'Americanized' quickly but that today's immigrants do not want to assimilate. Did 19th century immigrants really migrate to the United States to \"become Americans\"? Did they really assimilate quickly? Are today's immigrants really all that different from the immigrants who arrived earlier? Why do these particular narratives have such power and currency? This seminar will explore these issues and help students discern fact from fiction.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":193, "title": "Where Fire Meets Ice: Histories of the U.S.-Canada Border Across Four Centuries", "code": "AMST 2392", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "The international boundary between Canada and the United is the longest, straightest border in the world. Although frequently cast as \"boring\" in juxtaposition to its southern counterpart, this viewpoint overlooks the U.S.-Canada border's longstanding history as a site and engine of trans-national tensions and controversies. This course addresses the complex histories of the 3,500 mile boundary separating the United States from Canada from its eighteenth century colonial antecedents to contemporary challenges related to drug smuggling, border fence construction, pandemic-related travel restrictions, immigration, commerce, environmental issues, Indigenous peoples' rights, and national identity construction. The instructor, a dual citizen of Canada and the United States, brings not only life experience of border-crossing, but also a recent background in legal testimony on border-related issues.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":194, "title": "Environmental History", "code": "AMST 2581", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This lecture course serves as an introduction to the historical study of humanity's interrelationship with the natural world. Environmental history is a quickly evolving field, taking on increasing importance as the environment itself becomes increasingly important in world affairs. During this semester, we'll examine the sometimes unexpected ways in which \"natural\" forces have shaped human history (the role of germs, for instance, in the colonization of North America); the ways in which human beings have shaped the natural world (through agriculture, urbanization, and industrialization, as well as the formation of things like wildlife preserves); and the ways in which cultural, scientific, political, and philosophical attitudes toward the environment have changed over time. This is designed as an intensely interdisciplinary course: we'll view history through the lenses of ecology, literature, art, film, law, anthropology, and geography. Our focus will be on the United States, but, just as environmental pollutants cross borders, so too will this class, especially toward the end, when we attempt to put U.S. environmental history into a geopolitical context. This course is meant to be open to all, including non-majors and first-year students.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":195, "title": "Millennial Jewish Stars: Race, Gender and Sexuality", "code": "AMST 2585", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "The rap superstar Drake, comedian Ilana Glazer, and muscleman Zac Efron are just three of the millennial Jewish stars examined in this course. We will ask how millennial Jewish stars depict Jewishness in terms of race, gender, sexuality. For instance, why has the rapper Lil Dicky chosen such an emasculating stage name, and why does Ilana Glazer embrace the outdated racial term \"Jewess?\" How do these names use historical Jewish stereotypes to fuel present-day comedy? We will trace racial, gendered, and sexual tropes about Jews from 19th-century theater to the newest YouTube sketches. We'll cluster these media around themes like women's pleasure, Jewish identity, cultural appropriation, anti-Semitism, and millennial financial struggles. We'll laugh hard, learn a lot, and see today's media through new eyes.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":196, "title": "Introduction to African American Literature", "code": "AMST 2650", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course will introduce students to the African American literary tradition. Through aesthetic and contextual approaches, we will consider how African American life and culture has defined and constituted the United States of America. From slave narratives to Hip-Hop music, we will trace the range of artistic conventions and cultural movements while paying close attention to broader historical shifts in American life over the past three centuries. We will ask: How do authors create and define a tradition? What are some of the recurring themes and motifs within this tradition? Authors will include: David Walker, Frederick Douglass, Ida B. Wells-Barnett, W.E.B. DuBois, Zora Neale Hurston, Lorraine Hansberry, James Baldwin, Toni Morrison, Claudia Rankine, and Chimamanda Adichie.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":197, "title": "Latinos in the United States", "code": "AMST 2655", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Exploration and analysis of the Hispanic experience in the United States. Examines the sociohistorical background and economic, psychological, and political factors that converge to shape a Latino group identity in the United States. Perspectives are suggested and developed for understanding Hispanic migrations, the plight of Latinos in urban and rural areas, and the unique problems faced by the diverse Latino groups. Groups studied include Mexican Americans, Dominicans, Cubans, and Puerto Ricans.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":198, "title": "Everything You Know About Indians is Wrong: Unlearning Native American History", "code": "AMST 2660", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "One thing many Americans think they know is their Indians: Pocahontas, the First Thanksgiving, fighting cowboys, reservation poverty, and casino riches. Under our very noses, however, Native American history has evolved into one of the most exciting, dynamic, and contentious fields of inquiry into America's past. It is now safer to assume, as Comanche historian Paul Chaat Smith has pointed out, that everything you know about Indians is in fact wrong. Most people have much to \"unlearn\" about Native American history before true learning can take place. This course aims to achieve that end by (re)introducing students to key themes and trends in the history of North America's indigenous nations. Employing an issues-oriented approach, the course stresses the ongoing complexity of Native American societies' engagements with varieties of settler colonialism since 1492 and dedicates itself to a concerted program of myth-busting. As such, the course will provide numerous opportunities for students to develop their critical thinking and reading skills.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":199, "title": "Cultures of the Cold War", "code": "AMST 2675", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This class aims to approach the literature and culture of the Cold War as the birth of the present \"Age of Information,\" as well as the origin of modern notions of privacy that are now being superseded. We will begin with Hiroshima and the several forms of American anti-communism, and proceed from \"containment culture\" to the beginning of the counterculture, and from atomic weapons to the start of the environmental movement. Units of study will include intelligence (espionage), advertising (publicity), civil rights, and the public questioning of gender roles.\u00a0 We will also view a few films and discuss music and painting of the period. Authors include James Baldwin, Sylvia Plath, Marshall McLuhan, John Okada, Jack Kerouac, Frank O'Hara, Patricia Highsmith, and Rachel Carson.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":200, "title": "The United States in the 1960s and 1970s", "code": "AMST 2682", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This lecture course explores the dramatic cultural, economic, and social upheavals in U.S. society during the 1960s and 1970s. It will primarily focus on the dynamic interactions between formal politics, the state, the economy, and the era's mass movements on the right and the left. Among other things, we will explore the history and legacy of the Civil Rights and Black Power Movements, the Vietnam War, deindustrialization, \"white flight,\" the War on Poverty, the War on Crime, Watergate, the \"rise of the right,\" and women's changing roles.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":201, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "AMST 2710", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course is a blending of the Sociology of Education and Public Policy. Front and center in this course is the question of why consistent differential educational and economic outcomes exists in American society. We explore the broad sociological functions of schooling (socialization, sorting, caretaking, training) as well as local, state, and federal policies and court decisions.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":202, "title": "Introduction to Latina/o/x Performance", "code": "AMST 2725", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Latina/o/x Performance investigating the historical and contemporary representations of Latina/o/xs in performance and media. Throughout the semester, students will critically examine central themes and issues that inform the experiences and (re) presentations of Latina/o/xs in the United States. How is latinidad performed? In situating the class around \"Latina/o/x,\" as both an umbrella term and an enacted social construction, we will then turn our attention to (re) presentations of latinidad within different genres of cultural expressions.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":203, "title": "Jewish Films and Filmmakers: Hollywood and Beyond", "code": "AMST 2790", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "What does it mean to call a film is \"Jewish\"? Does it have to represent Jewish life? Does it have to feature characters identifiable as Jews? If artists who identify as Jews\u2014actors, directors, screenwriters, composers\u2014play significant roles in a film's production does that make it Jewish? Our primary point of entry into these questions will be Hollywood, from the industry's early silent films, through the period generally considered classical, down to the present day. We will also study films produced overseas, in countries that may include Israel, Egypt, France, Italy, and Germany. Our discussions will be enriched by contextual material drawn from film studies, cultural studies, Jewish studies, American studies, and other related fields. Students will be expected to view a significant number of films outside of class\u2014an average of one per week\u2014and engage with them through writing and in-class discussion. The directors, screenwriters, composers, and actors whose work we will study may include: Charlie Chaplin, Irving Berlin, Al Jolson, Fanny Brice, Billy Wilder, Barbra Streisand, Woody Allen, Mel Brooks, Aviva Kempner, Joan Micklin Silver, the Marx Brothers, and the Coen Brothers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":204, "title": "Monuments, Museums, and Memory: An Introduction to Public History", "code": "AMST 2792", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "In this course we will examine how we have come to narrate social, cultural, and political history in the United States, investigating the ways scholarly, curatorial, archival, and creative practices shape conceptions of the American past, in particular understandings of racial, gender, sexual, and class oppression and resistance. Students will build skills in historical interpretation and archival research and explore possibilities and challenges in preserving and presenting the past in a variety of public contexts\u2014monuments, memorials, museums, historical sites, movies and television, and community-based history projects. For their final project, students will conduct original research in a digital or material archive, chosen in consultation with the instructor, to produce a draft of an exhibit, providing popularly accessible historical context and interpretation.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":205, "title": "Consumer Culture", "code": "AMST 2885", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course will examine consumerism in the United States, first focusing on the rise of advertising, mass-market goods, shop windows, and department stores at the turn of the 20th century. We will examine the built environment, the experience of shopping, and the consequent disease of \"kleptomania\", looking at inequality and activism as a potential political outlet for consumerism. We will also study consumerism as a system of cultural meaning. How do our objects shape and symbolize our identities? What does our constellation of material goods say about our values, our beliefs, and our lives? What stands outside consumer culture? What does it mean to commodify love or bottle nature? Can art or beauty be beyond value?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":206, "title": "American Shakespeare", "code": "AMST 2983", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "What is distinctive about American Shakespeare? Is it merely a less confident cousin of its more prestigious UK relative; or does it have a character of its own? What is currently happening with 'American Shakespeare' that is not happening anywhere else? This course is designed explicitly to exploit the wide variety of human and material resources of the DC and surrounding area, such as the Folger Shakespeare Library and Theatre, the Shakespeare Theatre and the Blackfriars Playhouse at Staunton. While encountering a number of plays, students will have the opportunity to see at least three live performances and numerous movies, consider the history of Shakespeare in America and learn from actors, directors, scholars and designers.", "tags": "LA-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":207, "title": "Enduring Global and American Issues", "code": "AMST 3071", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "The US and the global community face a number of complex, interconnected and enduring issues that pose challenges for our political and policy governance institutions and society at large.\u00a0 Exploring how the US and the world conceive of the challenges and take action on them is fundamental to understanding them.\u00a0 This course investigates such issues, especially ones that fit into the critically important areas of sustainability, social justice, technology, public health and globalization, security and conflict, among others. Students will engage with these areas and issues and the challenges they pose, using multiple frameworks and approaches, through weekly class discussions and lectures.\"", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":208, "title": "Crime and Punishment", "code": "AMST 3121", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This is a class about the American criminal justice system\u2014from policing to prisons, from arrest to reentry. In many ways, the operation of the modern criminal justice system is taken for granted, which frequently allows it to escape close scrutiny. But we will examine it in great detail, with a focus on how it came about, how it sustains itself, its many roles in society (only some of which involve crime and justice), and how and why it may be changing. In Spring 21, the class will take a particular look at policing and examine the calls for police reform and abolition.\u00a0NB: This class is designed to challenge your settled assumptions and dearly held myths about what is right and wrong with the system. Those who have made up their mind about criminal justice in America should not take the course. This class was formerly GOVT 3141, PRISONS, taught by Prof. Margulies. It has been renamed and renumbered as GOVT 3121 to distinguish it from the distance learning course taught by Prof. Katzenstein.", "tags": "KCM-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":209, "title": "The Nature, Functions, and Limits of Law", "code": "AMST 3131", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "A general-education course to acquaint students with how our legal system pursues the goals of society. The course introduces students to various perspectives on the nature of law, what functions it ought to serve in society, and what it can and cannot accomplish. The course proceeds in the belief that such matters constitute a valuable and necessary part of a general education, not only for pre-law students but especially for students in other fields. Assigned readings comprise legal materials and also secondary sources on the legal process and the role of law in society. The classes include discussion and debate about current legal and social issues, including equality, safety, the environment, punishment, and autonomy.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":210, "title": "Living in an Uncertain World: Science, Technology, and Risk", "code": "AMST 3185", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course explores the history, sociology, and ethics of risk. In particular, we will focus on the complex and often ambiguous relationship between science, technology, and risk. A historical perspective shows how science and technology have generated risks while they have also played key roles in managing and solving those very risks. By examining several case studies, including 19th-century mining, the 1911 Triangle fire, nuclear science, the space shuttle disasters, asbestos litigation, Hurricane Katrina, and the contemporary financial crisis, we will consider how risk and ideas about risk have changed over time. By exploring different historical and cultural responses to risk, we will examine the sociopolitical dimensions of the definitions, perceptions, and management of risk both in the past and the present.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":211, "title": "Dance in America: Cultures, Identities, and Fabrication", "code": "AMST 3214", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This class explores dance across multiple stages\u2014TikTok videos, concert halls, streets\u2014to assess how people create, sustain, and challenge markers of difference (race, gender, sexuality, ability, and class).\u00a0How is dance appreciation different from appropriation? What are dancing\u00a0avatars\u00a0in\u00a0video games allowed to do that real persons are not? We will examine genres such as k-pop, hip hop, salsa, modern dance, and ballroom as we develop the tools necessary for viewing dance, analyzing it, and understanding its place\u00a0in\u00a0larger social, cultural, historical, and political structures. We will explore how markers of difference affect the practice and the reception of dance forms, and,\u00a0in\u00a0turn, how dance helps shape representations of identities. This is a seminar course. Previous performance experience is not necessary.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":212, "title": "Multicultural Issues in Education", "code": "AMST 3405", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course explores research on race, ethnicity and language in American education. It examines historical and current patterns of school achievement for minoritized youths. It also examines the cultural and social premises undergirding educational practices in diverse communities and schools. Policies, programs and pedagogy, including multicultural and bilingual education, are explored.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":213, "title": "Ethnoracial Identity in Anthropology, Language, and Law", "code": "AMST 3424", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "In this course, we examine the role that law and language, as mutually constitutive mediating systems, occupy in constructing ethnoracial identity in the United States. We will approach law from a critical anthropological perspective, as a signifying and significant sociocultural system, rather than as an objective\u00a0structure of rational rules and processes, to consider how legal norms, procedures, and discourses inform other processes of sociocultural production and reproduction, thus contributing to the creation and maintenance of differential power relations. We will draw on anthropological, linguistic, and critical race theory as well as ethnographic and legal material to guide and document our analyses.", "tags": "SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":214, "title": "History of the U.S. Civil War and Reconstruction", "code": "AMST 3430", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "A survey of the turning point of US. history: The Civil War (1861-1865) and its aftermath, Reconstruction (1865-1877). We will look at the causes, the coming, and the conduct, of the war, and the way in which it became a war for freedom. We will then follow the cause of freedom through the greatest slave rebellion in American history, and the attempts by formerly enslaved people to make freedom real in Reconstruction. And we will see how Reconstruction's tragic ending left questions open that are still not answered in U.S. society and politics.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":215, "title": "Contemporary Television", "code": "AMST 3463", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course considers issues, approaches, and complexities in the contemporary television landscape. As television has changed drastically over the past fifteen years, this course provides students with a deeper understanding of the changes in narratives, technologies, forms, and platforms that structure/restructure the televisual world. Students will grapple with how \"new media\" forms such as web-series and on-demand internet streaming services have changed primetime television. We will balance our look at television shows with nuanced readings about the televisual media industry. By watching, analyzing, and critiquing the powerful medium of television, students will situate their understanding within a broader consideration of the medium's regulation, production, distribution, and reception in the network and post-network era.", "tags": "CA-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":216, "title": "Thinking from a Different Place: Indigenous Philosophies", "code": "AMST 3562", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "The Western nation-state has failed to solve the two most pressing, indeed catastrophic, global problems: poverty and climate change. This failure is due to the inability of national policy to imagine a world beyond a boundary drawn by the formative capitalist ideas of property, production, and profit. The course will begin by discussing the historical origin and continuing force of these ideas while raising questions about their limits. Then it will look at a range of alternative ideas about how the world should work if we want to keep it socially, economically, and ecologically in balance. The alternatives we will query come from a range of Indigenous writers of fiction, poetry, and theory, who locate themselves in Native American (north and south), Aboriginal, and Maori communities.", "tags": "LA-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":217, "title": "Cornell Hip-Hop Collective", "code": "AMST 3617", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course is open to experienced rappers, beatmakers, and vocalists interested forging collaborative relationships with other students. The fall semester will center on hip-hop's relationship to social justice. From the beginning of the semester, we will work together to plan and record a thematic album. As we develop this project, we will construct and analyze playlists that explore how hip-hop historically grew out of racialized struggle and how it is and could be used to comment on and challenge systemic racism today. We will identify and employ hip-hop compositional strategies for creating socially engaged beats and rhymes, including musical sampling and lyrical intertextuality, and will use these tools to create and workshop collaborative tracks in weekly meetings. Spring semester topic: TBD.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":218, "title": "Dissent and Protest in U.S. History", "code": "AMST 3621", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "What is dissent, and what is its relationship to American Democratic principles? This course will examine the various forms of dissent and counter dissent in U.S. history from the Colonial phase to the present. Organized by a thematic structure, each week the course will consider a different group from the earliest to the most contemporary protests of Indigenous People, Abolitionists and anti-slavery tactics, Women's and Environmental movements, etc. Our explorations will consider a variety of primary sources, literature, film, and secondary scholarship. For a longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "HA-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":219, "title": "Asians in the Americas: A Comparative Perspective", "code": "AMST 3703", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "The common perception of ethnicity is that it is a natural\u00a0and an inevitable consequence of cultural difference. Asians\u00a0overseas, in particular, have won repute as a people who cling tenaciously to their culture and refuse to assimilate into their host societies and cultures. But, who are the Asians?\u00a0On what basis can we label Asians\u00a0an ethnic group? Although there is a significant Asian presence in the Caribbean, the category Asian\u00a0itself does not exist in the Caribbean. What does this say about the nature of categories that label and demarcate groups of people on the basis of alleged cultural and phenotypical characteristics? This course will examine the dynamics behind group identity, namely ethnicity, by comparing and contrasting the multicultural experience of Asian populations in the Caribbean and the United States. Ethnographic case studies will focus on the East Indian and Chinese experiences in the Caribbean and the Chinese, Korean, Japanese, Filipino, and Indian experiences in the United States.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":220, "title": "Africans and African Americans in Literature", "code": "AMST 3732", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "When an African and an African American meet, solidarity is presumed, but often friction is the result. In this course, we will consider how Africans and African Americans see each other through literature. What happens when two peoples suffering from double consciousness meet? We will examine the influence of historical forces including slavery, colonialism and pan-Africanism on the way writers explore the meeting between Africans and African Americans. Specifically we will look at how writers such as W.E.B DuBois, Maya Angelou, NoViolet Bulawayo, Chimamanda Adichie, Richard Wright, Eugene Robinson, Philippe Wamba, Teju Cole, and Malcolm X have understood the meeting.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":221, "title": "Staging Faith: Contemporary Theatre and Lived Religions", "code": "AMST 3747", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Religious beliefs, practices, and conflicts shape our world and influence global politics.\u00a0 Yet mediatized depictions of religion can be reductive and polarizing.\u00a0 Moreover, these depictions may be different from what people experience in their everyday lives.\u00a0 In the contemporary theatre, we have the opportunity to consider representations of individuals' lived religion, the complex questions of belief, and challenges to faith from within and outside religious communities.\u00a0 Through close readings of plays and related materials engaging with Christian, Jewish, Muslim, Sikh and other faith traditions, we will explore and discuss together the religious motivations, tensions, and dilemmas facing us today.\u00a0 Our texts include, among others, Jesus Christ Superstar, Indecent, Angels in America, and Heroes of the Fourth Turning.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":222, "title": "Poetry and Poetics of the Americas", "code": "AMST 3820", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "As globalization draws the Americas ever closer together, reshaping our sense of a common and uncommon American culture, what claims might be made for a distinctive, diverse poetry and poetics of the America? How might we characterize its dominant forms and alternative practices? What shared influences, affiliations, concerns and approaches might we find and what differences emerge? Ranging across North and South America, Central America and the Caribbean, this course will place in conversation such figures as Poe, Stein, Eliot, Pound, Williams, Neruda, Vallejo, Borges, Parra, C\u00e9saire, Walcott, Bola\u00f1o, Espada, Waldrop, Vicu\u00f1a, Hong, and Rankine.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":223, "title": "The History of Consumption: From Wedgwood to Wal-Mart", "code": "AMST 3870", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Whether buying at a general store, shopping at a department store, or loitering at a mall, consumption has always formed an important part of the American experience. More than just commodities bought and sold, consumption is also about the institutions, social practices, cultural meanings, and economic functions that have surrounded the merchandise. This course will look at the changing meanings consumption has had for life, politics, and economy in the US over the past 300 years.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":224, "title": "Special Topics", "code": "AMST 3900", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "An intensive study of a particular dramatist, period, form or problem in drama and/or performance. Topics, prerequisites and formats will vary from year to year. Topic for Spring: Power Plays: Contemporary Drama Womxn: This course explores questions of power in contemporary drama written by playwrights identifying as women. Taking feminisms as our main critical lenses, we'll look at plays from the UK, Canada, the USA, India, Australia, and South Africa, asking how these plays stage marginalized bodies and voices, and call in to question hierarchies of power. We'll also interrogate assumptions about canon formation and consider the place of womxn in contemporary theatre and in the cultural hierarchies to which theatre responds and in which it participates. Our reading list will be partly informed by student interests.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":225, "title": "Independent Research", "code": "AMST 3980", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Affords opportunities for students to carry out independent research under appropriate supervision. Each student is expected to review pertinent literature, prepare a project outline, conduct the research, and prepare a report. Topic and credit hours TBD as arranged between faculty and student.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":226, "title": "Latinx Popular Culture Matters", "code": "AMST 3981", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course examines several areas of Latinx popular culture that influence U.S. politics and society, artistic productions, and aesthetic sensibilities, as well as popular and civic cultures. Mapping a historical trajectory of Chicanidad and Latinidad in art, music, film, and popular media in the twentieth century, the course also engages contemporary art practices that are rooted in 1960s and 1970s civil rights and community art movements. Topics include Latinx people in film and TV, muralism and street art, music, spoken word as well as close examinations of representations of Latinx people in American mainstream culture.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":227, "title": "Readings in American Studies", "code": "AMST 3990", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Individualized readings for junior and senior students. Topics, requirements, and credit hours will be determined in consultation between the student and the supervising faculty member.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":228, "title": "Diasporic and Indigenous Health", "code": "AMST 4002", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Rates of chronic disease and other health conditions, including mental illness and substance use disorders, have surged over the past three decades, owing largely to structural factors associated with the fragmentation of national healthcare systems, diminished social support networks, and government subsidization of unhealthy foods and hazardous pharmaceuticals. These issues are especially amplified in ethnoracial communities: for example, Blacks and Latinos typically have higher rates of disease in comparison to their non-Black counterparts, even after adjusting for factors such as income and education level. This course investigates the complex political, economic and cultural forces which contribute to health inequities. Students will be exposed to case studies throughout various diasporas\u2014from Harlem to Cape Town\u2014to understand the intricate ways in which race and health interact.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":229, "title": "Poetry in Process", "code": "AMST 4030", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Like all of us, poets change over time. In this course we'll track the shifting visions and styles of three major American poets whose work spans two centuries. Whitman, Stevens, and Ammons differ in many ways, but they share an expansive perspective that celebrates mind, body, and creativity while acknowledging violence, loss, and death. Rather than reading each poet separately, we'll move back and forth among them, comparing the phases of their careers, charting their formal and stylistic innovations, and exploring the lines of influence that connect them. Ammons taught at Cornell from 1964 to 1998, and we'll consider how his work synthesizes Whitman's rugged physicality and Stevens's meditative subtlety to produce a poetry that draws equally on scientific thought and religious feeling.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":230, "title": "Reconstruction and the New South", "code": "AMST 4039", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course focuses on the American South in the nineteenth century as it made the transition from Reconstruction to new forms of social organization and patterns of race relations. Reconstruction will be considered from a sociopolitical perspective, concentrating on the experiences of the freed people. The New South emphasis will include topics on labor relations, economic and political changes, new cultural alliances, the rise of agrarianism, and legalization of Jim Crow.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":231, "title": "Death Penalty in America", "code": "AMST 4051", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "The death penalty has gotten increased media attention due to high profile death row exonerations, and has long been under siege for other reasons, such as racial disparities in its imposition and the prevalence of very poor representation by defense counsel. This course surveys the legal and social issues that arise in the administration of the death penalty. The reading will be largely comprised of reported death penalty cases, but will be augmented by a variety of other sources, including empirical studies of the death penalty and the litigation experience of the professors. Although the focus will be on capital punishment as practiced in the United States, we will also consider international and comparative perspectives. Guest speakers will provide a range of views, and law students with experience working on capital cases will lead discussion sections.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":232, "title": "Technological Change at Work", "code": "AMST 4066", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Computers and digital technologies including robotics, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), internet-enabled platforms, and other \"high-tech\" drivers of automation have revolutionized the nature and organization of work in the U.S., with material implications for workers and their families, among others. This upper-level seminar begins with a rhetorical inquiry into whether and when the technological change engendered by digitization and the so-called \"Information Technology (IT) Revolution\" benefits workers. We then consider the broader impact of recent technological advances on manufacturing and fabrication, low- and semi-skilled service work, i.e., restaurant servers and bus drivers, and even on expert and professional work like that to which most of you presumably aspire. Among the central themes is the notion that technology does not unilaterally act upon workers, their employers, or society-at-large. Rather, workers, managers, customers, institutions, and policymakers shape which advances take hold and which do not, the ways that these technologies are deployed in the workplace, and the ways that society can actively mitigate the costs to technological advancement while harnessing its benefits.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":233, "title": "Contesting Votes: Democracy and Citizenship Throughout U.S. History", "code": "AMST 4203", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This advanced seminar traces transformations in citizenship and the franchise throughout U.S. history. Through readings, frequent short writings, discussion, and a final paper, the class examines the struggles over who can claim full citizenship and legitimate voice in the political community. It examines the divergent, often clashing, visions of legitimate democratic rule, focusing particularly on the debates over who should vote and on what terms.\u00a0 We examine the dynamics that have shaped the boundaries of citizenship and hierarchies within it, paying attention to changes in the civic status of Native Americans, property-less white men, paupers, women, African Americans, various immigrant groups, residents of U.S. colonies, felons, and people with intellectual disabilities. A significant portion of the class focuses on debates about U.S. democracy in the decades after the passage of the 1965 Voting Rights Act.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":234, "title": "Health and Environmental Justice", "code": "AMST 4280", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Human bodies are inescapably enmeshed in our environments: human health and environmental health are inseparable. But human bodies are not equally impacted by environmental degradation and toxicity. Environmental injustice physically reproduces structures of power along lines of race, gender, global position, and wealth disparity. This upper-level seminar examines global and US case studies of environmental injustice and public health. Topics include waste flows, dump and industrial siting, environmental monitoring, and agriculture and aquaculture. We will also examine the politics of environmental health knowledge and movements for environmental justice.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":235, "title": "The 1980s: Politics, Culture, and Memory in the United States", "code": "AMST 4337", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This seminar will examine U.S. culture and politics in the 1980s as a pivotal decade in shaping our contemporary cultural, social, and political landscape. We will consider how U.S. culture and politics shifted with the \"Reagan Revolution\" and the end of the Cold War, and their connections to and ramifications for social activism, social welfare, media, foreign policy, and everyday life. At the same time, we will consider the methodological opportunities and challenges in researching, writing, reading, and presenting recent history. Students will complete a research paper, and work together to design and launch a digital exhibition on the 1980s. We will also explore how 1980s culture and politics was shaped by nostalgia for the 1950s, and how the 1980s and remembered and misremembered today. Topics include the rise of neoliberalism, privatization of civil and social services, the emergence of digital technologies, activism in response to HIV/AIDS, transnational feminisms, the consolidation of the Christian right, and the \"Culture Wars.\" Readings will include historical scholarship, as well as creative non-fiction, films, TV, and music from the 1980s.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":236, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "AMST 4502", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":237, "title": "Contemporary Native American Fiction", "code": "AMST 4627", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "If you haven't read contemporary U.S. American Indian fiction, then it might be fair to ask how much you know about the United States, its origins and its current condition. Since the 1960s, American Indians have been producing a significant body of award-wining novels and short stories. In 1969, for example, N. Scott Momaday, from the Kiowa nation, won the Pulitzer Prize for his novel House Made of Dawn and in 2012 Louise Erdrich, who is Anishinaabe, won the National Book Award for her novel The Round House. In between these two notable moments and since we can list an impressive number of Native storytellers whose work is aesthetically powerful, offering us a narrative of the United States that counters the official history. Centrally the course will focus on the various formal approaches Native writers take from surrealism to realism in representing the (post)colonial situation of Indian country and the ongoing resistance in Indian country to the U.S. legal and political regime.", "tags": "ALC-AS|LA-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":238, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "AMST 4658", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":239, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "AMST 4705", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday,\u00a0alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":240, "title": "Law and Empire in Early America", "code": "AMST 4716", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "European empires used the law to justify colonialism and project sovereign authority over distant territories. But the legal regimes imposed by imperial centers on colonial peripheries were jurisdictionally complex, overlapping, and contested by colonial actors on the ground. This course explores the role of law in the context of colonialism and imperialism in the Americas, ca. 1490 to 1800. We will consider the transmission and transformation of legal thought and practice throughout the Atlantic world, with a specific focus on the role of law in shaping racial identities, gender norms, imperial competition, and the ultimate unraveling of empires in the Americas. The course will examine the different legal regimes, from Roman civil law to English common law, that shaped societies in the Americas. And we will pay particular attention to actors in colonial spaces\u2014from self-liberated Africans to European smugglers\u2014who manipulated the complexity of imperial legal regimes to suit their own needs, shaping the trajectory of American history from the bottom-up in the process.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":241, "title": "Be a Man! Masculinity, Race, and Nation", "code": "AMST 4757", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course analyzes how cultural beliefs about masculinity intersect with race, sexuality, and citizenship. To emphasize how masculine norms vary across cultures, we will use the plural term \"masculinities.\" Treating gender as a relational system of power, we will investigate how masculinities are defined against femininities, and how different masculinities are defined against each other (for example, the stereotypes of the Latino \"bad hombre\" vs. the white \"all-American football player\"). Combining sociological studies with media analysis, we will ask the following questions and more: Where do beliefs about masculinities come from, and how do they change over time? How do these beliefs naturalize certain kinds of violence? How do these beliefs interact with, and help to create, ideas about race and nation?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":242, "title": "Honors Essay Tutorial II", "code": "AMST 4994", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "To graduate with honors, AMST majors must complete a senior thesis under the supervision of an AMST faculty member and defend that thesis orally before a committee. Students interested in the honors program should consult the AMST Director of Undergraduate Study during the junior year and submit an honors application by May 1 of the junior year.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":243, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "AMST 5710", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Examines the goals, roles, inputs, and outcomes of schooling in American society, and the policy environment in which schools operate. Analyzes controversies and tensions (e.g., equity, market forces, state control) surrounding public education at local, state, and federal levels. Includes current and historical, urban, and rural issues and problems.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":244, "title": "Doing Research With Marginalized Populations", "code": "AMST 6003", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course covers the basic epistemology for social sciences research, integrating an explicit focus on\u00a0applied\u00a0mixed methods approaches (quantitative and qualitative) for conducting original \"real world\" research on humans. While these cognates will be approached theoretically, the course's primary concentration will be on the praxis of quantifying and contextualizing the experiences, attitudes, and social/health outcomes of historically marginalized and \"hidden\" populations, including people who are Black, Latino and indigenous, LGBTQ+, and individuals with a disability, mental illness or substance use disorder, with an intersectional lens. While not offering an exhaustive review of individual quantitative or qualitative methodologies, students will learn the fundamentals of curating a substantive research framework on marginalized and hidden populations, ethically engaging and recruiting people into their studies, collecting and analyzing data, and meaningfully disseminating research findings.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":245, "title": "The American State", "code": "AMST 6011", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Contemporary politics raise profound questions about the American past and how aspects of it have traveled across time and into the present, shaping US government and politics. This PhD-level seminar uses historical and institutional lenses to examine analytical questions about the origins and development of the American state as well as processes of political change. In Spring 2021, we will explore American political development with an eye toward understanding how threats to democracy have waxed and waned and combined over time, and the implications for the present. We will focus on topics such as political parties and polarization; conflict over belongs, with respect to race and gender; economic inequality; and executive aggrandizement. We will read some classic texts as well as new and recent ones.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":246, "title": "The 1980s: Politics, Culture, and Memory in the United States", "code": "AMST 6337", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This seminar will examine U.S. culture and politics in the 1980s as a pivotal decade in shaping our contemporary cultural, social, and political landscape. We will consider how U.S. culture and politics shifted with the \"Reagan Revolution\" and the end of the Cold War, and their connections to and ramifications for social activism, social welfare, media, foreign policy, and everyday life. At the same time, we will consider the methodological opportunities and challenges in researching, writing, reading, and presenting recent history. Students will complete a research paper, and work together to design and launch a digital exhibition on the 1980s. We will also explore how 1980s culture and politics was shaped by nostalgia for the 1950s, and how the 1980s and remembered and misremembered today. Topics include the rise of neoliberalism, privatization of civil and social services, the emergence of digital technologies, activism in response to HIV/AIDS, transnational feminisms, the consolidation of the Christian right, and the \"Culture Wars.\" Readings will include historical scholarship, as well as creative non-fiction, films, TV, and music from the 1980s.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":247, "title": "Ethnoracial Identity in Anthropology, Language, and Law", "code": "AMST 6424", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "In this course, we examine the role that law and language, as mutually constitutive mediating systems, occupy in constructing ethnoracial identity in the United States. We will approach law from a critical anthropological perspective, as a signifying and significant\u00a0sociocultural system, rather than as an objective\u00a0structure of rational rules and processes, to consider how legal norms, procedures, and discourses inform other processes of sociocultural production and reproduction, thus contributing to the creation and maintenance of differential power relations. We will draw on anthropological, linguistic, and critical race theory as well as ethnographic and legal material to guide and document our analyses.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":248, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "AMST 6502", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":249, "title": "Violence, Power, and Nonviolence", "code": "AMST 6596", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "This course pursues a theoretical and comparative understanding of the relationship between violence and power. Beginning with an overview of disputes over the politics of 'naming' violence, we will examine a series of intersecting historical disputes about the nature, justification, and functions of political violence between a series of realist, Marxist, and pacifist\u00a0thinkers. Topics to be discussed will include the relationship between tactics and strategy, means and ends, the dynamics of political contention, revolution and mass politics, the relationship coercion and persuasion, and the power of nonviolence, as well\u00a0as revolutionary terror, general strikes, civil disobedience, hunger strikes, and political rioting. Thinkers studied may include Clausewitz, Tolstoy, Lenin, Luxemburg, Weber, Sorel, Gandhi, Trotsky, Niebuhr, Du Bois, Fanon, King, Arendt, and Deming.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":250, "title": "Democratic Theory", "code": "AMST 6645", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "In contemporary political contexts \"democracy\" is often invoked as the very ground of political legitimacy.\u00a0There is very little agreement, however, on what democracy means or how it is best embodied in state institutions and law.\u00a0This seminar will introduce students to select debates in contemporary democratic theory over the normative meaning of democracy and the limitations of contemporary democratic practice.\u00a0Beginning with the work of Rousseau and ending with debates over \"radical democracy,\" we will explore the following themes:\u00a0How do democratic theorists and democratic actors negotiate the paradoxes of collective self-rule?\u00a0What is the relationship between liberalism and democracy? Do rights suspend democracy or establish its preconditions?\u00a0What are the best procedures for democratic decision-making?\u00a0How does democracy deal with difference?\u00a0Is democracy best understood as a form of government or a practice of resistance to domination?", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":251, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "AMST 6658", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit\u00a0The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":252, "title": "Law and Empire in Early America", "code": "AMST 6716", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "European empires used the law to justify colonialism and project sovereign authority over distant territories. But the legal regimes imposed by imperial centers on colonial peripheries were jurisdictionally complex, overlapping, and contested by colonial actors on the ground. This course explores the role of law in the context of colonialism and imperialism in the Americas, ca. 1490 to 1800. We will consider the transmission and transformation of legal thought and practice throughout the Atlantic world, with a specific focus on the role of law in shaping racial identities, gender norms, imperial competition, and the ultimate unraveling of empires in the Americas. The course will examine the different legal regimes, from Roman civil law to English common law, that shaped societies in the Americas. And we will pay particular attention to actors in colonial spaces\u2014from self-liberated Africans to European smugglers\u2014who manipulated the complexity of imperial legal regimes to suit their own needs, shaping the trajectory of American history from the bottom-up in the process.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":253, "title": "Urban Representation", "code": "AMST 6809", "subject": "AMST", "descr": "Urban Representation Labs are intended to bring students and faculty into direct contact with complex urban representations spanning a wide media spectrum and evoking a broad set of humanist discourses. Students will leverage archival materials at Cornell to launch new observations and explore unanticipated approaches to urban culture that derive from previously understudied archival materials. The goal is twofold: to demystify the representational technologies involved in presenting the city, and to unpack the political, cultural, and aesthetic values and priorities embedded in every form of presentation. Urban Representation Labs are offered under the auspices of Cornell University's Andrew W. Mellon Foundation Collaborative Studies in Architecture, Urbanism, and the Humanities grant. For current special topic seminar description and application instructions, visit our urban seminars page.", "tags": "AMST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":254, "title": "Careers in Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 1105", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "In addition to preparing students for veterinary medicine, a degree in Animal Science is excellent background for careers in agricultural production, education, marketing, communications, and policy development, in both private and public sectors. In this course, students explore these opportunities and develop skills that will aid them in career planning.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":255, "title": "Practical Large Animal Handling", "code": "ANSC 2100", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "The course will introduce students to the fundamental principles of handling and restraint including basic veterinary techniques pertaining to horses, beef and dairy cattle, swine, sheep, and poultry. Topics include basic animal anatomy and physiology, identifying breeds of various large animal species, breeding techniques, and general husbandry and management practices. This course is designed to enhance the large animal handling skills of animal science students.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":256, "title": "Principles of Animal Genetics", "code": "ANSC 2210", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "This course focuses on the genetic foundation and improvement of domestic species. Basic cellular biology and DNA replication will lay the groundwork for understanding the genetic mechanisms underlying traits, modern genomic tool development, and analysis methods. Critical thinking towards animal breeding and management will require an understanding of heritability, population dynamics, rate of selection, and genetic and economic gain. Software and reference programs will be used to investigate animal genes and genomes, individual genotypes through DNA sequence or whole-genome marker panels, and statistical associations between traits and genetic markers. Modern examples, practical applications, and hands-on tools will be key components of this class in order to appreciate the intricacies of genetics and the future of genomic research for the improvement and management of animals.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":257, "title": "Biology of Reproduction", "code": "ANSC 2400", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Comparative anatomy and physiology of mammalian and avian reproduction, with emphasis on domestic and laboratory animals; fertilization through embryonic development, pregnancy, and growth to sexual maturity; emphasis on physiological mechanisms and application to fertility regulation. Separate laboratory is offered to demonstrate fundamental aspects of reproduction and reproductive technology.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":258, "title": "Biology of Reproduction Lab", "code": "ANSC 2410", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Demonstrates fundamental principles and applied aspects of mammalian and avian reproduction. A limited number of live animals are used in some demonstrations. Dissection and examination of tissues from vertebrate animals are included in selected laboratories.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":259, "title": "Dairy Cattle Principles", "code": "ANSC 2500", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Introduction to the background and scientific principles relating to dairy cattle production. Laboratories are designed to provide an understanding of dairy cattle production.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":260, "title": "Fish Physiology", "code": "ANSC 3300", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Fish Physiology is an introduction to the functional biology of fish. Lecture topics will cover cellular and tissue function within key physiological systems that help fish thrive in a wide range of aquatic habitats, from mountain streams to deep-sea vents. These systems will be illustrated using a diverse variety of fish, while broader comparisons between fish and higher vertebrates will also be drawn. Discussion will integrate aquaculture, fisheries, and environmental contexts, including some of the anthropogenic challenges that fish face today and what can be done to mitigate them. Students will perform a gross dissection to identify anatomy in situ and visit an aquaculture facility (there is no separate lab section).", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":261, "title": "Applied Dairy Cattle Genetics", "code": "ANSC 3310", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Course will review the current knowledge base of dairy cattle genetics including the genetic regulation of diseases, production and health traits. Genomic evaluation scores will be assessed with an emphasis on how to prioritize and balance genetic selection towards long-term sustainability. Mating strategies will be evaluated for the achievement of goals and impact on both the individual animal and overall herd.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":262, "title": "Comparative Mammalian Reproduction", "code": "ANSC 3400", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "The course will examine the amazing diversity of reproductive strategies in mammals. Comparative aspects of reproductive physiology will be explored with a focus on the evolution of adaptations and strategies to optimize reproductive success in the face of challenges posed by geographical location and environment. The diversity in basic aspects of reproductive physiology will be highlighted, such as in gonadal function, estrous cycle, pregnancy and lactation. Unique features of species representing the major mammalian orders will be discussed.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":263, "title": "Reproductive Physiology and Management of Dairy Cattle", "code": "ANSC 3450", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "This course integrates concepts of reproductive physiology, management, and economics of dairy cattle. Special emphasis is given to practices and technologies currently used in modern dairy operations. Laboratory sessions include hands-on learning of reproductive techniques and dairy herd management software. Concepts discussed in lecture and their respective application include: artificial insemination, rectal palpation and transrectal ultrasonography of the reproductive tract and ovaries, synchronization of estrus and ovulation, blood testing for pregnancy diagnosis, superovulation and embryo transfer, in-vitro fertilization and embryo production.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":264, "title": "Dairy Herd Management", "code": "ANSC 3510", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Course integrates concepts of cow biology, management, economics, and sustainability of dairy operations. Special emphasis is given to management practices and technologies that affect cattle health and well-being, milk production and quality, reproduction, herd growth, milking, and environmental impact of dairy production. Basic concepts of dairy foods processing and the importance of milk quality for dairy products are covered. Laboratory sessions include hands-on learning of dairy software, analysis of alternative strategies, and decision-making. Commercial farm case studies are used to integrate concepts of biology and management learned in the course.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":265, "title": "Junior Dairy Fellows", "code": "ANSC 3511", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Designed for undergraduates who have a sincere interest in dairy production management and the dairy industry. The objective of this course is to impart further understanding of the integration and application of dairy science to dairy production enterprises and related industries. The course emphasizes a wide range of dairy- and agriculture- related businesses and personnel that work with the dairy industry worldwide.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":266, "title": "Dairy Cattle Nutrition", "code": "ANSC 3550", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Provides a foundation in the principles of dairy cattle nutrition and dairy ration formulation with emphasis on application of feeding programs on dairy farms. Laboratory emphasizes hands-on evaluation of feeds, use of ration formulation software for ration evaluation and formulation, and case study analysis of dairy farms.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":267, "title": "Immunology in Animal Health and Disease", "code": "ANSC 3700", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Covers selected concepts in immunology, with a focus on those that are important to domestic animal health and disease prevention. Students learn how to apply their knowledge of immunological principles to understand current literature, research, and practices.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":268, "title": "Sheep", "code": "ANSC 3800", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Breeding, feeding, management, and selection of sheep. Lectures and laboratories are designed to give students practical knowledge of managing sheep for meat, milk, and wool production as well as the scientific background for improving management practices. Students spend several days during the semester feeding and caring for ewes and their newborn lambs and milking ewes in a dairy setting.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":269, "title": "Mechanisms of Animal Growth and Development", "code": "ANSC 3920", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "A course on the basic biology of animal growth and development. The course relies on data obtained from a variety of species to describe whole animal growth patterns through life and the molecular and cellular mechanisms underpinning the formation of key tissues. Lecutres cover (1) patterns of whole-animal growth during fetal and postnatal life; (2) molecular and cellular basis of formation and development of skeletal muscle, adipose tissue, and bone; (3) regulation of growth and development by hormones and growth factors.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":270, "title": "Animals in Biomedical Research", "code": "ANSC 3980", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "This course introduces features and applications of various animal models and related cutting-edge tools for biomedical research on human health and diseases. Examples will be given on appropriate animal models for studying human diseases related to diabetes, bone, infection, brain, eye, and nutritional deficiencies. Model species include food-producing animals, recreational/companion animals, and laboratory animals. Lectures cover basic biology, common uses of animals in biomedical research, and unique applications of selected species for target human disease.\u00a0Comparative physiology between model species and humans, advantages and limitations of given models, regulations of biomedical uses of animals, and combined applications of animal models with omics, machine learning, and big data are also discussed.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":271, "title": "Seminar in Animal Sciences", "code": "ANSC 4020", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Reports of undergraduate honors research projects. Students present oral reports of their work for class discussion in addition to written reports.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":272, "title": "Whole-Farm Nutrient Management", "code": "ANSC 4120", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Provides students with an understanding of the concepts and practices underlying whole-farm nutrient management planning of livestock and dairy farms. Improving profitability and efficiency are key factors considered while improving air and water quality associated with dairy production. Students learn about nutrient management on (Concentrated) Animal Feeding Operations ((C)AFO's)\u00a0and conduct a whole farm nutrient balance for a farm of choice. This course integrates crop and manure management with nutrition and herd management to provide a broad but focused and action-oriented approach. The course utilizes three software programs for nutrient management planning and herd nutritional management: Cropware, the Cornell Net Carbohydrate and Protein System (CNCPS), and the Whole Farm Nutrient Mass Balance program. Current topics are also discussed, such as greenhouse gas emissions and impacts of dairy and livestock production and local versus global food production and environmental impacts.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":273, "title": "Ethics and Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 4140", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Explores the place of humans in the biological world, origins of ethics and morality, speciesism, the use of animals for research and agricultural purposes, and transgenic animals.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":274, "title": "Nutritional Physiology and Biochemistry", "code": "ANSC 4410", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "The course will integrate animal nutrition, biochemistry, and physiology. The overall goal is to enhance understanding of intermediary metabolism and metabolic adaptations that develop to support different physiological states. The comparative study of biochemistry across mammalian species will be emphasized. The structural and functional roles of biochemicals and the ability of hormones to influence their metabolic fate will be highlighted.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":275, "title": "Dairy Management Fellowship", "code": "ANSC 4560", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Designed for undergraduates who have a sincere interest in dairy farm management. The course objective is to gain further understanding of the integration and application of dairy farm management principles and programs with respect to progressive dairying and related industries. There are field trips focusing on dairy farm business analyses and feedback, along with other experiential learning activities and professional development and networking opportunities. Field trips will be held on announced Saturdays throughout the course of the semester.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":276, "title": "Special Topics in Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 4940", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the semester begins. Courses offered under the number will be approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":277, "title": "Internship in Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 4960", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Structured, on-the-job learning experience under supervision of qualified professionals in a cooperating organization (e.g., farm, agribusiness, pharmaceutical company, zoo, educational institution). Internships are arranged by the student and must be approved in advance by the student's academic advisor. The internship should provide a professionally supervised experience with at least 60 hours on the job per credit required. All ANSC 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at cals.cornell.edu/academics/student-research/internship.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":278, "title": "Individual Study in Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 4970", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "May include individual tutorial study or a lecture topic selected by a professor. Because topics may change, the course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":279, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching in Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 4980", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Designed to consolidate the student's knowledge. A participating student assists in teaching a course allied with his or her education and experience. The student is expected to meet regularly with a discussion or laboratory section, to gain teaching experience, and regularly to discuss teaching objectives, techniques, and subject matter with the professor in charge.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":280, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Animal Science", "code": "ANSC 4990", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Affords opportunities for students to carry out independent research under appropriate supervision. Each student is expected to review pertinent literature, prepare a project outline, conduct the research, and prepare a report.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":281, "title": "Division of Nutritional Sciences Seminar", "code": "ANSC 6190", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Lectures on current research in nutrition.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":282, "title": "Reproductive Physiology and Endocrinology Seminar", "code": "ANSC 6210", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Current research in reproductive physiology is presented by faculty and staff members, graduate students, and invited speakers.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":283, "title": "Graduate Student Research Updates", "code": "ANSC 6220", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "This course is designed to train Animal Science graduate students in communication/presentation skills needed to support a career in scientific research. Each student will present an update on research progress/plan towards his or her dissertation/thesis. Advice, feedback and peer-evaluation will be provided to each presenter. Focused discussions examining research areas of particular interest to each student on research methods, existing theories and/or controversies will be considered. This course also aims to foster collegiality, expand knowledge and promote professional development among graduate students in a broad context within this diverse field.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":284, "title": "Graduate-Level Thesis Research", "code": "ANSC 7900", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":285, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "ANSC 8900", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":286, "title": "Doctoral-Level Thesis Research", "code": "ANSC 9900", "subject": "ANSC", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "ANSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":287, "title": "FWS: Culture, Society, and Power", "code": "ANTHR 1101", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This First-Year Writing Seminar is devoted to the anthropological study of the human condition. Anthropology examines all aspects of human experience, from the evolution of the species to contemporary challenges of politics, environment, and society. The discipline emphasizes empirically rich field research informed by sophisticated theoretical understandings of human social life and cultural production. The diversity of anthropology's interests provides a diverse array of stimulating opportunities to write critically about the human condition. Topics vary by semester.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":288, "title": "Human Evolution: Genes, Behavior, and the Fossil Record", "code": "ANTHR 1300", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "The evolution of humankind is explored through the fossil record, studies of the biological differences among current human populations, and a comparison with our closest relatives, the primates. This course investigates the roots of human biology and behavior with an evolutionary framework.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":289, "title": "Early Agriculture", "code": "ANTHR 2201", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Throughout most of the human career, people survived by hunting and gathering wild foods. The advent of food production is one of the most profound changes in history and prehistory. This course examines the current evidence for the appearance and spread of agriculture - plant and animal domestication - around the world. We will consider definitions of agriculture and domestication, the conditions under which it arises, the consequences for those who adopt it, and why it has spread over most of the world.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":290, "title": "Cultural Diversity and Contemporary Issues", "code": "ANTHR 2400", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course will introduce students to the meaning and significance of forms of cultural diversity for the understanding of contemporary issues. Drawing from films, videos, and selected readings, students will be confronted with different representational forms that portray cultures in various parts of the world, and they will be asked to examine critically their own prejudices as they influence the perception and evaluation of cultural differences. We shall approach cultures holistically, assuming the inseparability of economies, kinship, religion, and politics, as well as interconnections and dependencies between world areas such as Africa, Latin America, the West. Among the issues considered: political correctness\u00a0and truth; nativism and ecological diversity; race, ethnicity, and sexuality; sin, religion, and war; global process and cultural integrity.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":291, "title": "Medicine, Culture, and Society", "code": "ANTHR 2468", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Medicine has become the language and practice through which we address a broad range of both individual and societal complaints. Interest in this medicalization of life\u00a0may be one of the reasons that medical anthropology is currently the fastest-growing subfield in anthropology. This course encourages students to examine concepts of disease, suffering, health, and well-being in their immediate experience and beyond. In the process, students will gain a working knowledge of ecological, critical, phenomenological, and applied approaches used by medical anthropologists. We will investigate what is involved in becoming a doctor, the sociality of medicines, controversies over new medical technologies, and the politics of medical knowledge. The universality of biomedicine, or hospital medicine,\u00a0will not be taken for granted, but rather we will examine the plurality generated by the various political, economic, social, and ethical demands under which biomedicine has developed in different places and at different times. In addition, biomedical healing and expertise will be viewed in relation to other kinds of healing and expertise. Our readings will address medicine in North America as well as other parts of the world. In class, our discussions will return regularly to consider the broad diversity of kinds of medicine throughout the world, as well as the specific historical and local contexts of biomedicine.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":292, "title": "Anthropology of Climate Change", "code": "ANTHR 2482", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "What does it mean to study humanity at a time when it has become a geological force? What is required of us as thinking subjects under the Anthropocene? In this course, we will argue that anthropologists have an important role to play at this historical juncture. But we will also consider how climate change troubles some of the discipline's central categories. Time, space, nature, power, reason \u2013 climate change throws these concepts into question. It inflects our ways of knowing. It demands adaptive thinking. Throughout the semester, we will take on this work in common, proceeding from the presumption that it is not enough to think of climate change as a simple ethnographic object. Climate change is the unavoidable context of contemporary anthropology.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":293, "title": "Human Biology and Evolution", "code": "ANTHR 2750", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Examines the theories and mechanisms of modern evolutionary biology as they apply to present-day humans and their hominid ancestors. Lectures and discussions of molecular and paleontological evidence of human evolution, the causes and consequences of contemporary human biological diversity, and biological and behavioral modes of human adaptation to past and present natural and cultural environments.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":294, "title": "Paleoethnobotany", "code": "ANTHR 3042", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course will prepare students to identify, analyze, and interpret plant remains gathered from archaeological sites. We will build a conceptual framework to explain how human behavior relates to plant patterning, drawing on case studies from around the world. Through hands-on laboratory activities, we will study aspects of plant anatomy and explore methods for the sampling and identification of plant remains, including charred seeds and wood, phytoliths, starch grains, and pollen. We will analyze paleoethnobotanical datasets using database and statistical programs to present evidence in varying formats. Final projects will involve the first-hand study of plant remains sampled from archaeological sites.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":295, "title": "Computing Cultures", "code": "ANTHR 3061", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Computers are powerful tools for working, playing, thinking, and living. Laptops, PDAs, webcams, cell phones, and iPods are not just devices, they also provide narratives, metaphors, and ways of seeing the world. This course critically examines how computing technology and society shape each other and how this plays out in our everyday lives. Identifies how computers, networks, and information technologies reproduce, reinforce, and rework existing cultural trends, norms, and values. Looks at the values embodied in the cultures of computing and considers alternative ways to imagine, build, and work with information technologies.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":296, "title": "Humans and Animals", "code": "ANTHR 3230", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Human-animal relationships are often seen in utilitarian, nutritional terms, particularly in archaeology. But animals and meat have significance far beyond their economic value. This course focuses on a broad range of these non-dietary roles of animals in human societies, past and present. This includes the fundamental shift in human-animal relations associated with domestication; the varied meanings of wild and domestic animals; as well as the importance of animals as wealth, as objects of sacrifice, as totems or metaphors for humans, and as symbols in art. Meat can be used in feasting and meat sharing to create, cement, and manipulate social relationships. This course is open to students of archaeology, cultural anthropology, and other disciplines with an interest in human-animal relations.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":297, "title": "Food and Work", "code": "ANTHR 3325", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course will explore key topics in the critical study of labor and capitalism through the lens of food. Questions of race, gender, and class, but also toxicity, settler colonialism, as well as production and reproduction can all be read in the landscapes of food provision and procurement. Food is the ground for an array of labor processes\u2014planting, harvesting, transporting, serving, and eating, just to name a few. Some of these forms of work are overt (stooped workers toiling in pesticide ridden field, for example). But some of these forms of work are invisible and unpaid. And sometimes, they are incredibly well remunerated but totally shadowy. By studying these different forms of work comparatively, we can understand genealogies and futures of inequality, resource use, and the nature of work itself.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":298, "title": "Primate Behavior and Ecology with Emphasis on African Apes", "code": "ANTHR 3390", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "The course will investigate all aspects of non-human primate life. Based on the fundamentals of evolutionary theory, group and inter-individual behaviors will be presented. In addition, an understanding of group structure and breeding systems will be reached through an evaluation of ecological constraints imposed on primates in different habitats. Subjects include: primate taxonomy, diet and foraging, predation, cooperation and competition, social ontogeny, kinship, and mating strategies.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":299, "title": "Multicultural Issues in Education", "code": "ANTHR 3405", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course explores research on race, ethnicity and language in American education. It examines historical and current patterns of school achievement for minoritized youths. It also examines the cultural and social premises undergirding educational practices in diverse communities and schools. Policies, programs and pedagogy, including multicultural and bilingual education, are explored.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":300, "title": "Anthropology of Global Health", "code": "ANTHR 3413", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "The term global health refers to an aspiration and a set of problems.\u00a0 As an aspiration, global health seeks to unite biosecurity, humanitarian, and philanthropic efforts to rid the world of disease.\u00a0 Seen as a set of problems, global health is more unruly.\u00a0 Deciding when an epidemic becomes a global emergency, or calculating the economic value of healthy childbirth, is anything but straightforward.\u00a0 Drawing on critical texts from medical anthropology, science studies, and allied fields, this course asks: What is the relationship of global health to colonialism and empire?\u00a0 \u00a0How do market and political actors shape health interventions?\u00a0 Finally, what is the future for global health in the context of a changing climate?", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":301, "title": "Myth, Ritual, and Symbol", "code": "ANTHR 3420", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course approaches the study of religion, symbols, and myth from an anthropological perspective.\u00a0The centrality and universality of religion and myth-making in social and symbolic life has been fundamental in the development of cultural theory.\u00a0Our aim is to understand with this is so. We begin by examining the classic theories of religion in the works of Durkheim, Marx, Weber, Mauss, and Freud, among others, followed by an exploration of how these theories have been influential in anthropological studies of symbolism, cosmology, ritual, selfhood, myth, sorcery, witchcraft, and pilgrimage.\u00a0We conclude by examining the apparent persistence, revival and transformation of religious and magical beliefs and practices within modern, modernizing, and postcolonial states.\u00a0We ask whether an increasing politicization and globalization of religious ideology through technological mediation poses significant challenges to the anthropological analysis of religion.\u00a0In so doing, we also try to understand better the human experience of and identification with the spiritual, mythical, and religious in the contemporary moment.\u00a0This, in turn, leads us to investigate the inherent volatility of such identifications and experiences within the larger national and global framework of cultural politics.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":302, "title": "Culture, Politics, and Environment in the Circumpolar North", "code": "ANTHR 3422", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course examines the cultures and histories of the circumpolar North. The primary emphasis is on the North American Arctic and Subarctic with some attention to northern Eurasia for comparative purposes. The focus is on the indigenous peoples of the region and the socio-political and ecological dimensions of their evolving relationships with southern industrial societies.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":303, "title": "Ethnoracial Identity in Anthropology, Language, and Law", "code": "ANTHR 3475", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "In this course, we examine the role that law and language, as mutually constitutive mediating systems, occupy in constructing ethnoracial identity in the United States. We will approach law from a critical anthropological perspective, as a signifying and significant sociocultural system, rather than as an objective\u00a0structure of rational rules and processes, to consider how legal norms, procedures, and discourses inform other processes of sociocultural production and reproduction, thus contributing to the creation and maintenance of differential power relations. We will draw on anthropological, linguistic, and critical race theory as well as ethnographic and legal material to guide and document our analyses.", "tags": "SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":304, "title": "Asians in the Americas: A Comparative Perspective", "code": "ANTHR 3703", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "The common perception of ethnicity is that it is a natural\u00a0and an inevitable consequence of cultural difference. Asians\u00a0overseas, in particular, have won repute as a people who cling tenaciously to their culture and refuse to assimilate into their host societies and cultures. But, who are the Asians?\u00a0On what basis can we label Asians\u00a0an ethnic group? Although there is a significant Asian presence in the Caribbean, the category Asian\u00a0itself does not exist in the Caribbean. What does this say about the nature of categories that label and demarcate groups of people on the basis of alleged cultural and phenotypical characteristics? This course will examine the dynamics behind group identity, namely ethnicity, by comparing and contrasting the multicultural experience of Asian populations in the Caribbean and the United States. Ethnographic case studies will focus on the East Indian and Chinese experiences in the Caribbean and the Chinese, Korean, Japanese, Filipino, and Indian experiences in the United States.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":305, "title": "Humanities Scholars Research Methods", "code": "ANTHR 3950", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course explores the practice, theory, and methodology of humanities research, critical analysis, and communication through writing and oral presentation. We will study the work and impact of humanists (scholars of literature, history, theory, art, visual studies, film, anthropology, gender and sexuality studies), who pose big questions about the human condition. By reading and analyzing their scholarship\u2014critiquing them and engaging their ideas\u2014we will craft our own methods and voices. Students will refine their research methods (library research, note taking, organizing material, bibliographies, citation methods, proposals, outlines, etc.) and design their own independent research project. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in the Humanities Scholars Program.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":306, "title": "Public Service Capstone", "code": "ANTHR 4100", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This capstone course is intended for students who are completing the Public Service Studies minor. It provides an academic space to support students' reflection on their culminating experience with their community partners and community-based projects. Students will explore connections between their various fields of study, community engagement work, and personal development. Students will also conduct background research on the organizations or project stakeholders to better understand the issues and challenges facing their communities.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":307, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "ANTHR 4176", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":308, "title": "Meaningful Stuff: Interpreting Material Culture", "code": "ANTHR 4235", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Res ipsa loquitur --\u00a0the thing speaks for itself. This common expression captures a widespread belief about\u00a0objects' roles in human lives, but\u00a0deciphering\u00a0what objects have to say is actually a complex cultural\u00a0process. An object rarely has a single meaning; they are read variously in different cultural settings, and\u00a0even by different individuals within a cultural system. How does one know,\u00a0can one know,\u00a0the\u00a0meanings of an object? How are objects strategically deployed in social interaction,\u00a0particularly in cross-cultural interactions where each side may have radically different understandings? How does one even\u00a0know what an object is? We will explore the history and variety of ways that material culture and its\u00a0meanings have been studied, using archaeological and ethnographic examples.", "tags": "HA-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":309, "title": "Archaeological Research Design", "code": "ANTHR 4250", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This studio-style seminar provides an in-depth examination of the principles and practices of archaeological research design. We will examine all aspects of the research process, from concept formation, to methodology, to ethical practice and data management. Over the course of the semester, students will undertake a series of projects that will build incrementally into a research proposal. We will focus on developing the skills vital to designing archaeological research, starting with the formulation of a question and continuing through the exploratory process of defining proper sites, assemblages, analytical techniques, and presentation of findings. Class sessions will focus on designing research projects examining case studies drawn from world archaeology and student research projects.", "tags": "HA-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":310, "title": "Anthropology of Education", "code": "ANTHR 4402", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This seminar examines public schools and other educational spaces as sites where knowledge, learning,\u00a0learner, and identities are produced and contested. It explores how power and cultural norms work in educational settings, and the unintended teaching and learning that happens outside the purported curriculum. Topics include issues of multiculturalism and pluralism in schools and society, the school achievement of racial and ethnic minorities, youth cultures and identities, and literacy in adult learning spaces. This course is for students interested in the advanced study of multicultural schooling and education.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":311, "title": "Writing Ethnography: Theory, Genre and Practice", "code": "ANTHR 4418", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "What are the poetics and politics of ethnographic writing? How is this genre, what many would call the signature of cultural anthropology, distinct from other modes of scholarly writing? What are its possibilities, limits and effects? In this course we will read classic and experimental ethnographies and undertake exercises in ethnographic writing as a means to investigate ethnography as epistemology, genre and craft.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":312, "title": "Ethnographic Film Theory and History", "code": "ANTHR 4424", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This seminar explores the history and theory of ethnographic film. Keeping in mind broader issues of cross-cultural representation, we consider the evolution of ethnographic film as a genre for representing \"reality\", embodied practices, and anthropological concepts. Students will examine ethnographic authority, the production of otherness, and the sensory dimensions of knowledge production. The course charts out various approaches to ethnographic film, ranging from the mobilization of the camera as a tool for storytelling, scientific record and analysis, empowerment and political advocacy, and arts and aesthetics. We will theorize the role and status of ethnographic film as a signifying practice, form of meaning-making, and mode of anthropological theory building. We will pay close attention to the ethical and political concerns of cross-cultural communication and representation.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SSC-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":313, "title": "Carceral Worlds: Policing, Prisons, and Securitization", "code": "ANTHR 4476", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Grounded in anthropological and interdisciplinary analyses of policing, prisons, and security, this course aims to account for how carcerality shapes our worlds. Attentive to specificity and variability across place and time, we will consider how carceral logics take hold and expand, and how they are contested and reimagined. We will pay particular attention to the interrelatedness of race and carcerality; lived experiences of carcerality, including those of people imprisoned in various contexts and those engaged in carceral work; the intersections between carcerality and science and technology; and abolitionist frameworks that address the limitations and constitutive oppressions of carcerality as they radically reimagine other possibilities.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":314, "title": "Independent Study: Undergrad I", "code": "ANTHR 4910", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":315, "title": "Independent Study: Undergrad II", "code": "ANTHR 4920", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":316, "title": "Honors Thesis Write-Up", "code": "ANTHR 4984", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Final write-up of the thesis under the direct supervision of the thesis advisor, who will assign the grade for this course.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":317, "title": "Honors Workshop II", "code": "ANTHR 4992", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Course will consist of weekly, seminar-style meetings of all thesis writers until mid-semester, under the direction of the honors chair. This second semester concentrates on preparation of a full draft of the thesis by mid-semester, with ample time left for revisions prior to submission. Group meetings will concentrate on collective reviewing of the work of other students, presentation of research, and the like.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":318, "title": "Proseminar in Anthropology", "code": "ANTHR 6025", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course explores advanced topics in anthropological theory and practice. It builds on the history of the discipline that students will have examined in the preceding course ANTHR 6020, and seeks to immerse students in major contemporary theoretical developments and debates and the discipline's most pressing concerns. Coursework will proceed mainly by way of reading, writing, and discussion.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":319, "title": "Paleoethnobotany", "code": "ANTHR 6042", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course will prepare students to identify, analyze, and interpret plant remains gathered from archaeological sites. We will build a conceptual framework to explain how human behavior relates to plant patterning, drawing on case studies from around the world. Through hands-on laboratory activities, we will study aspects of plant anatomy and explore methods for the sampling and identification of plant remains, including charred seeds and wood, phytoliths, starch grains, and pollen. We will analyze paleoethnobotanical datasets using database and statistical programs to present evidence in varying formats. Final projects will involve the first-hand study of plant remains sampled from archaeological sites.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":320, "title": "Humans and Animals", "code": "ANTHR 6230", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Human-animal relationships are often seen in utilitarian, nutritional terms, particularly in archaeology. But animals and meat have significance far beyond their economic value. This course focuses on a broad range of these non-dietary roles of animals in human societies, past and present. This includes the fundamental shift in human-animal relations associated with domestication; the varied meanings of wild and domestic animals; as well as the importance of animals as wealth, as objects of sacrifice, as totems or metaphors for humans, and as symbols in art. Meat can be used in feasting and meat sharing to create, cement, and manipulate social relationships. This course is open to students of archaeology, cultural anthropology, and other disciplines with an interest in human-animal relations.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":321, "title": "Archaeological Research Design", "code": "ANTHR 6250", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This studio-style seminar provides an in-depth examination of the principles and practices of archaeological research design. We will examine all aspects of the research process, from concept formation, to methodology, to ethical practice and data management. Over the course of the semester, students will undertake a series of projects that will build incrementally into a research proposal. We will focus on developing the skills vital to designing archaeological research, starting with the formulation of a question and continuing through the exploratory process of defining proper sites, assemblages, analytical techniques, and presentation of findings. Class sessions will focus on designing research projects examining case studies drawn from world archaeology and student research projects.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":322, "title": "Social Theory", "code": "ANTHR 6301", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Sociologist C. Wright Mills challenged his readers to develop their \"sociological imagination\" to understand the social and historical forces at work in seemingly individual events, such as the receipt of a pink slip, a draft card, or a drug prescription. Within science and technology studies, scholars have documented how social issues can become scientific, technological, or medical, often appearing to leave the social realm naturalized, normalized, or pathologized. This course introduces graduate students to classic texts and concepts in social theory with a focus on how scholars apply such theories to empirical research. It will consider major thinkers and schools of social thought, such as Marx, Weber, Durkheim, Mannheim, Foucault, and the Frankfurt School. It will also consider how a nuanced interplay of theory and empirical data can bring critically important insights to both theoretical and empirical understandings of the world. The course is relevant for students in sociology, history, and anthropology who are interested in social theory.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":323, "title": "Anthropology of Global Health", "code": "ANTHR 6413", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "The term global health refers to an aspiration and a set of problems.\u00a0 As an aspiration, global health seeks to unite biosecurity, humanitarian, and philanthropic efforts to rid the world of disease.\u00a0 Seen as a set of problems, global health is more unruly.\u00a0 Deciding when an epidemic becomes a global emergency, or calculating the economic value of healthy childbirth, is anything but straightforward.\u00a0 Drawing on critical texts from medical anthropology, science studies, and allied fields, this course asks: What is the relationship of global health to colonialism and empire?\u00a0 \u00a0How do market and political actors shape health interventions?\u00a0 Finally, what is the future for global health in the context of a changing climate?", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":324, "title": "Culture, Politics, and Environment in the Circumpolar North", "code": "ANTHR 6422", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course examines the cultures and histories of the circumpolar North. The primary emphasis is on the North American Arctic and Subarctic with some attention to northern Eurasia for comparative purposes. The focus is on the indigenous peoples of the region and the socio-political and ecological dimensions of their evolving relationships with southern industrial societies.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":325, "title": "Ethnoracial Identity in Anthropology, Language, and Law", "code": "ANTHR 6424", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "In this course, we examine the role that law and language, as mutually constitutive mediating systems, occupy in constructing ethnoracial identity in the United States. We will approach law from a critical anthropological perspective, as a signifying and significant\u00a0sociocultural system, rather than as an objective\u00a0structure of rational rules and processes, to consider how legal norms, procedures, and discourses inform other processes of sociocultural production and reproduction, thus contributing to the creation and maintenance of differential power relations. We will draw on anthropological, linguistic, and critical race theory as well as ethnographic and legal material to guide and document our analyses.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":326, "title": "Proposal Development", "code": "ANTHR 6440", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This seminar focuses on preparing a full-scale proposal for anthropological fieldwork for a dissertation. Topics include identifying appropriate funding sources; defining a researchable problem; selecting and justifying a particular fieldwork site; situating the ethnographic case within appropriate theoretical contexts; selecting and justifying appropriate research methodologies; developing a feasible timetable for field research; ethical considerations and human subjects protection procedures; and preparing appropriate budgets. This is a writing seminar, and students will complete a proposal suitable for submission to a major funding agency in the social sciences.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":327, "title": "Perspectives on the Nation", "code": "ANTHR 6482", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This course will critically examine the key texts that have informed our understanding of the nation and nationalism. Beginning with some of the founding texts such as Hahn Kohn's The Idea of Nationalism: A Study in its Origins and Backgrounds, Plamenatz's Two Types of Nationalism, and Renan's What is a Nation, we will then move on to more contemporary writings by Gellner, Hobsbawm and Anderson and end with analytical approaches addressing the national question\u00a0in postcolonial contexts such as Partha Chatterjee's Nationalist Thought and the Colonial World. A central theme will be how culture, power, and history are implicated in the concept of Nation. We will also explore the possibilities of an ethnographic approach to the nation and ask if such an analytical and methodological move may help us better grapple with the perplexing emotive dimension of nationalisms.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":328, "title": "Asians in the Americas: A Comparative Perspective", "code": "ANTHR 6703", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "The common perception of ethnicity is that it is a natural and an inevitable consequence of cultural difference. Asians\u00a0overseas, in particular, have won repute as a people who cling tenaciously to their culture and refuse to assimilate into their host societies and cultures. But, who are the Asians?\u00a0On what basis can we label Asians\u00a0an ethnic group? Although there is a significant Asian presence in the Caribbean, the category Asian\u00a0itself does not exist in the Caribbean. What does this say about the nature of categories that label and demarcate groups of people on the basis of alleged cultural and phenotypical characteristics? This course will examine the dynamics behind group identity, namely ethnicity, by comparing and contrasting the multicultural experience of Asian populations in the Caribbean and the United States. Ethnographic case studies will focus on the East Indian and Chinese experiences in the Caribbean and the Chinese, Korean, Japanese, Filipino, and Indian experiences in the United States.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":329, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "ANTHR 7176", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":330, "title": "Meaningful Stuff: Interpreting Material Culture", "code": "ANTHR 7235", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Res ipsa loquitur --\u00a0the thing speaks for itself. This common expression captures a widespread belief about\u00a0objects' roles in human lives, but\u00a0deciphering\u00a0what objects have to say is actually a complex cultural\u00a0process. An object rarely has a single meaning; they are read variously in different cultural settings, and\u00a0even by different individuals within a cultural system. How does one know,\u00a0can one know,\u00a0the\u00a0meanings of an object? How are objects strategically deployed in social interaction,\u00a0particularly in cross-cultural interactions where each side may have radically different understandings? How does one even\u00a0know what an object is? We will explore the history and variety of ways that material culture and its\u00a0meanings have been studied, using archaeological and ethnographic examples.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":331, "title": "Anthropology of Education", "code": "ANTHR 7402", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This seminar examines public schools and other educational spaces as sites where knowledge, learning, learner, and identities are produced and contested. It explores how power and cultural norms work in educational settings, and the unintended teaching and learning that happens outside the purported curriculum. Topics include issues of multiculturalism and pluralism in schools and society, the school achievement of racial and ethnic minorities, youth cultures and identities, and literacy in adult learning spaces. This course is for students interested in the advanced study of multicultural schooling and education.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":332, "title": "Writing Ethnography: Theory, Genre and Practice", "code": "ANTHR 7418", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "What are the poetics and politics of ethnographic writing? How is this genre, what many would call the signature of cultural anthropology, distinct from other modes of scholarly writing? What are its possibilities, limits and effects? In this course we will read classic and experimental ethnographies and undertake exercises in ethnographic writing as a means to investigate ethnography as epistemology, genre and craft.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":333, "title": "Ethnographic Film Theory and History", "code": "ANTHR 7424", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "This seminar explores the history and theory of ethnographic film. Keeping in mind broader issues of cross-cultural representation, we consider the evolution of ethnographic film as a genre for representing \"reality\", embodied practices, and anthropological concepts. Students will examine ethnographic authority, the production of otherness, and the sensory dimensions of knowledge production. The course charts out various approaches to ethnographic film, ranging from the mobilization of the camera as a tool for storytelling, scientific record and analysis, empowerment and political advocacy, and arts and aesthetics. We will theorize the role and status of ethnographic film as a signifying practice, form of meaning-making, and mode of anthropological theory building. We will pay close attention to the ethical and political concerns of cross-cultural communication and representation.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":334, "title": "Carceral Worlds: Policing, Prisons, and Securitization", "code": "ANTHR 7476", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Grounded in anthropological and interdisciplinary analyses of policing, prisons, and security, this course aims to account for how carcerality shapes our worlds. Attentive to specificity and variability across place and time, we will consider how carceral logics take hold and expand, and how they are contested and reimagined. We will pay particular attention to the interrelatedness of race and carcerality; lived experiences of carcerality, including those of people imprisoned in various contexts and those engaged in carceral work; the intersections between carcerality and science and technology; and abolitionist frameworks that address the limitations and constitutive oppressions of carcerality as they radically reimagine other possibilities.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":335, "title": "Southeast Asia: Readings in Special Problems", "code": "ANTHR 7520", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course on topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":336, "title": "South Asia: Readings in Special Problems", "code": "ANTHR 7530", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":337, "title": "Problems in Himalayan Studies", "code": "ANTHR 7540", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":338, "title": "East Asia: Readings in Special Problems", "code": "ANTHR 7550", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":339, "title": "Towards an Anti-Racist and Decolonial Anthropology: Futures", "code": "ANTHR 7902", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":340, "title": "Independent Study: Grad I", "code": "ANTHR 7910", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":341, "title": "Independent Study: Grad II", "code": "ANTHR 7920", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":342, "title": "Independent Study: Grad III", "code": "ANTHR 7930", "subject": "ANTHR", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ANTHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":343, "title": "Intensive Arabic I", "code": "ARAB 1200", "subject": "ARAB", "descr": "This course designed for students who are interested in completing Cornell's Elementary Arabic sequence (ARAB 1201\u00a0and ARAB 1202) in the spring semester. This will be a useful course for students who miss taking Elementary Arabic I in the fall since the course is not offered in the spring.\u00a0 Students finishing this course will be in a position to take  ARAB 1203 - Intermediate Arabic I.", "tags": "ARAB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":344, "title": "Elementary Arabic II", "code": "ARAB 1202", "subject": "ARAB", "descr": "This two-course sequence assumes no previous knowledge of Arabic and provides a thorough grounding in the four language skills of listening, speaking, reading, and writing. It starts with the alphabet and the number system and builds the four skills gradually and systematically through carefully selected and organized materials focusing on specific, concrete and familiar topics such as self identification, family, travel, food, renting an apartment, study, the weather, etc.). These topics are listed in the textbook's table of contents.\u00a0 The student who successfully completes the two-course sequence will have mastered about 1000 basic words and will be able to: 1) understand and actively participate in conversations on a limited range of practical topics such as self-identification, family, school, work, the weather, travel, etc., 2) read and understand, with the help of a short list of words, passages of up to 180 words written in Arabic script, and 3) discuss orally in class and write a 50-word paragraph in Arabic.\u00a0 The two-course sequence aims to take the student from the Novice to the Intermediate Mid level according to the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.", "tags": "ARAB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":345, "title": "Intermediate Arabic II", "code": "ARAB 2202", "subject": "ARAB", "descr": "In this two-course sequence learners continue to develop the four language skills of listening, speaking, reading, and writing and grammar foundation through the extensive use of graded materials on a wide variety of topics.\u00a0 While more attention is given to developing native-like pronunciation and to grammatical accuracy than in ARAB 1201\u00a0and ARAB 1202, the main focus of the course will be on encouraging fluency and facility in understanding the language and communicating ideas in it.\u00a0 The student who successfully completes this two-course sequence will have mastered over 1500 new words and will be able to: 1) understand and actively participate in conversations related to a wide variety of topics beyond those covered in ARAB 1201\u00a0and ARAB 1202, such as the history and geography of the Arab world, food and health, sports, economic matters, the environment, politics, the Palestine problem, etc. 2) read and understand, with the help of a short list of words, passages of up to 300 words, and 3) discuss orally in class and write a 150-word paragraph in Arabic with fewer grammatical errors than in ARAB 1202.\u00a0 The two-course sequence aims to take the student from the Intermediate Mid to the Advanced Mid level according to the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ARAB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":346, "title": "Introduction to Quranic Arabic", "code": "ARAB 2204", "subject": "ARAB", "descr": "This course is designed for students who are interested in reading the language of the Qur'an with accuracy and understanding. The first week (4 classes) will be devoted to an introduction of the history of the Qur'an: the revelation, collection, variant readings, and establishment of an authoritative edition. The last week will be devoted to a general overview of \"revisionist\" literature on the Qur'an. In the remaining 12 weeks, we will cover all of Part 30 (Juz' 'Amma, suuras 78-114) and three suuras of varying length (36, 19, and 12).", "tags": "LA-AS|HST-AS|ARAB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":347, "title": "Advanced Arabic II", "code": "ARAB 3202", "subject": "ARAB", "descr": "In this two-semester sequence, learners will be introduced to authentic, unedited Arabic language materials ranging from short stories, and poems, to newspaper articles dealing with social,\u00a0 political,\u00a0 and cultural issues. Emphasis will be on developing fluency in oral expression through discussions of issues presented in the reading and listening selections. There will be more focus on the development of native-like pronunciation and accurate use of grammatical structures than in the previous four courses. A primary objective of the course is the development of the writing skill through free composition exercises in topics of interest to individual students.\u00a0 This course starts where ARAB 2202\u00a0leaves off and continues the development of the four language skills and grammar foundation using 18 themes, some new and some introduced in previous courses but are presented here at a more challenging level.\u00a0 The student who successfully completes this two-course sequence have mastered over 3000 new words and will be able, within context of the 18 new and recycled themes to: 1) understand and actively participate in conversations, 2) read and understand, with the help of a short list of words, authentic, unedited passages of up to 400 words, and 3) discuss orally in class and write a 300-word paragraph in Arabic with fewer grammatical errors than in ARAB 2202.\u00a0 The two-course sequence aims to take the student from the Advanced Mid to the Superior level according to the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ARAB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":348, "title": "Kalila wa Dimna for Students of Arabic", "code": "ARAB 3687", "subject": "ARAB", "descr": "This course is designed for students who have successfully finished at least one year of Arabic study or its equivalent. It is based on the well-known Arabic literary classic Kalila wa Dimna, an eighth-century translation (from Sanskrit to Persian and from Persian to Arabic) of a collection of fables about people and animals that has long been enjoyed by Arab children and adults alike. The main textbook for the course is Kalila wa Dimna for Students of Arabic, which retells the stories in Modern Standard Arabic and includes a wide variety of exercises and activities to help the development of the four language skills of reading, listening, speaking and writing.\u00a0 We'll be reading and listening to the stories and retelling and writing about them. The course fulfills the Group A requirement of the Arabic Minor.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ARAB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":349, "title": "Design II", "code": "ARCH 1102", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Continuation of ARCH 1101. Covers human, social, technical, and aesthetic factors related to space and form. Design problems range from those of the immediate environment of the individual to that of small social groups.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":350, "title": "Representation II: Media of Representation", "code": "ARCH 1502", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "The understanding of representational and fabrication techniques as generative tools in the design process.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":351, "title": "Structural Concepts", "code": "ARCH 1612", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Fundamental concepts of structural behavior. Statics and strength of materials. Introduction to and analysis of simple structural systems.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":352, "title": "History of Architecture II", "code": "ARCH 1802", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "The history of the built environment as social and cultural expression from more recent times to the present. Architecture and urban design themes, theories, and ideas are addressed in greater detail leading to the present time.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":353, "title": "Design IV", "code": "ARCH 2102", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "In this Integrative Design Studio, the requirements of building systems are seen to both support and inform architectural concepts and form. One of the key design experiences during this semester will be the interaction of these concepts and building systems. Questions of energy, thermal comfort, sustainability, structure, material, and life safety will be addressed.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":354, "title": "Building Technology II: Structural Elements", "code": "ARCH 2615", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Concepts and procedures for the design, manufacture, and construction of structural components (e.g., walls, columns, beams, slabs) in steel, concrete, masonry, and timber.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":355, "title": "Environmental Systems II: Building Dynamics", "code": "ARCH 2616", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course examines the design and analysis of the building envelope, with a focus on the material and energetic transformations taking place at the boundary between architecture and environment. Topics include: comfort, building thermodynamics, envelope assemblies, thermal modeling, active and passive control systems, daylighting and architectural acoustics.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":356, "title": "Design V", "code": "ARCH 3101", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Design and development of complex architectural projects situated in urban contexts and developed with regard to program, site, building, and representation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":357, "title": "Design VI", "code": "ARCH 3102", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Design and development of complex architectural projects situated in urban contexts and developed with regard to program, site, building, and representation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":358, "title": "Special Investigations in Architectural Design", "code": "ARCH 3197", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":359, "title": "Special Topics in the Theory of Architecture I", "code": "ARCH 3308", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Theory of Architecture. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":360, "title": "Special Investigations in the Theory of Architecture I", "code": "ARCH 3397", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":361, "title": "Special Investigations in Architecture, Culture, and Society", "code": "ARCH 3497", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":362, "title": "Special Topics in the History of Architecture and Urbanism", "code": "ARCH 3819", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of History of Architecture and Urbanism. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":363, "title": "Special Investigations in History of Architecture and Urbanism", "code": "ARCH 3897", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study for undergraduate students.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":364, "title": "Design VII", "code": "ARCH 4101", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Advanced programs in architectural design, with options in, but not limited to, urban design, architectural technology, computational design, ecology, culture, and representation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":365, "title": "Design VIII", "code": "ARCH 4102", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Advanced programs in architectural design, with options including, but not limited to, urban design, architectural technology, computational design, ecology, culture, and representation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":366, "title": "Special Topics in Architecture, Culture, and Society", "code": "ARCH 4408", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Architecture, Culture and Society. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":367, "title": "Special Investigations in Visual Representation", "code": "ARCH 4508", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":368, "title": "Special Topics in Visual Representation I", "code": "ARCH 4509", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Visual Representation. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":369, "title": "Ecological Literacy and Design", "code": "ARCH 4601", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course is a design-oriented lecture/seminar course for students who are concerned about the role they play as design professionals in affecting the biophysical world. The course's prime objective is to develop a new worldview founded on a broader sensitivity for things living and an accompanying set of meaningful environmental ethics. The course's secondary objectives are to develop a deeper knowledge of environmental issues, construct conceptual frameworks for analysis of these issues and to demonstrate how ecological knowledge can be applied to design.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":370, "title": "Special Topics in Construction", "code": "ARCH 4605", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Construction. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":371, "title": "Special Topics in Environmental Systems and Conservation", "code": "ARCH 4619", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Environmental Systems and Conservation. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":372, "title": "Sustainable Architecture: The Science and Politics of Green Building", "code": "ARCH 4621", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Students will examine the five basic components of sustainable building design (site, water, energy, materials, and IEQ) from both a historical perspective and as implemented through the LEED/USGBC rating system, in each case comparing the issues raised by building and environmental science with the political context within which those issues are considered.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":373, "title": "Special Investigations in Construction", "code": "ARCH 4697", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":374, "title": "Special Investigations in Environmental Systems and Conservation", "code": "ARCH 4698", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":375, "title": "Special Investigations in Structures", "code": "ARCH 4699", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":376, "title": "Design IX", "code": "ARCH 5101", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Advanced programs in architectural design, with options in, but not limited to, urban design, architectural technology, computational design, ecology, culture, and representation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":377, "title": "Core Design Studio II", "code": "ARCH 5112", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Continuation of subjects developed in the first term. Focus on issues of program and architectonics in the design of a building type in context; introduction to site planning.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":378, "title": "Core Design Studios IV: Integrative Design Practices", "code": "ARCH 5114", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Focus on the development of architectural ideas in constructed, material form. The studio explores emergent topics and constructive methods in contemporary architectural practice. Design study includes the creation of a comprehensive set of representations that describes an architectural project in detail. Students work in collaborative groups and in consultation with advisors drawn from professional practice to develop a project that engages a complex range of topical areas, including: structural and environmental systems, building envelope systems, materiality and construction, life-safety planning, and sustainability.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":379, "title": "Core Design Studios V: Expanded Practices", "code": "ARCH 5115", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "These studios use an expanded form of design practice to address meta-issues in global urbanism. They recognize that architectural production is becoming increasingly heterogeneous and\u00a0networked, and that real-world projects are seldom defined by site boundaries, or the work of a single profession. On-site design research\u00a0and speculation are used to situate projects within larger social, political and environmental systems, creatively engage the perspectives of other actors shaping the built environment, and opportunistically orchestrate real world processes and interactions.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":380, "title": "Vertical Design Studio", "code": "ARCH 5116", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "The vertical studios are topical in nature and engage contemporary issues in architectural practice and research.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":381, "title": "Professional Practice", "code": "ARCH 5201", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Examination of organizational and management theories and practices for delivering professional design services. Includes a historic overview of the profession and a review of the architect's responsibilities from the pre-contract phase through cost estimating and specifications to construction. Application of computer technology in preparing specifications.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":382, "title": "Multicultural Work Environments", "code": "ARCH 5203", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study. Promotes an understanding of the cultural assumptions we bring to the work environment and the effects of cultural differences on the ways in which architecture is practiced. A 5-10 page paper relates the experience of the internship to one or more texts approved by the instructor. Course may be taken more than once, but a maximum of 1 credit may be used to fulfill departmental free elective distribution requirement.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":383, "title": "Professional Training", "code": "ARCH 5204", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This 1-credit course explores a holistic view of the 'typologies' of professional practices and helps prepare students for the various phases of professional applications that include the search, the cover letter, the resum\u00e9, the portfolio and the interview. NB: individual portfolio reviews are not an expectation of the course.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":384, "title": "Theories and Analyses of Architecture II", "code": "ARCH 5302", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Continuation of ARCH 5301\u00a0focusing on themes in architectural discourse, design, and inquiry from the 1960s to the present, and their creative/critical implications.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":385, "title": "Constructed Drawing II", "code": "ARCH 5512", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Develops understanding of, and proficiency in, projective drawing,\u00a0in both analog and digital forms. Students continue to develop a variety of digital representation applications, including modeling, rendering, and animation, and scripting.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":386, "title": "Structural Concepts", "code": "ARCH 5612", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Fundamental concepts of structural behavior. Statics and strength of materials. Introduction to and analysis of simple structural systems.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":387, "title": "Building Technology II: Structural Elements", "code": "ARCH 5615", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Concepts and procedures for the design, manufacture, and construction of structural components (e.g., walls, columns, beams, slabs) in steel, concrete, masonry, and timber.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":388, "title": "Environmental Systems II: Building Dynamics", "code": "ARCH 5616", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course examines the design and analysis of the building envelope, with a focus on the material and energetic transformations taking place at the boundary between architecture and environment. Topics include: comfort, building thermodynamics, envelope assemblies, thermal modeling, active and passive control systems, daylighting and architectural acoustics.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":389, "title": "History of Architecture II", "code": "ARCH 5802", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "The history of the built environment as social and cultural expression from the modern period to the present day is studied through selected examples from across the world. Architecture and urban design themes, theories, and ideas are explored through texts, artifacts, buildings, cities, and landscapes.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":390, "title": "Special Topics in the History of Architecture and Urbanism", "code": "ARCH 5819", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of History of Architecture and Urbanism. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":391, "title": "Design X Thesis", "code": "ARCH 5902", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":392, "title": "Special Problems in Design", "code": "ARCH 6109", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":393, "title": "Special Investigations in the Theory of Architecture II", "code": "ARCH 6307", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":394, "title": "Special Topics in the Theory of Architecture II", "code": "ARCH 6308", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Theory of Architecture. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":395, "title": "Special Topics in Architecture, Culture, and Society", "code": "ARCH 6408", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Architecture, Culture and Society. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content. please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":396, "title": "Graduate Investigations in Architecture, Culture, and Society", "code": "ARCH 6409", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":397, "title": "Special Investigations in Visual Representation II", "code": "ARCH 6508", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":398, "title": "Special Topics in Visual Representation II", "code": "ARCH 6509", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Visual Representation. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":399, "title": "Special Topics in Construction", "code": "ARCH 6605", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of Construction. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":400, "title": "Special Investigations in Structures", "code": "ARCH 6609", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":401, "title": "Practicum", "code": "ARCH 6805", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course exercises history of architecture and urbanism's capacities for affecting contemporary events through critical associations with the past. The workshop culminates in an exhibition, publication, symposium, curricular initiative, or other public occasion. Enrollment of qualified graduate students from associated fields is encouraged.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":402, "title": "Seminar in Special Topics in the History of Architecture and Urbanism", "code": "ARCH 6819", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of History of Architecture and Urbanism. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content. For precise content, please see the Architecture Department webpage.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":403, "title": "Design B: Topic Studio", "code": "ARCH 7112", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Advanced programs in architectural design, with options in, but not limited to, urban design, architectural technology, computational design, ecology, culture, and representation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":404, "title": "Design Topic Research Studio 2: Matter Design Computation", "code": "ARCH 7152", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Continuation of subjects developed in the first term. Focus is on research methods in matter design computation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":405, "title": "Graduate Independent Study in the History of Architecture and Urbanism", "code": "ARCH 7809", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":406, "title": "Projects in Advanced Architectural Design", "code": "ARCH 8903", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Final project documentation drawing on work from ARCH 7111, ARCH 7112, and ARCH 7113\u00a0design studios as well as from the four courses representing the student's territory of investigation (TI) \u2014 discourse, ecology, representation, or urbanism \u2014 that demonstrate expertise in the student's TI.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":407, "title": "Independent Design Thesis", "code": "ARCH 8904", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":408, "title": "Independent Design Thesis: Matter Design Computation", "code": "ARCH 8905", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "An independent design project on a topic selected and developed by the student and researched in ARCH 8151. Marking the transition between academic and professional practices, the objective of the thesis project is for each student to define an individual position with regard to the discipline and practice of architecture in the context of matter design computation.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":409, "title": "Thesis in Advanced Architectural Design I", "code": "ARCH 8906", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":410, "title": "Proseminar in Design Research", "code": "ARCH 8911", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "This course offers a synthesis of design and research methods for the development of an independent thesis proposal. Course work includes exposure to different theories and practices of design inquiry, explorations of critical positions for individual development, and preparation of a document encapsulating research leading to a thesis proposition. Successful completion of the course, which includes approval of the thesis document, is a prerequisite for advancement into ARCH 8912 - Independent Design Thesis.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":411, "title": "Independent Design Thesis", "code": "ARCH 8912", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "An independent design project on a topic selected and developed by the student and researched in ARCH 8911. Marking the transition between academic and professional practices, the thesis project is an opportunity for each student to define an individual position with regard to the discipline of architecture.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":412, "title": "Ph.D. Dissertation in the History of Architecture and Urbanism", "code": "ARCH 9901", "subject": "ARCH", "descr": "Independent study for the doctoral degree.", "tags": "ARCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":413, "title": "Archaeology-Great Discoveries", "code": "ARKEO 1702", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This introductory course surveys the archaeology of the ancient Greek and Roman Mediterranean. Each week, we will explore a different archaeological discovery that transformed scholars' understanding of the ancient world. From early excavations at sites such as Pompeii and Troy, to modern field projects across the Mediterranean, we will discover the rich cultures of ancient Greece and Rome while also exploring the history, methods, and major intellectual goals of archaeology.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":414, "title": "Early Agriculture", "code": "ARKEO 2201", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Throughout most of the human career, people survived by hunting and gathering wild foods. The advent of food production is one of the most profound changes in history and prehistory. This course examines the current evidence for the appearance and spread of agriculture - plant and animal domestication - around the world. We will consider definitions of agriculture and domestication, the conditions under which it arises, the consequences for those who adopt it, and why it has spread over most of the world.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":415, "title": "Drinking through the Ages: Intoxicating Beverages in Near Eastern and World History", "code": "ARKEO 2522", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This course examines the production and exchange of wine, beer, coffee and tea, and the social and ideological dynamics involved in their consumption. We start in ancient Egypt and Mesopotamia, and end with tea and coffee in the Arab and Ottoman worlds. Archaeological and textual evidence will be used throughout to show the centrality of drinking in daily, ritual and political life.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":416, "title": "Ancient Ships and Seafaring: Introduction to Nautical Archaeology", "code": "ARKEO 2661", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "A survey of the history and development of ships and seafaring as revealed by shipwrecks, boat burials, texts, art, and other evidence. The role of nautical technology and seafaring among the maritime peoples of the ancient Mediterranean world-Canaanites, Minoans, Mycenaeans, Phoenicians, Hebrews, Greeks, and Romans-and the riverine cultures of Mesopotamia and Egypt is addressed. The survey stretches from the earliest evidence for Mediterranean seafaring around 10,000 bce to the first transatlantic voyages in the 15th century, including Arab, Viking, and European explorers, and the birth of modern capitalism in the Italian Maritime Republics. Along the way, economics, war, exploration, cult, life at sea, and colonization are discussed.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":417, "title": "Cleopatra's Egypt: Tradition and Transformation", "code": "ARKEO 2688", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Following the conquests of Alexander, the ancient civilization of Egypt came under Greek rule. This period is best known for its famous queen Cleopatra, the last independent ruler of ancient Egypt. But even before Cleopatra's life and death, the Egypt that she governed was a fascinating place \u2013 and a rich case study in cultural interactions under ancient imperialism. This course explores life in Egypt under Greek rule, during the three centuries known as the Ptolemaic period (named after Cleopatra's family, the Ptolemaic dynasty). We will examine the history and culture of Ptolemaic Egypt, an empire at the crossroads of Africa, the Near East, and the Mediterranean. We will explore the experiences of both Egyptians and Greeks living in this multi-cultural, multi-ethnic, and multi-linguistic society. Finally, we will investigate the ways that Ptolemaic Egypt can shed light on modern experiences of imperialism, colonialism, and globalization.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":418, "title": "The Ancient Economy", "code": "ARKEO 2712", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Ancient economies were very different to our modern economy: there were no banks, transport and communication were difficult, and the discipline of economics did not yet exist. Yet there are also striking similarities between the ancient and modern economic worlds: many people liked luxuries, production was increasingly standardized, and buyers and sellers came together on market days. This course introduces the key characteristics of ancient economies, with a focus on ancient Rome but also looking at classical Athens and further afield. It is structured around themes such as trade and exchange, craft, consumption, and money. Its aim is to probe the nature of the ancient economy, both for students interested in the ancient world and for students keen to put the modern economy in historical perspective.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SSC-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":419, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "ARKEO 2812", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":420, "title": "Undergraduate Independent Study in Archaeology and Related Fields", "code": "ARKEO 3000", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Undergraduate students pursue topics of particular interest under the guidance of a faculty member.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":421, "title": "Paleoethnobotany", "code": "ARKEO 3042", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This course will prepare students to identify, analyze, and interpret plant remains gathered from archaeological sites. We will build a conceptual framework to explain how human behavior relates to plant patterning, drawing on case studies from around the world. Through hands-on laboratory activities, we will study aspects of plant anatomy and explore methods for the sampling and identification of plant remains, including charred seeds and wood, phytoliths, starch grains, and pollen. We will analyze paleoethnobotanical datasets using database and statistical programs to present evidence in varying formats. Final projects will involve the first-hand study of plant remains sampled from archaeological sites.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":422, "title": "Introduction to Dendrochronology", "code": "ARKEO 3090", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Introduction and training in dendrochronology (tree-ring dating) and its applications in archaeology, art history, climate and environment through lab work and participation in ongoing research projects using ancient to modern wood samples from around the world. Supervised reading and laboratory/project work. Possibilities exists for summer fieldwork in the Mediterranean, Mexico, and New York State.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":423, "title": "Humans and Animals", "code": "ARKEO 3230", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Human-animal relationships are often seen in utilitarian, nutritional terms, particularly in archaeology. But animals and meat have significance far beyond their economic value. This course focuses on a broad range of these non-dietary roles of animals in human societies, past and present. This includes the fundamental shift in human-animal relations associated with domestication; the varied meanings of wild and domestic animals; as well as the importance of animals as wealth, as objects of sacrifice, as totems or metaphors for humans, and as symbols in art. Meat can be used in feasting and meat sharing to create, cement, and manipulate social relationships. This course is open to students of archaeology, cultural anthropology, and other disciplines with an interest in human-animal relations.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":424, "title": "Identity in the Ancient World", "code": "ARKEO 3738", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Have you ever been asked 'who are you' or 'which group do you belong to'? You would have noted how the answer shifts according to who is asking, in which context, etc. While everyone is unique, the possible replies in any one situation are largely defined at the level of society. What is less often realized, however, is that identity shows in particular in ways of doing: what and how one eats; what one wears and when; how one moves in a space. Archaeology is in a unique position to investigate these questions, and the Greek and Roman worlds offer a fruitful test ground, both because of their varied evidence, and because of their peculiar echoing in the modern world and its manifold identities. This course will address current theories about identity and its formation, discuss the various facets of identity (e.g. gender, citizenship, ethnicity) in the Greek and Roman worlds, and introduce tools for studying identity in the past.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":425, "title": "Meaningful Stuff: Interpreting Material Culture", "code": "ARKEO 4235", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Res ipsa loquitur --\u00a0the thing speaks for itself. This common expression captures a widespread belief about\u00a0objects' roles in human lives, but\u00a0deciphering\u00a0what objects have to say is actually a complex cultural\u00a0process. An object rarely has a single meaning; they are read variously in different cultural settings, and\u00a0even by different individuals within a cultural system. How does one know,\u00a0can one know,\u00a0the\u00a0meanings of an object? How are objects strategically deployed in social interaction,\u00a0particularly in cross-cultural interactions where each side may have radically different understandings? How does one even\u00a0know what an object is? We will explore the history and variety of ways that material culture and its\u00a0meanings have been studied, using archaeological and ethnographic examples.", "tags": "HA-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":426, "title": "Archaeological Research Design", "code": "ARKEO 4250", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This studio-style seminar provides an in-depth examination of the principles and practices of archaeological research design. We will examine all aspects of the research process, from concept formation, to methodology, to ethical practice and data management. Over the course of the semester, students will undertake a series of projects that will build incrementally into a research proposal. We will focus on developing the skills vital to designing archaeological research, starting with the formulation of a question and continuing through the exploratory process of defining proper sites, assemblages, analytical techniques, and presentation of findings. Class sessions will focus on designing research projects examining case studies drawn from world archaeology and student research projects.", "tags": "HA-AS|SSC-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":427, "title": "Sardis, A City at the Crossroads", "code": "ARKEO 4353", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Situated at the crossroads between the Mediterranean in the West and the Anatolian plateau in the East, Sardis successively belonged to the Lydian, Persian, Seleucid, Roman, and Byzantine empires. An urban center from at least the 7th century BCE onwards, the city developed a very particular fabric of peoples and traditions over the long time of its existence. The seminar follows the history of the site and the changing relationship of city and hinterland from the bronze age to the Byzantine period, focusing on its major civic, religious, military and funerary monuments. Debates in heritage and a critical analysis of the site's exploration and excavation in modern times, including the first expedition organized by Princeton University and the current Harvard-Cornell led excavations, form an integral part of the class. The seminar includes excursions to the Metropolitan Museum in New York and the Sardis Archive at Harvard University.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":428, "title": "Honors Thesis Research", "code": "ARKEO 4981", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Independent work under the close guidance of a faculty member.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":429, "title": "Honors Thesis Write-Up", "code": "ARKEO 4982", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "The student, under faculty direction, will prepare a senior thesis.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":430, "title": "Graduate Independent Study in Archaeology", "code": "ARKEO 6000", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Graduate students pursue advanced topics of particular interest under the guidance of a faculty member(s).", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":431, "title": "Paleoethnobotany", "code": "ARKEO 6042", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This course will prepare students to identify, analyze, and interpret plant remains gathered from archaeological sites. We will build a conceptual framework to explain how human behavior relates to plant patterning, drawing on case studies from around the world. Through hands-on laboratory activities, we will study aspects of plant anatomy and explore methods for the sampling and identification of plant remains, including charred seeds and wood, phytoliths, starch grains, and pollen. We will analyze paleoethnobotanical datasets using database and statistical programs to present evidence in varying formats. Final projects will involve the first-hand study of plant remains sampled from archaeological sites.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":432, "title": "The Craft of Archaeology", "code": "ARKEO 6100", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This course engages students in Archaeology and related fields in a semester-long discussion of the craft of archaeology with the faculty of the Cornell Institute of Archaeology and Material Studies. Each week, a different faculty member will moderate a conversation on the professional skills vital to the modern practice of archaeological research and the tools key to professionalization. Seminar topics include developing a research project and working with museum collections to matters of pedagogy and career development.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":433, "title": "Humans and Animals", "code": "ARKEO 6230", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Human-animal relationships are often seen in utilitarian, nutritional terms, particularly in archaeology. But animals and meat have significance far beyond their economic value. This course focuses on a broad range of these non-dietary roles of animals in human societies, past and present. This includes the fundamental shift in human-animal relations associated with domestication; the varied meanings of wild and domestic animals; as well as the importance of animals as wealth, as objects of sacrifice, as totems or metaphors for humans, and as symbols in art. Meat can be used in feasting and meat sharing to create, cement, and manipulate social relationships. This course is open to students of archaeology, cultural anthropology, and other disciplines with an interest in human-animal relations.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":434, "title": "Archaeological Research Design", "code": "ARKEO 6250", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "This studio-style seminar provides an in-depth examination of the principles and practices of archaeological research design. We will examine all aspects of the research process, from concept formation, to methodology, to ethical practice and data management. Over the course of the semester, students will undertake a series of projects that will build incrementally into a research proposal. We will focus on developing the skills vital to designing archaeological research, starting with the formulation of a question and continuing through the exploratory process of defining proper sites, assemblages, analytical techniques, and presentation of findings. Class sessions will focus on designing research projects examining case studies drawn from world archaeology and student research projects.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":435, "title": "Archaeological Dendrochronology", "code": "ARKEO 6755", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "An introduction to the field of Dendrochronology and associated topics with an emphasis on their applications in the field of archaeology and related heritage-buildings fields. Course aimed at graduate level with a focus on critique of scholarship in the field and work on a project as part of the course.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":436, "title": "Meaningful Stuff: Interpreting Material Culture", "code": "ARKEO 7235", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Res ipsa loquitur --\u00a0the thing speaks for itself. This common expression captures a widespread belief about\u00a0objects' roles in human lives, but\u00a0deciphering\u00a0what objects have to say is actually a complex cultural\u00a0process. An object rarely has a single meaning; they are read variously in different cultural settings, and\u00a0even by different individuals within a cultural system. How does one know,\u00a0can one know,\u00a0the\u00a0meanings of an object? How are objects strategically deployed in social interaction,\u00a0particularly in cross-cultural interactions where each side may have radically different understandings? How does one even\u00a0know what an object is? We will explore the history and variety of ways that material culture and its\u00a0meanings have been studied, using archaeological and ethnographic examples.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":437, "title": "Sardis, A City at the Crossroads", "code": "ARKEO 7353", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Situated at the crossroads between the Mediterranean in the West and the Anatolian plateau in the East, Sardis successively belonged to the Lydian, Persian, Seleucid, Roman, and Byzantine empires. An urban center from at least the 7th century BCE onwards, the city developed a very particular fabric of peoples and traditions over the long time of its existence. The seminar follows the history of the site and the changing relationship of city and hinterland from the bronze age to the Byzantine period, focusing on its major civic, religious, military and funerary monuments. Debates in heritage and a critical analysis of the site's exploration and excavation in modern times, including the first expedition organized by Princeton University and the current Harvard-Cornell led excavations, form an integral part of the class. The seminar includes excursions to the Metropolitan Museum in New York and the Sardis Archive at Harvard University.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":438, "title": "Master's Thesis", "code": "ARKEO 8902", "subject": "ARKEO", "descr": "Students, working individually with faculty member(s), prepare a master's thesis in archaeology.", "tags": "ARKEO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":439, "title": "Painting: Introduction to Painting", "code": "ART 2201", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Studies the language of painting through color, form, materials, and techniques. Aspects of traditional and modern pictorial composition are studied including proportion, space, and color theory through the representation of a variety of subjects.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":440, "title": "Print Media: Introduction to Print Media", "code": "ART 2301", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This is an inclusive course that offers an expanded study of traditional printmaking processes through experimental print media. Print media is a critical practice grounded in the history of all printed matter and the printed form as a social medium. Students will participate in a comprehensive range of technical and aesthetic approaches centered in a range of strategies including the art work as multiple, digital and cultural production. These issues of critical discourse will challenge traditional definitions of intaglio, lithography, relief, screen-printing, digital printmaking, and laser cutting technology.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":441, "title": "Introduction to Sculpture", "code": "ART 2401", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This course introduces students to artistic practice in three dimensions using a variety of materials and approaches. Problems require the student to address materials in terms of cultural and historical context. Assumes no prior knowledge of sculpture.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":442, "title": "Drawing: Introduction to Drawing", "code": "ART 2503", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This foundation drawing course introduces students to a broad range of conceptual and technical approaches. It introduces traditional and nontraditional materials, and covers diverse pictorial strategies and subject matter. A significant component is exposure to art historical precedents. This course also serves as an introduction to critique techniques and to the discipline of maintaining a journal.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":443, "title": "Photography: Introduction to Photography", "code": "ART 2601", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This course explores camera and lens as devices that frame and translate three-dimensional space to a two-dimensional surface. Through assignments and individual investigation, students acquire a deeper understanding of visual perception and photography as medium for personal expression. This course introduces students to photographic processes and assumes no prior knowledge of photography.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":444, "title": "Digital Media: Introduction to Digital Media", "code": "ART 2701", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This course explores the use of digital technology in contemporary art making. Students approach software programs by researching historical and contemporary art issues, with emphasis on how to differentiate between analog and digital forms. Through the investigation of the history of digital technology students will gain an understanding of digital culture and its correlation to social, aesthetic and theoretical issues. Topics explored include time-based art, network culture, image resolution, computational techniques, virtuality, and interactivity.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":445, "title": "Advanced Practice", "code": "ART 3006", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This class will concentrate on the development, through research and material experimentation, of a studio practice informed by historical and social context. Different research and production methodologies will be encouraged to develop a practice that is critical, self-sustaining, and flexible. This course is conceived as an introduction to the concentrated studio practice developed further in the following two thesis semesters.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":446, "title": "Directed Readings in Art", "code": "ART 3091", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Independent reading allows a student the opportunity to investigate special interests that are not treated in regularly scheduled courses. The student develops a plan of study to pursue under the supervision of a faculty member.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":447, "title": "Independent Studio in Art", "code": "ART 3092", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Independent studio allows a student the opportunity to investigate special interests that are not treated in regularly scheduled courses. The student develops a plan of study to pursue under the supervision of a faculty member.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":448, "title": "Directed Research in Art", "code": "ART 3093", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Independent research allows a student the opportunity to investigate special interests that are not treated in regularly scheduled courses. The student develops a plan of study to pursue under the supervision of a faculty member.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":449, "title": "Special Topics Studio", "code": "ART 3099", "subject": "ART", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":450, "title": "Theory and Criticism: Special Topics", "code": "ART 3199", "subject": "ART", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":451, "title": "Painting: Painting Intent and Context", "code": "ART 3202", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Students are encouraged to develop visual applications or interpretations of a chosen subject matter, whether this subject matter is inherently visual or non-visual (e.g., experientially or conceptually manifested outside of a visual frame of reference). Emphasis is placed on experimentation with pictorial languages and identifying an appropriate scale of production and mode of delivery, ranging from two-dimensional picture plane to site-specific installation.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":452, "title": "Print Media: The Hybrid Print", "code": "ART 3305", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Printmaking's evolving language, a hybrid vocabulary of newly available materials, tools and methods with traditional techniques, is expanding the concept of the printed edition and facilitating new and radical explorations of scale, dimension, content and display. This course encourages students, like many contemporary artists working in print media, to define printmaking in their own terms by stressing traditional and experimental platemaking, digital printing and fabricating, editionable collage and hand-finishing techniques, and strategies for successfully merging these disparate methods into finished prints.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":453, "title": "Sculpture: Special Topics", "code": "ART 3499", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Topics TBA.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":454, "title": "Drawing: Special Topics", "code": "ART 3599", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Topics TBA.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":455, "title": "Photography: Special Topics", "code": "ART 3699", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Advanced studio course related to photography. Topics vary each semester.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":456, "title": "Digital Media: Special Topics", "code": "ART 3799", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Topics TBA.", "tags": "CA-AAP|LA-AAP|ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":457, "title": "Art History: Special Topics", "code": "ART 3899", "subject": "ART", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":458, "title": "Thesis II", "code": "ART 4002", "subject": "ART", "descr": "This course is the final B.F.A. studio\u00a0semester in which students develop and present an independent body of work that may take the form of an exhibition or some other project. Students will work with members of the Core Thesis Faculty to define and refine the positions formulated within each work and to foster the ability to speak about one's own work as well as the work of others. Emphasis is placed on developing strategies of productive self-criticality to inform their work both during and beyond the thesis semester.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":459, "title": "Graduate Independent Studio in Art", "code": "ART 5092", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Independent studio allows a student the opportunity to investigate special interests that are sometimes not treated in regularly scheduled courses. The student develops a plan of study to pursue under the supervision of an Art faculty member.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":460, "title": "Graduate Seminar: Contemporary Theory and Art", "code": "ART 6000", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Seminar exploring selected writings on current issues in the visual arts. Designed to introduce graduate students to several approaches to critical inquiry and analysis of contemporary artistic practice. Topics vary but may include related issues in areas such as critical theory, identity politics, institutional frames, sustainability, urbanization, and globalization.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":461, "title": "Graduate Studio II", "code": "ART 7002", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Course instructor is the chair of student's Special Committee. Students are responsible, under faculty direction, for planning their own projects and selecting the media in which they work. All members of the faculty are available for individual consultation.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":462, "title": "Graduate Studio IV", "code": "ART 8002", "subject": "ART", "descr": "Course instructor is the chair of student's Special Committee. Students are responsible, under faculty direction, for planning their own projects and selecting the media in which they work. All members of the faculty are available for individual consultation.", "tags": "ART", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":463, "title": "Introduction to Visual Studies", "code": "ARTH 2000", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to modes of vision and the historical impact of visual images, visual structures, and visual space on culture, communication, and politics. It examines all aspects of culture that communicate through visual means, including 20th-century visual technologies\u2014photography, cinema, video, etc., and their historical corollaries. The production and consumption of images, objects, and events is studied in diverse cultures. Students develop the critical skills necessary to appreciate how the approaches that define visual studies complicate traditional models of defining and analyzing art objects.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ETM-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":464, "title": "Indigenous Ingenuities as Living Networks", "code": "ARTH 2101", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course explores Haudenosaunee (Iroquois) knowledge and its application across the disciplines and through time. In particular, it offers a glimpse into Cornell's local indigenous culture through Haudenosaunee understanding of themselves as a unique people, maintaining traditional teachings and fulfilling ancient responsibilities in the world. Students will engage multiple primary sources including: art, archives, material and expressive culture and interact with Haudenosaunee knowledge holders, intellectuals, and elders.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":465, "title": "Introduction to Medieval Art and Culture", "code": "ARTH 2355", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Survey lecture course covering the creation, encoding, and reception of Medieval (roughly AD 500-1500) European, Byzantine, and Islamic architecture, ornament, manuscripts, liturgical and luxury objects.\u00a0 The approach is thematic but chronologically grounded; attention is also given to cultural interaction in the Mediterranean basin.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":466, "title": "Introduction to Latin American Art", "code": "ARTH 2550", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to Latin American art from the pre-Columbian period to the present.\u00a0 It will cover the arts of ancient civilizations including the Olmec, Maya, Aztec, Moche, and Inca, as well as the colonial, modern, and contemporary arts of Latin America and the Latino/a diaspora.\u00a0 Major themes include the relationship between art and religion, innovations and transformations in Latin American art across time, art and identity, as well as Indigenous and Afro-Latin American contributions to the visual arts.\u00a0 This course examines the societal relevance of images across Latin American cultures by paying close attention to the historical and political contexts in which they were created.\u00a0 Course readings are drawn from the disciplines of art history, anthropology, and history, along with theoretical perspectives on colonialism, postcolonialism, identity, race, and ethnicity.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":467, "title": "Introduction to Dendrochronology", "code": "ARTH 3250", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Introduction and training in dendrochronology (tree-ring dating) and its applications in archaeology, art history, climate and environment through lab work and participation in ongoing research projects using ancient to modern wood samples from around the world. Supervised reading and laboratory/project work. Possibilities exists for summer fieldwork in the Mediterranean, Mexico, and New York State.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":468, "title": "Art of South Asia, 1200 - Present", "code": "ARTH 3611", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course surveys the art and architecture of South Asia since 1200 CE. We cover major developments over the last eight centuries, including the architecture of the Sultanate Period, Vijaynagar, painting and architecture in the Deccan and South India, Mughal art and architecture, and Rajput painting. We look at British period colonial art and architecture, the rise of nationalism and modernism in Indian art and the circulation of vernacular images, including posters and bazaar prints in the twentieth century. The recent globalization of South Asian contemporary art is also examined. Artistic movements are situated with reference to social, economic, and political developments.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":469, "title": "After Nature: Art and Environmental Imagination", "code": "ARTH 3620", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course looks at what it means to make art in, of, and after nature, and asks how that art might contribute to shaping the world we live in. Tracing a trajectory from the collection and display of natural history specimens to views of European and American landscapes to contemporary artists who address ecological crises, the course offers both a history of landscape in western art and a study of environmental imagination. We will further explore how nature is represented on Cornell's campus, including in the Johnson Museum, the Lab of Ornithology and the Botanic Gardens. This course includes opportunities to creatively reflect on our personal relationship to nature through hands-on activities. Students from all disciplines are welcome to engage with themes including natural curiosities, parks and gardens, ideas of wilderness, the picturesque, environmental preservation, earth works, and the \"post-natural.\"", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":470, "title": "Women in New Media Art", "code": "ARTH 3651", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "The work of women artists\u00a0has been central to the development of new media art. These rich and varied practices include installation, virtual reality environments, net art, digital video, networked performance, tactical media, video games, remix and robotics. This course will begin with an overview of feminist art and early experiments in performance and video art to then investigate multiple currents of digital media. Discussions will focus primarily on works by women artists from Europe, the Americas and Australia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":471, "title": "Greco-Roman Art from Alexander to Augustus (c.350 BC - AD 20)", "code": "ARTH 3741", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course explores the visual arts of the Mediterranean region from the court of Alexander the Great to the principate of Augustus, the first Roman emperor. During the first half of the semester we will explore the civic, domestic and religious uses of sculpture, painting, architecture, and other media in major settlements of the Hellenistic world such as Alexandria, Pergamon and Rhodes, focusing on the third to first centuries BCE. In the second half of the semester, we will turn to the rise of the Roman empire and the relationship between native Italian artistic traditions and those of the Hellenized Mediterranean, as Republican Rome drew influences (and booty) from its conquered territories. Throughout the course we will examine visual images alongside relevant literary and archaeological material, emphasizing the role of the visual arts within broader aesthetic, intellectual and political trends.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":472, "title": "Topics in Feminist Media Arts", "code": "ARTH 4153", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Topic: Feminist Posthumanisms in the Visual Arts. While some feminist works of art in new media address traditional feminist concerns such as the female body, identity, representation, feminist history, and consumerism, others directly engage with recent theoretical currents on the Anthropocene, posthumanism and new materialisms that view humans and non-humans as co-dependent. Non-humans include environmental factors, animals, plants, bacteria, and machines. This seminar will examine work by contemporary artists engaged with posthumanist perspectives in relation to a body of relevant theoretical texts and previous feminist media arts.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":473, "title": "Topics in Colonial Encounters", "code": "ARTH 4160", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "The colonial period in Latin America (circa 1521-1820s) witnessed the formation of one of the most diverse societies in the world.\u00a0 Labor regimes, religious activities, marriage alliances, and commercial contacts engendered by the Spanish colonial enterprise brought Spaniards, Africans, and Indigenous peoples into dynamic contact.\u00a0 This cross-fertilization of cultures resulted in the construction of new cultural categories and colonial identities whose reverberations continue to be felt into the present day.\u00a0 This seminar explores the role that visual culture played in the articulation of identity in Latin America.\u00a0 For the purposes of this seminar, \"identity\" can be loosely defined as the overlapping allegiances to which one ascribes, whether racial, cultural, gendered, religious, or community-based.\u00a0 The visual culture of colonial Latin America can reveal multitudes on the construction of self and community across temporal and geographical contexts.\u00a0 We will explore a variety of colonial Latin American objects and images, including paintings, textiles, and material culture.\u00a0 Our discussions of images will be guided by readings on hybridity, coloniality, cross-cultural exchange, and the early modern Atlantic world.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":474, "title": "19th Century Art and Culture", "code": "ARTH 4171", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "An examination and analysis of the major trends in art from Neoclassicism and Romanticism through Post Impressionism and the dawn of the twentieth century. Lectures and readings will concentrate on the historical context of great masterpieces by seminal artists. The class will investigate the imagery and theoretical foundation of nineteenth-century European and American art using a selection of appropriate methodological approaches. Major figures to be discussed include David, Copley, Goya, Delacroix, Courbet, Cole, Manet, Morisot, Monet, Degas, Cassatt, Sargent, Eakins, Homer, Rodin, Van Gogh, Gauguin, Cezanne, and Toulouse-Lautrec. Part of each class will be devoted to discussions of the readings. Two classes will be held in the National Gallery of Art at times and dates to be determined. Exams, a term paper, and class participation will be used for evaluative purposes.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":475, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "ARTH 4310", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":476, "title": "Sardis, A City at the Crossroads", "code": "ARTH 4353", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Situated at the crossroads between the Mediterranean in the West and the Anatolian plateau in the East, Sardis successively belonged to the Lydian, Persian, Seleucid, Roman, and Byzantine empires. An urban center from at least the 7th century BCE onwards, the city developed a very particular fabric of peoples and traditions over the long time of its existence. The seminar follows the history of the site and the changing relationship of city and hinterland from the bronze age to the Byzantine period, focusing on its major civic, religious, military and funerary monuments. Debates in heritage and a critical analysis of the site's exploration and excavation in modern times, including the first expedition organized by Princeton University and the current Harvard-Cornell led excavations, form an integral part of the class. The seminar includes excursions to the Metropolitan Museum in New York and the Sardis Archive at Harvard University.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":477, "title": "Art and Empire in Britian and France", "code": "ARTH 4621", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":478, "title": "Classicism and Contemporary Art", "code": "ARTH 4716", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course will explore how contemporary artists and designers borrow, replicate, challenge, play with, and subvert the arts of Greco-Roman antiquity. We will survey the influence of classical multiples \u2013 from bronze series and plaster casts to digital imaging and 3-D printing; the use of classical objects in critiques of art-world institutions, especially by female photographers such as Louise Lawler and Sara VanDerBeek; subversions of classical monumentality by Black artists such as Kehinde Wiley and Kara Walker; and the influence of classicism upon constructions of European heritage in contemporary fashion and interior design. As a form of \"critical reception studies\", this course also examines the complex political legacy of classicism and the role it plays in contemporary discussions of race, from debates over the \"whiteness\" of classical sculpture to the relationship between state power and monumentality.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":479, "title": "Modern Chinese Art", "code": "ARTH 4816", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "China, a cultural giant of East Asia, made a passive entrance into modernity. With the advent of Western and American colonialism and imperialism, coupled with recent successes in westernization by the Japanese, Chinese artists had to redefine their roles as well as their visions. This turmoil bore witness to a vibrant beginning in modern Chinese art. Interactions between the Chinese themselves, and Chinese interactions with foreigners in the major cities of Shanghai and Beijing, fostered new directions in Chinese art and helped shape western visions of Chinese art history. Issues covered include: Chinese debates on western influence--their theoretical foundations and rationales; New visions for the future of Chinese art in the late 19th and early 20th centuries; Pluralistic approaches and arguments on \"Chinese identity\" in the modern era; Collecting art and the vision of history; The identity of traditional literati painters in the modern era-their roles, artworks, and deeds; Foreigners in China-the formation of major European collections of Chinese art, and the formation of \"Chinese art history\" in the West.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":480, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "ARTH 4992", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Individual investigation and discussion of special topics not covered in the regular course offerings, by arrangement with a member of the department.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":481, "title": "Honors Work II", "code": "ARTH 4999", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "The student under faculty direction prepares a senior thesis.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":482, "title": "Supervised Reading", "code": "ARTH 5992", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Individual investigation and discussion of special topics not covered in the regular course offerings, by arrangement with a member of the department.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":483, "title": "Supervised Study", "code": "ARTH 5994", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Individual investigation and discussion of special topics not covered in the regular course offerings, by arrangement with a member of the department.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":484, "title": "Topics in Feminist Media Arts", "code": "ARTH 6153", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Topic: Feminist Posthumanisms in the Visual Arts. While some feminist works of art in new media address traditional feminist concerns such as the female body, identity, representation, feminist history, and consumerism, others directly engage with recent theoretical currents on the Anthropocene, posthumanism and new materialisms that view humans and non-humans as co-dependent. Non-humans include environmental factors, animals, plants, bacteria, and machines. This seminar will examine work by contemporary artists engaged with posthumanist perspectives in relation to a body of relevant theoretical texts and previous feminist media arts.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":485, "title": "Topics in Colonial Encounters", "code": "ARTH 6160", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "The colonial period in Latin America (circa 1521-1820s) witnessed the formation of one of the most diverse societies in the world.\u00a0 Labor regimes, religious activities, marriage alliances, and commercial contacts engendered by the Spanish colonial enterprise brought Spaniards, Africans, and Indigenous peoples into dynamic contact.\u00a0 This cross-fertilization of cultures resulted in the construction of new cultural categories and colonial identities whose reverberations continue to be felt into the present day.\u00a0 This seminar explores the role that visual culture played in the articulation of identity in Latin America.\u00a0 For the purposes of this seminar, \"identity\" can be loosely defined as the overlapping allegiances to which one ascribes, whether racial, cultural, gendered, religious, or community-based.\u00a0 The visual culture of colonial Latin America can reveal multitudes on the construction of self and community across temporal and geographical contexts.\u00a0 We will explore a variety of colonial Latin American objects and images, including paintings, textiles, and material culture.\u00a0 Our discussions of images will be guided by readings on hybridity, coloniality, cross-cultural exchange, and the early modern Atlantic world.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":486, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "ARTH 6310", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":487, "title": "Sardis, A City at the Crossroads", "code": "ARTH 6353", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "Situated at the crossroads between the Mediterranean in the West and the Anatolian plateau in the East, Sardis successively belonged to the Lydian, Persian, Seleucid, Roman, and Byzantine empires. An urban center from at least the 7th century BCE onwards, the city developed a very particular fabric of peoples and traditions over the long time of its existence. The seminar follows the history of the site and the changing relationship of city and hinterland from the bronze age to the Byzantine period, focusing on its major civic, religious, military and funerary monuments. Debates in heritage and a critical analysis of the site's exploration and excavation in modern times, including the first expedition organized by Princeton University and the current Harvard-Cornell led excavations, form an integral part of the class. The seminar includes excursions to the Metropolitan Museum in New York and the Sardis Archive at Harvard University.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":488, "title": "Art and Empire in Britain and France", "code": "ARTH 6621", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":489, "title": "Classicism and Contemporary Art", "code": "ARTH 6716", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "This course will explore how contemporary artists and designers borrow, replicate, challenge, play with, and subvert the arts of Greco-Roman antiquity. We will survey the influence of classical multiples \u2013 from bronze series and plaster casts to digital imaging and 3-D printing; the use of classical objects in critiques of art-world institutions, especially by female photographers such as Louise Lawler and Sara VanDerBeek; subversions of classical monumentality by Black artists such as Kehinde Wiley and Kara Walker; and the influence of classicism upon constructions of European heritage in contemporary fashion and interior design. As a form of \"critical reception studies\", this course also examines the complex political legacy of classicism and the role it plays in contemporary discussions of race, from debates over the \"whiteness\" of classical sculpture to the relationship between state power and monumentality.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":490, "title": "Modern Chinese Art", "code": "ARTH 6816", "subject": "ARTH", "descr": "China, a cultural giant of East Asia, made a passive entrance into modernity. With the advent of Western and American colonialism and imperialism, coupled with recent successes in westernization by the Japanese, Chinese artists had to redefine their roles as well as their visions. This turmoil bore witness to a vibrant beginning in modern Chinese art. Interactions between the Chinese themselves, and Chinese interactions with foreigners in the major cities of Shanghai and Beijing, fostered new directions in Chinese art and helped shape western visions of Chinese art history. Issues covered include: Chinese debates on western influence--their theoretical foundations and rationales; New visions for the future of Chinese art in the late 19th and early 20th centuries; Pluralistic approaches and arguments on \"Chinese identity\" in the modern era; Collecting art and the vision of history; The identity of traditional literati painters in the modern era-their roles, artworks, and deeds; Foreigners in China-the formation of major European collections of Chinese art, and the formation of \"Chinese art history\" in the West.", "tags": "ARTH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":491, "title": "Milstein Collab II", "code": "AS 3111", "subject": "AS", "descr": "The Milstein Program Collab provides structured learning to each cohort of Milstein students, through required master classes with visiting professionals and scholars, project-based learning, intergroup dialogue, and critical reflection workshops and writing.", "tags": "AS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":492, "title": "FWS: The Great Epic of India", "code": "ASIAN 1106", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "The great Sanskrit epic, the Mahabharata, is one of the principal monuments of world literature. This vast, enthralling, and powerful tale of intra-familial war and world historical decline (of which the famous Bhagavad Gita forms but a small part) transformed the religious and literary consciousness of India, and exercised a broad impact throughout South and Southeast Asia. This course will introduce students to this remarkable text and the literary tradition it inaugurated, through selected readings from the epic itself, along with samples of later renditions of its narrative (including contemporary theatrical, TV, and comic book versions).", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":493, "title": "FWS: Literature, Culture, Religion", "code": "ASIAN 1111", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This First-Year Writing Seminar is about Asian Literature, Religion, and Culture and provides the opportunity to write extensively about these issues.\u00a0 Topics vary by section.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":494, "title": "A Global History of Love", "code": "ASIAN 1193", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "By posing seemingly simple questions such as what is love and who has the right to love, this introductory-level lecture course surveys how love has been experienced and expressed from the pre-modern period to the present. Through case studies of familial and conjugal love in Africa, Asia, the US, Europe, and South and Latin America, the course will examine the debates about and enactment's of what constitutes the appropriate way to show love and affection in different cultures and historical contexts. Among the themes we will explore are questions of sexuality, marriage, kinship, and gender rights. A final unit will examine these themes through modern technologies such as the Internet, scientific advances in medicine, and a growing awareness that who and how we love is anything but simple or universal.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":495, "title": "Introduction to China", "code": "ASIAN 2212", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Interdisciplinary introduction to Chinese culture especially designed for students not majoring in Asian Studies. Explores literature, history, religion, and art, and other aspects of China's rich and diverse heritage, from earliest times to the present.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":496, "title": "Introduction to Korea", "code": "ASIAN 2218", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course provides a chronological survey of Korean culture and history from ancient times to the present. We will examine major historical time periods and cultural forms of the Korean peninsula, with a focus on the Chos\u014fn Dynasty (1392-1910) and the twentieth century. The course is designed to give students an overview of the transformations of Korean civilization in the context of the East Asian cultural sphere and globalization. We will engage with a wide range of texts and various media across time periods, including films, primary historical sources in translation, literature, and music videos. Key themes and topics of the course include the formation of South and North Korea's identities, the rise of Neo-Confucianism, Japanese\ncolonization and postcolonialism, the construction and performance of gender, the Korean War and postwar reconstruction, environmental degradation, and developments in popular culture.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":497, "title": "Controversy and Debate in Islam", "code": "ASIAN 2247", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Whether it is politics, society, the law, sexuality, popular culture or minorities' rights, the media are saturated with news on Islam. This course introduces topical issues in Islam as a religious, historical, cultural and political phenomenon. We will discuss this religion's manifold interpretations and investigate its multiple manifestations across the globe, giving special attention to Asia (from Iran to China, Indonesia, Afghanistan, India, Thailand, etc.). Key themes include religious devotion, the arts, Islamic law, gender, statehood, jihad, and sectarianism. No previous knowledge of Islam is required as the course covers the fundamentals of Islam as a religious system as well as a historical phenomenon.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":498, "title": "Introduction to Asian Religions", "code": "ASIAN 2250", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course will explore religious traditions in South Asia (Pakistan, India, and Sri Lanka) and East Asia (China, Japan, and Korea) including Hinduism, Buddhism (South Asian and East Asian), Sikhism, Confucianism, Daoism, and Shint\u014d. We will also encounter a wide range of religious expressions, including myth, ritual, pilgrimage, mysticism, meditation, and other spiritual technologies.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":499, "title": "Music in and of East Asia", "code": "ASIAN 2259", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course explores the breadth of music found in present day China, Japan, and Korea--from indigenous musical traditions, through adaptations of Western art music, up to the latest popular styles--as well as the presence of traditional East Asian musics outside East Asia, including right here at Cornell. In both cases, music offers a lens for examining the myriad social and cultural forces that shape it, and that are shaped by it. The course's academic focus on critical reading and listening, written assignments, and discussion is complemented by\u00a0opportunities to engage directly with music, whether attending concerts or participating in workshops with student-led ensembles.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":500, "title": "Japanese Pop Culture", "code": "ASIAN 2260", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Japanese pop culture\u2014anime, manga, video games, music and more\u2014has been a major phenomenon with massive worldwide popularity for the last three decades. In this course, we will explore a wide range of Japanese pop cultural forms, exploring the interactions between different media, Japanese pop culture as global pop culture, and a variety of modes of analyzing visual and audio materials. We will also see how pop cultural works themselves, in their content and form, engage with questions of gender, technology, fandom, nation, and the environment. No prior knowledge of Japanese language, culture, or history required. All readings and screenings will be available in English or with English subtitles.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":501, "title": "Chinese Mythology", "code": "ASIAN 2279", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Students will study Chinese myths from the earliest times. Focus will be on understanding how people have used myth to create and convey meaning, on examining the form Chinese myths take, and on considering how they are related to religion, literature, historical accounts, and intellectual trends.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":502, "title": "Transformations in Twentieth Century China", "code": "ASIAN 2286", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "The twentieth century was a time of unprecedented change in China as the country's ancient imperial system collapsed and a new modern order began to emerge. This course will explore the myriad transformations that occurred during this remarkable century of revolution and renewal. Among the major changes that we will focus on are the fall of the Qing dynasty, the intellectual awakening of May Fourth, the rise of the Nationalist party-state, and key events of the Communist era, such as the Great Leap Forward and Cultural Revolution under Mao Zedong and the capitalist reforms of Deng Xiaoping. The class will encourage historical reflection on China's engagement with the modern world in order to better understand the complex reality of China today.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":503, "title": "Making of an Empire in China", "code": "ASIAN 2293", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "The Great Qing (1644-1911), a multi-ethnic empire that conquered China proper from the northeastern borderlands, expanded into central Asia, Mongolia, and Tibet, and consolidated the China-based empire's control over its southwestern frontiers. An heir to both Chinese and Inner Asian traditions, the Qing empire laid the foundation for the modern Chinese nation-state. In this course, students will focus on the political, legal, social, cultural, and intellectual aspects of China's long eighteenth century. Students will also locate the early modern Chinese empire in a regional and global context, examining its power influence in Korea and Southeast Asia, and its encounters and interactions with Western and Japanese imperialist powers. These encounters and interactions contributed to the domestic turmoil and foreign invasions that eventually led to the demise of China's imperial tradition. But they also gave rise to new forces that would shape the fate of modern China in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries. From Spring 2021 onward, this course fulfills the pre-1800 requirement for History Major", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":504, "title": "China's Next Economy", "code": "ASIAN 3304", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course provides students with an analytical framework to understand China's ongoing economic transformation. The courses goals include: 1) to familiarize students with different perspectives on China's economic development and future prospects; 2) to provide a close working knowledge of the evolving current situation, with a focus on internal variation within China\u2014telling different Chinese stories, not one \"China story\"\u2014and particularly emphasizing urbanization and the goal of shifting from manufacturing and export-led to services and domestic-led economy; and 3) to give students hands-on experience using Chinese economic data in the context of a brief research note. Each week will connect to current events and debates, with students writing three blog posts over the course of the semester to bring academic research and social scientific analysis to bear upon policy-relevant questions and developments.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":505, "title": "South Asian Poetry and Narrative: From Ghazals to Film", "code": "ASIAN 3313", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course covers the major literary movements in the literary landscape of the region such as the Progressive Writer's movement and regional modernisms. It also explores the impact of British colonialism on the culture and the politics of South Asia. The course encourages thinking across boundaries of literatures, cultures, and histories. This course covers a range of topics and diverse genres: from Ghazal, a prominent poetic expression, to fictional representation of the two partitions (1947 and 1971) and its aftermath to theatrical retelling of the Indian mythology.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":506, "title": "Modern and Contemporary Korean Literature", "code": "ASIAN 3324", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course examines major writers, works, and developments in modern Korean literature from the early twentieth century to the present. Beginning with the cultural transition from the end of the Chos\u014fn dynasy to the Japanese colonial period, we will cover Korean writers and literary production under the Japanese empire, Liberation, the Korean War, postwar industrialization and democratization. We will consider how social issues such as class, gender, sexuality, race, migration, and the environment factor into literary constructions of the self, community, and nation. The course integrates creative writing workshops to illuminate the process of literary composition and deepen analytical engagement. Theoretical frameworks are provided with which to interpret Korean literature in a transnational and global context, including (post)colonial criticism, feminist criticism, and ecocriticism. Readings for the course will be in English or in English translation and no prior knowledge of Korea is required.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":507, "title": "Southeast Asian Politics", "code": "ASIAN 3334", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course will give students the historical background and theoretical tools to understand the politics of Southeast Asia, one of the world's most diverse and fascinating regions. The first part of the course traces Southeast Asia's political development from the colonial period to the present day, examining common themes such as decolonization, state building, war and insurgency, ethnic relations, democratization, economic development, and nationalism. The second part of the course focuses on key issues in contemporary Southeast Asian politics, including political culture, representation and mass politics, globalization, regional politics, and civil violence. Our course will concentrate primarily but not exclusively on the six largest countries in the region-Burma, Indonesia, Malaysia, the Philippines, Thailand, and Vietnam-using the comparative method to understand variation across time, across countries, and within countries.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":508, "title": "Imagining India, Home and Diaspora", "code": "ASIAN 3368", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "A modern country and an ancient civilization, India has been imagined through the ages in many different ways. This introductory course focuses on the 20th and 21st centuries, drawing on films (Bollywood and Hollywood), TV shows, music, novels, and political thought. Readings from Gandhi, Ambedkar, Tagore, Kipling, Forster, Premchand, Senapati, Manto, Ananthamurthy and Roy as well as such diasporic writers as Rushdie, Lahiri, and Naipaul.", "tags": "LA-AS|GLC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":509, "title": "Gendering Enlightenment: Attitudes toward Women in Buddhist Traditions", "code": "ASIAN 3374", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Women have from the beginning been integral members of Buddhist traditions. But their voices have often been silenced by male clergy. This course will explore ways in which images of women and the feminine have been manipulated within normative literature to serve a variety of ends. We will also look at the lives of real Buddhist women in premodern and contemporary times as we think about the complex ways women have made space for their own interests.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":510, "title": "Humanities Scholars Research Methods", "code": "ASIAN 3375", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course explores the practice, theory, and methodology of humanities research, critical analysis, and communication through writing and oral presentation. We will study the work and impact of humanists (scholars of literature, history, theory, art, visual studies, film, anthropology, gender and sexuality studies), who pose big questions about the human condition. By reading and analyzing their scholarship\u2014critiquing them and engaging their ideas\u2014we will craft our own methods and voices. Students will refine their research methods (library research, note taking, organizing material, bibliographies, citation methods, proposals, outlines, etc.) and design their own independent research project. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in the Humanities Scholars Program.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":511, "title": "Art of South Asia, 1200 - Present", "code": "ASIAN 3382", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course surveys the art and architecture of South Asia since 1200 CE. We cover major developments over the last eight centuries, including the architecture of the Sultanate Period, Vijaynagar, painting and architecture in the Deccan and South India, Mughal art and architecture, and Rajput painting. We look at British period colonial art and architecture, the rise of nationalism and modernism in Indian art and the circulation of vernacular images, including posters and bazaar prints in the twentieth century. The recent globalization of South Asian contemporary art is also examined. Artistic movements are situated with reference to social, economic, and political developments.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":512, "title": "Asian Studies Honors Course", "code": "ASIAN 4401", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Supervised reading and research on the problem selected for honors work.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":513, "title": "Asian Studies Honors: Senior Essay", "code": "ASIAN 4402", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "The student, under faculty direction, prepares an honors essay.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":514, "title": "Supervised Reading", "code": "ASIAN 4404", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Intensive reading under the direction of a member of the staff.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":515, "title": "Media Theory and Japan", "code": "ASIAN 4406", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "In this seminar we will be exploring media theory in relation to Japan: how media has been thought about, written about, and created within Japan, and how media theorists from across the world have used \"Japan\" and its cultural products as a key element in their thinking. We will investigate media in Japan in relation to language, nation, gender, technology, disability, the environment, and more, and will both examine and produce creative works (film, poetry, visual art, sound, programming) as a form of critical practice. No Japanese language knowledge required, as all the core readings will be in English; some Japanese-language supplemental readings will be available for graduate students with sufficient language ability.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":516, "title": "Narrating Choson Korea: History and Memory", "code": "ASIAN 4426", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course will explore the culture and society of Choson Korea (1392\u20141897) through a variety of historical, literary, and visual representations. Following the major political, social, and cultural transformations that shaped Choson Korea, such as Confucianism and the introduction of the patriarchy; changes to relationships among family, class, and gender; the Hideyoshi invasion and the collapse of the Ming dynasty; and the flourishing of commerce and foreign trade, we will examine a variety of discursive practices for constructing individual and collective identities and analyze how these identities changed over time in relation to shifting historical conditions in Choson Korea.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":517, "title": "The Rise of China and Change in World Politics", "code": "ASIAN 4454", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "The rise of China is one of the most important and defining themes in changing world politics. This seminar course is intended for students to examine major issues and topics concerning the rise of China against the backdrop of paradigmatic change in world politics from a historical and theoretical perspective, and to engage in the academic discourse and policy debate about dynamics of China's rise and its implications for world politics, and vice versa, how evolving world politics inform and influence the process of China's rise \u2013 namely, mutual constitution of rising China and the changing world.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":518, "title": "Modern Chinese Art", "code": "ASIAN 4473", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "China, a cultural giant of East Asia, made a passive entrance into modernity. With the advent of Western and American colonialism and imperialism, coupled with recent successes in westernization by the Japanese, Chinese artists had to redefine their roles as well as their visions. This turmoil bore witness to a vibrant beginning in modern Chinese art. Interactions between the Chinese themselves, and Chinese interactions with foreigners in the major cities of Shanghai and Beijing, fostered new directions in Chinese art and helped shape western visions of Chinese art history. Issues covered include: Chinese debates on western influence--their theoretical foundations and rationales; New visions for the future of Chinese art in the late 19th and early 20th centuries; Pluralistic approaches and arguments on \"Chinese identity\" in the modern era; Collecting art and the vision of history; The identity of traditional literati painters in the modern era-their roles, artworks, and deeds; Foreigners in China-the formation of major European collections of Chinese art, and the formation of \"Chinese art history\" in the West.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":519, "title": "China and Asian Security", "code": "ASIAN 4475", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course focuses primarily on China's evolving role in both Asia and world politics. While China may not necessarily be the sole determinant of the type of security order that will prevail in Asia, it has a profound influence on the region and potentially on the global order as well. To gain an understanding of security issues in Asia today, the seminar attempts to come to terms with the evolving nature of China's foreign policy and national security strategies. The course then concentrates on the most influential academic work on China's foreign relations and national security policies that has been published since the end of the Cold War.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":520, "title": "China Imagined: The Historical and Global Origins of the Chinese Nation", "code": "ASIAN 4478", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "As China, with its \"China Dream,\" rises in power on the global stage, what \"China\" means to its inhabitants and outsiders has become an issue increasingly relevant to business, international relations, and cultural exchange, and a topic that draws intensive attention from historians and social scientists. This course brings together undergraduate and graduate students who are interested in shifting meanings embedded in the concept of \"China,\" either as part of their research agenda, or as a useful lens for comparative analysis. Focus will be on how China as an Empire/ a Nation was conceptualized by different people in different periods and in different contexts, and on the reality and representation of China as political, cultural, racial, and geographical entities.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":521, "title": "Projects of Modernity in Asia", "code": "ASIAN 4480", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Idea(l)s of modernity across the Global South have been largely rooted in Euro-American projections of \"civilization\", and \"civilizational\" projects. The colonial worldview in which only Western(ized) experiences could be modern is foundational to the multifarious ways in which scholarship and nation-builders have engaged with progress, whether aspiring to it, rejecting it, or appropriating it. In this seminar we explore how imperial authorities, nationalists, and scholars/intellectuals have interfaced with idea(l)s of progress and modernity in Asia, reading works (\"one book a week\") grounded in multiple disciplines and cultural settings. Core themes will include: health and hygiene, consumption, technology, gender, piety and devotion, imperialism and race, and nationalism.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":522, "title": "Methodology of Asian Language Learning and Teaching", "code": "ASIAN 5505", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "This course presents theories of language teaching and learning, and shows how they apply to Asian language course structure, classroom instruction, and assessment techniques.\u00a0 Students will observe classes taught by experienced teachers, discuss language learning theory and practice, and design and implement their own class activities.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":523, "title": "Media Theory and Japan", "code": "ASIAN 6606", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "In this seminar we will be exploring media theory in relation to Japan: how media has been thought about, written about, and created within Japan, and how media theorists from across the world have used \"Japan\" and its cultural products as a key element in their thinking. We will investigate media in Japan in relation to language, nation, gender, technology, disability, the environment, and more, and will both examine and produce creative works (film, poetry, visual art, sound, programming) as a form of critical practice. No Japanese language knowledge required, as all the core readings will be in English; some Japanese-language supplemental readings will be available for graduate students with sufficient language ability.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":524, "title": "Southeast Asian Bibliography and Research Methods", "code": "ASIAN 6613", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Covers practical bibliographical skills and research methods necessary to accomplish quality research in the field of Southeast Asian Studies.\u00a0 During the semester we will explore resources available at the Cornell University Libraries, those provided through Library subscription, and resources available elsewhere.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":525, "title": "Modern Chinese Art", "code": "ASIAN 6673", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "China, a cultural giant of East Asia, made a passive entrance into modernity. With the advent of Western and American colonialism and imperialism, coupled with recent successes in westernization by the Japanese, Chinese artists had to redefine their roles as well as their visions. This turmoil bore witness to a vibrant beginning in modern Chinese art. Interactions between the Chinese themselves, and Chinese interactions with foreigners in the major cities of Shanghai and Beijing, fostered new directions in Chinese art and helped shape western visions of Chinese art history. Issues covered include: Chinese debates on western influence--their theoretical foundations and rationales; New visions for the future of Chinese art in the late 19th and early 20th centuries; Pluralistic approaches and arguments on \"Chinese identity\" in the modern era; Collecting art and the vision of history; The identity of traditional literati painters in the modern era-their roles, artworks, and deeds; Foreigners in China-the formation of major European collections of Chinese art, and the formation of \"Chinese art history\" in the West.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":526, "title": "Projects of Modernity in Asia", "code": "ASIAN 6678", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Idea(l)s of modernity across the Global South have been largely rooted in Euro-American projections of \"civilization\", and \"civilizational\" projects. The colonial worldview in which only Western(ized) experiences could be modern is foundational to the multifarious ways in which scholarship and nation-builders have engaged with progress, whether aspiring to it, rejecting it, or appropriating it. In this seminar we explore how imperial authorities, nationalists, and scholars/intellectuals have interfaced with idea(l)s of progress and modernity in Asia, reading works (\"one book a week\") grounded in multiple disciplines and cultural settings. Core themes will include: health and hygiene, consumption, technology, gender, piety and devotion, imperialism and race, and nationalism.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":527, "title": "China Imagined: The Historical and Global Origins of the Chinese Nation", "code": "ASIAN 6679", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "As China, with its \"China Dream,\" rises in power on the global stage, what \"China\" means to its inhabitants and outsiders has become an issue increasingly relevant to business, international relations, and cultural exchange, and a topic that draws intensive attention from historians and social scientists. This course brings together undergraduate and graduate students who are interested in shifting meanings embedded in the concept of \"China,\" either as part of their research agenda, or as a useful lens for comparative analysis. Focus will be on how China as an Empire/ a Nation was conceptualized by different people in different periods and in different contexts, and on the reality and representation of China as political, cultural, racial, and geographical entities.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":528, "title": "Directed Research", "code": "ASIAN 7704", "subject": "ASIAN", "descr": "Guided independent study for graduate students.", "tags": "ASIAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":529, "title": "American Sign Language I", "code": "ASL 1101", "subject": "ASL", "descr": "Students with no previous background in American Sign Language (ASL) will be introduced to basic conversational techniques in ASL, including both expressive and receptive skills.\u00a0 Basic grammar and vocabulary will be covered, including explanations of the fundamental parts of a sign, proper use of fingerspelling, and the significance of non-manual features. Instruction will be supplemented with videos, allowing students to begin exploring the visual literature of the Deaf community in the United States. Readings and class discussions will acquaint students with American Deaf culture, history and education, and the historical development of ASL.", "tags": "ASL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":530, "title": "American Sign Language II", "code": "ASL 1102", "subject": "ASL", "descr": "This course focuses on continued development of conversational fluency in ASL, for both expressive and receptive skills. Through communicative activities and feedback, students will acquire a deeper understanding of grammatical features including use of non-manuals. Readings and class discussions will acquaint students\u00a0to topics relevant to the Deaf community, American Deaf culture, ASL linguistics and history. The course will provide further development in ASL literature by analyzing storytelling features and re-telling them.", "tags": "ASL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":531, "title": "ASL Literature", "code": "ASL 2302", "subject": "ASL", "descr": "This course provides an overview of various genres in American Sign Language literature including narratives, folklore, ABC stories, poetry, translated works and visual vernacular. Students will analyze contents, themes and stylistic techniques of works done by various ASL literary artists. This course emphasizes critiquing various narrative and poetic genres with planning and development of new literary works.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ASL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":532, "title": "Elementary Arabic II", "code": "ASRC 1202", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This two-course sequence assumes no previous knowledge of Arabic and provides a thorough grounding in the four language skills of listening, speaking, reading, and writing. It starts with the alphabet and the number system and builds the four skills gradually and systematically through carefully selected and organized materials focusing on specific, concrete and familiar topics such as self identification, family, travel, food, renting an apartment, study, the weather, etc.). These topics are listed in the textbook's table of contents.\u00a0 The student who successfully completes the two-course sequence will have mastered about 1000 basic words and will be able to: 1) understand and actively participate in conversations on a limited range of practical topics such as self-identification, family, school, work, the weather, travel, etc., 2) read and understand, with the help of a short list of words, passages of up to 180 words written in Arabic script, and 3) discuss orally in class and write a 50-word paragraph in Arabic.\u00a0 The two-course sequence aims to take the student from the Novice to the Intermediate Mid level according to the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":533, "title": "Introduction to Africana Studies", "code": "ASRC 1500", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the study of Africa, the U.S., the Caribbean and other diasporas.\u00a0 This course will examine, through a range of disciplines, among them literature, history, politics, philosophy, the themes - including race/racism, the Middle Passage, sexuality, colonialism, and culture - that have dominated Africana Studies since its inception in the late-1960s. We will explore these issues in the attempt to understand how black lives have been shaped, in a historical sense; and, of course, the effects of these issues in the contemporary moment. This course seeks to introduce these themes, to investigate through one or more of the disciplines relevant to the question, and to provide a broad understanding of the themes so as to enable the kind of intellectual reflection critical to Africana Studies.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":534, "title": "History and Popular Culture in Africa", "code": "ASRC 1590", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course uses a multidisciplinary approach to explore the complex relationship between history and popular culture in Africa. The course considers two main questions - how can you write history using popular culture? And, how do artists use history to create popular culture? It uses examples from around the continent to explore old and new forms of popular culture; forms of cultural expression used by historians; as well as the ways in which artists use moments of great historical significance or key historical actors in their works. We consider, for example, the work of Leroy Vail who used songs by Mozambican peasants to write a social history of colonialism as well as films about colonialism by African film-makers such as the late Ousman Sembene.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":535, "title": "Philosophy of Race", "code": "ASRC 1650", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the philosophy of race. It canvasses key debates in the field concerning the metaphysical status of race, the relationship between the concept of race and racism (and the nature of the latter), the first-person reality of race, and the connections and disconnections between racial, ethnic, and national identities.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SCD-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":536, "title": "Pirates, Slaves, and Revolutionaries: A History of the Caribbean from Columbus to Louverture", "code": "ASRC 1790", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "What is the Caribbean? How did its native inhabitants fared in the aftermath of the arrival of Europeans? How did the region shift from a Spanish Lake to a heavily contested geopolitical site where all European powers vied for political and commercial superiority? What were the main production systems of the region and how did they result in dramatic environmental change? How did the eighteenth-century revolutions transform the Caribbean? In this introductory survey to Caribbean history we will answer these and many other questions through the study of the political, economic, social, cultural, and environmental transformations of the Caribbean from the arrival of Columbus to the era of the Haitian Revolution. We will follow indigenous people, Spanish conquistadors, English, Dutch, and French pirates and privateers, planters, and merchants, imperial officers, slaves, sailors, and revolutionaries as they adapted to the multiple transformations that shaped this region. Through lectures, discussions, and readings of primary and secondary sources we will navigate the Caribbean in a quest to understand the historical processes that gave shape to this tropical paradise.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":537, "title": "FWS: Queering African American History", "code": "ASRC 1852", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "What is the relationship between race, gender, sexuality, and politics in the American past? This course will introduce students to the historical study of African American LGBTQ life in the 20th century by way of reading interdisciplinary scholarship and writing expository prose. Students will read texts by authors such as Langston Hughes, James Baldwin, Audre Lorde, and Angela Davis and examine primary sources such as newspaper articles, magazines, film, and music to enhance analytic writing skills.\u00a0Students will also complete individual writing exercises and collaborative activities that highlight key components of the academic writing process. Such assignments include regular journal entries, reading responses, abstract and thesis development tasks, and peer-review workshops.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":538, "title": "FWS: The Anthropo(s)cene and African-African Diasporic Cinemas", "code": "ASRC 1855", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "In the era of the Anthropocene, humanity must consider itself an environmental force. Global disasters\u2014storms, drought, new diseases\u2014call us to ask: Is this really the apocalypse? If so, what can we hope for? We will view African/African diasporic films that consider identity formation and its subsequent constructions of race, class, gender, sexuality, and geography. Examining responses to these primary questions of humanity, nature, belonging and agency in the time of the Anthropocene invites our critical reflection on the medium of filmmaking itself as we attend to the (im)possibilities of the category, 'African film'. Likely films include: Get Out, Moonlight, and The End of Eating Everything. Students will write reflection responses and film reviews and explore materials from across Africana studies, film studies, and psychoanalysis. The seminar encourages the production of a podcast, zine, short film or film festival proposal.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":539, "title": "From Subjects to Citizens: The Making and Unmaking of Early America", "code": "ASRC 1985", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "On the eve of the American Revolution Britain administered 26 colonies\u2014not just the 13 that would become the United States. British North America's dramatic struggle for independence has led many history textbooks to read the revolution back into colonial history, focusing on those 13 North American colonies that would become the United States, often at the expense of global connections that defined the colonial and revolutionary periods. As this class will explore, key elements of early American history can only be understood through a broader perspective, from the economic growth of New England as a result of the African slave trade and exchange in the Caribbean, to the use of citizenship as a category of exclusion in response to the myriad inhabitants\u2014European, Indigenous, and African\u2014who neighbored or lived within the original 13 colonies. In this course, we will explore the history of early America from the 1490s through the 1800s from a global perspective. Voices usually peripheral to the narrative of American development, from enslaved African mariners to Spanish American nuns, will become central to processes of cultural encounter, labor exploitation, revolutionary upheavals, and state formation that shaped the making and unmaking early America.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":540, "title": "Intermediate Arabic II", "code": "ASRC 2200", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "In this two-course sequence learners continue to develop the four language skills of listening, speaking, reading, and writing and grammar foundation through the extensive use of graded materials on a wide variety of topics.\u00a0 While more attention is given to developing native-like pronunciation and to grammatical accuracy than in ARAB 1201\u00a0and ARAB 1202, the main focus of the course will be on encouraging fluency and facility in understanding the language and communicating ideas in it.\u00a0 The student who successfully completes this two-course sequence will have mastered over 1500 new words and will be able to: 1) understand and actively participate in conversations related to a wide variety of topics beyond those covered in ARAB 1201\u00a0and ARAB 1202, such as the history and geography of the Arab world, food and health, sports, economic matters, the environment, politics, the Palestine problem, etc. 2) read and understand, with the help of a short list of words, passages of up to 300 words, and 3) discuss orally in class and write a 150-word paragraph in Arabic with fewer grammatical errors than in ARAB 1202.\u00a0 The two-course sequence aims to take the student from the Intermediate Mid to the Advanced Mid level according to the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":541, "title": "Introduction to Quranic Arabic", "code": "ASRC 2204", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course is designed for students who are interested in reading the language of the Qur'an with accuracy and understanding. The first week (4 classes) will be devoted to an introduction of the history of the Qur'an: the revelation, collection, variant readings, and establishment of an authoritative edition. The last week will be devoted to a general overview of \"revisionist\" literature on the Qur'an. In the remaining 12 weeks, we will cover all of Part 30 (Juz' 'Amma, suuras 78-114) and three suuras of varying length (36, 19, and 12).", "tags": "LA-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":542, "title": "Dress Cloth and Identity", "code": "ASRC 2452", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course uses a multi-disciplinary approach to examine the importance of textiles in African social and economic history. It combines art history, anthropology, social and economic history to explore the role of textiles in marking status, gender, political authority and ethnicity. In addition, we examine the production and distribution of indigenous cloth and the consequences of colonial rule on African textile industries. Our analysis also considers the principles of African dress and clothing that shaped the African diaspora in the Americas as well as the more recent popularity and use of African fabrics and dress in the United States.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":543, "title": "Introduction to African American Literature", "code": "ASRC 2650", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course will introduce students to the African American literary tradition. Through aesthetic and contextual approaches, we will consider how African American life and culture has defined and constituted the United States of America. From slave narratives to Hip-Hop music, we will trace the range of artistic conventions and cultural movements while paying close attention to broader historical shifts in American life over the past three centuries. We will ask: How do authors create and define a tradition? What are some of the recurring themes and motifs within this tradition? Authors will include: David Walker, Frederick Douglass, Ida B. Wells-Barnett, W.E.B. DuBois, Zora Neale Hurston, Lorraine Hansberry, James Baldwin, Toni Morrison, Claudia Rankine, and Chimamanda Adichie.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":544, "title": "Cleopatra's Egypt: Tradition and Transformation", "code": "ASRC 2688", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Following the conquests of Alexander, the ancient civilization of Egypt came under Greek rule. This period is best known for its famous queen Cleopatra, the last independent ruler of ancient Egypt. But even before Cleopatra's life and death, the Egypt that she governed was a fascinating place \u2013 and a rich case study in cultural interactions under ancient imperialism. This course explores life in Egypt under Greek rule, during the three centuries known as the Ptolemaic period (named after Cleopatra's family, the Ptolemaic dynasty). We will examine the history and culture of Ptolemaic Egypt, an empire at the crossroads of Africa, the Near East, and the Mediterranean. We will explore the experiences of both Egyptians and Greeks living in this multi-cultural, multi-ethnic, and multi-linguistic society. Finally, we will investigate the ways that Ptolemaic Egypt can shed light on modern experiences of imperialism, colonialism, and globalization.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":545, "title": "Introduction to Humanities", "code": "ASRC 2750", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "These seminars offers an introduction to the humanities by exploring the historical, cultural, social and political themes. Students will explore themes in critical dialogue with a range of texts and media drawn from the arts, humanities, and/or humanistic social sciences. Guest speakers, including Cornell faculty and Society for the Humanities Fellows, will present from different disciplines and points of view. Students will make field trips to local sites relevant to the theme, and visit Cornell special collections and archives. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in additional programming related to the Society's annual focus theme and the Humanities Scholars Program for undergraduate humanities research.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":546, "title": "Advanced Arabic II", "code": "ASRC 3101", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "In this two-semester sequence, learners will be introduced to authentic, unedited Arabic language materials ranging from short stories, and poems, to newspaper articles dealing with social,\u00a0 political,\u00a0 and cultural issues. Emphasis will be on developing fluency in oral expression through discussions of issues presented in the reading and listening selections. There will be more focus on the development of native-like pronunciation and accurate use of grammatical structures than in the previous four courses. A primary objective of the course is the development of the writing skill through free composition exercises in topics of interest to individual students.\u00a0 This course starts where ARAB 2202\u00a0leaves off and continues the development of the four language skills and grammar foundation using 18 themes, some new and some introduced in previous courses but are presented here at a more challenging level.\u00a0 The student who successfully completes this two-course sequence have mastered over 3000 new words and will be able, within context of the 18 new and recycled themes to: 1) understand and actively participate in conversations, 2) read and understand, with the help of a short list of words, authentic, unedited passages of up to 400 words, and 3) discuss orally in class and write a 300-word paragraph in Arabic with fewer grammatical errors than in ARAB 2202.\u00a0 The two-course sequence aims to take the student from the Advanced Mid to the Superior level according to the ACTFL proficiency guidelines.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":547, "title": "African American Literature Through the 1930's", "code": "ASRC 3507", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "One way to think of African American literature is to recognize that certain themes and motifs recur and tell a story that one can study across time from slavery to freedom.\u00a0 Solid literacies in this field not only provide valuable interpretive contexts for analyzing various aspects of African American and diasporan life and culture, but can reinforce work in a range of other fields, from Africana studies to American literature.\u00a0 Additionally, they reinforce skills in reading and analysis of literature, as well as writing, that will pay off now and as time goes on.\u00a0 We will examine selections from authors in African American literary history from the 18th century into the 1930s.\u00a0 Authors who will be examined include Phillis Wheatley, Olaudah Equiano, Frederick Douglass, David Walker, Harriet Jacobs, Harriet Wilson, Charles Chesnutt, Paul Laurence Dunbar, Booker T.\u00a0 Washington, W.E.B. DuBois, James Weldon Johnson, Jean Toomer, Nella Larsen, and Langston Hughes.\u00a0 The production of early African American literature was grounded in genres such as poetry, the novel, the short story, the slave narrative, the spiritual narrative, and autobiography, all of which will be explored.\u00a0 It will be especially important for us to recognize the foundational contributions of African Americans to such fiction genres as the short story and the novel by the 1850s, forming a renaissance of sorts.\u00a0 Additionally, we will consider the impact of oral forms on African American writing such as spirituals and folk tales.\u00a0 We will consider the development of African American literature across a range of historical contexts, including the Revolutionary/Enlightenment period, the antebellum period, the Civil War and Reconstruction, and the Harlem Renaissance/Jazz Age.", "tags": "LA-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":548, "title": "Dissent and Protest in U.S. History", "code": "ASRC 3626", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "What is dissent, and what is its relationship to American Democratic principles? This course will examine the various forms of dissent and counter dissent in U.S. history from the Colonial phase to the present. Organized by a thematic structure, each week the course will consider a different group from the earliest to the most contemporary protests of Indigenous People, Abolitionists and anti-slavery tactics, Women's and Environmental movements, etc. Our explorations will consider a variety of primary sources, literature, film, and secondary scholarship. For a longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "HA-AS|SCD-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":549, "title": "African Economic Development Histories", "code": "ASRC 3652", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "What impact did Africa's involvement in the slave trade and its colonization by Europe have on its long-term economic health? What role have post-independence political decisions made within Africa and by multinational economic actors (the World Bank and the IMF, for example) had on altering the trajectory of Africa's economic history? Does China's recent heavy investment in Africa portend a movement away from or a continuation of Africa's economic underdevelopment? These questions and others will be addressed in this course.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":550, "title": "Africans and African Americans in Literature", "code": "ASRC 3742", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "When an African and an African American meet, solidarity is presumed, but often friction is the result. In this course, we will consider how Africans and African Americans see each other through literature. What happens when two peoples suffering from double consciousness meet? We will examine the influence of historical forces including slavery, colonialism and pan-Africanism on the way writers explore the meeting between Africans and African Americans. Specifically we will look at how writers such as W.E.B DuBois, Maya Angelou, NoViolet Bulawayo, Chimamanda Adichie, Richard Wright, Eugene Robinson, Philippe Wamba, Teju Cole, and Malcolm X have understood the meeting.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":551, "title": "Body Politics in African Literature, Cinema, and New Media", "code": "ASRC 3977", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "GLC-AS|LA-AS|SCD-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":552, "title": "Diasporic and Indigenous Health", "code": "ASRC 4002", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Rates of chronic disease and other health conditions, including mental illness and substance use disorders, have surged over the past three decades, owing largely to structural factors associated with the fragmentation of national healthcare systems, diminished social support networks, and government subsidization of unhealthy foods and hazardous pharmaceuticals. These issues are especially amplified in ethnoracial communities: for example, Blacks and Latinos typically have higher rates of disease in comparison to their non-Black counterparts, even after adjusting for factors such as income and education level. This course investigates the complex political, economic and cultural forces which contribute to health inequities. Students will be exposed to case studies throughout various diasporas\u2014from Harlem to Cape Town\u2014to understand the intricate ways in which race and health interact.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":553, "title": "Reconstruction and the New South", "code": "ASRC 4390", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course focuses on the American South in the nineteenth century as it made the transition from Reconstruction to new forms of social organization and patterns of race relations. Reconstruction will be considered from a sociopolitical perspective, concentrating on the experiences of the freed people. The New South emphasis will include topics on labor relations, economic and political changes, new cultural alliances, the rise of agrarianism, and legalization of Jim Crow.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":554, "title": "New Black Southern Women Writers", "code": "ASRC 4403", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Anna Julia Cooper's pioneering publication of A Voice from the South (1892) underscores the centrality of black women in determining the possibilities for black racial uplift in the nation. Areas from local color and regionalism, to contemporary fields such as cultural geography, have underscored the impact of geography on identity. Such insights have increasingly underscored that region matters in shaping black women's identities in the U.S., along with their various cultural productions. Black women writers in the U.S. South played a salient role in shaping the black women's literature renaissance of the 1970s in both writing and theorizing literature, and thus, in expanding the conventional canons in African American and American literature more broadly. This course considers the new generation of writers of black women that has emerged in the U.S. South in more recent years in the twenty first century, whose writings have increasingly impacted the development of contemporary African American literature. This course is designed to meet this body of material with serious reading, study and critical analysis. Genres that we will explore include the novel, poetry, the essay and the memoir, along with visual art. We will consider a range of newer authors, including Edwidge Danticat, Honor\u00e9e Jeffers, Tayari Jones, Valdez Perkins, Natasha Tretheway, Jesmyn Ward, and Shay Youngblood. Concomitantly, we will explore the visual art of Kara Walker. We will consider ways in which these writers build upon established themes and conventions in African American and black women's writing and the implications of their work for black feminist theory. Furthermore, we will examine the impact of their work within the emergent field of twenty first century African American literature and criticism.", "tags": "LA-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":555, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "ASRC 4555", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":556, "title": "Women and Gender Issues in Africa", "code": "ASRC 4602", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "There are two contrasting views of the status and role of women in Africa. One view portrays African women as controlled by men in all social institutions. Another view projects women as having a relatively favorable position in indigenous societies they were active with an identity independent of men's and no concentration of women in a private sphere while men controlled the public sphere. This course examines critical gender theories and women in historical and contemporary periods. The topics covered include: non-westernized/pre-colonial societies; the impact and legacy of colonial policies; access to education and knowledge; women in politics and the economy in local and global contexts; women's organizations; armed conflicts and peace; same gender love and evolving family values; the law and health challenges; the United Nations and World Conferences on Women: Mexico 1975, Copenhagen 1980, Nairobi 1985, Beijing 1995 and post-Beijing meetings, and the 2010 superstructure of UN Women, and Beijing +20 in 2015 with the UN Women's slogan \"Empowering Women, Empowering Humanity: Picture it!\"", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":557, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "ASRC 4658", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":558, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "ASRC 4721", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":559, "title": "Honors Thesis", "code": "ASRC 4901", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "For senior Africana Studies majors working on honors theses, with selected reading, research projects, etc., under the supervision of a member of the Africana Studies and Research Center faculty.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":560, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "ASRC 4903", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "For students working on special topics, with selected reading, research projects, etc., under the supervision of a member of the Africana Studies and Research Center faculty.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":561, "title": "Doing Research With Marginalized Populations", "code": "ASRC 6003", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course covers the basic epistemology for social sciences research, integrating an explicit focus on\u00a0applied\u00a0mixed methods approaches (quantitative and qualitative) for conducting original \"real world\" research on humans. While these cognates will be approached theoretically, the course's primary concentration will be on the praxis of quantifying and contextualizing the experiences, attitudes, and social/health outcomes of historically marginalized and \"hidden\" populations, including people who are Black, Latino and indigenous, LGBTQ+, and individuals with a disability, mental illness or substance use disorder, with an intersectional lens. While not offering an exhaustive review of individual quantitative or qualitative methodologies, students will learn the fundamentals of curating a substantive research framework on marginalized and hidden populations, ethically engaging and recruiting people into their studies, collecting and analyzing data, and meaningfully disseminating research findings.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":562, "title": "Psychoanalysis and Race", "code": "ASRC 6010", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "In this graduate seminar, we will read Franz Fanon's classic texts Black Skin, White Masks and The Wretched of the Earth in order to trace and interrogate his evolving critiques of psychoanalysis and psychoanalytical clinical practices in the colonial world. We will examine his critiques of Hegel's theory of the subject and Lacanian models of subject formation and his call for the incorporation of social analysis in approaches to Black subjectivity and psychic life (sociogeny). What implications does sociogeny have for reading the black body and its relation to self and society? Our reading of Fanon's texts will be placed in dialogue with works by Aim\u00e9 C\u00e9saire, Jean-Paul Sartre, Hannah Arendt, Hortense Spillers, Saidiya Hartman, and David Marriott.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":563, "title": "Africana Philosophy: W.E.B Du Bois", "code": "ASRC 6204", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This class is devoted to the in-depth study of the works of W.E.B. DuBois. The aim is to locate DuBois in the general philosophicalfimament while mining his works for specific philosophical insights that they embody and laying bare the contributions that he has made to our understanding of some of the great questions that occupy the energies wherever they happen to be located. Finally, we seek to elicit how his Afican American inheritance inspired him and is itself impacted by his philosophical exertions.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":564, "title": "Black Feminist Theories: Sexuality, Creativity, and Power", "code": "ASRC 6207", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course examines black feminist theories as they are articulated in the cross-cultural experiences of women across the African Diaspora. We will explore a variety of theories, texts and creative encounters within their socio-political and geographical frames and locations, analyzing these against, or in relation to, a range of feminist activisms and movements. Some key categories of discussion will include Black Left Feminism, Feminist Movements in Latin America and the Caribbean and African feminisms. Texts like the Combahee River Collective statement and a variety of US Black feminist positions and the related literature as well as earlier black feminist articulations such as the Sojourners for Truth and Justice will also be engaged. Students will have the opportunity to develop their own research projects from a range of possibilities.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":565, "title": "Reconstruction and the New South", "code": "ASRC 6391", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "This course focuses on the American South in the nineteenth century as it made the transition from Reconstruction to new forms of social organization and patterns of race relations. Reconstruction will be considered from a sociopolitical perspective, concentrating on the experiences of the freed people. The New South emphasis will include topics on labor relations, economic and political changes, new cultural alliances, the rise of agrarianism, and legalization of Jim Crow.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":566, "title": "New Black Southern Women Writers", "code": "ASRC 6403", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Anna Julia Cooper's pioneering publication of A Voice from the South (1892) underscores the centrality of black women in determining the possibilities for black racial uplift in the nation. Areas from local color and regionalism, to contemporary fields such as cultural geography, have underscored the impact of geography on identity. Such insights have increasingly underscored that region matters in shaping black women's identities in the U.S., along with their various cultural productions. Black women writers in the U.S. South played a salient role in shaping the black women's literature renaissance of the 1970s in both writing and theorizing literature, and thus, in expanding the conventional canons in African American and American literature more broadly. This course considers the new generation of writers of black women that has emerged in the U.S. South in more recent years in the twenty first century, whose writings have increasingly impacted the development of contemporary African American literature. This course is designed to meet this body of material with serious reading, study and critical analysis. Genres that we will explore include the novel, poetry, the essay and the memoir, along with visual art. We will consider a range of newer authors, including Edwidge Danticat, Honor\u00e9e Jeffers, Tayari Jones, Valdez Perkins, Natasha Tretheway, Jesmyn Ward, and Shay Youngblood. Concomitantly, we will explore the visual art of Kara Walker. We will consider ways in which these writers build upon established themes and conventions in African American and black women's writing and the implications of their work for black feminist theory. Furthermore, we will examine the impact of their work within the emergent field of twenty first century African American literature and criticism.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":567, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "ASRC 6555", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":568, "title": "Women and Gender Issues in Africa", "code": "ASRC 6602", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "There are two contrasting views of the status and role of women in Africa. One view portrays African women as controlled by men in all social institutions. Another view projects women as having a relatively favorable position in indigenous societies they were active with an identity independent of men's and no concentration of women in a private sphere while men controlled the public sphere. This course examines critical gender theories and women in historical and contemporary periods. The topics covered include: non-westernized/pre-colonial societies; the impact and legacy of colonial policies; access to education and knowledge; women in politics and the economy in local and global contexts; women's organizations; armed conflicts and peace; same gender love and evolving family values; the law and health challenges; the United Nations and World Conferences on Women: Mexico 1975, Copenhagen 1980, Nairobi 1985, Beijing 1995 and post-Beijing meetings, and the 2010 superstructure of UN Women.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":569, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "ASRC 6658", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit\u00a0The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":570, "title": "Urban Representation", "code": "ASRC 6819", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Urban Representation Labs are intended to bring students and faculty into direct contact with complex urban representations spanning a wide media spectrum and evoking a broad set of humanist discourses. Students will leverage archival materials at Cornell to launch new observations and explore unanticipated approaches to urban culture that derive from previously understudied archival materials. The goal is twofold: to demystify the representational technologies involved in presenting the city, and to unpack the political, cultural, and aesthetic values and priorities embedded in every form of presentation. Urban Representation Labs are offered under the auspices of Cornell University's Andrew W. Mellon Foundation Collaborative Studies in Architecture, Urbanism, and the Humanities grant. For current special topic seminar description and application instructions, visit our urban seminars page.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":571, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "ASRC 6901", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "Independent study course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":572, "title": "Africana Studies Graduate Seminar", "code": "ASRC 6903", "subject": "ASRC", "descr": "The seminar is coordinated and supervised by one professor but team taught by three or four faculty members per semester. Each participating faculty member is responsible for a topical segment of the course related to her or his areas of specialization or an area of interest pertaining to theory and methodology of Africana Studies.", "tags": "ASRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":573, "title": "Our Solar System", "code": "ASTRO 1102", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":574, "title": "Black Holes: Race and the Cosmos", "code": "ASTRO 2034", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Conventional wisdom would have it that the \"black\" in black holes has nothing to do with race. Surely there can be no connection between the cosmos and the idea of racial blackness. Can there? Contemporary Black Studies theorists, artists, fiction writers implicitly and explicitly posit just such a connection. Theorists use astronomy concepts like \"black holes\" and \"event horizons\" to interpret the history of race in creative ways, while artists and musicians conjure blackness through cosmological themes and images. Co-taught by professors in Comparative Literature and Astronomy, this course will introduce students to the fundamentals of astronomy concepts through readings in Black Studies. Texts may include works by theorists like Michelle Wright and Denise Ferreira da Silva, authors like Octavia Butler and Nalo Hopkinson, music by Sun Ra, Outkast and Janelle Mon\u00e1e. Astronomy concepts will include the electromagnetic spectrum, stellar evolution, and general relativity.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PHS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":575, "title": "The History of the Universe", "code": "ASTRO 2201", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "General discussion of how the universe has evolved since the Big Bang era and how our understanding of it has changed from ancient to modern times. Several main themes are covered over the course of the semester: the evolution of our view of the sky from that of ancient cultures to that of space telescopes; the formation and nature of black holes; dark matter and dark energy; and the origin, evolution, and fate of the universe. Presents a nonmathematical introduction to these subjects and discusses uncertainties and unresolved issues in our understanding.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":576, "title": "Astronomy: Stars, Galaxies, and Cosmology", "code": "ASTRO 2211", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Course surveying the evolution of the universe from the Big Bang onwards: what happens in the first few minutes of the universe's life; star formation, structure, and evolution; the physics of white dwarfs, neutron stars, and black holes; galaxy formation and structure; and cosmology. The roles of quantum physics, particle physics, and relativity in astrophysics are discussed (no prior knowledge of these is assumed). The course is more in-depth than ASTRO 1101/ASTRO 1103. All course materials are made available online.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":577, "title": "Data Analysis and Research Techniques in Astronomy", "code": "ASTRO 3334", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Introduction to the tools of data processing and analysis for research in astronomy. \u00a0The course reviews the techniques employed in astrophysical research, both observational and theoretical, to explore the universe.\u00a0\u00a0Methods and\u00a0strategies of data acquisition and image and signal processing are discussed. Students gain hands-on experience with visualization techniques and methods of\u00a0error analysis, data fitting, numerical simulation, and data scalability. \u00a0Exercises address the processes by which astrophysicists piece together observations made with today's\u00a0foremost astronomical instruments to solve questions concerning the origin of planets, stars, galaxies, and the universe itself. \u00a0This course prepares students with the techniques and computing tools necessary to undertake research in astronomy\u00a0and other data-driven fields.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|SDS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":578, "title": "Evolution of Galaxies", "code": "ASTRO 4432", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "An overview of modern astrophysical concepts for physical science and engineering students similar in terms of level, style and prerequisites as ASTRO 4431. A previous knowledge of the ASTRO 4431\u00a0material is useful but not required. The course will include topics not covered in ASTRO 4431, such as formation of stars and planets (including exoplanets), dynamics and formation of galaxies, dark matter and cosmology, and gravitational wave astronomy. Current research problems in these areas are introduced along the way. The emphasis is on using fundamental principles of physics to explain astronomical phenomena.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":579, "title": "Modeling, Mining and Machine Learning in Astronomy", "code": "ASTRO 4523", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "This course builds upon a review of probability and statistics to explore, develop, and apply algorithms for discovering objects and events in astronomical data, for inference of sophisticated models for populations of objects using frequentist and Bayesian methods, and for visualization and presentation of results to address fundamental questions using persuasive, data-based arguments.\u00a0Methods include time-series analysis; clustering, classification algorithms, genetic and Markov Chain Monte Carlo methods.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|SDS-AS|ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":580, "title": "Independent Study in Astronomy", "code": "ASTRO 4940", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Individuals work on selected topics. A program of study is devised by the student and instructor.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":581, "title": "General Relativity II", "code": "ASTRO 6510", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "A continuation of PHYS 6553\u00a0and ASTRO 6509\u00a0that covers a variety of advanced topics and applications of general relativity in astrophysics, cosmology, and high-energy physics.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":582, "title": "Physics of Black Holes, White Dwarfs, and Neutron Stars", "code": "ASTRO 6511", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Compact objects (neutron stars, black holes and white dwarfs) are the endpoints of stellar evolution. They are responsible for some of the most exotic phenomena in the universe such as supernovae, magnetars, gamma-ray bursts, neutron star and black hole mergers.\u00a0 Supermassive black holes also lie at the heart of the violent processes in active galactic nuclei. The study of compact objects allows one to probe physics under extreme conditions (high densities, strong magnetic fields, and gravity). This course surveys the astrophysics of compact stars and related subjects. Emphasis is on the application of diverse theoretical physics tools to various observations of compact stars. There are no astronomy or general relativity prerequisites.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":583, "title": "Modeling, Mining and Machine Learning in Astronomy", "code": "ASTRO 6523", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "This course builds upon a review of probability and statistics to explore, develop, and apply algorithms for discovering objects and events in astronomical data, for inference of sophisticated models for populations of objects using frequentist and Bayesian methods, and for visualization and presentation of results to address fundamental questions using persuasive, data-based arguments. Methods include time-series analysis; clustering, classification algorithms, genetic and Markov Chain Monte Carlo methods.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":584, "title": "Astrophysical Fluid Dynamics", "code": "ASTRO 6531", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "This course will survey fluid dynamics (including magnetohydrodynamics and some plasma physics) important for understanding astronomical phenomena. Topics include basic fluid and MHD concepts and equations, waves and instabilities of various types (e.g., sound, gravity, Rossby, hydromagnetic, spiral density waves; Rayleigh-Taylor, thermal, Jeans, rotational, magnetorotational instabilities), shear and viscous flows, turbulence, shocks and blast waves, etc. These topics will be discussed in different astrophysical contexts and applications, such as atmosphere and ocean, star and planet formation, compact objects, interstellar medium, galaxies and clusters. This course is intended mainly for graduate students (both theory and observation) and senior undergraduates in physics and engineering interested in astrophysics and space physics. No previous exposure to fluid dynamics is required.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":585, "title": "Planet Formation and Evolution", "code": "ASTRO 6578", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Survey of chemical and physical processes important to the origin and evolution of planetary systems. The first part of the course will cover the formation of planets including the astronomical context, nucleosynthesis, meteoritics, condensation sequence, accretion, dynamical evolution, and observational constraints (disks, exoplanets, major planets, satellites, and small bodies). The second part of the course will cover planetary internal structure and evolution including melting, differentiation, core formation, convection, thermal evolution, and magnetic fields.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":586, "title": "Advanced Study and Research", "code": "ASTRO 6940", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "Guided reading and seminars on topics not currently covered in regular courses.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":587, "title": "Seminar: Astronomy and Planetary Science", "code": "ASTRO 7683", "subject": "ASTRO", "descr": "This course is a reading seminar where graduate students will gain astronomy breadth, practice public speaking, and distill important results from\u00a0seminal astronomy\u00a0research papers.", "tags": "ASTRO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":588, "title": "Elementary Bosnian-Croatian-Serbian II", "code": "BCS 1132", "subject": "BCS", "descr": "By the end of this course, students will be able to carry on basic conversations in Bosnian/ Croatian/Serbian on many topics from daily life. They should be able to make polite requests, ask for information, respond to requests and descriptions, impart personal information, and have simple discussions on familiar topics. They will also acquire the skills to read and understand simple informational texts, such as newspaper headlines and menus, announcements and advertisements, and to extract the general idea of longer informational texts. They will master the writing systems of the languages, and should be able to write notes or simple letters and keep a journal.", "tags": "BCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":589, "title": "Intermediate Bosnian Croatian Serbian II", "code": "BCS 1134", "subject": "BCS", "descr": "The intermediate course in BCS is a continuation of the elementary course and is intended to enhance overall communicative competence in the language. This course moves forward from the study of the fundamental systems and vocabulary of the Bosnian/Croatian/Serbian to rich exposure to the spoken and written language with the wide range of speakers and situations. The goal of the course is to give students practice in comprehension, speaking, and composition, while broadening their vocabulary and deepening their understanding of grammar and syntax. The course will focus on the following skills: conversation, writing, role-playing, interviewing, and summarizing. To develop these skills the students will be assigned dialogues, language exercises, translations, descriptions, summaries, and a final independent project.", "tags": "BCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":590, "title": "Perspectives on the Climate Change Challenge", "code": "BEE 2000", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This university-wide seminar series provides critically important perspectives on the grand challenge of climate change. Speakers from Cornell University and other institutions will cover a range of topics including the science of climate change, implications for ecosystems, oceans, forests, agriculture and communities, the important ethical, philosophical and legal insights on the issue, and provide thoughts on societal responses through international mechanisms, economic drivers and communication tools. This seminar series counts towards the requirements of the climate change minor and the ESS minor and major.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":591, "title": "Bioengineering Thermodynamics and Kinetics", "code": "BEE 2220", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Living systems rely on chemical and phase equilibria, precise coordination of biochemical pathways, and the release of chemical energy as heat, all of which are governed by the laws of thermodynamics and the rates of chemical reactions. The course covers concepts and laws of thermodynamics as applied to phase transformations, work, heat, and chemical reactions; and reaction kinetics applied to industrial processes and living systems, all with a focus on biological examples.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":592, "title": "Sustainable Development", "code": "BEE 3299", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Sustainable development is a dominant economic, environmental, and social concern of the 21st century. This course introduces the key concepts of sustainable development and how they are integrated into life cycle analysis (LCA) assessments of system sustainability.\u00a0 Students learn to carry out LCA assessments from environmental, economic, and social perspectives.\u00a0 Students develop these assessments throughout the semester for a system/product of their choice that is relevant to their majors and/or interests, and post their assessment components on an ePortfolio of their project to enable peer sharing and feedback. Course is web-based.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":593, "title": "Design and Analysis of Biomaterials", "code": "BEE 3400", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Covers the analysis of different types of biomaterials, synthetic or bio-derived, their synthesis, characterization and applications. The fundamental understanding of biomaterials chemistry and physics at the molecular level is emphasized.\u00a0 Mathematical analysis towards rational design of biomaterials is used throughout the course. In addition, examples from forefront biomaterials research will be used for case studies.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":594, "title": "Molecular and Cellular Bioengineering", "code": "BEE 3600", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Biotechnology viewed at the cellular and molecular level. Advances in biotechnology are broken down to their functional parts using the tools of biological engineering (thermodynamics, transport, kinetics, etc.) to understand how and why they work with an emphasis on design. Particular attention paid to gene therapy, synthetic biology, protein engineering, and nucleic acid engineering. Case studies in biomedical, bioprocess, and bioenvironmental engineering.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":595, "title": "Physical Hydrology for Ecosystems", "code": "BEE 3710", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Introduction to physical hydrology with an emphasis on roles and interactions between hydrological processes and ecological, biogeochemical, and human systems.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":596, "title": "Sustainability and Sustainable Energy Systems", "code": "BEE 3800", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This course is offered as part of the CALS Signature Semester: Toward a Sustainable Future and Emerging Technologies Important to China on site in Shanghai, China. The major challenge facing our society is to create sustainable communities that are supported and encouraged via policies that integrate energy, environment and natural resources. The focus is interconnectivity of housing, transportation, environmental impacts, economic development and social wellbeing \"that meets a community's current needs while preserving the environment so that these needs can continue to be met in the future\". A systems approach will be utilized integrating analysis of urban design, \"green\" buildings, renewable energy, transportation, economic development, agriculture and food systems, water management, waste management, and communication/governance.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":597, "title": "Introduction to Nanobiotechnology", "code": "BEE 3801", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This course is offered as part of the CALS Signature Semester: Toward a Sustainable Future and Emerging Technologies Important to China on site in Shanghai, China. Nanobiotechnology strides at the interface between nanotechnology and biotechnology. This introductory course will teach the \"nano\" concept related to nanotechnology and biotechnology, from scales to sizes to energy. The course will further cover nanoscale building blocks of life, in particular nucleic acids (including DNA, RNA, TNA, PNA, etc.). Students will also learn the concepts of polymers, hierarchy assemblies and self-assemblies. A variety of related techniques will be examined along with demonstrations of real-world applications.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":598, "title": "Multivariate Statistics for Environmental Applications", "code": "BEE 4310", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This class provides an introduction to relatively simple but powerful multivariate statistical techniques needed to analyze and model complex datasets frequently encountered in the environmental sciences. Emphasis is given to developing the mathematical foundation of these methods to foster a deeper understanding of the benefits and limitations of different approaches. The goal is to provide students in the applied environmental sciences with a toolbox of methods not taught in more introductory statistical courses, but also to ensure that students can use these methods in their own work without viewing them as a \"black box\". The course only assumes a limited knowledge of calculus, linear algebra, and statistics, and will provide a review of the mathematical concepts needed to understand the multivariate techniques presented. Applications will be presented primarily from the geophysical and ecological sciences, but the theory will be applicable to other environmental fields. Upon completion of the course, students will be able to use the multivariate techniques presented in the course to understand and evaluate environmental problems of interest in their respective domains.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":599, "title": "Bioinstrumentation", "code": "BEE 4500", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Bioinstrumentation applications are emphasized in this laboratory-based course. Electronic instruments from sensor to computer are considered. Static and dynamic characteristics of components and systems are examined theoretically and empirically. General analog and digital signal condition circuits are designed, constructed, and tested. A variety of biological applications of instrumentation are discussed.\u00a0 Without capstone design 3 credits; with capstone design 4 credits.\u00a0 Priority given to students taking capstone design.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":600, "title": "Computer-Aided Engineering: Applications to Biological Processes", "code": "BEE 4530", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Introduction to simulation-based design as an alternative to prototype-based design; modeling and optimization of complex real-life processes for design and research, using industry-standard physics-based computational software. Emphasis is on problem formulation, starting from a real process and developing its computer model. Covers biomedical processes in thermal therapy and drug delivery that involve heat transfer, mass transfer, and fluid flow. Computational topics introduce the finite-element method, pre- and post-processing, and pitfalls of using computational software. Students choose their own semester-long biomedical project, which is the major part of the course (no final exam).", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":601, "title": "Introduction to Groundwater", "code": "BEE 4710", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Fresh water has become a limited resource in many parts of the world. In arid and semi-arid regions, groundwater levels are declining at unstainable levels. In many industrial areas, groundwater is contaminated and unsuitable for drinking water. Sustainability and pollution will be addressed in this course; we will study these problem by first learning the theory of saturated flow and contaminant transport under ideal conditions. Subsequently, we will learn how to simplify a complex groundwater system so solutions can be found. At the end of the course, we will put conceptual, analytical and simulation models, in the broader context of past, current, and potential future groundwater quantity and quality issues, as they are affected by natural or human actions. Throughout the course, guest speakers will discuss topics of current interest related to water. This elective course is intended for seniors and graduate students interested in sub surface water and solute transport applications to sustainable ground water use and prevention of \u00a0pollution. Well prepared juniors are welcome too.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":602, "title": "Solid Waste Engineering", "code": "BEE 4760", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Planning and design of processes and facilities for management of municipal solid wastes. Source characterization and reduction; collection and transport systems; waste-to energy combustion; sanitary landfills; composting; recycling and materials recovery facilities; and hazardous waste management. Emphasizes quantitative analyses.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":603, "title": "Applied Modeling and Simulation for Renewable Energy Systems", "code": "BEE 4880", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This course will provide an applied introduction to modeling, simulation and optimization techniques for various renewable energy systems. The course will be modular in nature. Each module will focus on a particular renewable energy application and relevant modeling/simulation tools. Some modules are independent and some will build on previous modules. The instructional format of the course will include lectures, scientific paper reviews, and some Matlab programming. Students will have an opportunity to apply new techniques to a relevant modeling project. The course will culminate with a modeling project relevant to renewable energy. Undergraduates will work in teams of 2-3 students to complete the term project.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":604, "title": "Special Topics in Biological and Environmental Engineering", "code": "BEE 4940", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "The department teaches trial courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and will be advertised by the department. Courses offered under this number will be approved by the department curriculum committee and the same course will not be offered twice under this number. Each 4940 has a unique course ID for enrollment.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":605, "title": "Individual Study in Biological and Environmental Engineering", "code": "BEE 4970", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Special work in any area of biological and environmental engineering on problems under investigation by the department or of special interest to the student, provided, in the latter case, that adequate facilities can be obtained.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":606, "title": "Engineers Without Borders Independent Study", "code": "BEE 4971", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "The course content must relate directly to goals of Engineers Without Borders (EWB) and can be taken for 1 to 4 credits under supervision of a College of Engineering faculty member with approval of the EWB faculty advisor, Professor Hess. Internships can consist of on- or off-campus research or work experiences. The independent study should be purposeful, provide opportunities for reflection, present a continual challenge to the student, and incorporate active learning. The student is expected to be an active participant in all stages of the experience from planning to evaluation. Students taking this course must be members of Cornell EWB.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":607, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching", "code": "BEE 4980", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "The student assists in teaching a biological and environmental engineering course appropriate to his or her previous training. The student meets with a discussion or laboratory section, prepares course materials, grades assignments, and regularly discusses objectives and techniques with the faculty member in charge of the course.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":608, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "BEE 4990", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Research in any area of biological or environmental engineering on problems under investigation by the department or of special interest to the student, provided that adequate facilities can be obtained. The student must review pertinent literature, prepare a project outline, carry out an approved plan, and submit a formal final report.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":609, "title": "Honors Thesis", "code": "BEE 4993", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Intended for students pursuing the research honors program in BEE. This course is the culmination of the program's honors project requirement. Students enrolled in the BEE Honors program will prepare an honors thesis based on the subject matter of a BEE 4990\u00a0project from the previous semester, under the supervision of their BEE 4990\u00a0research mentor. A preliminary draft and the final copy will be submitted according to the deadline and formatting requirements of the Honors program.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":610, "title": "Engineering Professionalism", "code": "BEE 5330", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "The primary focus is to prepare students for the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam, which is required as the first step in obtaining a Professional Engineering license. Other engineering professionalism topics will be covered in some of lectures. The FE exam is valid in any state and does not expire. Students complete a formal comprehensive review of engineering subjects associated with the FE Exam.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":611, "title": "Master of Engineering Design Project", "code": "BEE 5952", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Comprehensive engineering design projects relating to the candidate's area of specialization. Projects are supervised by a BEE faculty member on an individual basis. A formal project report and oral presentation of the design project are required for completion of the course(s). A minimum of 3 to a maximum of 9 credits of\u00a0BEE 5951-5952 is required for the M.Eng. degree.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":612, "title": "Multivariate Statistics for Environmental Applications", "code": "BEE 6310", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This class provides an introduction to relatively simple but powerful multivariate statistical techniques needed to analyze and model complex datasets frequently encountered in the environmental sciences. Emphasis is given to developing the mathematical foundation of these methods to foster a deeper understanding of the benefits and limitations of different approaches. The goal is to provide students in the applied environmental sciences with a toolbox of methods not taught in more introductory statistical courses, but also to ensure that students can use these methods in their own work without viewing them as a \"black box\". The course only assumes a limited knowledge of calculus, linear algebra, and statistics, and will provide a review of the mathematical concepts needed to understand the multivariate techniques presented. Applications will be presented primarily from the geophysical and ecological sciences, but the theory will be applicable to other environmental fields. Upon completion of the course, students will be able to use the multivariate techniques presented in the course to understand and evaluate environmental problems of interest in their respective domains.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":613, "title": "Veterinary Perspectives on Pathogen Control in Animal Manure", "code": "BEE 6430", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "In-depth look at the management of pathogens in animal manures. Reviews the pathogens involved, the role of governing agencies, the survival of pathogens in the field, and methods of pathogen destruction. Discusses commercial methods of manure processing for the control of these pathogens for the protection of other animals and the human population. Concludes with class discussions with major stakeholders representing the dairy, beef, pork, and poultry industries and their understanding of the problem as it relates to veterinary students.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":614, "title": "Applied Modeling and Simulation for Renewable Energy Systems", "code": "BEE 6880", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "This course will provide an applied introduction to modeling, simulation and optimization techniques for various renewable energy systems. The course will be modular in nature. Each module will focus on a particular renewable energy application and relevant modeling/simulation tools. Some modules are independent and some will build on previous modules. The instructional format of the course will include lectures, scientific paper reviews, and some Matlab programming. Students will have an opportunity to apply new techniques to a relevant modeling project. The course will culminate with a modeling project relevant to renewable energy. Graduate students will be required to complete the term project on an individual basis.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":615, "title": "Graduate Individual Study in Biological and Environmental Engineering", "code": "BEE 6970", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Topics are arranged by the faculty at the beginning of the semester.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":616, "title": "Soil and Water Engineering Seminar", "code": "BEE 7710", "subject": "BEE", "descr": "Study and discussion of research or design procedures related to selected topics in watershed management, erosion control, hydrology, colloid transport, and water quality.", "tags": "BEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":617, "title": "Elementary Bengali II", "code": "BENGL 1122", "subject": "BENGL", "descr": "Enables students to read and comprehend basic Bengali texts as well as speak and write in the language.", "tags": "BENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":618, "title": "Intermediate Bengali II", "code": "BENGL 2202", "subject": "BENGL", "descr": "Continuing focus on reading, writing, and conversational skills, this course is designed to advance students' oral competence and enhance comprehension skills through reading, conversations, and listening.", "tags": "BENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":619, "title": "Advanced Bengali II", "code": "BENGL 3302", "subject": "BENGL", "descr": "Continuing instruction in Bengali at the advanced level focusing on conversation, interview, and discussion skills.", "tags": "BENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":620, "title": "The Biological Basis of Human Reproduction", "code": "BIOAP 2140", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "This course will examine human reproductive biology. Topics will address the structural, functional, and endocrine differences between the male and the female primarily as they relate to reproduction. Reproductive aberrations resulting in infertility and assisted reproductive technologies will be discussed. Additionally, non-reproductive differences including physical and behavioral differences will be considered.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":621, "title": "Cellular Physiology", "code": "BIOAP 3160", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "A comprehensive course covering the general characteristics of eukaryotic cells; the structure, composition, and function of subcellular organelles; and the major signal transduction pathways regulating a variety of physiological cell activities. Among the main subjects covered are absorption and transport processes, mechanism of action of signaling molecules (hormones), the cell cycle and regulation of cell proliferation, cell-cell communication, extracellular matrix, stem cells, apoptosis, and carcinogenesis.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":622, "title": "Fish Physiology", "code": "BIOAP 3300", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "Fish Physiology is an introduction to the functional biology of fish. Lecture topics will cover cellular and tissue function within key physiological systems that help fish thrive in a wide range of aquatic habitats, from mountain streams to deep-sea vents. These systems will be illustrated using a diverse variety of fish, while broader comparisons between fish and higher vertebrates will also be drawn. Discussion will integrate aquaculture, fisheries, and environmental contexts, including some of the anthropogenic challenges that fish face today and what can be done to mitigate them. Students will perform a gross dissection to identify anatomy in situ and visit an aquaculture facility (there is no separate lab section).", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":623, "title": "Histology: The Biology of the Tissues", "code": "BIOAP 4130", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "Provides students with a basis for understanding the microscopic, fine-structural, and functional organization of vertebrates (primarily mammals), as well as methods of analytic morphology at the cell and tissue levels. Emphasizes dynamic interrelations of structure, composition, and function in cells and tissues.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":624, "title": "Principles of Pharmacology", "code": "BIOAP 4140", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "Undergraduate course surveying system- and organ-related aspects of pharmacology. Topics include mechanisms of drug action; drug disposition; pharmacokinetics; autonomic pharmacology; pharmacology of inflammation, allergy and platelet function; and endocrine, cardiovascular, respiratory, gastrointestinal, and renal pharmacology. The course is designed for undergraduate life science majors, particularly those interested in medical or veterinary school.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":625, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "BIOAP 4980", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and assisting in biology courses. This experience may include supervised participation in a discussion group, assisting in a biology laboratory, assisting in field biology, or tutoring.", "tags": "BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":626, "title": "By Scientific Design: Skill Building for a Career in the Life Sciences II", "code": "BIOAP 7100", "subject": "BIOAP", "descr": "A major goal in biomedical research is to translate advances in basic science into practically useful applications in clinical medicine. This class will provide graduate students with exposure to basic and clinical research, training in critical evaluation of the literature, foster creative thinking, and provide practice in oral defense.", "tags": "BIOAP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":627, "title": "The Art and Science of Birds", "code": "BIOEE 1130", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Art and science have always been fundamentally linked. Before the invention of photography, illustration was the main documentation tool in science; even now, artistic representations are used to communicate important scientific discoveries. This course is led by the staff biological illustrator at the Cornell Lab of Ornithology with visiting professional illustrator and ornithology guest lecturers, to showcase how art can be an invaluable part of explaining science, and conversely how bird studies can inform and promote artistic expression. You will learn about the basics of bird anatomy to inform your drawings, as well as techniques in sketching to foster an appreciation of how science and art can reinforce each other in enriching your life. No prior art experience is required or expected. Beginning with the fundamentals of observational drawing, the course blends art instruction with ornithology science covering a range of interconnected topics", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":628, "title": "Introductory Biology: Ecology and the Environment", "code": "BIOEE 1610", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to ecology, covering interactions between organisms and the environment at scales of populations, communities, and ecosystems. Ecological principles are used to explore the theory and applications of major issues facing humanity in the 21st century, including population dynamics, disease ecology, biodiversity and invasive species, global change, and other topics of environmental sustainability.", "tags": "BIO-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":629, "title": "FWS: Topics in Ecology and Evolutionary Biology", "code": "BIOEE 1640", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "The First-Year Writing Seminar provides the opportunity to write extensively about issues related to ecology and evolutionary biology. Topics vary by section.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":630, "title": "An Introduction to Evolutionary Biology and Diversity", "code": "BIOEE 1780", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Considers explanations for pattern of diversity and the apparent good fit of organisms to the environment. Topics include the diversity of life, the genetics and developmental basis of evolutionary change, processes at the population level, evolution by natural selection, modes of speciation, long-term trends in evolution, origin of humans.", "tags": "BIO-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":631, "title": "The Vertebrates: Comparative Anatomy, Function, Paleontology, and Evolution", "code": "BIOEE 2740", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Introductory course in vertebrate organismal biology that explores the anatomy and function of vertebrates with an emphasis on vertebrate evolution. Lectures cover topics such as the origin, anatomy, physiology, paleontology, and evolution of various vertebrate groups, with a focus on organ systems (such as the nervous, circulatory, and respiratory systems), life history, locomotion, behavior, and conservation. \u00a0This course prepares students for advanced courses on the biology of fishes, amphibians and reptiles, birds, and mammals; pre-vet and pre-med students benefit from its comparative anatomical approach to understanding the organization of the vertebrate body.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":632, "title": "Dynamic Models in Biology", "code": "BIOEE 3620", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Introductory survey of the development, computer implementation, and applications of dynamic models in biology and ecology. Case-study format covering a broad range of current application areas such as regulatory networks, neurobiology, cardiology, infectious disease management, and conservation of endangered species. Students also learn how to construct and study biological systems models on the computer using a scripting and graphics environment.", "tags": "MQR-AS|BIO-AS|SMR-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":633, "title": "Chemical Ecology", "code": "BIOEE 3690", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Why are chilies so spicy? This course examines the chemical basis of interactions between species and is intended for students with a basic knowledge of chemistry and biology. Focuses on the ecology and chemistry of plants, animals, and microbes. Stresses chemical signals used in diverse ecosystems, using Darwinian natural selection as a framework. Topics include: plant defenses, microbial warfare, communication in marine organisms, and human pheromones.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":634, "title": "Digital Morphology through CT", "code": "BIOEE 3780", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "This course is an introduction to CT visualization for its applications in comparative biology of the vertebrates. Students will learn and practice the exploration of vertebrate anatomy with OSIRIX 3-D visualization software or its future replacement; work on student-designed projects and/or a large survey of the vertebrates based on CT scans from specimens in the Cornell museum as well as the Smithsonian and other museums around the world.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":635, "title": "Plant Behavior and Biotic Interactions, Lecture", "code": "BIOEE 4460", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "How do plants respond to antagonists, such as herbivores and pathogens? What are the checks and balances that keep mutualist organisms in their tight interactions? How are symbioses organized on molecular, metabolic and ecological levels? What are the molecular, plant hormonal, and metabolic mechanisms mediating plant biotic interactions with other organisms? What ecological and evolutionary consequences do these interactions have for the fitness of the plants and their interactors? This course provides an overview of plants' myriad interactions with antagonists and mutualists, from microbes to multicellular organisms, and explains the underlying ecological and evolutionary concepts. It gives an introduction to the study of induced plant responses in the light of a behavioral biology framework.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|SDS-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":636, "title": "Plant Behavior and Biotic Interactions, Laboratory", "code": "BIOEE 4461", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Laboratory course covering topics presented in BIOEE 4460/BIONB 4460/PLSCI 4460.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":637, "title": "Speciation: Genetics, Ecology, and Behavior", "code": "BIOEE 4530", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Advanced course in evolutionary biology focusing on the pattern and process of speciation and the nature and origin of behavioral, morphological, physiological, and ecological traits that form the intrinsic barriers to gene exchange. Lecture topics include species concepts and definitions, the history of ideas about speciation, the biological basis of intrinsic barriers to gene exchange, current models for the origin of such barriers, genetic architecture of speciation, rates of speciation. Emphasis is on developing a rigorous conceptual framework for discussing speciation and on detailed analysis of a series of case histories.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":638, "title": "Food, Agriculture, and Society", "code": "BIOEE 4690", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Multidisciplinary course dealing with the social and environmental impact of food production in the United States and developing countries. Agroecosystems of various kinds are analyzed from biological, economic, and social perspectives. The impacts of traditional, conventional, and alternative agricultural technologies are critically examined in the context of developed and developing economies. Specific topics include biodiversity and ecosystem services in agriculture, transgenic crops, biofuels, urban agriculture, and sustainable development.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|GLC-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":639, "title": "Herpetology, Lectures", "code": "BIOEE 4700", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Lectures cover various aspects of the biology of amphibians and reptiles, including evolution, zoogeography, ecology, behavior, and physiology.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":640, "title": "Herpetology, Laboratory", "code": "BIOEE 4701", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Laboratory topics include systematics, morphology, and behavior.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":641, "title": "Ecosystem Biology and Global Change", "code": "BIOEE 4780", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Examines ecosystem structure, carbon and energy flow, and nutrient cycles, and how these processes respond to environmental variations. Reviews classic ecosystem experiments, and considers\u00a0effects on ecosystems from human-driven environmental changes, such as climate change, air pollution, excess nitrogen use, and land-use change.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":642, "title": "Paleobiology", "code": "BIOEE 4790", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Surveys the major groups of invertebrate organisms and their evolutionary histories, and the theoretical and practical principles of paleontology, from biostratigraphy to macroevolution. Intended to fill out the biological backgrounds of Earth and atmospheric science students concerning the nature and significance of the fossil record for their respective studies, and the paleontological backgrounds of biology students interested in ecology and evolution.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":643, "title": "Ecological Genetics", "code": "BIOEE 4800", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Ecological Genetics focuses on the application of population genetic concepts in ecological contexts, with emphases on measuring adaptation in natural populations, detecting the effects of population demography, and determining the genetic basis of quantitative traits. Illustrative examples will be drawn from the primary research literature to demonstrate experimental techniques and methods of data analysis on single-gene, multi-locus and genome-wide scales.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":644, "title": "Special Topics in Ecology and Evolutionary Biology", "code": "BIOEE 4940", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "The department offers \"trial\" courses or seminars under this number. Offerings vary by semester. The same course is not to be offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":645, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "BIOEE 4980", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and assisting in biology courses. This experience may include supervised participation in a discussion group, assisting in a biology laboratory, assisting in field biology, or tutoring.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":646, "title": "Seminar in Ecology and Evolution of Infectious Diseases", "code": "BIOEE 6900", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Graduate-level discussion of the ecology, epidemiology, genetics, and evolution of infectious disease in animal and plant systems. Weekly discussion of research papers published in the primary scientific literature. Participation in discussion and presentation of at least one paper required for course credit.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":647, "title": "Seminar in Spatial Population Ecology", "code": "BIOEE 7570", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Examines the role of space for individuals, populations and communities in ecology. Each weekly meeting will be a discussion based on journal articles and book chapters. General topics will be individual movement, dispersal, range; observation scale, spatial synchrony; landscape ecology; habitat fragmentation: (meta) population dynamics, population genetics and evolution; species interactions and community structure; climate change, invasion, extinction and conservation.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":648, "title": "Special Topics in Evolution and Ecology", "code": "BIOEE 7600", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Independent or group-intensive study of special topics of current interest. Content varies each semester.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":649, "title": "Plant-Insect Interactions Seminar", "code": "BIOEE 7640", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Group intensive study of current research in plant-insect interactions. Topics vary from semester to semester but include chemical defense, coevolution, insect community structure, population regulation, biocontrol, tritrophic interactions, and mutualism.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":650, "title": "Ph.D. Dissertation Research", "code": "BIOEE 9990", "subject": "BIOEE", "descr": "Dissertation research conducted by a Ph.D. student in the field of ecology and evolutionary biology with advice and consultation of a major professor who is a member of the field.", "tags": "BIOEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":651, "title": "Academic Support for BIOG 1440: Physiology", "code": "BIOG 1044", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":652, "title": "Biology Scholars Program Freshman Seminar", "code": "BIOG 1200", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "This course is designed to help freshman biology majors make the transition to Cornell's science courses, give exposure to career options in research and medicine, provide opportunities to meet and network with faculty, and to facilitate students' pursuit of research on campus.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":653, "title": "Biology Seminar", "code": "BIOG 1250", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "A first-year seminar that provides an opportunity for students to participate in a small group, interactive course with a biologist. Students will develop critical thinking skills by exploring topics in the biological sciences (review at least one scientific paper). Multiple topics and sections will be offered each semester.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":654, "title": "Introductory Biology: Comparative Physiology", "code": "BIOG 1440", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "An introductory physiology course intended for freshman and sophomore biology majors and other students majoring in life sciences. The course integrates physiology from the cell to the organism with comparisons among animals, plants and microbes. Emphasis is on understanding of basic physiological concepts, stressing structure-function relationships and underlying physio-chemical mechanisms.", "tags": "BIO-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":655, "title": "Introduction to Comparative Anatomy and Physiology, Individualized Instruction", "code": "BIOG 1445", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "Designed primarily for freshman and sophomore biology majors who desire an introduction to concepts of physiology. The course focuses on the understanding of how different biological organisms (animals, plants, microbes) perform common physiological functions. The course is based on individualized instruction and offers flexibility in scheduling. Completion of the course requires mastery of a set of core units. Testing is primarily by oral examination. Students who elect to take the course must be able to meet deadlines. Four formal laboratory simulations are offered with additional laboratory simulations incorporated into the core units.", "tags": "BIO-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":656, "title": "Investigative Biology Laboratory", "code": "BIOG 1500", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "Designed for biology majors to provide lab experience with emphasis on processes of scientific investigations and to promote communication, literacy and collaboration in science. Students gain expertise in methods including instrumentation used by biologists to construct new knowledge. Lab topics include genetics, evolution, ecology, biochemistry, and molecular biology.", "tags": "BIO-AG|BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":657, "title": "Special Studies in Biology", "code": "BIOG 2000", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "Registration device for students who want to take only a portion of a regular biological sciences course-for example, only the lectures or only the laboratory in a course that includes both. Only students who have already had training equivalent to the portion of the regular course that is to be omitted may register in this manner. This course may not be\u00a0used to fulfill college distribution requirements except by permission from the Office of Undergraduate Biology.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":658, "title": "Introduction to Research Methods in Biology", "code": "BIOG 2990", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "Any Cornell faculty member whose research field is biological in nature may serve as a supervisor for this course. Non-Cornell supervisors are not acceptable.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":659, "title": "Preparing HHMI-CURT Scholars for Research", "code": "BIOG 3100", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "This course is for students in the HHMI-Cornell Research Transfer (CURT) program, and will introduce HHMI-CURT Scholars to faculty research, include scholar presentations, and serve as a forum for HHMI-CURT Scholars to discuss potential difficulties or success in labs.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":660, "title": "Independent Study in Biology", "code": "BIOG 4970", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "This course is designed for a student to study a problem or topic not covered in a regular course or undertake tutorial study of an independent nature in an area of interest in Biology, under the supervision of a faculty member in any biology department that does not have its own Independent Study course, i.e., Animal Physiology, Ecology & Evolutionary Biology, Microbiology, Molecular Biology & Genetics, Neurobiology & Behavior. The student's academic advisor must approve the course for it to be used to satisfy a Biology concentration requirement. Students must register using the CALS Special Studies form available online.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":661, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "BIOG 4980", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and assisting in biology courses. This experience may include supervised participation in a discussion group, assisting in a biology laboratory, assisting in field biology, or tutoring.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":662, "title": "Independent Undergraduate Research in Biology", "code": "BIOG 4990", "subject": "BIOG", "descr": "For students with previous undergraduate experience conducting biological research at Cornell. Students enrolled for this credit should be doing independent work on their own project. Applications available online. Research supervisors must approve by the Add Deadline, two weeks after the start of classes. Each student must submit a project description as part of the application.\u00a0Any Cornell faculty member whose research field is biological in nature may serve as supervisor for this course. Non-Cornell supervisors are not acceptable.", "tags": "BIOG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":663, "title": "Academic Support for BIOMG 1350: Cell and Developmental Biology", "code": "BIOMG 1035", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "This course reviews material presented in BIOMG 1350\u00a0and provides problem-solving strategies and additional practice with material. BIOMG 1035 support is recommended for students who want to maximize their understanding of Cell and Developmental Biology and enhance their learning skills. BIOMG 1035 is not a substitute for\u00a0BIOMG 1350.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":664, "title": "Personal Genomics and Medicine: Why Should You Care About What's in Your Genes", "code": "BIOMG 1290", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Do you have allergies to milk or wheat? Curious about your family ancestry? Does a relative suffer from a genetic disease, and you wonder if you might also be at risk? How will medicine be impacted by DNA testing? How will your own future, your quality of life, your decisions regarding children be impacted? What are the ethical, legal, and social challenges we all face as this genetic technology becomes rapidly available to anyone with as little as $99 and a saliva sample? This course is not just for those interested in science, it is a topic we all need to have a basic understanding of to ensure we are prepared for what is rapidly becoming part of all of our futures.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":665, "title": "Orientation Lectures in Molecular Biology and Genetics", "code": "BIOMG 1320", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Six professors discuss their research and promising new areas for research in the future.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":666, "title": "Introductory Biology: Cell and Developmental Biology", "code": "BIOMG 1350", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "The course introduces molecular mechanisms that underlie the organization, division, and growth of individual cells; how they organize during embryonic development to form functional tissues and organs in multicellular organisms; and how their misbehavior contributes to disease. Students seeking additional help with the material taught in BIOMG 1350 should consider the active learning supplemental class BIOMG 1035\u00a0(see course catalog for details). The learning outcomes below indicate the topics and skills that students should master upon completion of the course.", "tags": "BIO-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":667, "title": "Lectures in Genetics and Genomics", "code": "BIOMG 2800", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "General introduction to the fundamental principles of genetics in eukaryotes and bacteria. Topics include: gene transmission, linkage, recombination, structure, mutations, and manipulation, as well as analysis of genomes in individuals and populations.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":668, "title": "Laboratory in Genetics and Genomics", "code": "BIOMG 2801", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "General introduction to laboratory experimental genetics.\u00a0 Topics include gene transmission, linkage, recombination, gene structure, mutations, and manipulation.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":669, "title": "Principles of Biochemistry, Individualized Instruction", "code": "BIOMG 3300", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Thirteen units that cover protein structure and function, enzymes, basic metabolic pathways, DNA, RNA, protein synthesis, and an introduction to recombinant DNA techniques. No formal lectures, auto-tutorial format.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":670, "title": "Principles of Biochemistry: Molecular Biology", "code": "BIOMG 3320", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Comprehensive course in molecular biology that covers the structure and properties of DNA, DNA replication and repair, synthesis and processing of RNA and proteins, the regulation of gene expression, and the principles and applications of recombinant DNA technologies, genomics, and proteomics.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":671, "title": "Computer Graphics and Molecular Biology", "code": "BIOMG 3340", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Visualization of complex biomolecules using computer graphics techniques. Group presentations on current topics in molecular biology.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":672, "title": "Principles of Biochemistry: Proteins, Metabolism, and Molecular Biology", "code": "BIOMG 3350", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Comprehensive introduction to biologically important molecules and polymers. Topics include: protein structure and function, enzyme catalysis, metabolic regulatory pathways, DNA and RNA structure, DNA replication and repair, modern DNA technologies, gene expression, and protein synthesis.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":673, "title": "Advanced Genetics and Genomics", "code": "BIOMG 3800", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "An extension of BIOMG 2800 in which selected topics will be explored in greater depth. The course will not attempt to cover the breadth of Genetics and Genomics. Through readings, small class discussions, and problem solving, students will develop the background for understanding selected studies from the primary research literature, chiefly on model eukaryotic experimental organisms.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":674, "title": "Survey of Cell Biology", "code": "BIOMG 4320", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Survey of a wide array of topics focusing on the general properties of eukaryotic cells. Topics include methods used for studying cells, the structure and function of the major cellular organelles, and analyses of cellular processes such as mitosis, endocytosis, cell motility, secretion, cell-to-cell communication, gene expression, and oncogenesis. Some of the material is covered in greater depth in BIOMG 4370, BIOMG 4380, BIOMG 6360, and BIOMG 6390.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":675, "title": "Molecular Basis of Disease", "code": "BIOMG 4390", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "This course will examine how changes in the normal expression, structure, and activity of gene products caused by genetic mutations and environmental agents lead to disease in humans and other animals. The material will focus on how proteins with modified structures and biochemical activities cause alterations in normal cellular processes, as well as the physiological consequences of these changes. Topics will be selected from hormone insensitivity syndromes, gene fusions resulting in hybrid proteins, gene amplification, gene inactivation, disruption of signaling pathways, genetic variation in non-coding transcriptional regulatory elements, and the molecular actions of environmental poisons and toxins. The methods used to identify the underlying biochemical and genetic basis of diseases, as well as possible pharmaceutical and genetic therapies for treating the diseases, will be presented.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":676, "title": "Laboratory in Biochemistry and Molecular Biology", "code": "BIOMG 4400", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Students perform experiments in protein biochemistry\u00a0 and in molecular biology in an engaging laboratory environment.\u00a0 The protein biochemistry projects include protein purifications (salt fractionation, ion exchange chromatography, and affinity chromatography), protein analysis (SDS PAGE, BN PAGE, immunoblotting, mass and activity assays, and mass spectrometry), as well as a determination of enzyme kinetic parameters (Vmax, Km, and kcat).\u00a0 The molecular biology projects include nucleic acid purifications (RNA, genomic DNA, and plasmid DNA), agarose gel electrophoresis, restriction endonuclease digestion, PCR and qPCR, DNA cloning, and DNA sequence analysis.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":677, "title": "Development and Evolution", "code": "BIOMG 4610", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "This course explores the molecular and genetic pathways and mechanisms that regulate animal development, and how they are modified through evolution to result in the dazzling array of forms and functions seen in the animal kingdom.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":678, "title": "Cancer Genetics", "code": "BIOMG 4880", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "This course will focus on the fundamentals of cancer genetics and genomics. Main topics include the genes and pathways that are mutated in various cancer types, mechanisms leading to cancer mutations and cancer development, current genetic and genomic methods used to study and to diagnose cancer, and how genetics and genomics are informing cancer treatment.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":679, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "BIOMG 4980", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and assisting in biology courses. This experience may include supervised participation in a discussion group, assisting in a biology laboratory, assisting in field biology, or tutoring.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":680, "title": "Teaching Experience in Principles of Biochemistry, Indv", "code": "BIOMG 4981", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "BIOMG 4981 offers training and experience for undergraduate teaching assistants in BIOMG 3300\u00a0(Introductory Biochemistry: Individualized Instruction). Teaching assistants are required to complete a weekly written assignment, attend a weekly two-hour TA training meeting and to spend six hours per week in the Biochemistry Study Center answering student questions, grading written quizzes, and administering oral quizzes. Teaching Assistants are evaluated based on the quality of written work submitted, observations at the weekly meetings and Study Center shifts, as well as on the mid-term and end-of-semester course evaluations.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":681, "title": "Teaching Leadership in Principles of Biochemistry, Indv", "code": "BIOMG 4982", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "BIOMG 4982 gives students who have successfully served as a BIOMG 3300\u00a0Teaching Assistant (as part of BIOMG 4981) a second opportunity at teaching the class and the added privilege of assisting the course instructor in leading and mentoring the incoming teaching assistant group. In addition to the required leadership responsibilities, students in BIOMG 4982 are required to review the material on a weekly basis and to spend six hours per week in the Biochemistry Study Center. Teaching Leaders are evaluated based on observations made during their Study Center shifts, as well as on the mid-term and end-of-semester course evaluations.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":682, "title": "Stem Cells and Regeneration", "code": "BIOMG 6320", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "This course will cover basic aspects of tissue morphogenesis and homeostasis with emphasis on the biological role of embryonic and adult stem cells in development, and their possible clinical applications. The focus will be placed on mouse and human stem cells. The discussion will be structured around relevant research papers that allow more in-depth analysis of the material taught during lectures.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":683, "title": "Functional Organization of Eukaryotic Cells", "code": "BIOMG 6360", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Aims to provide an integrated view of eukaryotic cell organization as elucidated using biochemical molecular, genetic, and cell biological approaches. Major topics include the cytoskeleton, membrane traffic, and cell polarity. Together with BIOMG 4370\u00a0and BIOMG 6390, this course provides broad coverage of the cell biology subject area.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":684, "title": "The Nucleus", "code": "BIOMG 6390", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Lectures on topics of eukaryotic genomics, chromatin structure, regulation of gene expression, RNA processing, micro-RNA regulation, the structure and movement of chromosomes, long range regulatory interactions, and nuclear export and import. Covers the structure and function of the nucleus at the molecular and cell biological levels.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":685, "title": "Ethical Issues and Professional Responsibilities", "code": "BIOMG 7510", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Ethical issues in research and the professional responsibilities of scientists are discussed based on readings and occasional lectures. The topics are intended to cover the requirements for ethical training of graduate students on training grants and follow the recommendations of the Office of Research Integrity.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":686, "title": "Current Topics in Genetics and Development", "code": "BIOMG 7800", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Lectures and seminars on specialized topics in genetics, genomics and development. Topics for Fall and Spring to be announced in the course and time roster at the beginning of each semester.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":687, "title": "Research Seminar in Genetics and Development", "code": "BIOMG 7860", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Each graduate student presents one seminar per year based on his or her thesis research. The student then meets with the thesis committee members for an evaluation of the presentation.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":688, "title": "Seminar in Genetics and Development", "code": "BIOMG 7870", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Seminars in current research in genetics and developmental biology conducted by distinguished visitors and staff.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":689, "title": "Current Topics in Biochemistry, Molecular and Cell Biology", "code": "BIOMG 7940", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Lectures and seminars on specialized topics. Topics for fall and spring to be announced in the course and time roster published at the beginning of each semester.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":690, "title": "Biochemistry Seminar", "code": "BIOMG 8300", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Lectures on current research in biochemistry, presented by distinguished visitors and staff members.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":691, "title": "Advanced Biochemical Methods II", "code": "BIOMG 8320", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Research in the laboratories of two different professors chosen by the student. Arrangements are made jointly between the director of graduate studies and the research advisor.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":692, "title": "Research Seminar in Biochemistry", "code": "BIOMG 8330", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Each student presents one seminar per year on his or her thesis research and then meets with instructors and thesis committee members for evaluation.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":693, "title": "Foundations and Frontiers in Cellular and Molecular Biology \u2013 II", "code": "BIOMG 8370", "subject": "BIOMG", "descr": "Introduction to concepts, historical perspectives and outstanding questions in selected topics through weekly lectures, discussions and analysis of research literature.", "tags": "BIOMG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":694, "title": "Genesis", "code": "BIOMI 1200", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "This class will explore the current theories about the chemical origins of life on earth, and will then use these insights to discuss the search for life on other planets, inside the Solar system and outside. Topics will include origin of the Sun, the Big Bang, the formation of Earth, the origin of life, from the prebiotic synthesis of amino acids, nucleobases, and other building blocks of life, the evolution of primitive protocells, the earliest RNA-based catalysts, the evolution of protein synthesis machinery, and the origins of eukaryotic cells. We will conclude with strategies and progress in identifying life on other planets in our solar system and on planets orbiting other stars.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":695, "title": "Antibiotics: Probing the Biology of Life and Death", "code": "BIOMI 1400", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Though antibiotic resistance puts millions of lives at peril from infectious diseases each year, antibiotics and other antimicrobials have played a critical role in helping scientists understand biologicals systems better. This class examines the biology of microbial life through the lens of antibiotics and other antimicrobials. It is intended for non-life-science majors.", "tags": "BIONLS-AG|BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":696, "title": "Microbiology of Human Contagious Diseases", "code": "BIOMI 2600", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the microbiology of microbial diseases. The primary focus is on molecular mechanisms of pathogenesis, including detection of the host environment, binding of pathogenic microbes to host cell surfaces and their invasion of host cells and tissues, and the delivery and functions of microbial toxins. It will include host defenses and microbial countermeasures against these defenses. We will also study the evolution of pathogens and the co-evolution of their hosts.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":697, "title": "General Microbiology Lectures", "code": "BIOMI 2900", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Comprehensive overview of the biology of microorganisms, with emphasis on bacteria. Topics include microbial cell structure and function, physiology, metabolism, genetics, diversity, and ecology. Also covers applied aspects of microbiology such as biotechnology, the role of microorganisms in environmental processes, and medical microbiology.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":698, "title": "General Microbiology Laboratory", "code": "BIOMI 2911", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "This class will introduce you to current concepts and laboratory techniques in microbiology. Our goal is to show you how scientists use experiments to learn about the microbes around us, with an emphasis on bacteria. This course complements the Microbiology lecture by providing students with hands-on investigations into the microbial world.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":699, "title": "General Parasitology", "code": "BIOMI 3310", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the basic animal parasites, stressing systematics, taxonomy, general biology, ecological interactions, and behavior of non-medically important groups. Introduces the major animal parasite groups: protozoan, nematode, platyhelminth, acanthocephalan, annelid, and arthropod.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":700, "title": "Marine Microbes and Disease in a Changing Ocean", "code": "BIOMI 3500", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Marine microorganisms fuel globally significant elemental cycles through their activities. They also drive diseases in multicellular life through pathogenesis, modulation of host-associated microbiomes, and through induction of stressors (e.g. toxins, hypoxia). The purpose of this course is to provide junior- and senior-level students a background in biological oceanography, marine microbial ecology, biogeochemistry, and disease pathogenesis in marine habitats. The emphasis of the course is on understanding how biology affects and is affected by the oceans, and how organisms interact to produce ocean biological phenomena. The course is divided into 4 modules: 1) Marine microbial diversity and ocean structure; 2) Ocean biogeochemistry; 3) Marine disease pathogenesis; and 4) Pollution and climate change. This course will equip students with foundations for further undergraduate courses in ocean sciences and environmental dynamics, and for graduate studies in biological oceanography and marine biology.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":701, "title": "Professional Skills for Host-Microbe Interactions Research", "code": "BIOMI 3990", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "This course complements the Undergraduate Research Experience program coordinated by the Cornell Institute of Host-Microbe Interactions and Disease. The goal is to introduce students interested in research on host-microbe interactions to professional skills needed to successfully complete research projects and apply to graduate school. Course activities will address principles of the scientific method, electronic database literacy, science citation software, research ethics, science communication as well as planning for graduate study, including preparation of curriculum vitae and personal statement.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":702, "title": "Pathogenic Bacteriology", "code": "BIOMI 4040", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Course in medical microbiology, presenting the major groups of bacterial pathogens important to human and veterinary medicine. Emphasizes infection and disease pathogenesis. Topics include disease causality; interactions of host, pathogen, and environment, including immunity to bacteria; and principles of antimicrobial therapy and drug resistance. Recommended for those planning to attend medical school, graduate school, or veterinary medical school, or those just interested in how bacteria cause disease.\u00a0 A companion seminar addresses the current and classic literature related to the pathophysiology of medically important bacterial pathogens on the cellular and molecular levels.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":703, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "BIOMI 4980", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and assisting in biology courses. This experience may include supervised participation in a discussion group, assisting in a biology laboratory, assisting in field biology, or tutoring.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":704, "title": "Veterinary Perspectives on Pathogen Control in Animal Manure", "code": "BIOMI 6430", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "In-depth look at the management of pathogens in animal manures. Reviews the pathogens involved, the role of governing agencies, the survival of pathogens in the field, and methods of pathogen destruction. Discusses commercial methods of manure processing for the control of these pathogens for the protection of other animals and the human population. Concludes with class discussions with major stakeholders representing the dairy, beef, pork, and poultry industries and their understanding of the problem as it relates to veterinary students.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":705, "title": "Prokaryotic Biology: Bacterial Genetics", "code": "BIOMI 6904", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Reviews the fundamental concepts of microbial genetics including mutations and their analysis, plasmids, conjugation, transformation, transduction, transposition, recombination, repair, and mutagenesis.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":706, "title": "Prokaryotic Biology: Bacterial Pathogenesis", "code": "BIOMI 6905", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Introduction to the fundamental concepts of bacterial pathogenesis including the normal flora, pathogen entry and colonization, the production and regulation of toxins, horizontal transfer of pathogenesis determinants, and the roles of both specific and nonspecific host defenses. Examples include bacterial pathogens of both animals and plants.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":707, "title": "Prokaryotic Biology: Viral Diversity and Ecology", "code": "BIOMI 6906", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "This course is intended to give graduate students an introduction to virology in an environmental setting. As crucial components of ecosystem function in many habitats, viruses infecting bacteria (bacteriophage) and higher organisms infect and kill their hosts, mediate gene transfer, influence system biogeochemical cycling, and form important links in microbial food webs.\u00a0This course will provide an overview of viral biology and lifestyles, infection kinetics, and then provide an appreciation for different types of viruses including uncultivated viruses recovered through metagenomics.\u00a0The course will conclude with discussion of viral influence upon ecosystem processes and host communities.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":708, "title": "Advanced Topics in Microbiology", "code": "BIOMI 7910", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Reading and presentation by graduate students of current literature in selected areas of modern microbiology.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":709, "title": "Scientific Communication Skills", "code": "BIOMI 7970", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "The ability to communicate effectively is essential for success as a scientist. The primary goal of this course is to provide students with an opportunity to develop self-confidence and refine their formal oral presentation skills. Students are asked to present topical seminars that are critically evaluated by the instructor. Feedback for improving the presentation and peer evaluations are emphasized.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":710, "title": "Graduate Research Seminar in Microbiology", "code": "BIOMI 7980", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "All graduate students in the field of microbiology are required to attend and present a seminar concerning their research at least once each year.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":711, "title": "Microbiology Seminar", "code": "BIOMI 7990", "subject": "BIOMI", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "BIOMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":712, "title": "Cellular Physiology", "code": "BIOMS 3160", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "A comprehensive course covering the general characteristics of eukaryotic cells; the structure, composition, and function of subcellular organelles; and the major signal transduction pathways regulating a variety of physiological cell activities. Among the main subjects covered are absorption and transport processes, mechanism of action of signaling molecules (hormones), the cell cycle and regulation of cell proliferation, cell-cell communication, extracellular matrix, stem cells, apoptosis, and carcinogenesis.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":713, "title": "General Parasitology", "code": "BIOMS 3310", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the basic animal parasites, stressing systematics, taxonomy, general biology, ecological interactions, and behavior of non-medically important groups. Introduces the major animal parasite groups: protozoan, nematode, platyhelminth, acanthocephalan, annelid, and arthropod.", "tags": "BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":714, "title": "Pathogenic Bacteriology", "code": "BIOMS 4040", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "Course in medical microbiology, presenting the major groups of bacterial pathogens important to human and veterinary medicine. Emphasizes infection and disease pathogenesis. Topics include disease causality; interactions of host, pathogen, and environment, including immunity to bacteria; and principles of antimicrobial therapy and drug resistance. Recommended for those planning to attend medical school, graduate school, or veterinary medical school, or those just interested in how bacteria cause disease.\u00a0 A companion seminar addresses the current and classic literature related to the pathophysiology of medically important bacterial pathogens on the cellular and molecular levels.", "tags": "BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":715, "title": "Histology: The Biology of the Tissues", "code": "BIOMS 4130", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "Provides students with a basis for understanding the microscopic, fine-structural, and functional organization of vertebrates (primarily mammals), as well as methods of analytic morphology at the cell and tissue levels. Emphasizes dynamic interrelations of structure, composition, and function in cells and tissues.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":716, "title": "Principles of Pharmacology", "code": "BIOMS 4140", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "Undergraduate course surveying system- and organ-related aspects of pharmacology. Topics include mechanisms of drug action; drug disposition; pharmacokinetics; autonomic pharmacology; pharmacology of inflammation, allergy and platelet function; and endocrine, cardiovascular, respiratory, gastrointestinal, and renal pharmacology. The course is designed for undergraduate life science majors, particularly those interested in medical or veterinary school.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":717, "title": "Paleoparasitology - Very, Very Cold Cases", "code": "BIOMS 4311", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "The course will introduce students to a new world of investigation into the ancient realm of human and animal associations with their parasites. Initial discoveries were parasites in tissues of Egyptian mummies and has now expanded to include human and animal remains from around the world. Parasites have also been found in coproliths from latrines and cave habitations from the Middle Pleistocene and from dinosaurs living in the early Cretaceous. Vectors and their parasites have been found in ambers that are from the Eocene. The application of modern molecular methods has added greatly to identification of these parasites of the past and have allowed new interpretations of the various agents that people have carried with them as they have traveled around the globe.", "tags": "BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":718, "title": "Cellular and Molecular Microbial Pathogenesis: The Host Pathogen Interplay", "code": "BIOMS 4340", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "This course will integrate the immune response of the host to challenges from medically important pathogens, including viruses, parasites and bacteria, to provide a unified view of microbial pathogenesis. The lectures will integrate concepts from the disciplines of immunology, bacteriology, virology, and parasitology, to cover aspects of host cell biology and the innate and acquired immune responses of the host to infection. A range of medically relevant human and animal pathogens will be detailed, focusing on the host's response to commensalism versus disease, the mechanisms of host invasion, nutrient acquisition, and modulation of the host's immune response. The course will also discuss current disease interventions and the challenges facing antimicrobial therapy and vaccine development. This integrated and comparative view of the cellular and molecular interaction between infectious agents and the host's immune response will be a capstone of the student's exposure to infection biology.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":719, "title": "Undergraduate Supervised Teaching", "code": "BIOMS 4980", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "Students assist in teaching a course appropriate to their previous training. Students meet with a discussion or laboratory section and regularly discuss objectives with the course instructor.", "tags": "BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":720, "title": "Social Issues in Community Engagement by Cancer Scientists", "code": "BIOMS 5660", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "The goal of this intensive weekend workshop is to provide students an understanding of social issues of relevance to cancer patients. Topics to be covered\u00a0may include but are not limited to psychological and economic impacts of cancer; health disparities; cancer advocacy; clinical trial access and patient rights; and public communication of science.", "tags": "BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":721, "title": "Seminars in Stem Cell Research", "code": "BIOMS 7900", "subject": "BIOMS", "descr": "This course is organized as work-in-progress presentations by faculty, post-docs, and students participating in stem cell research. Each student in the Cornell Training Program in Stem Cell Research presents one seminar per year based on their research. The student then meets with the thesis committee members for an evaluation of the presentation.", "tags": "BIOMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":722, "title": "FWS: Special Topics in Neurobiology and Behavior", "code": "BIONB 1220", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "The First-Year Writing Seminar is about introducing concepts in neuroscience and behavior and writing extensively about them. Topics vary by section.", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":723, "title": "Neurobiology and Behavior II: Introduction to Neuroscience", "code": "BIONB 2220", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "An introduction to neuroscience: the structure and function of the nervous system of humans and other animals. Topics include the cellular and molecular basis for cell signaling, the functions of neurons in communication and in decision making; neuroanatomy, neurochemistry, sensory systems, motor systems, neural development, learning and memory, and other complex brain functions. The course will emphasize how the nervous system is built during development, how it changes with experiences during life, how it functions in normal behavior, and how it is disrupted by injury and disease. Discussion sections will include a dissection of a preserved sheep brain.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":724, "title": "Gender and the Brain", "code": "BIONB 3215", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Why are boys more likely than girls to be diagnosed with autism, and why are women more likely than men to be diagnosed with depression? Are there different \"gay\" and \"straight\" brains? And how does brain science interact with gender and sexuality in popular debate? Reading and discussing the original scientific papers and related critical texts, we will delve into the neuroscience of gender. In this course, we will delve into the neuroscience of gender difference. Reading the original scientific papers and related critical texts, we will ask whether we can find measurable physical differences in male and female brains, and what these differences might be. Do men and women solve spatial puzzles differently, as measured physiologically? Do nonhuman animals display sex-specific behaviors mediated by brain structure, and can we extrapolate these findings to human behavior? Why are boys three times more likely than girls to be diagnosed as autistic, and is there any connection between the predominantly male phenomenon of autism and other stereotypically male mental traits? Are there physical representations of sexual orientation in the brain, and how are these related to gender identity? And how are scientific studies represented and misrepresented in popular debate?", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|SCD-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":725, "title": "Biopsychology of Learning and Memory", "code": "BIONB 3280", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Surveys the approaches that have been or are currently being used in order to understand the biological bases for learning and memory. Topics include invertebrate, \"simple system\" approaches, avian song learning, hippocampal and cerebellar function, research using MRI in humans. Many of the readings are from primary literature.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":726, "title": "Chemical Ecology", "code": "BIONB 3690", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Why are chilies so spicy? This course examines the chemical basis of interactions between species and is intended for students with a basic knowledge of chemistry and biology. Focuses on the ecology and chemistry of plants, animals, and microbes. Stresses chemical signals used in diverse ecosystems, using Darwinian natural selection as a framework. Topics include: plant defenses, microbial warfare, communication in marine organisms, and human pheromones.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":727, "title": "Principles of Pharmacology", "code": "BIONB 4140", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Undergraduate course surveying system- and organ-related aspects of pharmacology. Topics include mechanisms of drug action; drug disposition; pharmacokinetics; autonomic pharmacology; pharmacology of inflammation, allergy and platelet function; and endocrine, cardiovascular, respiratory, gastrointestinal, and renal pharmacology. The course is designed for undergraduate life science majors, particularly those interested in medical or veterinary school.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":728, "title": "Topics in Neurobiology and Behavior", "code": "BIONB 4200", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Courses on selected topics in neurobiology and behavior; can include lecture and seminar courses. Topics vary by section; see Class Roster.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":729, "title": "Experimental Molecular Neurobiology", "code": "BIONB 4300", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Experiments include PCR, immunoprecipitations, western blots, RNAi, antibody staining, optogenetics, and behavioral assays. Experiments emphasize how molecular techniques can be applied to studying neurobiological problems and will culminate in designing your own experiments. Labs frequently last to 1 or 2 PM but it is possible to attend one class on Tuesday if it meets after 11 AM as the experiments have incubation steps or other breaks. But plan on returning after class to finish the experiments. A section on Thursday will be scheduled after the course begins. If you have additional questions please contact me at dld14@cornell.edu.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":730, "title": "Topics in Cognitive Science", "code": "BIONB 4330", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "A seminar series examining current and classical ideas in human sciences and the humanities.\u00a0 Themes vary from semester to semester", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":731, "title": "Neural Circuits of Motivated Behavior", "code": "BIONB 4370", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "This class examines the neural circuits of motivated behavior and reward, and involves the critical reading and discussion of classic and contemporary papers in this subject. Topics include neural processes related to reward, punishment, risk, effort, appetite, aggression, addiction, and depression.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":732, "title": "Plant Behavior and Biotic Interactions, Lecture", "code": "BIONB 4460", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "How do plants respond to antagonists, such as herbivores and pathogens? What are the checks and balances that keep mutualist organisms in their tight interactions? How are symbioses organized on molecular, metabolic and ecological levels? What are the molecular, plant hormonal, and metabolic mechanisms mediating plant biotic interactions with other organisms? What ecological and evolutionary consequences do these interactions have for the fitness of the plants and their interactors? This course provides an overview of plants' myriad interactions with antagonists and mutualists, from microbes to multicellular organisms, and explains the underlying ecological and evolutionary concepts. It gives an introduction to the study of induced plant responses in the light of a behavioral biology framework.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|SDS-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":733, "title": "Plant Behavior and Biotic Interactions, Laboratory", "code": "BIONB 4461", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Laboratory course covering topics presented in BIOEE 4460/BIONB 4460/PLSCI 4460.", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":734, "title": "Speciation: Genetics, Ecology, and Behavior", "code": "BIONB 4530", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Advanced course in evolutionary biology focusing on the pattern and process of speciation and the nature and origin of behavioral, morphological, physiological, and ecological traits that form the intrinsic barriers to gene exchange. Lecture topics include species concepts and definitions, the history of ideas about speciation, the biological basis of intrinsic barriers to gene exchange, current models for the origin of such barriers, genetic architecture of speciation, rates of speciation. Emphasis is on developing a rigorous conceptual framework for discussing speciation and on detailed analysis of a series of case histories.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":735, "title": "Principles of Neurophysiology", "code": "BIONB 4910", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Laboratory-oriented course designed to teach the concepts and tools of cellular neurophysiology through hands-on experience with extracellular and intracellular electrophysiological techniques, and computer acquisition and analysis of laboratory results. Students explore signal transmission in the nervous system by examining the cellular basis of resting and action potentials, and synaptic transmission\u00a0and optogenetic control of behavior and physiology. Lecture time is used to review nervous system physiology, introduce laboratory exercises, discuss lab results and primary research papers, and for presentation of additional experimental preparations and methods. Invertebrate preparations are used as model systems. BIONB4910 website", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":736, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "BIONB 4980", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and assisting in biology courses.\u00a0 This experience may include supervised participation in a discussion group, assisting in a biology laboratory, assisting in field biology, or tutoring.", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":737, "title": "Research Design in the Study of Animal Social Behavior", "code": "BIONB 7201", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "A weekly journal club-style discussion. Graduate students may be expected to present a summary of their research or a summary of research in the literature related to their thesis once per year.", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":738, "title": "Topics in Neural Basis of Behavior", "code": "BIONB 7202", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "A weekly journal club-style discussion. Graduate students may be expected to present a summary of their research or a summary of research in the literature related to their thesis once per year.", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":739, "title": "Plant-Insect Interactions Seminar", "code": "BIONB 7640", "subject": "BIONB", "descr": "Group intensive study of current research in plant-insect interactions. Topics vary from semester to semester but include chemical defense, coevolution, insect community structure, population regulation, biocontrol, tritrophic interactions, and mutualism.", "tags": "BIONB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":740, "title": "Physiology of Human Health and Disease", "code": "BME 2010", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Covers essentials of human physiology, with an overview of complementary mechanisms of homeostasis and disease pathogenesis. Topics presented in a modular format incorporating an overview of basic physiological mechanisms and key diseases of specific organ systems susceptible to alterations in that physiological mechanism. Topics include: filtration and renal function, electrophysiology and cardiac arrhythmia, neural transmission and muscular dystrophy, mineral balance and osteoporosis, and lipid transport and atherosclerosis. Course utilizes best pedagogical strategies including engaged learning practices, small group discussion, and lectures by clinicians working in these areas.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":741, "title": "Experiential Learning Seminar", "code": "BME 2080", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This seminar focuses on building professional skills while activating curricular content within the context of experiential learning activities. Students will pursue individual and team based exercises, with reflective discussions. Students must complete both spring and fall seminars to receive credit for the course.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":742, "title": "Biomolecular Thermodynamics", "code": "BME 2110", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This course serves as an introduction to thermodynamics and physical chemistry focused on the application to biomolecular systems. Topics include the role of entropy and free energy in determining biological reactions and processes such as enzymatic reactions or molecular interactions, protein folding/unfolding, single molecule mechanics, energy states, and equilibrium distribution of biomolecular and other systems.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":743, "title": "Biomedical Signals and Systems", "code": "BME 2310", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Fundamentals of time- and frequency-domain methods to model biomedical signals and systems, within the context of biomedical instrumentation and imaging. Examples covered include the analysis of signals from a pulse oximeter, the reconstruction of ultrasound or MRI images, and the analysis of a control system for robotic surgery. Topics that are covered include the Fourier transform, linear systems, convolution, transfer function, filtering, sampling and aliasing, signal modulation and demodulation, Laplace transforms, circuits and control.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":744, "title": "Molecular Principles of Biomedical Engineering", "code": "BME 3020", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Genomic and proteomic thinking and tools have revolutionized the way scientists study biology and medicine. We are now beginning to understand the molecular level mechanisms that underlie normal and pathologic cellular functions. As a consequence, novel molecular level approaches provide the basis for better diagnostic and therapeutic strategies to effectively treat or prevent human diseases. This course aims to present a broad overview of molecular level techniques that are relevant in many aspects of biomedical engineering. We will discuss the underlying principles, how to interpret representative data, limitations of current approaches, and engineering challenges for the development of new and improved techniques.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":745, "title": "Cellular Systems Biology", "code": "BME 3110", "subject": "BME", "descr": "The behaviors of cells are increasing appreciated to be governed by a system of regulatory pathways, which processes information often in a multivariate, dynamic and non-linear fashion. The ability to reduce this complexity to predictable models is useful for designing new cancer therapies and genetically engineering cellular \"machines\". The course will cover: (1) analysis of dynamic control processes in cell biology, from intracellular pathways to networks to multicellular systems; (2) principles of computational systems biology, including genomic, proteomic, and transcriptomic algorithms; and (3) principles of synthetic biology, including gene circuit design and modeling. Students will learn to solve problems using computationally implemented algorithms and models, involving statistical methods, differential equation systems, multivariate regression, and logic-based approaches. This course is designed for upper-level undergraduate and Master's students in the biomedical, biological and/or engineering sciences.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":746, "title": "Multiscale Biomaterial Analysis", "code": "BME 3210", "subject": "BME", "descr": "The course in advanced biomaterials leads the class through the process of material design and characterization for their development as products in the medical device or pharmaceutical fields. Student teams will apply their fundamental knowledge of chemistry and biology to open-ended design challenges focused on biomaterial mechanics, processability, biocompatibility and federal regulatory requirements. Hands-on technical work in materials characterization will be combined with key knowledge of biomaterials to give the class an integrated understanding of biomaterials design and development. Specific topics to be covered are classes of biomaterials, methods of characterization, the interface of biomaterials and biology, the foreign body response, inflammation, wound healing, biofilms, sterilization methods, FDA-approval guidelines and EU-approval guidelines.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":747, "title": "Medical and Preclinical Imaging", "code": "BME 3310", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This course teaches the fundamentals and applications of medical imaging techniques, including x-ray imaging and computed tomography, nuclear medicine, magnetic resonance imaging, ultrasound, and optical imaging. Through lecture and demonstration labs, the class provides a rigorous introduction to medical imaging, beginning with the basic physical principles of image formation on to image reconstruction and descriptions and demonstrations of the hardware used in clinical applications. Concepts covered include resolution, point-spread-functions, modulation transfer functions, signal-to-noise, multi-dimensional Fourier transformation, image filtering in spatial domain and the structure and function of the human visual system.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":748, "title": "Systems Mechanobiology", "code": "BME 3410", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This course analyzes how mechanical forces affect biological responses across biological scales, including molecular, cellular, tissue, organ, and organism level. Theoretical and empirical foundations and engineering approaches to applying, quantifying, and elucidating mechanobiological mechanisms across each scale will be presented. Applications in human health and disease pathogenesis will be emphasized.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":749, "title": "Electrical and Chemical Physiology", "code": "BME 4020", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Focuses on understanding how circulating agents and bioelectric activity comprises interorgan and central nervous system communication, and control of the human body. Additional emphasis includes examining medical devices involved in the treatment of human disease.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":750, "title": "Biomedical Engineering Design II", "code": "BME 4090", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Substantial design experience based on the knowledge and skills acquired in earlier course work combined with the fundamental design theory articulated in BME 4080.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":751, "title": "Science Policy Bootcamp: Concept to Conclusion", "code": "BME 4440", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Science Policy Bootcamp: Concept to Conclusion, is an interdisciplinary service-learning course where students will explore the trends that shape science and innovation policy, understand core science policy concepts and engage in active policymaking work. This three-credit course will comprise of a three-hour long session that will meet every week. The first hour of each session will be devoted to broadening student's perspective on science policy. The following two hours will be spent working in groups on the primary activity of the course - a science policy advocacy project that builds over the full semester. Working in small groups, students will identify a key science policy issue. Together, they will thoroughly research the issue and contact key stakeholders, formulate a detailed plan to address the issue, and unique to this course - implement their plan for solving the problem toward the end of the semester. Examples may include drafting legislation, commenting on Federal or State rulemaking procedures, launching public outreach campaigns, or raising press awareness of an issue. This aspect of the course will include both mentored work in developing the idea and advocacy plan, as well as activities to build the skills necessary to be an effective policy advocate. Examples of such activities include mock press interviews and lobbying visits. As a result of the final project - students will have the unique opportunity to address a bona fide policy issue and create a working solution.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":752, "title": "Biomechanics Laboratory", "code": "BME 4490", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This course focuses on mastering experimental techniques related to measuring the mechanical behavior of biomedical materials and biological tissues. Students will learn techniques for measuring mechanical properties of cardiovascular and musculoskeletal tissues in tension, compression, shear, and bending. Students will learn to apply non-linear models to describe the behavior of elastic, viscoelastic, poroelastic, and hyperelastic materials.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":753, "title": "Orthopaedic Tissue Mechanics", "code": "BME 4640", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Application of mechanics and materials principles to orthopaedic tissues. Physiology of bone, cartilage, ligament, and tendon and the relationship of these properties to their mechanical function. Mechanical behavior of skeletal tissues. Functional adaptation of these tissues to their mechanical environment. Tissue engineering of replacement structures.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":754, "title": "Independent Undergraduate Project in Biomedical Engineering", "code": "BME 4900", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Research or projects by an individual or a small group of undergraduates.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":755, "title": "Honors Thesis", "code": "BME 4901", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Intended for students pursuing the research honors program in BME. This course is the culmination of the program's honors project requirement. Students enrolled in the BME Honors program will prepare an honors thesis based on the subject matter of a BME 4900\u00a0project from the previous semester, under the supervision of their research mentor.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":756, "title": "Principles of Neurophysiology", "code": "BME 4910", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Laboratory-oriented course designed to teach the concepts and tools of cellular neurophysiology through hands-on experience with extracellular and intracellular electrophysiological techniques, and computer acquisition and analysis of laboratory results. Students explore signal transmission in the nervous system by examining the cellular basis of resting and action potentials, and synaptic transmission\u00a0and optogenetic control of behavior and physiology. Lecture time is used to review nervous system physiology, introduce laboratory exercises, discuss lab results and primary research papers, and for presentation of additional experimental preparations and methods. Invertebrate preparations are used as model systems. BIONB4910 website", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":757, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching in Biomedical Engineering", "code": "BME 4970", "subject": "BME", "descr": "The student assists in teaching a biomedical engineering course appropriate to their previous training. The student may meet with a discussion or laboratory section, prepare course materials, grade assignments, and regularly discuss objectives and techniques with the faculty member in charge of the course.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":758, "title": "BME MEng Professional Engagement Seminar", "code": "BME 5010", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Students must attend and report on 10 self-selected seminars to fulfill the requirements of the course.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":759, "title": "Medical Device Regulatory Affairs for Biomedical Engineers", "code": "BME 5510", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This course is designed to provide a working knowledge of Medical Device Regulatory Affairs specifically for Biomedical Engineers. It is geared for both experienced biomedical engineering professionals as well as those new to the industry and is intended for non-regulatory professionals who need a better understanding of the regulatory requirements necessary to bring medical devices to market. This course demonstrates important regulatory requirements and concepts using case study discussions of real products from a variety of clinical specialties. Strategies for using regulation as a competitive advantage will also be discussed. Instructor will be lecturing virtually (on-line) but in real-time.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":760, "title": "Computer Analysis of Biomed Images", "code": "BME 5780", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Powerful imaging modalities with attending computer image processing methods are evolving for the evaluation of health and the detection of disease. This course focuses on the quantitative analysis of such images and Computer Aided Diagnosis (CAD), i.e., the automatic identification and classification of abnormalities by the computer.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":761, "title": "Cell-Biomaterials Interactions", "code": "BME 5830", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Biological principles underlying biomaterial design and cellular adhesive behavior, incorporating biomechanical analysis across the molecular, cellular and tissue length scales. We will take an in-depth look at design considerations and biomaterials analysis, incorporating reading from the primary literature as well as the text.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":762, "title": "Preliminary Study for Design Project", "code": "BME 5910", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Design and economic evaluation of a biomedical engineering device or therapeutic strategy. Team projects are encouraged.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":763, "title": "Industrial Projects: Preliminary Study for Design Project", "code": "BME 5911", "subject": "BME", "descr": "The first of two required design courses for the biomedical engineering Master of Engineering program. Teams starting a new project will focus on the identification and ideation phases of a design process. The teams will identify and/or verify unmet healthcare need(s), roughly explore potential concepts, devise the requirements of the technology to be engineered, and implement the first interaction of a conceptual prototype.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":764, "title": "Performance of Design Project", "code": "BME 5920", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Once a proposal for the project has been approved by the Sponsor or Faculty member, the student must (\"deliver on time and under budget\") produce a tangible work product.\u00a0Scheduling activities, ordering supplies, assembling, testing the device or procedure, and documenting the work and outcomes are the key expectation for the project.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":765, "title": "Industrial Projects: Performance of Design Project", "code": "BME 5921", "subject": "BME", "descr": "This course is the execution phase of your design project. From BME 5500\u00a0and BME 5911\u00a0your team should have applied Yock's Biodesign process and devised the product requirements of the solution to be engineered during this semester. The objective of the course is the engineering of a fully functional proof-of-concept prototype (product) based on the previously defined and proposed set of requirements.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":766, "title": "Independent Design Project", "code": "BME 5930", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Graduate-level, non-thesis research or studies on special projects in biomedical engineering.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":767, "title": "Biomedical Engineering Internship", "code": "BME 5940", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Off-campus internship with industry in which a student gains knowledge and experience in the field of biomedical engineering.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":768, "title": "Discussions on Current Topics in Biomaterials", "code": "BME 6220", "subject": "BME", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":769, "title": "Modern Biomedical Microscopy", "code": "BME 6320", "subject": "BME", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":770, "title": "Mechanics of Bone", "code": "BME 6640", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Covers current methods and results in skeletal research, focusing on bone. Topics include skeletal anatomy and physiology, experimental and analytical methods for determination of skeletal behavior, mechanical behavior of bone tissue, and skeletal functional adaptation to mechanics.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":771, "title": "Biomedical Engineering Research Seminar", "code": "BME 7020", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Designed to train graduate students in public presentation of scientific data. Students in their third year and beyond are required to give an annual seminar on their research; all students are required to attend the seminars and to provide constructive feedback to others on the quality of their presentation and data.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":772, "title": "Graduate Student Teaching Experience", "code": "BME 7030", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Guided individual experience in laboratory instruction and/or lectures/recitation instruction. Provides a preparatory teaching experience for graduate students considering an academic career.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":773, "title": "Core Concepts in Disease", "code": "BME 7130", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Most diseases emerge due to a relative small number of biological effects, including mechanisms like infection, inflammation, neoplasia, genetic mutation, protein misfolding, and metabolic disregulation. Students learn about disease-state biology by focusing on these broad disease pathways. The course consists of several modules, each focused on one broad class of disease mechanism, and includes both a discussion of the underlying biology of the disease pathway as well as examples of specific diseases that involve those mechanisms. This course complements the training in fundamental normal-state biology students are already receiving by providing a mechanism-centered view of disease development.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":774, "title": "Biomedical Engineering Graduate Colloquium", "code": "BME 7900", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Research-based seminars. May meet with other seminar series as appropriate.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":775, "title": "M.S. Thesis Research", "code": "BME 8999", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Thesis research for the M.S. degree in BME.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":776, "title": "Ph.D. Thesis Research", "code": "BME 9999", "subject": "BME", "descr": "Thesis research for the Ph.D. degree in BME.", "tags": "BME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":777, "title": "Real Estate Case Competitions", "code": "BPRE 6594", "subject": "BPRE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "BPRE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":778, "title": "Ethics and the Environment", "code": "BSOC 2061", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Politicians, scientists, and citizens worldwide face many environmental issues today, but they are neither simple nor straightforward. Moreover, there are many ways to understand how we have, do, and could value the environment from animal rights and wise use to deep ecology and ecofeminism. This class acquaints students with some of the challenging moral issues that arise in the context of environmental management and policy-making, both in the past and the present. Environmental concerns also highlight important economic, epistemological, legal, political, and social issues in assessing our moral obligations to nature as well as other humans. This course examines various perspectives expressed in both contemporary and historical debates over environmental ethics by exploring four central questions: What is nature? Who counts in environmental ethics? How do we know nature? Whose nature?", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":779, "title": "Introduction to the History of Medicine", "code": "BSOC 2071", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "This course offers an introductory survey of the history of medicine (principally in Europe and the United States) from classical antiquity to the early twentieth century. Using a combination of both primary and secondary sources, students will learn about the \"Hippocratic Heritage\" of contemporary western medicine; medicine in late antiquity; faith and healing in the medieval period; medicine and knowledge in the Islamic world; medicine during the Renaissance (particularly the rise of the mechanical philosophy); medicine in the age of Enlightenment; professionalization, women-doctors and midwives, and battles over 'quackery' in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries; the role of medicine in colonialism and empire; and the promises and perils of modern medicine (dramatic decreases in mortality on the one hand, the rise of Eugenics and the importance of Medicine to the National Socialist State on the other). As well as this temporal survey, we will consider a number of ongoing themes: race, bodily difference, and medicine; medicine and the environment; women, gender, and medicine; the history of the body; the history of sexuality; and the close connections between forms of social order and forms of medical knowledge. The course meets three times a week (for two lectures and a section) and is open to all.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":780, "title": "Society and Natural Resources", "code": "BSOC 2201", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "The actions of people are crucial to environmental well-being. This course addresses the interrelationships between social phenomena and the natural (i.e., biophysical) environment. It is intended to (1) increase student awareness of these interconnections in their everyday lives; (2) introduce students to a variety of social science perspectives, including sociology, economics, psychology, and political science, that help us make sense of these connections; (3) identify the contributions of each of these perspectives to our understanding of environmental problems; and (4) discuss how natural resource management and environmental policy reflect these perspectives.", "tags": "SBA-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":781, "title": "Early Agriculture", "code": "BSOC 2211", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Throughout most of the human career, people survived by hunting and gathering wild foods. The advent of food production is one of the most profound changes in history and prehistory. This course examines the current evidence for the appearance and spread of agriculture - plant and animal domestication - around the world. We will consider definitions of agriculture and domestication, the conditions under which it arises, the consequences for those who adopt it, and why it has spread over most of the world.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":782, "title": "Literature and Medicine", "code": "BSOC 2350", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "How does literary language depict the experience of physical suffering? Can a poem or a novel palliate pain, illness, even the possibility of death? From darkly comic narratives of black plague to the rise and fall of hysteria to depictions of the AIDS crisis, this course examines literature centered on medical practices from the early modern period through the twentieth century. Why have medical practices changed, and how do writers address their political, social, and ideological implications? Readings will include a broad range of genres, including poetry (Dickinson, Whitman, Keats), fiction (McEwan, Chekhov, Gilman, Kafka, Camus), theater (Kushner), nonfiction prose (Woolf, Freud), and critical theory (Foucault, Scarry, Canguilhem, Sontag).", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":783, "title": "Medicine, Culture, and Society", "code": "BSOC 2468", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Medicine has become the language and practice through which we address a broad range of both individual and societal complaints. Interest in this medicalization of life\u00a0may be one of the reasons that medical anthropology is currently the fastest-growing subfield in anthropology. This course encourages students to examine concepts of disease, suffering, health, and well-being in their immediate experience and beyond. In the process, students will gain a working knowledge of ecological, critical, phenomenological, and applied approaches used by medical anthropologists. We will investigate what is involved in becoming a doctor, the sociality of medicines, controversies over new medical technologies, and the politics of medical knowledge. The universality of biomedicine, or hospital medicine,\u00a0will not be taken for granted, but rather we will examine the plurality generated by the various political, economic, social, and ethical demands under which biomedicine has developed in different places and at different times. In addition, biomedical healing and expertise will be viewed in relation to other kinds of healing and expertise. Our readings will address medicine in North America as well as other parts of the world. In class, our discussions will return regularly to consider the broad diversity of kinds of medicine throughout the world, as well as the specific historical and local contexts of biomedicine.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":784, "title": "Environmental History", "code": "BSOC 2581", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "This lecture course serves as an introduction to the historical study of humanity's interrelationship with the natural world. Environmental history is a quickly evolving field, taking on increasing importance as the environment itself becomes increasingly important in world affairs. During this semester, we'll examine the sometimes unexpected ways in which \"natural\" forces have shaped human history (the role of germs, for instance, in the colonization of North America); the ways in which human beings have shaped the natural world (through agriculture, urbanization, and industrialization, as well as the formation of things like wildlife preserves); and the ways in which cultural, scientific, political, and philosophical attitudes toward the environment have changed over time. This is designed as an intensely interdisciplinary course: we'll view history through the lenses of ecology, literature, art, film, law, anthropology, and geography. Our focus will be on the United States, but, just as environmental pollutants cross borders, so too will this class, especially toward the end, when we attempt to put U.S. environmental history into a geopolitical context. This course is meant to be open to all, including non-majors and first-year students.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":785, "title": "Life Sciences and Society", "code": "BSOC 3011", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Biology and biotechnology are major influences on modern life. In addition, socio-political and historical conditions have shaped biological research and its applications in medicine, agriculture, environmental science, etc. Life science research is itself a social process involving complex human dynamics, different kinds of work and an array of social and natural systems. The course aims to introduce students to critical science and technology studies (S&TS) perspectives on the knowledge and practices of life sciences. The course is designed to prepare students for more advanced courses in the Biology & Society and S&TS majors, but students who do not plan to take further courses in those subjects can get critical insight into biology's profound role in both science and society.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":786, "title": "Living in an Uncertain World: Science, Technology, and Risk", "code": "BSOC 3181", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "This course explores the history, sociology, and ethics of risk. In particular, we will focus on the complex and often ambiguous relationship between science, technology, and risk. A historical perspective shows how science and technology have generated risks while they have also played key roles in managing and solving those very risks. By examining several case studies, including 19th-century mining, the 1911 Triangle fire, nuclear science, the space shuttle disasters, asbestos litigation, Hurricane Katrina, and the contemporary financial crisis, we will consider how risk and ideas about risk have changed over time. By exploring different historical and cultural responses to risk, we will examine the sociopolitical dimensions of the definitions, perceptions, and management of risk both in the past and the present.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":787, "title": "Humans and Animals", "code": "BSOC 3230", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Human-animal relationships are often seen in utilitarian, nutritional terms, particularly in archaeology. But animals and meat have significance far beyond their economic value. This course focuses on a broad range of these non-dietary roles of animals in human societies, past and present. This includes the fundamental shift in human-animal relations associated with domestication; the varied meanings of wild and domestic animals; as well as the importance of animals as wealth, as objects of sacrifice, as totems or metaphors for humans, and as symbols in art. Meat can be used in feasting and meat sharing to create, cement, and manipulate social relationships. This course is open to students of archaeology, cultural anthropology, and other disciplines with an interest in human-animal relations.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":788, "title": "Primate Behavior and Ecology with Emphasis on African Apes", "code": "BSOC 3390", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "The course will investigate all aspects of non-human primate life. Based on the fundamentals of evolutionary theory, group and inter-individual behaviors will be presented. In addition, an understanding of group structure and breeding systems will be reached through an evaluation of ecological constraints imposed on primates in different habitats. Subjects include: primate taxonomy, diet and foraging, predation, cooperation and competition, social ontogeny, kinship, and mating strategies.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":789, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "BSOC 3751", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Projects under the direction of a Biology and Society faculty member are encouraged as part of the program of study within the student's concentration area. Applications for research projects are accepted by individual faculty members. Students may enroll for 1 to 4 credits in BSOC 3751 Independent Study with written permission of the faculty supervisor and may elect either the letter grade or the S-U option. Students may elect to do an independent study project as an alternative to, or in advance of, an honors project. Information on faculty research, scholarly activities, and undergraduate opportunities are available in the Biology and Society Office, 303 Morrill Hall. Independent study credits may not be used in completion of the major requirements.", "tags": "BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":790, "title": "Health and Environmental Justice", "code": "BSOC 4280", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Human bodies are inescapably enmeshed in our environments: human health and environmental health are inseparable. But human bodies are not equally impacted by environmental degradation and toxicity. Environmental injustice physically reproduces structures of power along lines of race, gender, global position, and wealth disparity. This upper-level seminar examines global and US case studies of environmental injustice and public health. Topics include waste flows, dump and industrial siting, environmental monitoring, and agriculture and aquaculture. We will also examine the politics of environmental health knowledge and movements for environmental justice.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":791, "title": "Advanced Topics in Clinical Ethics", "code": "BSOC 4650", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "In this advanced course, students will use their knowledge and analytical skills to explore complex value-laden issues in contemporary healthcare and health policy debate.\u00a0 Case studies and news stories will springboard discussion around topics including the changing professional-patient relationship,\u00a0medical decision-making, emerging technologies,\u00a0contemporary health concerns, evolving care-delivery systems,\u00a0and the healthcare experience of vulnerable populations.\u00a0\u00a0Discussions will emphasize contextual issues and vantage point at the individual and societal levels, as well as the interconnections between bedside ethical dilemmas and broader health system, health policy, and sociocultural/political issues.\u00a0Topics will encompass the life span from maternal-fetal to end-of-life. We will utilize speakers/field trips to enhance exposure to different voices.\u00a0 Readings will be selected from the popular press and healthcare, ethics, social science, and law literatures.", "tags": "CA-AS|ETM-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":792, "title": "Food, Agriculture, and Society", "code": "BSOC 4691", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Multidisciplinary course dealing with the social and environmental impact of food production in the United States and developing countries. Agroecosystems of various kinds are analyzed from biological, economic, and social perspectives. The impacts of traditional, conventional, and alternative agricultural technologies are critically examined in the context of developed and developing economies. Specific topics include biodiversity and ecosystem services in agriculture, transgenic crops, biofuels, urban agriculture, and sustainable development.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|GLC-AS|BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":793, "title": "Honors Project I", "code": "BSOC 4991", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Students must register for 4 credits each semester (4991-4992) for a total of 8 credits. After the first semester, students receive a letter grade of \"R\"; a letter grade for both semesters is submitted at the end of the second semester whether or not the student completes a thesis or is recommended for honors. Minimally, an honors thesis outline and bibliography should be completed during the first semester. In consultation with the advisors, the director of undergraduate studies will evaluate whether the student should continue working on an honors project. Students should note that these courses are to be taken in addition to those courses that meet the regular major requirements. If students do not complete the second semester of the honors project, they must change the first semester to independent study to clear the \"R\" and receive a grade. Otherwise, the \"R\" will remain on their record and prevent them from graduating.", "tags": "BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":794, "title": "Honors Project II", "code": "BSOC 4992", "subject": "BSOC", "descr": "Students must register for the 4 credits each semester (BSOC 4991-BSOC 4992) for a total of 8 credits. After the first semester, students receive a letter grade of \"R\"; a letter grade for both semesters is submitted at the end of the second semester whether or not the student completes a thesis or is recommended for honors. Minimally, an honors thesis outline and bibliography should be completed during the first semester. In consultation with the advisors, the director of undergraduate studies will evaluate whether the student should continue working on an honors project. Students should note that these courses are to be taken in addition to those courses that meet the regular major requirements. If students do not complete the second semester of the honors project, they must change the first semester to independent\u00a0 study to clear the \"R\" and receive a grade. Otherwise, the \"R\" will remain on their record and prevent them from graduating.", "tags": "BSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":795, "title": "Biological Statistics II", "code": "BTRY 3020", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Applies linear statistical methods to quantitative problems addressed in biological and environmental research. Methods include linear regression, inference, model assumption evaluation, the likelihood approach, matrix formulation, generalized linear models, single-factor and multifactor analysis of variance (ANOVA), and a brief foray into nonlinear modeling. Carries out applied analysis in a statistical computing environment.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":796, "title": "Probability Models and Inference", "code": "BTRY 3080", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to probability and parametric inference. Topics include: random variables, standard distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, likelihood-based estimation, sampling distributions and hypothesis testing, as well as an introduction to Bayesian methods. Some assignments may involve computation using the R programming language.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":797, "title": "Theory of Statistics", "code": "BTRY 4090", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Introduction to classical theory of parametric statistical inference that builds on the material covered in BTRY 3080. Topics include sampling distributions, principles of data reduction, likelihood, parameter estimation, hypothesis testing, interval estimation, and basic asymptotic theory.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":798, "title": "Applied Design", "code": "BTRY 4140", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "This course begins with a discussion of some general principles of experimental design. Classical designs are covered in detail, motivated by real data applications. These include completely randomized, randomized block, balanced incomplete block, split-plot, repeated measures and fractional factorial designs. If time permits rank-based nonparametric versions of the classical designs will also be covered.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":799, "title": "Statistical Computing", "code": "BTRY 4520", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "This course is designed to provide students with an introduction to statistical computing. The class will cover the basics of programming; numerical methods for optimization and linear algebra and their application to statistical estimation, generating random variables, bootstrap, jackknife and permutation methods, Markov Chain Monte Carlo methods, Bayesian inference and computing with latent variables.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":800, "title": "Quantitative Genomics and Genetics", "code": "BTRY 4830", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "A rigorous treatment of analysis techniques used to understand complex genetic systems. This course covers both the fundamentals and advances in statistical methodology used to analyze disease and agriculturally relevant and evolutionarily important phenotypes. Topics include mapping quantitative trait loci (QTLs), application of microarray and related genomic data to gene mapping, and evolutionary quantitative genetics. Analysis techniques include association mapping, interval mapping, and analysis of pedigrees for both single and multiple QTL models. Application of classical inference and Bayesian analysis approaches is covered and there is an emphasis on computational methods.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":801, "title": "Undergraduate Individual Study in Biometry and Statistics", "code": "BTRY 4970", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Consists of individual tutorial study selected by the faculty. Because topics usually change from year to year, this course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":802, "title": "Undergraduate Supervised Teaching", "code": "BTRY 4980", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Students assist in teaching a course appropriate to their previous training. Students meet with a discussion or laboratory section and regularly discuss objectives with the course instructor.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":803, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "BTRY 4990", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Permits outstanding undergraduates to carry out independent study of suitable problems under appropriate supervision. Students cannot receive both pay and credit for the same hours of work.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":804, "title": "Statistical Methods II", "code": "BTRY 6020", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Continuation of BTRY 6010. Emphasizes the use of multiple regression analysis, analysis of variance, and related techniques to analyze data in a variety of situations. Topics include an introduction to data collection techniques; least squares estimation; multiple regression; model selection techniques; detection of influential points, goodness-of-fit criteria; principles of experimental design; analysis of variance for a number of designs, including multi-way factorial, nested, and split plot designs; comparing two or more regression lines; and analysis of covariance. Emphasizes appropriate design of studies before data collection, and the appropriate application and interpretation of statistical techniques. Practical applications are implemented using a modern, widely available statistical package.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":805, "title": "Computationally Intensive Statistical Methods", "code": "BTRY 6520", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Modern statistical methods routinely used in practice for analyzing large, complex datasets require intensive computation. This course covers topics in statistical computing, including numerical optimization and finding zeros (likelihood and related techniques), random number generation and Monte Carlo methods, bootstrap and subsampling, dimension reduction, nonlinear predictive modeling and parallel computing. Programming will be done in R.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":806, "title": "Quantitative Genomics and Genetics", "code": "BTRY 6830", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "A rigorous treatment of analysis techniques used to understand complex genetic systems. This course covers both the fundamentals and advances in statistical methodology used to analyze disease and agriculturally relevant and evolutionarily important phenotypes. Topics include mapping quantitative trait loci (QTLs), application of microarray and related genomic data to gene mapping, and evolutionary quantitative genetics. Analysis techniques include association mapping, interval mapping, and analysis of pedigrees for both single and multiple QTL models. Application of classical inference and Bayesian analysis approaches is covered and there is an emphasis on computational methods.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":807, "title": "Current Topics in Population Genomics", "code": "BTRY 6890", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Graduate seminar on current topics in population genetics. Readings are chosen primarily from current scientific literature. Participation in discussion and presentation of at least one paper required for course credit.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":808, "title": "Individual Graduate Study in Biometry and Statistics", "code": "BTRY 6970", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Individual tutorial study selected by the faculty. Because topics usually change from year to year, this course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":809, "title": "Statistical and Computational Genetics", "code": "BTRY 7200", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Weekly seminar series on recent advances in computational genomics. A selection of the latest papers in the field are read and discussed. Methods are stressed, but biological results and their significance are also addressed.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":810, "title": "Topics in Quantitative Genomics", "code": "BTRY 7210", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Weekly seminar series on recent advances in quantitative genomics. A selection of the latest papers in the field is read and discussed. Methods are stressed, but biological results and their significance are also addressed.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":811, "title": "Graduate-Level Dissertation Research", "code": "BTRY 7900", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Research at the Ph.D. level.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":812, "title": "Graduate Supervised Teaching", "code": "BTRY 7980", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Students assist in teaching a course appropriate to their previous training. Students meet with a discussion section, prepare course materials, and assist in grading. Credit hours are determined in consultation with the instructor, depending on the level of teaching and the quality of work expected.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":813, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "BTRY 8900", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Research at the M.S. level.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":814, "title": "Doctoral-Level Dissertation Research", "code": "BTRY 9900", "subject": "BTRY", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "BTRY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":815, "title": "Elementary Burmese (Myanmar) II", "code": "BURM 1122", "subject": "BURM", "descr": "The skills learned in the first semester are reinforced and expanded in this course. The focus is on building up confidence in speaking and understanding spoken Burmese that you will need if you visit the country. Significant practical skills are learned along with essential information on some customs and traditions of Burmese culture. Knowledge and understanding of grammar is also an important part of the course.", "tags": "BURM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":816, "title": "Intermediate Burmese (Myanmar) II", "code": "BURM 2202", "subject": "BURM", "descr": "Continuing instruction in Burmese at the higher intermediate level with a focus on improving oral expression, reading and interpretation of written texts, and further development of listening skills using language learning materials based on authentic audio-video clips.", "tags": "BURM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":817, "title": "Advanced Burmese (Myanmar) II", "code": "BURM 3302", "subject": "BURM", "descr": "All materials used in the course are authentic Burmese stories, current event reports, radio plays, etc. The particular materials used in any given year may vary depending on the proficiency level of the students. For students who are involved in Burma/Myanmar related research, their projects may also become part of the course.", "tags": "BURM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":818, "title": "Advanced Reading in Burmese (Myanmar) II", "code": "BURM 3310", "subject": "BURM", "descr": "This course will further advance the student's reading skills. Burmese texts of advanced-level complexity will be read, analyzed, and translated to English. A certain amount of discussion in Burmese and English is also part of the course, but the primary objective is to learn to read and understand the typical texts that appear on websites about current events, cultural trends, news from around the world, as well as short literary works by contemporary authors, especially those that reflect the country's history, geography, and ethnic diversity. Heritage speakers of Burmese as well as students who are learning Burmese as a foreign language are welcome.", "tags": "BURM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":819, "title": "Introduction to China", "code": "CAPS 2212", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "Interdisciplinary introduction to Chinese culture especially designed for students not majoring in Asian Studies. Explores literature, history, religion, and art, and other aspects of China's rich and diverse heritage, from earliest times to the present.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":820, "title": "Making of an Empire in China", "code": "CAPS 2931", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "The Great Qing (1644-1911), a multi-ethnic empire that conquered China proper from the northeastern borderlands, expanded into central Asia, Mongolia, and Tibet, and consolidated the China-based empire's control over its southwestern frontiers. An heir to both Chinese and Inner Asian traditions, the Qing empire laid the foundation for the modern Chinese nation-state. In this course, students will focus on the political, legal, social, cultural, and intellectual aspects of China's long eighteenth century. Students will also locate the early modern Chinese empire in a regional and global context, examining its power influence in Korea and Southeast Asia, and its encounters and interactions with Western and Japanese imperialist powers. These encounters and interactions contributed to the domestic turmoil and foreign invasions that eventually led to the demise of China's imperial tradition. But they also gave rise to new forces that would shape the fate of modern China in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries. From Spring 2021 onward, this course fulfills the pre-1800 requirement for History Major", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":821, "title": "Transformations in Twentieth Century China", "code": "CAPS 2985", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "The twentieth century was a time of unprecedented change in China as the country's ancient imperial system collapsed and a new modern order began to emerge. This course will explore the myriad transformations that occurred during this remarkable century of revolution and renewal. Among the major changes that we will focus on are the fall of the Qing dynasty, the intellectual awakening of May Fourth, the rise of the Nationalist party-state, and key events of the Communist era, such as the Great Leap Forward and Cultural Revolution under Mao Zedong and the capitalist reforms of Deng Xiaoping. The class will encourage historical reflection on China's engagement with the modern world in order to better understand the complex reality of China today.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":822, "title": "China's Next Economy", "code": "CAPS 3049", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "This course provides students with an analytical framework to understand China's ongoing economic transformation. The courses goals include: 1) to familiarize students with different perspectives on China's economic development and future prospects; 2) to provide a close working knowledge of the evolving current situation, with a focus on internal variation within China\u2014telling different Chinese stories, not one \"China story\"\u2014and particularly emphasizing urbanization and the goal of shifting from manufacturing and export-led to services and domestic-led economy; and 3) to give students hands-on experience using Chinese economic data in the context of a brief research note. Each week will connect to current events and debates, with students writing three blog posts over the course of the semester to bring academic research and social scientific analysis to bear upon policy-relevant questions and developments.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":823, "title": "Empire of Migrants", "code": "CAPS 3395", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "The Chinese diaspora can be found in nearly every corner of the globe today. Although Chinese emigration accelerated under what came to be known as \"globalization\" in the late 20th century, in fact the global movement of Chinese people is not a new phenomenon. This course will use both internal migration and global immigration as a lens for understanding China's development, politics, and society more broadly. In focusing on the period from the\u00a0mid-19th\u00a0century to the present, we will see that the movement of Chinese people has both shaped, and been shaped by, colonialism, the global economy, and international politics.", "tags": "CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":824, "title": "Honors Thesis Tutorial I", "code": "CAPS 4010", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "Honors students conduct research to prepare a thesis on a topic of their own choosing under the direction of a faculty member.\u00a0The application must be successfully submitted and an Honors Committee formed by the end of applicant's junior year in order for the student to be an honors candidate. Permission to enroll in CAPS 4020 is contingent upon the advisor's judgment of the viability of the student's honors thesis by the end of the semester.", "tags": "CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":825, "title": "Honors Thesis Tutorial II", "code": "CAPS 4020", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "Honors students complete research and finish a thesis on a topic of their own choosing under the direction of a faculty member.", "tags": "CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":826, "title": "Making Sense of China: The Capstone Seminar", "code": "CAPS 4030", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "This course serves as a survey of major issues within Chinese politics and foreign policy and constitutes the capstone seminar for CAPS students.\u00a0\u00a0is intended to give students an opportunity to explore aspects related to Chinese politics, economics, and society that they may have touched upon in other China-focused courses at Cornell, but have not been able to examine as fully, and with the degree of care, that they would like.\u00a0\u00a0In this regard, the substance of the course will be developed through an iterative process between the instructor and the seminar participants.\u00a0\u00a0We will spend the first part of the course doing a series of recent influential readings on contemporary China and developing initial research projects.\u00a0\u00a0The second half of the class will be organized around student led presentations of research projects (accompanied by relevant academic, media, and policy readings).", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":827, "title": "The Rise of China and Change in World Politics", "code": "CAPS 4049", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "The rise of China is one of the most important and defining themes in changing world politics. This seminar course is intended for students to examine major issues and topics concerning the rise of China against the backdrop of paradigmatic change in world politics from a historical and theoretical perspective, and to engage in the academic discourse and policy debate about dynamics of China's rise and its implications for world politics, and vice versa, how evolving world politics inform and influence the process of China's rise \u2013 namely, mutual constitution of rising China and the changing world.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":828, "title": "Becoming a China Hand", "code": "CAPS 4502", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "China's prominence in the news cycle and policy discourse reflects the immense and growing tension in China's relations with the United States and other countries around the world. Substantively, there is hardly a profession or sector where what happens inside China does not touch upon or impact what happens outside China. Throughout this course, we will grapple with ongoing debates over China's rise and whether policies of engagement with China have succeeded or failed. These debates are unfolding in many different communities and idea marketplaces, across many different modes and styles of analysis and writing. Each of the reading and writing assignments are aimed at developing literacy and proficiency in three different modes of analysis and writing about China: academic, policy, and journalistic. While many courses provide introductions to different aspects of China, and many seminars examine more specialized questions at even deeper levels, there are few that directly invite students to examine and explore the different ways in which scholars and professionals have written about and come to understand China.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":829, "title": "China Imagined: The Historical and Global Origins of the Chinese Nation", "code": "CAPS 4772", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "As China, with its \"China Dream,\" rises in power on the global stage, what \"China\" means to its inhabitants and outsiders has become an issue increasingly relevant to business, international relations, and cultural exchange, and a topic that draws intensive attention from historians and social scientists. This course brings together undergraduate and graduate students who are interested in shifting meanings embedded in the concept of \"China,\" either as part of their research agenda, or as a useful lens for comparative analysis. Focus will be on how China as an Empire/ a Nation was conceptualized by different people in different periods and in different contexts, and on the reality and representation of China as political, cultural, racial, and geographical entities.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":830, "title": "China and Asian Security", "code": "CAPS 4870", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "This course focuses primarily on China's evolving role in both Asia and world politics. While China may not necessarily be the sole determinant of the type of security order that will prevail in Asia, it has a profound influence on the region and potentially on the global order as well. To gain an understanding of security issues in Asia today, the seminar attempts to come to terms with the evolving nature of China's foreign policy and national security strategies. The course then concentrates on the most influential academic work on China's foreign relations and national security policies that has been published since the end of the Cold War.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":831, "title": "CAPS Independent Study", "code": "CAPS 4999", "subject": "CAPS", "descr": "Independent study course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "CAPS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":832, "title": "Sustainable Engineering of Energy, Water, Soil, and Air Resources", "code": "CEE 1130", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Course introduces concepts and tools required for the sustainable management of energy, water, soil, and air resources in our modern society.\u00a0 Semester is organized into four modules, each concentrating on one resource area and including a case study of local or regional significance.\u00a0 Students work in teams to address sustainability problems that arise in the case studies.\u00a0 Each module also includes presentations of technical approaches used in environmental engineering analyses. Project teams will be expected to apply those methods in their case study evaluations and management proposals. Technical approaches include life cycle analysis, mass balance computations, and mathematical modeling of pollutant dynamics in the environment.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":833, "title": "AguaClara: Sustainable Water Supply Project", "code": "CEE 2550", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Student teams conduct research, build working models, design full-scale prototypes, create design algorithms, and create educational materials for technology transfer to improve drinking water quality in the Global South. For more information, see aguaclara.cee.cornell.edu.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":834, "title": "Introduction to CADD", "code": "CEE 3080", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Students learn to employ computer-aided design and drafting (CADD) to construct 2D drawings in AutoCAD and 3D rendered models in SketchUp using a variety of AutoCAD and SketchUp techniques.\u00a0 Grades are based on attendance, weekly projects, and a final project due the last week of classes.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":835, "title": "Special Topics in Civil and Environmental Engineering", "code": "CEE 3090", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Supervised study by individuals or groups of upper-division students on an undergraduate project or on specialized topics not covered in regular courses.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":836, "title": "Engineering Computation", "code": "CEE 3200", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introduction to numerical methods, computational mathematics, and probability and statistics. Development of programming and graphics proficiency with MATLAB and spreadsheets. Topics include Taylor-series approximations, numerical errors, condition numbers, operation counts, convergence, and stability, probability distributions, hypothesis testing. Included are numerical methods for solving engineering problems that entail roots of functions, simultaneous linear equations, statistics, regression, interpolation, numerical differentiation and integration, and solution of ordinary and partial differential equations, including an introduction to finite difference methods. Applications are drawn from different areas of engineering. A group project uses these methods on a realistic engineering problem.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":837, "title": "Engineering Economics and Management", "code": "CEE 3230", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introduction to engineering and business economics investment alternatives and to project management. Intended to give students a working knowledge of money management and how to make economic comparisons of alternatives involving future benefits and cost. The impact of inflation, taxation, depreciation, financial planning, economic optimization, project scheduling, and legal and regulatory issues are introduced and applied to economic investment and planning and project-management problems.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":838, "title": "Environmental Quality Engineering", "code": "CEE 3510", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introduction to engineering aspects of environmental quality control. Quality parameters, criteria, and standards for water and wastewater. Elementary analysis pertaining to the modeling of pollutant reactions in natural systems, and introduction to design of unit processes for wastewater treatment.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":839, "title": "Introduction to Transportation Engineering", "code": "CEE 3610", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introduces technological, economic, and social aspects of transportation. Emphasizes design and functioning of transportation systems and their components. Covers supply-demand interactions; system planning, design, and management; traffic flow, intersection control and network analysis; institutional and energy issues; and environmental impacts.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":840, "title": "Structural Modeling and Behavior", "code": "CEE 3710", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introduction to the structural engineering enterprise including aspects of design, loads, behavior, form, modeling, mechanics, materials, analysis, and construction/ manufacturing. Case studies involve different scales and various materials. Topics include analytical and finite-element computational modeling of structural systems, including cables, arches, trusses, beams, frames, and 2-D continua; deflections, strains, and stresses of structural members, systems, and 2-D continua by analytical and work/energy methods, with a focus on linear elastic behavior; the foundations of matrix structural analysis; and the application of finite-element software.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":841, "title": "Senior Honors Thesis", "code": "CEE 4000", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Supervised research, study, and/or project work resulting in a written report or honors thesis.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":842, "title": "Undergraduate Engineering Teaching in CEE", "code": "CEE 4010", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Methods of instruction developed through discussions with faculty and by assisting with the instruction of undergraduates under the supervision of faculty.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":843, "title": "CEE Undergraduate Research", "code": "CEE 4090", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Research in any area of civil or environmental engineering on problems under investigation by the department or of special interest to the student, provided that adequate facilities can be obtained. The student must review pertinent literature, prepare a project outline, carry out an approved plan, and submit a formal final report.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":844, "title": "Flow in Porous Media and Groundwater", "code": "CEE 4330", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "This course covers fundamentals of flow and transport in porous media and essentials of analytical and numerical methods for solving problems relevant to groundwater. Topics include (but not limited to): porous materials in the subsurface, water transport, mass and momentum conservation, infiltration, unsaturated flows. Throughout the course, we integrate common analytical and numerical methods for solving partial differential equations encountered in developing the fundamental concepts, such as separation of variables, method of characteristics and finite difference. Grades are based on individual and group assignments, a midterm, and a final project.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":845, "title": "Laboratory Research in Environmental Engineering", "code": "CEE 4530", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Laboratory investigations of reactor flow characteristics; acid rain/lake chemistry; contaminated soil-site assessment and remediation; and wastewater treatment.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":846, "title": "Environmental Engineering in an International Context III", "code": "CEE 4562", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The course connects the themes of culture, society, and water infrastructure in the context of the majority world. The goal of the course is to offer students an experiential learning opportunity, working with AguaClara partner organizations and civil society organizations in emerging markets. Students will learn about the challenges and opportunities of creating sustainable infrastructure, institutional networks, and technical backstopping for water, sanitation, and hygiene. During the spring semester students synthesize the readings and their observations to develop a clearer understanding of the challenges of cross cultural collaboration designed to make the world a better place. This is the final part of a three-course sequence.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":847, "title": "Introduction to the Behavior of Metal Structures", "code": "CEE 4740", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introductory course focused on the use of solid and structural mechanics to quantify elementary behavior of metal structures in order to enable design. The course is project focused; with the students preparing a complete and detailed design deliverable. The course considers applications from civil structures, naval architecture, and aerospace engineering.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":848, "title": "Concrete Materials and Construction", "code": "CEE 4750", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Covers the materials science, structural engineering, and construction technology involved in the materials aspects of the use of concrete. Topics include cement chemistry and physics, mix design, admixtures, engineering properties, testing of fresh and hardened concrete, and the effects of construction techniques on material behavior.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":849, "title": "Structural Dynamics and Earthquake Engineering", "code": "CEE 4780", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Covers modal analysis, numerical methods, and frequency-domain analysis. Introduction to earthquake-resistant design.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":850, "title": "Sensors for the Built and Natural Environments", "code": "CEE 4795", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Sensors are the link between the physical world and engineering decision making. This course introduces students to a wide variety of sensors with a specific focus on civil and environmental engineering applications such as material testing, structural health monitoring, traffic engineering, air and water quality monitoring, structural testing, watershed engineering, and geotechnical and subsurface energy applications. This course is intended to teach students how to implement sensors to measure physical quantities, conduct experiments, and develop monitoring tools for the natural environment and our engineered systems. Course topics include general introduction to different classes of sensors, data acquisition, signals, noise, system calibration, and uncertainty.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":851, "title": "Applied Modeling and Simulation for Renewable Energy Systems", "code": "CEE 4880", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "This course will provide an applied introduction to modeling, simulation and optimization techniques for various renewable energy systems. The course will be modular in nature. Each module will focus on a particular renewable energy application and relevant modeling/simulation tools. Some modules are independent and some will build on previous modules. The instructional format of the course will include lectures, scientific paper reviews, and some Matlab programming. Students will have an opportunity to apply new techniques to a relevant modeling project. The course will culminate with a modeling project relevant to renewable energy. Undergraduates will work in teams of 2-3 students to complete the term project.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":852, "title": "Project in Environmental and Water Resources Systems", "code": "CEE 5022", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Project-based course in the area of environmental and water resources under the guidance of a faculty member.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":853, "title": "Project in Environmental Fluid Mechanics and Hydrology", "code": "CEE 5032", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Project-based course in the area of environmental fluid mechanics and hydrology under the guidance of a faculty member.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":854, "title": "Project in Geotechnical Engineering", "code": "CEE 5042", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Design of major geotechnical engineering project. Planning and preliminary design during fall semester; final design completed in January intersession.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":855, "title": "Interdisciplinary Master of Engineering Project", "code": "CEE 5050", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Students will participate in a community-engaged, interdisciplinary Master of Engineering (M.Eng.) project to tackle pressing technological and societal challenges surrounding infrastructure, with a specific focus on energy and environmental systems. For example, in 2018/19, projects were focused on Puerto Rico post Hurricane Maria. As part of this course, you will work closely with local stakeholders to hear their perspective on prior challenges and future needs. Each subsequent year will then build upon the prior year's activity to tackle large, complex issues over multiple years. During the course, you will contribute to developing a library of monitoring tools and algorithms which will persist over time and then be applied to solve new challenges with each course iteration.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":856, "title": "Project in Environmental Engineering", "code": "CEE 5052", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Continuation of design project related to Environmental Engineering.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":857, "title": "Project in Transportation Engineering", "code": "CEE 5062", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Systems analysis of a substantial transportation service.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":858, "title": "Systems Analysis Behavior and Optimization", "code": "CEE 5252", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "This is an advanced course in the application of analytical methodologies and tools to the analysis and optimization of complex systems. On completion of this course, students should be able to use probability and statistics as a modeling and analysis tool for systems exhibiting uncertainty; be able to use algorithms and dynamic programming to model and optimize systems with a recursive structure; be able to use optimization tools to optimize complex systems and tune parameters.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":859, "title": "Energy Technologies and Subsurface Resources", "code": "CEE 5420", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "This course will discuss the scientific basis for advancing sustainable energy systems including clean fossil and renewable energy resources. Specifically, the course will draw on the fundamentals of thermodynamics, chemical kinetics and transport behavior of fluids at solid interfaces. Students will evaluate the impacts of existing and emerging energy technologies on the environment. In a given week, we will discuss the energy resource of interest and the underlying scientific principles.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":860, "title": "Sensors for the Built and Natural Environments", "code": "CEE 5795", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Sensors are the link between the physical world and engineering decision making. This course introduces students to a wide variety of sensors with a specific focus on civil and environmental engineering applications such as material testing, structural health monitoring, traffic engineering, air and water quality monitoring, structural testing, watershed engineering, and geotechnical and subsurface energy applications. This course is intended to teach students how to implement sensors to measure physical quantities, conduct experiments, and develop monitoring tools for the natural environment and our engineered systems. Course topics include general introduction to different classes of sensors, data acquisition, signals, noise, system calibration, and uncertainty.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":861, "title": "Project Management", "code": "CEE 5900", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Core graduate course in project management for people who will manage technical or engineering projects. Focuses both on the \"technical\" tools of project management (e.g., methods for planning, scheduling, and control) and the \"human\" side (e.g., forming a project team, managing performance, resolving conflicts), with somewhat greater emphasis on the latter.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":862, "title": "Engineering Management Project", "code": "CEE 5910", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "As Engineering Managers, you need to embrace both technical and business skills to tackle complex, sociotechnical challenges, while staying on top of the current pace of technological change. In this Engineering Management project course, we are bridging from your coursework to your role as an engineering manager. To get there, you will practice the tools, themes, and techniques learned in your Engineering Management coursework through the scaffolding of a large project. In CEE 5910, you will work in teams to lead and execute a project in collaboration with an industry partner. You will perform an intensive evaluation of some mixture of the technological and management aspects of a major engineering project or system, conducted with a team of students.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":863, "title": "Decision Framing and Analytics", "code": "CEE 5980", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Framework to structure the way we think about decision situations that are complicated by uncertainty, complexity, and competing objectives. Specific decision analysis concepts and tools, such as decision trees, sensitivity analysis, value of information, and utility theory. Applications to all areas of engineering and life. Includes a group project to analyze a real-world decision.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":864, "title": "Special Topics: Remote Sensing", "code": "CEE 6015", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Students may elect to undertake a project in remote sensing. The work is supervised by a professor in this subject area.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":865, "title": "Seminar: Environmental Engineering and Water Resources", "code": "CEE 6021", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Graduate students and faculty members give informal lectures on various topics related to ongoing research in environmental engineering or water resources.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":866, "title": "Special Topics in Geotechnical Engineering", "code": "CEE 6045", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Supervised study of special topics not covered in the formal courses.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":867, "title": "Special Topics in Environmental Engineering", "code": "CEE 6055", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Supervised study in special topics not covered in formal courses.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":868, "title": "Special Topics in Transportation", "code": "CEE 6065", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Advanced subject matter not covered in depth in other regular courses.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":869, "title": "Special Topics in Structural Engineering", "code": "CEE 6075", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Study of topics in structural engineering that are more specialized or different from other courses. Special topics depend on faculty and student interests.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":870, "title": "Seminar: Project Management", "code": "CEE 6091", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Weekly seminar aimed at M.Eng students, in particular in the engineering management program. Weekly speaker will come from different engineering applications and discuss insights into project management. Seminar is non-participatory.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":871, "title": "Special Topics in Engineering Management", "code": "CEE 6095", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Individually supervised study of one or more specialized topics not covered in regular courses.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":872, "title": "Remote Sensing Fundamentals", "code": "CEE 6100", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Introduction to the principles, equipment, and methods used in obtaining information about earth resources and the environment from aircraft or satellite sensors. Topics include: basic interactions of electromagnetic radiation with the earth, sensors, sensor and grounddata acquisition, data analysis and interpretation, and project design in the form of a proposal to use remote sensing for a specific application.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":873, "title": "Flow in Porous Media and Groundwater", "code": "CEE 6330", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "This course covers fundamentals of flow and transport in porous media and essentials of analytical and numerical methods for solving problems relevant to groundwater. Topics include (but not limited to): porous materials in the subsurface, water transport, mass and momentum conservation, infiltration, unsaturated flows. Throughout the course, we integrate common analytical and numerical methods for solving partial differential equations encountered in developing the fundamental concepts, such as separation of variables, method of characteristics and finite difference. Grades are based on individual and group assignments, a midterm, and a final project.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":874, "title": "Biological Processes", "code": "CEE 6570", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Theoretical and engineering aspects of biological phenomena and processes applicable to the removal of impurities from water, wastewater, and industrial wastes and to their transformation in the environment. Bioenergetics analysis, stoichiometry, biokinetic, and design of biological treatment process.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":875, "title": "Microeconometrics of Discrete Choice", "code": "CEE 6640", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Understanding individual choice behavior is critical for several disciplines that need to account for demand dynamics. Discrete choice models represent the cognitive process of economic decisions and are widely used in transportation analysis, applied economics, marketing, and urban planning. Discrete choice analysis is used to forecast demand under differing pricing and marketing strategies and to determine how much consumers are willing to pay for qualitative improvements. In transportation engineering, these models allow researchers, firms, and policy-makers to predict demand for new alternatives and infrastructure (e.g. a light rail or a new highway), to analyze the market impact of firm decisions (e.g. merger of two airline companies), to set pricing strategies (e.g. road pricing, toll definition, revenue management), to prioritize research and development decisions (e.g. ultra low emission vehicles) as well as to perform cost-benefit analyses of transportation projects (e.g. building a new bridge).", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":876, "title": "Concrete Materials and Construction", "code": "CEE 6750", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Covers the materials science, structural engineering, and construction technology involved in the materials aspects of the use of concrete. Topics include cement chemistry and physics, mix design, admixtures, engineering properties, testing of fresh and hardened concrete, and the effects of construction techniques on material behavior.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":877, "title": "Structural Dynamics and Earthquake Engineering", "code": "CEE 6780", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Covers modal analysis, numerical methods, and frequency-domain analysis. Introduces earthquake-resistant design. Students\u00a0are also required to complete an individual or group project assigned by the instructor.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":878, "title": "Applied Modeling and Simulation for Renewable Energy Systems", "code": "CEE 6880", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "This course will provide an applied introduction to modeling, simulation and optimization techniques for various renewable energy systems. The course will be modular in nature. Each module will focus on a particular renewable energy application and relevant modeling/simulation tools. Some modules are independent and some will build on previous modules. The instructional format of the course will include lectures, scientific paper reviews, and some Matlab programming. Students will have an opportunity to apply new techniques to a relevant modeling project. The course will culminate with a modeling project relevant to renewable energy. Graduate students will be required to complete the term project on an individual basis.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":879, "title": "Project Management", "code": "CEE 6910", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Core graduate course in project management for people who will manage technical or engineering projects. Focuses both on the \"technical\" tools of project management (e.g., methods for planning, scheduling, and control) and the \"human\" side (e.g., forming a project team, managing performance, resolving conflicts), with somewhat greater emphasis on the latter.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":880, "title": "Research in Structural Engineering", "code": "CEE 7070", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Pursues a branch of structural engineering beyond what is covered in regular courses. Theoretical or experimental investigation of suitable problems.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":881, "title": "Civil and Environmental Engineering Materials Project", "code": "CEE 7073", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Individual projects or reading and study assignments involving engineering materials.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":882, "title": "Advanced Structural Concrete", "code": "CEE 7740", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "Course is an extension of CEE 6730\u00a0covering design of reinforced and post-tensioned slabs, doubly-reinforced beams, slender columns, deflections, shear walls, deep beams, two-way slab systems, punching shear, and other advanced topics.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":883, "title": "Introductory Nonlinear Finite Element Analysis for Solids", "code": "CEE 7750", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The focus of this course is the development of the fundamentals of nonlinear finite element analysis for continuum solids, spanning topics from finite element formulations, functional analysis, numerical solution techniques to aspects of practical implementation. Most natural phenomena are nonlinear, so the main aim of this course is the development of an adequate framework to model nonlinear phenomena in solids and obtain approximate solutions. We will focus on several problems for solid mechanics, including material nonlinearities, geometric nonlinearities, contact mechanics, and multiphysics problems. All assignments will include coding.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":884, "title": "Thesis - Remote Sensing", "code": "CEE 8100", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":885, "title": "Thesis - Environmental and Water Resource Systems", "code": "CEE 8200", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":886, "title": "Thesis - Environmental Fluid Mechanics and Hydrology", "code": "CEE 8300", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":887, "title": "Thesis - Geotechnical Engineering", "code": "CEE 8400", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":888, "title": "Thesis - Environmental Engineering", "code": "CEE 8500", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":889, "title": "Thesis - Transportation Systems Engineering", "code": "CEE 8600", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":890, "title": "Thesis - Structural Engineering", "code": "CEE 8700", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":891, "title": "Thesis - Civil Infrastructure Systems", "code": "CEE 8800", "subject": "CEE", "descr": "The student selects a thesis research topic with the advice of the faculty member in charge and pursues it either independently or in conjunction with others working on the same topic.", "tags": "CEE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":892, "title": "Academic Support for CHEM 2080", "code": "CHEM 1008", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "CHEM 1008 reviews material presented in CHEM 2080\u00a0lectures and also provides problem-solving strategies and practice. This course is recommended for students who want to improve their chemistry problem-solving skills. CHEM 1008 is not a substitute for CHEM 2080\u00a0lectures and recitations.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":893, "title": "Academic Support for CHEM 3580", "code": "CHEM 1058", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Reviews material presented in CHEM 3580\u00a0lectures and offers practice with CHEM 3580\u00a0material. Weekly review sessions focus on the most important topics covered in lecture and office hours held throughout the week are designed to help improve performance in CHEM 3580.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":894, "title": "Introduction to Organic and Biological Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 1570", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Introduction to organic chemistry with emphasis on structure, reactivity, and mechanisms of carbon compounds relevant to the life sciences.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":895, "title": "General Chemistry II", "code": "CHEM 2080", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Covers fundamental chemical principles, including reaction kinetics, thermodynamics, and equilibrium. These principles are presented quantitatively and explored in the laboratory. Considerable attention is given to the quantitative calculations and techniques important for further work in chemistry.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":896, "title": "Engineering General Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 2090", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Covers basic chemical concepts, such as reactivity and bonding of molecules,\u00a0introductory quantum mechanics, and intermolecular forces in liquids and solids and\u00a0gases. Attention will be focused on aspects and applications of chemistry most pertinent to engineering.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":897, "title": "Honors General and Inorganic Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 2150", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Intensive systematic study of the laws and concepts of chemistry, with considerable emphasis on quantitative aspects. CHEM 2150 covers electronic structure of atoms, chemical bonding, thermodynamics, kinetics, and equilibrium. 2150 serves as an accelerated entry into organic chemistry in the Spring semester for students with a strong background in chemistry. Laboratory work covers qualitative and quantitative analysis, thermodynamics, kinetics transition metal chemistry, and spectroscopic techniques.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":898, "title": "Introduction to Experimental Organic Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 2510", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Introduction to the synthesis, separation, characterization, and handling of materials, including the applications of different types of chromatography, extraction, crystallization, infrared spectroscopy, polarimetry, and others. An experiment is performed the first week of lab and to prepare for this lab students need to enroll in the course Canvas site and complete the appropriate pre-lab assignments outlined on that site before coming to the first lab.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":899, "title": "Introductory Physical Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 2880", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "This course covers the application of physical chemistry to biological systems, including spectroscopy, photochemistry, statistical mechanics, phenomena in condensed phases, electron transfer, and transport.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":900, "title": "Introductory Physical Chemistry Laboratory", "code": "CHEM 2900", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Survey of the methods basic to the experimental study of physical chemistry, with a focus on the areas of kinetics, equilibrium, calorimetry, and molecular spectroscopy.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":901, "title": "Honors Experimental Chemistry I", "code": "CHEM 3010", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Introduction to the techniques of synthetic organic chemistry. A representative selection of the most important classes of organic reactions is explored in the first half of the semester, augmented by lectures on the reaction chemistry and the theory of separation and characterization techniques.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":902, "title": "Honors Experimental Chemistry III", "code": "CHEM 3030", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Introduction to experimental physical chemistry, including topics in spectroscopy and kinetics. The analysis and numerical simulation of experimental data is stressed.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|SDS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":903, "title": "Organic Chemistry for the Life Sciences", "code": "CHEM 3580", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Study of the important classes of carbon compounds-including those encountered in the biological sciences. The course emphasizes their three-dimensional structures, mechanisms of their characteristic reactions, their synthesis, methods of identifying them, and their role in modern science and technology.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":904, "title": "Honors Organic Chemistry I", "code": "CHEM 3590", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "The course provides an intensive introduction to organic chemistry as a solid foundation for subsequent study in the fields of chemical, biological, materials and physical sciences. Students will learn a set of important tools and concepts that will enable appreciation and powerful application of modern organic chemistry.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":905, "title": "Honors Physical Chemistry II", "code": "CHEM 3900", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "CHEM 3900 is a continuation of CHEM 3890\u00a0and discusses the thermodynamic behavior of macroscopic systems in the context of quantum and statistical mechanics. After an introduction to the behavior of ensembles of quantum mechanical particles, the laws of thermodynamics, concepts of equilibrium, and\u00a0chemical kinetics are covered in detail.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":906, "title": "Inorganic Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 4100", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Discussion of chemical bonding and reactivity with an emphasis on the transition metals. A \"ground up\" approach will be taken, building bonding models from atomic electronic structure to molecular orbital theory. Course will also introduce concepts germane to solid state chemistry, bioinorganic chemistry, and organometallic catalysis.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":907, "title": "Introduction to Inorganic Chemistry Research", "code": "CHEM 4210", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Research in inorganic chemistry involving both laboratory and library work, planned in consultation with a faculty member.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":908, "title": "Introduction to Analytical Chemistry Research", "code": "CHEM 4330", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Research in analytical chemistry involving both laboratory and library work, planned in consultation with a faculty member.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":909, "title": "Introduction to Organic Chemistry Research", "code": "CHEM 4610", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Research in organic chemistry involving both laboratory and library work, planned in consultation with a faculty member.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":910, "title": "Introduction to Physical Chemistry Research", "code": "CHEM 4770", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Research in physical chemistry involving both laboratory and library work, planned in consultation with a faculty member.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":911, "title": "Computational Methods in Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 4810", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "This course provides a broad overview of modern computational methods in Chemistry. Topics covered will include investigating the statistical mechanics of\u00a0condensed phase chemical systems using Monte Carlo and\u00a0Molecular Dynamics, quantum mechanical characterization of molecular energetics and structure\u00a0using Electronic Structure Theory (Hartree Fock, Perturbation Theory, and Density Functional Theory), and time-dependent approaches to investigate chemical reaction dynamics and kinetics.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":912, "title": "Honors Seminar", "code": "CHEM 4980", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "In the Chemistry Honors Seminar students will present their research in written and oral form. The Seminar will also include a broader discussion of professional issues and life skills in the world of chemistry.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":913, "title": "Chemical Facilities Boot Camp", "code": "CHEM 5110", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Discussion of and demonstration of facilities relevant to modern chemical research.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":914, "title": "Capstone Research Project", "code": "CHEM 5120", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Supervision of Capstone Research Project.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":915, "title": "Computational Methods in Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 5810", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "This course provides a broad overview of modern computational methods in Chemistry. Topics covered will include investigating the statistical mechanics of\u00a0condensed phase chemical systems using Monte Carlo and\u00a0Molecular Dynamics, quantum mechanical characterization of molecular energetics and structure\u00a0using Electronic Structure Theory (Hartree Fock, Perturbation Theory, and Density Functional Theory), and time-dependent approaches to investigate chemical reaction dynamics and kinetics.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":916, "title": "Solid State Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 6070", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "This course is aimed at the broad community of chemists and engineers interested in the synthesis, structure, characterization, and application of extended solids. We will focus on the unique challenges and opportunities in materials chemistry, starting with the construction (how do we make it?) and characterization (how do we know?) of organic, hybrid, and inorganic materials. We will then explore\u00a0the relationship between a material's properties and its potential applications (what can we use it for?). Special topics including porous materials, metal-organic frameworks, conductivity, and defects.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":917, "title": "Advanced Inorganic Chemistry I: Organometallic Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 6080", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":918, "title": "Advanced Analytical Chemistry I", "code": "CHEM 6250", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Application of high-resolution NMR spectroscopy and mass spectroscopy in metabolomics, chemical biology, synthetic organic chemistry, inorganic chemistry, and polymer chemistry problems. Some practical experience in NMR and MS is offered.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":919, "title": "Electrochemistry", "code": "CHEM 6290", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Fundamentals and applications of electrochemistry. Topics include the fundamentals of electrode kinetics, electron transfer theory, the electrical double layer, diffusion, and other modes of transport. A broad range of electrochemical methods, techniques and instrumentation will also be covered.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":920, "title": "Synthetic Organic Chemistry", "code": "CHEM 6660", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Modern techniques of organic synthesis; applications of organic reaction mechanisms and retrosynthetic analysis to the problems encountered in rational multistep synthesis, with particular emphasis on modern developments in synthesis design.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":921, "title": "Structural Methods in Biochemistry", "code": "CHEM 7880", "subject": "CHEM", "descr": "Lectures cover the fundamentals of X-ray crystallography, X-ray scattering, and electron microscopy with a practical emphasis on methods for investigating the three-dimensional structures of macromolecules. Topics include the physics of scattering and imaging; sample preparation; data collection and processing; and structure determination, refinement, validation, and interpretation.", "tags": "CHEM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":922, "title": "Career Perspectives", "code": "CHEME 3010", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Weekly presentations by visiting chemical and biomolecular engineers to describe career paths and current professions. Job overviews and day-to-day details. Lessons learned from experiences.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":923, "title": "Fluid Mechanics", "code": "CHEME 3230", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Fundamentals of fluid mechanics. Macroscopic and microscopic balances. Applications to problems involving viscous flow.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":924, "title": "Analysis of Separation Processes", "code": "CHEME 3320", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Analysis and design of chemical separation processes involving phase equilibria and mass transfer. Topics include: continuous and batch processing; counter-current and co-current flow patterns; tray columns and packed columns for distillation, gas absorption/stripping, and liquid-liquid extraction; batch separation by selective adsorption on solids; continuous separation by selective permeation through membranes; and choosing among separation options.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":925, "title": "Applied Process Control", "code": "CHEME 3700", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Applying control theory to heavy industrial process in energy, chemical processing, water treatment and food processing. Use of state of the art measurement, control equipment and software tools. Documentation of process control systems, sizing, applying and selecting appropriate measurement devices for common process variables. Study of industrial process units employed for design measurement and control systems that are robust and provide a high degree of safety. Commissioning and tuning an integrated pilot-scale chemical plant.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":926, "title": "Introduction to Process Dynamics and Control", "code": "CHEME 3720", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Modeling and analysis of the dynamics of chemical processes, Laplace transforms, block diagrams, feedback control systems, and stability analysis.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":927, "title": "Chemical Kinetics and Reactor Design", "code": "CHEME 3900", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Study of chemical reaction kinetics and principles of reactor design for chemical processes.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":928, "title": "Molecular Principles of Biomedical Engineering", "code": "CHEME 4020", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Genomic and proteomic thinking and tools have revolutionized the way scientists study biology and medicine. We are now beginning to understand the molecular level mechanisms that underlie normal and pathologic cellular functions. As a consequence, novel molecular level approaches provide the basis for better diagnostic and therapeutic strategies to effectively treat or prevent human diseases. This course aims to present a broad overview of molecular level techniques that are relevant in many aspects of biomedical engineering. We will discuss the underlying principles, how to interpret representative data, limitations of current approaches, and engineering challenges for the development of new and improved techniques.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":929, "title": "Chemical Engineering Design", "code": "CHEME 4620", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Students prepare a full-scale feasibility study of a chemical process including product supply and demand forecasts, development of mass and energy balances and a process flow sheet sufficient for estimating the capital and operating costs of the process facilities. Students also define all off plot support facilities and estimate the capital and operating costs of those facilities as well. This information is used to develop an economic analysis of the facilities and to provide an ultimate recommendation as to the viability of the project.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":930, "title": "Lean Operations Design and Process Optimization", "code": "CHEME 4710", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "An introduction into Lean base process design and operations management based on the Toyota Production System model (Lean). A deeper dive into the specific focus points of effective and clear process design, effective problem solving along with managerial expectations will be investigated and discussed. Tools/principles such as process mapping, data collection and analysis, gap analysis, cycle time content and balance, lead-time assessment and management, quality performance analysis and remediation, sustainable control measures, demand/takt time analysis and relation to demonstrated equipment/process capacity, process stability assessment, six sigma will be covered in detail. These tools will drive towards effective observation and analysis of process performance so that relevant and impactful process improvements related to cycle time, quality, lead time, and cost can be achieved. Content of delivery is supported through business case analyses and class discussion/debate by the students along with hands-on team activities throughout the semester in order to link theory with some level of practical outcomes. Industrial examples will also be linked to the theory throughout the class as case studies or videos. Guest speakers may be included where possible to link theory with practice.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":931, "title": "Undergraduate Projects in Chemical Engineering", "code": "CHEME 4900", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Research or studies on special problems in chemical engineering.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":932, "title": "Design and Testing of the Chemical Engineering Car", "code": "CHEME 4980", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Research, design, and construct a small chemical-powered model car. Participate in team-oriented hands-on construction of a car powered with a chemical energy source that will carry a specified load a given distance and stop. The AIChE Student Chapter enters it in the AIChE Regional Conference to qualify and compete in the organization's national conference competition.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":933, "title": "International Research Internship", "code": "CHEME 4998", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Research or studies on special problems in chemical engineering for visiting international students.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":934, "title": "Hydrocarbon Resources", "code": "CHEME 5207", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "The discovery and development of petroleum resources and their subsequent transformation to transportation fuels. Topics include exploration and drilling techniques, reservoir engineering, conversion of well fluid to transportable crude oil and gas, extraction of natural gas liquids, and petroleum refining. Various processing scenarios for different crude oils will be modeled by refinery software.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":935, "title": "Advanced Principles of Biomolecular Engineering", "code": "CHEME 5440", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "This course will cover the physical principles required for understanding the molecular basis of life and its use in biotechnologies. Emphasis will be placed on deconstructing biological phenomena from a quantitative perspective of core engineering principles. Specific topics will include:\u00a0 thermodynamics and kinetics of gene expression and genetic circuitry, biophysical principles of molecular interaction, molecular mechanisms in the definition of cell state and differentiation, molecular modes of cellular communication, and biophysical considerations for multicellular life.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":936, "title": "Design Project", "code": "CHEME 5650", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Design study and economic evaluation of a chemical processing facility, alternative methods of manufacture, raw-material preparation, food processing, waste disposal, or some other aspect of chemical processing.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":937, "title": "Applied Process Control", "code": "CHEME 5700", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "An applied course in control technology for heavy industrial processes in energy, chemical processing, water treatment and food processing suitable for use in training graduate students in proper design, fabrication and commissioning techniques for controls in laboratory and pilot plant control experiments. Fundamental treatment of low voltage electrical circuit design as applied in industrial control and power systems, with multiple hands-on electrical controls laboratory exercises. Process safety assessment using HAZOP methods, and design of control devices and loops to assure process safety. Use of state of the art measurement, control equipment and software tools. Documentation of process control systems, sizing, applying and selecting appropriate measurement devices for common process variables. Study of industrial process units employed for design measurement and control systems that are robust and provide a high degree of safety. Commissioning and tuning an integrated pilot-scale chemical plant.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":938, "title": "Introduction to Electronic Materials", "code": "CHEME 5862", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Examines the electrical and optical properties of materials. Topics include: the mechanism of electrical conduction in metals, semiconductors and insulators, tuning of electrical properties in semiconductors, charge transport across metal/semiconductor and semiconductor/semiconductor junctions, the interaction of materials with light, semiconductor electronic devices, and the materials science of device fabrication. Applications in microelectronics, solar cells, electronics, and display technologies are discussed. Students will complete and present a review of a current issues in semiconductor device evolution.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":939, "title": "Energy Seminar II", "code": "CHEME 5880", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Energy resources, their conversion to electricity or mechanical work, and the environmental consequences of the energy cycle are discussed by faculty members from several departments in the university and by outside experts. Topics include energy resources and economics; coal-based electricity generation; nuclear reactors; solar power; energy conservation by users; and air pollution control.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":940, "title": "Medical and Industrial Biotechnology Seminar", "code": "CHEME 5990", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Students attend seminars of their selection and write one-page summaries. Eligible seminars include all listings that are related to medical and industrial biotechnology.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":941, "title": "Special Projects in Chemical Engineering", "code": "CHEME 5999", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Nonthesis research or studies on special problems in chemical engineering.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":942, "title": "Polymeric Materials", "code": "CHEME 6400", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Covers chemistry and physics of the formation and characterization of polymers; principles of fabrication.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":943, "title": "Solar Energy Module", "code": "CHEME 6662", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Energy technology module of CHEME 6660\u00a0provides a comprehensive overview of solar energy conversion technologies. Major themes range from fundamental (nuts and bolts) solid-state concepts and operating principles of photovoltaics to manufacturing of cells and modules, balance of system aspects, and perspectives on second- and third-generation photovoltaic technologies. The module also summarizes solar thermal power technologies including passive and active solar heating, concentrated solar power plants.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":944, "title": "Geothermal Energy Module", "code": "CHEME 6663", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Energy technology module of\u00a0CHEME 6660\u00a0focuses on the utilization of low-temperature geothermal energy: geothermal heat pumps, district heating systems for heating and cooling, hybrid geothermal systems and cogeneration applications. It also discusses shallow and deep geothermal reservoir thermal modeling. Technical economic and environmental aspects of large scale geothermal deployment will be covered.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":945, "title": "Quantum Computing and Artificial Intelligence", "code": "CHEME 6860", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Introduces the current status of quantum computing and its applications for artificial intelligence. Topics include Qubit states, entanglement, quantum circuits, Ising model, basics of quantum algorithms, adiabatic quantum computing and quantum annealing, noisy intermediate scale quantum (NISQ) computing, quantum optimization, quantum machine learning and quantum neural network. Learn how to access and use quantum computing resources, set up optimization and machine/deep learning problems to be solved with quantum computing, and develop quantum algorithms for artificial intelligence applications.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":946, "title": "Industrial Big Data Analytics and Machine Learning", "code": "CHEME 6880", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "This course covers the basic concepts, models and algorithms of Bayesian learning, classification, regression, dimension reduction, clustering, density estimation, artificial neural networks, deep learning, and reinforcement learning. Application and methodology topics include process monitoring, fault diagnosis, preventive maintenance, root cause analysis, soft sensing, quality control, machine learning for process optimization, data-driven decision making under uncertainty, missing data imputation, data de-noising, and anomaly/outlier detection.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":947, "title": "Chemical Kinetics and Transport", "code": "CHEME 7130", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Topics include microscopic and macroscopic viewpoints; connections between phenomenological chemical kinetics and molecular reaction dynamics; reaction cross sections, potential energy surfaces, and dynamics of biomolecular collisions; molecular beam scattering; transition state theory. Unimolecular reaction dynamics; complex chemically reacting systems: reactor stability, multiple steady states, oscillations, and bifurcation; reactions in heterogeneous media; and free-radical mechanisms in combustion and pyrolysis.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":948, "title": "Principles of Molecular Simulation", "code": "CHEME 7740", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "Introduction to molecular simulation methods, Molecular Dynamics and Monte Carlo. Understanding options for interatomic and intermolecular modeling and appropriate representation of materials.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":949, "title": "Advanced Principles of Biomolecular Engineering", "code": "CHEME 7770", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "This course will cover the physical principles required for understanding the molecular basis of life and its use in biotechnologies. Emphasis will be placed on deconstructing biological phenomena from a quantitative perspective of core engineering principles. Specific topics will include:\u00a0 thermodynamics and kinetics of gene expression and genetic circuitry, biophysical principles of molecular interaction, molecular mechanisms in the definition of cell state and differentiation, molecular modes of cellular communication, and biophysical considerations for multicellular life.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":950, "title": "Chemical Engineering Seminar", "code": "CHEME 7900", "subject": "CHEME", "descr": "General chemical engineering seminar.", "tags": "CHEME", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":951, "title": "Beginning Mandarin II", "code": "CHIN 1102", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "For beginners only, providing a thorough grounding in conversational and reading skills. Students with any previous background or training in the language will need to take the Mandarin Placement Test to determine which Chinese course will best suit their needs.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":952, "title": "Beginning Chinese Reading and Writing for Students of Chinese Heritage II", "code": "CHIN 1110", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "Continuation of CHIN 1109. Intended primarily for students whose family language is Mandarin but have had little or no formal training. The focus is on characters, reading comprehension, composition, grammar, standard pronunciation, cultural aspects, and current events in the Chinese speaking community.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":953, "title": "Beginning Mandarin for Professional Students II", "code": "CHIN 1122", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "A continuation of  \u00a0CHIN 1121. This course helps students develop basic skills in Mandarin Chinese, at a moderate pace. For complete beginners only.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":954, "title": "Beginning Mandarin for Professional Students IV", "code": "CHIN 1124", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "A continuation of\u00a0\u00a0CHIN 1123\u00a0. This course helps students develop basic skills in Mandarin Chinese, at a moderate pace. For non-heritage learners only.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":955, "title": "Intermediate Mandarin II", "code": "CHIN 2202", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "Continuing instruction in written and spoken Chinese with particular emphasis on consolidating basic conversational skills and improving reading confidence and ability.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":956, "title": "Intermediate Chinese Reading and Writing for Students of Chinese Heritage II", "code": "CHIN 2210", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "If your long-time goal is to move past the intermediate Chinese learning plateau and gain ability to participate fully in the Chinese-speaking world, this course will be the next great step you need to take.\u00a0 This course uses authentic articles from the Chinese version of New York Times and focuses on how to read effectively and write clearly through 1) learning both semi-formal and formal vocabulary, modern idiomatic expressions, advanced sentence structures and the major features that characterize the advanced Chinese; 2) exploring together with your classmates the different aspects of Chinese culture or events that interest\u00a0you by listening to the Chinese version of TED talk; 3) completing a book or a magazine in Chinese as the group project that documents student learning that takes place during the semester.\u00a0 This course helps students further solidify the foundation for their Chinese study for the next level which is advanced level as well as enhance their awareness and overall competence for cross-cultural communications.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":957, "title": "High Intermediate Mandarin II", "code": "CHIN 3302", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "Continuing instruction in spoken and written Chinese Mandarin via authentic multimedia materials.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":958, "title": "Mandarin Foreign Language Across the Curriculum (FLAC)", "code": "CHIN 3316", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "This 1-credit optional course aims to expand the students' vocabulary, and advance their speaking and reading skills as well as enhance their knowledge and deepen their cultural understanding by attaching to non-language courses throughout the University.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":959, "title": "High Intermediate Mandarin II: CAPS in Beijing", "code": "CHIN 3352", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "Equivalent to CHIN 3302. Continuing instruction in spoken Chinese and in various genres and styles of written Chinese.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":960, "title": "Advanced Mandarin II", "code": "CHIN 4412", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "Reading, discussion, and composition at advanced levels.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":961, "title": "High Advanced Mandarin II: CAPS in Beijing", "code": "CHIN 4454", "subject": "CHIN", "descr": "This course is designed for students who have satisfactorily finished CHIN 4427\u00a0or the equivalent.\u00a0 The focus of the course is on formal Chinese, and the main aim of this course is to help students achieve an advanced level of Chinese performance, so that they may combine Chinese with their work in their majors.\u00a0 The course material will be formal Chinese writings by native speakers, mostly for native speakers, related to students' majors and fields of interest.\u00a0 In addition, classical Chinese will also be introduced through readngs as a means to enhance students' understanding of the language.", "tags": "CHIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":962, "title": "Introduction to Classical Chinese II", "code": "CHLIT 2214", "subject": "CHLIT", "descr": "Students read from early Classical Chinese texts and learn to use advanced sources for solving textual problems.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|CHLIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":963, "title": "Directed Study", "code": "CHLIT 4422", "subject": "CHLIT", "descr": "Students choose a faculty member to oversee this independent study. The student and the faculty member work together to develop course content.", "tags": "CHLIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":964, "title": "Advanced Directed Reading", "code": "CHLIT 6622", "subject": "CHLIT", "descr": "Students choose a faculty member to oversee this independent study. The student and the faculty member work together to develop class readings.", "tags": "CHLIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":965, "title": "Elementary Sanskrit II", "code": "CLASS 1332", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "An introduction to the essentials of Sanskrit grammar. Designed to enable the student to read classical and epic Sanskrit as soon as possible.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":966, "title": "FWS: Greek Myth", "code": "CLASS 1531", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This course will focus on the stories about the gods and heroes of the Greeks as they appear in ancient literature and art. We will examine the relationship between myths and the cultural, religious, and political conditions of the society in which they took shape. Beginning with theories of myth and proceeding to the analysis of individual stories and cycles, the\u00a0material will serve as a vehicle for improving your written communication skills. Assignments include preparatory writing and essays focusing on readings and discussions in class.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":967, "title": "English Words: Histories and Mysteries", "code": "CLASS 1699", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Where do the words we use come from? This course examines the history and structure of the English vocabulary from its distant Indo-European roots to the latest in technical jargon and slang. Topics include formal and semantic change, taboo and euphemism, borrowing, new words from old, \"learned\" English loans from Greek and Latin, slang, and society.", "tags": "HA-AS|ETM-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":968, "title": "Archaeology-Great Discoveries", "code": "CLASS 1702", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This introductory course surveys the archaeology of the ancient Greek and Roman Mediterranean. Each week, we will explore a different archaeological discovery that transformed scholars' understanding of the ancient world. From early excavations at sites such as Pompeii and Troy, to modern field projects across the Mediterranean, we will discover the rich cultures of ancient Greece and Rome while also exploring the history, methods, and major intellectual goals of archaeology.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":969, "title": "Intermediate Sanskrit II", "code": "CLASS 2352", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Readings from Sanskrit dramas and literary commentary.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":970, "title": "Drinking through the Ages: Intoxicating Beverages in Near Eastern and World History", "code": "CLASS 2630", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This course examines the production and exchange of wine, beer, coffee and tea, and the social and ideological dynamics involved in their consumption. We start in ancient Egypt and Mesopotamia, and end with tea and coffee in the Arab and Ottoman worlds. Archaeological and textual evidence will be used throughout to show the centrality of drinking in daily, ritual and political life.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":971, "title": "Introduction to Christian History", "code": "CLASS 2636", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the history of Christianity from the first century through the seventeenth and perhaps a bit beyond. Our emphasis will be on the diversity of Christian traditions, beliefs, and practices throughout history. We will explore the origins of Christianity within the eastern Mediterranean world, the spread of Christianity, the development of ecclesiastical institutions, the rise and establishment of monasticism, and the various controversies that occupied the church throughout its history. Throughout the course, we will supplement our reading of primary texts with art, archaeology, music, and manuscripts.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":972, "title": "War and Peace in Greece and Rome", "code": "CLASS 2680", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "In ancient Greece and Rome, government did little besides wage war and raise taxes, culture focused on war, warriors gloried in battle, and civilians tried to get out of the way. This course surveys the impact of war and the rarity of peace in the ancient world. Topics include: \"why war?\"; the face of battle; leadership; strategy, operations, and tactics; women and war; intelligence and information-gathering; diplomacy and peacemaking; militarism; war and slavery; the archaeology of warfare. Readings in translation include selections from Homer, Herodotus, Thucydides, Xenophon, Caesar, Livy, Tacitus, Josephus, and Ammianus Marcellinus. (pre-1800/non-US)", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":973, "title": "Introduction to Military History", "code": "CLASS 2687", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "An introduction to basic themes of military history, e.g., battle, strategy, tactics, war and society, as well as classic works, e.g. Sun Tzu, Thucydides, Clausewitz, Jomini.\u00a0 Recent theories in scholarship will also be emphasized.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":974, "title": "Cleopatra's Egypt: Tradition and Transformation", "code": "CLASS 2688", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Following the conquests of Alexander, the ancient civilization of Egypt came under Greek rule. This period is best known for its famous queen Cleopatra, the last independent ruler of ancient Egypt. But even before Cleopatra's life and death, the Egypt that she governed was a fascinating place \u2013 and a rich case study in cultural interactions under ancient imperialism. This course explores life in Egypt under Greek rule, during the three centuries known as the Ptolemaic period (named after Cleopatra's family, the Ptolemaic dynasty). We will examine the history and culture of Ptolemaic Egypt, an empire at the crossroads of Africa, the Near East, and the Mediterranean. We will explore the experiences of both Egyptians and Greeks living in this multi-cultural, multi-ethnic, and multi-linguistic society. Finally, we will investigate the ways that Ptolemaic Egypt can shed light on modern experiences of imperialism, colonialism, and globalization.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":975, "title": "The Ancient Economy", "code": "CLASS 2712", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Ancient economies were very different to our modern economy: there were no banks, transport and communication were difficult, and the discipline of economics did not yet exist. Yet there are also striking similarities between the ancient and modern economic worlds: many people liked luxuries, production was increasingly standardized, and buyers and sellers came together on market days. This course introduces the key characteristics of ancient economies, with a focus on ancient Rome but also looking at classical Athens and further afield. It is structured around themes such as trade and exchange, craft, consumption, and money. Its aim is to probe the nature of the ancient economy, both for students interested in the ancient world and for students keen to put the modern economy in historical perspective.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SSC-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":976, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "CLASS 2812", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":977, "title": "Independent Study in Sanskrit, Undergraduate Level", "code": "CLASS 3391", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "To be taken only in exceptional circumstances. Must be arranged by the student with his or her advisor and the faculty member who has agreed to direct the study. To be approved by the DUS.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":978, "title": "Advanced Sanskrit II", "code": "CLASS 3396", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Selected readings in Sanskrit literary and philosophical texts.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":979, "title": "Plato", "code": "CLASS 3669", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "We will study several of Plato's major dialogues, including the Apology, the Meno, Phaedo, and Republic. Topics include knowledge and reality; morality and happiness; and the nature of the soul.", "tags": "KCM-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":980, "title": "Independent Study in Classical Civilization, Undergraduate Level", "code": "CLASS 3686", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "May be taken upon completion of one semester of work at the 3000-level. To be taken only in exceptional circumstances. Must be arranged by the student with his or her advisor and the faculty member who has agreed to direct the study. To be approved by the DUS.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":981, "title": "Identity in the Ancient World", "code": "CLASS 3738", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Have you ever been asked 'who are you' or 'which group do you belong to'? You would have noted how the answer shifts according to who is asking, in which context, etc. While everyone is unique, the possible replies in any one situation are largely defined at the level of society. What is less often realized, however, is that identity shows in particular in ways of doing: what and how one eats; what one wears and when; how one moves in a space. Archaeology is in a unique position to investigate these questions, and the Greek and Roman worlds offer a fruitful test ground, both because of their varied evidence, and because of their peculiar echoing in the modern world and its manifold identities. This course will address current theories about identity and its formation, discuss the various facets of identity (e.g. gender, citizenship, ethnicity) in the Greek and Roman worlds, and introduce tools for studying identity in the past.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":982, "title": "Greco-Roman Art from Alexander to Augustus (c.350 BC - AD 20)", "code": "CLASS 3741", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This course explores the visual arts of the Mediterranean region from the court of Alexander the Great to the principate of Augustus, the first Roman emperor. During the first half of the semester we will explore the civic, domestic and religious uses of sculpture, painting, architecture, and other media in major settlements of the Hellenistic world such as Alexandria, Pergamon and Rhodes, focusing on the third to first centuries BCE. In the second half of the semester, we will turn to the rise of the Roman empire and the relationship between native Italian artistic traditions and those of the Hellenized Mediterranean, as Republican Rome drew influences (and booty) from its conquered territories. Throughout the course we will examine visual images alongside relevant literary and archaeological material, emphasizing the role of the visual arts within broader aesthetic, intellectual and political trends.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":983, "title": "Introduction to Dendrochronology", "code": "CLASS 3750", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Introduction and training in dendrochronology (tree-ring dating) and its applications in archaeology, art history, climate and environment through lab work and participation in ongoing research projects using ancient to modern wood samples from around the world. Supervised reading and laboratory/project work. Possibilities exists for summer fieldwork in the Mediterranean, Mexico, and New York State.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":984, "title": "Gnosticism and Early Christianity", "code": "CLASS 4636", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "What is \"Gnosticism\" and why has it come to be so hotly debated among scholars and in our contemporary media? What is the Gospel of Judas and are its ideas \"heretical\"? Who wrote the Gospel of Thomas and the Gospel of Mary and why were these Gospels not included in the New Testament canon? To what extent did Dan Brown's The Da Vinci Code draw from ancient Christian gnostic sources? This seminar will explore answers to these questions and many others by focusing on the complex array of literary sources from late antiquity-primarily from a cache of manuscripts found at Nag Hammadi, Egypt, in 1945-that have long been associated with a so-called \"Christian Gnosticism\". Church Fathers condemned the \"movement\" on a variety of grounds, but in this course we will not simply read the condemnations written by the opponents of gnostic thought; rather, we will focus our attention on reading (in English translation) substantial portions of the \"gnostic\" texts written by the adherents themselves. We will give special attention to the ways in which conflicts about Gnosticism connected with conflicts about gender, heresy, power, and authority. To set these texts within a socio-historical context, we will discuss the possible Jewish and hellenistic roots of early Christian Gnosticism and ties to Stoic and other ancient philosophical movements.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":985, "title": "Classicism and Contemporary Art", "code": "CLASS 4716", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This course will explore how contemporary artists and designers borrow, replicate, challenge, play with, and subvert the arts of Greco-Roman antiquity. We will survey the influence of classical multiples \u2013 from bronze series and plaster casts to digital imaging and 3-D printing; the use of classical objects in critiques of art-world institutions, especially by female photographers such as Louise Lawler and Sara VanDerBeek; subversions of classical monumentality by Black artists such as Kehinde Wiley and Kara Walker; and the influence of classicism upon constructions of European heritage in contemporary fashion and interior design. As a form of \"critical reception studies\", this course also examines the complex political legacy of classicism and the role it plays in contemporary discussions of race, from debates over the \"whiteness\" of classical sculpture to the relationship between state power and monumentality.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":986, "title": "Honors: Senior Essay I", "code": "CLASS 4721", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "See \"Honors\" under Classics front matter.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":987, "title": "Honors: Senior Essay II", "code": "CLASS 4722", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "See \"Honors\" under Classics front matter.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":988, "title": "Sardis, A City at the Crossroads", "code": "CLASS 4755", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Situated at the crossroads between the Mediterranean in the West and the Anatolian plateau in the East, Sardis successively belonged to the Lydian, Persian, Seleucid, Roman, and Byzantine empires. An urban center from at least the 7th century BCE onwards, the city developed a very particular fabric of peoples and traditions over the long time of its existence. The seminar follows the history of the site and the changing relationship of city and hinterland from the bronze age to the Byzantine period, focusing on its major civic, religious, military and funerary monuments. Debates in heritage and a critical analysis of the site's exploration and excavation in modern times, including the first expedition organized by Princeton University and the current Harvard-Cornell led excavations, form an integral part of the class. The seminar includes excursions to the Metropolitan Museum in New York and the Sardis Archive at Harvard University.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":989, "title": "Archaeological Dendrochronology", "code": "CLASS 6755", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "An introduction to the field of Dendrochronology and associated topics with an emphasis on their applications in the field of archaeology and related heritage-buildings fields. Course aimed at graduate level with a focus on critique of scholarship in the field and work on a project as part of the course.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":990, "title": "Constructing Antiquity: The World the Slaves Made", "code": "CLASS 6855", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Scholars of slavery have typically considered five historical contexts to be \"slave societies\". Two of those are the principal societies of what is called \"classical antiquity\": democratic Athens (c. 500-300 BCE) and imperial Rome (c. 200 BCE-500 CE). In a slave society, slavery permeates every aspect of life, economy, and culture. This course examines the contrast between the representation of enslaved people in different genres and media and the reality of how enslaved people were exploited to construct the society that underpinned this cultural imagination. Topics will include: physical and skilled labor, literary and artistic production, sex work, actors, and gladiators. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanites website.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":991, "title": "Religion, Emotion, and Imagination", "code": "CLASS 6856", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "We tend to think of emotions as private, unlearned, and biological. Though in much of antiquity, the emotions were primarily seen as public, performative, and cognitive. The cultivation and control of emotions were key concerns in ancient education, moral formation, gender roles, and ritual life in Mediterranean antiquity. This seminar focuses on Greco-Roman and Christian efforts to describe, direct, mix, and control the emotions in late antique moral philosophy and religious instruction. Following an introduction to ancient Greek, Roman, and Jewish writings on the emotions, we shall turn our attention to ancient Christian efforts to foster, adapt, and redescribe emotions. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":992, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "CLASS 6857", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":993, "title": "Graduate TA Training", "code": "CLASS 7345", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Pedagogical instruction and course coordination. Requirement for all graduate student teachers of LATIN 1201-LATIN 1202\u00a0and first-year writing seminars.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":994, "title": "Classicism and Contemporary Art", "code": "CLASS 7716", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "This course will explore how contemporary artists and designers borrow, replicate, challenge, play with, and subvert the arts of Greco-Roman antiquity. We will survey the influence of classical multiples \u2013 from bronze series and plaster casts to digital imaging and 3-D printing; the use of classical objects in critiques of art-world institutions, especially by female photographers such as Louise Lawler and Sara VanDerBeek; subversions of classical monumentality by Black artists such as Kehinde Wiley and Kara Walker; and the influence of classicism upon constructions of European heritage in contemporary fashion and interior design. As a form of \"critical reception studies\", this course also examines the complex political legacy of classicism and the role it plays in contemporary discussions of race, from debates over the \"whiteness\" of classical sculpture to the relationship between state power and monumentality.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":995, "title": "Sardis, A City at the Crossroads", "code": "CLASS 7755", "subject": "CLASS", "descr": "Situated at the crossroads between the Mediterranean in the West and the Anatolian plateau in the East, Sardis successively belonged to the Lydian, Persian, Seleucid, Roman, and Byzantine empires. An urban center from at least the 7th century BCE onwards, the city developed a very particular fabric of peoples and traditions over the long time of its existence. The seminar follows the history of the site and the changing relationship of city and hinterland from the bronze age to the Byzantine period, focusing on its major civic, religious, military and funerary monuments. Debates in heritage and a critical analysis of the site's exploration and excavation in modern times, including the first expedition organized by Princeton University and the current Harvard-Cornell led excavations, form an integral part of the class. The seminar includes excursions to the Metropolitan Museum in New York and the Sardis Archive at Harvard University.", "tags": "CLASS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":996, "title": "Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "COGST 1101", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the science of the mind.\u00a0 Everyone knows what it's like to think and perceive, but this subjective experience provides little insight into how minds emerge from physical intities like brains.\u00a0 To address this issue, cognitive science integrates work from at least five disciplines: Psychology, Neuroscience, Computer Science, Linguistics, and Philosophy.\u00a0 This course introduces students to the insights these disciplines offer into the workings of the mind by exploring visual perception, attention, memory, learning, problem solving, language, and consciousness.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":997, "title": "WIM: Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "COGST 1104", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "This section is highly recommended for students who are interested in learning about the topics covered in the main course through writing and discussion.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":998, "title": "Music on the Brain", "code": "COGST 1212", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "This course is for anyone who listens to music or plays music and wonders what's happening in your brain that makes you feel the way you do. Starting with the music each of you knows and loves\u2014the soundtrack to your life\u2014we'll tackle questions like: What is the relationship between speech and music? Do animals have music, too? How does the brain process aspects of music, including rhythm, melody, harmony, and form? Why does some music trigger an emotional response? What does it mean to say that music is an embodied behavioral act? What is the relationship between music and memory? Through lectures, discussions, experiments, compositions, recording technologies, student presentations/performances and writing assignments we'll explore how/why you've chosen the particular tunes on the soundtrack of your life, and how your brain processes musical thoughts and experiences.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":999, "title": "Psychology of Language", "code": "COGST 2150", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Provides an introduction to the psychology of language. The purpose of the course is to introduce students to the scientific study of psycholinguistic phenomena. Covers a broad range of topics from psycholinguistics, including the origin of language, the different components of language (phonology, morphology, syntax, and semantics), processes involved in reading, computational modeling of language processes, the acquisition of language (both under normal and special circumstances), and the brain bases of language.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1000, "title": "Introduction to Deductive Logic", "code": "COGST 2310", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Covers sentential languages, the truth-functional connectives, and their logic; first-order languages, the quantifiers \"every\" and \"some,\" and their logic.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1001, "title": "Minds and Machines", "code": "COGST 2621", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Throughout history, metaphors drawn from technology of the time have been proposed to understand how the mind works. While Locke likened the newborn's mind to a blank slate, Freud compared the mind to hydraulic and electro-magnetic systems. More recently, many have endorsed Turing's proposal that the mind is a computer. Why is this idea attractive and what exactly is a computer? Is it at all plausible that the cells of your brain are computing? Could a computer ever really have a mind, beliefs, emotions and conscious experiences? What are these mysterious things anyway? Could a machine ever count as a person and make choices based on its own free will? Is it really so clear that we have this kind of free will?", "tags": "KCM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1002, "title": "Computational Psychology", "code": "COGST 3140", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "This course states and motivates the observation that cognition is fundamentally a computational process and explores the implications of this idea. Students are introduced to a variety of conceptual tools for thinking about cognitive information processing, including statistical learning from experience and the use of patterns distilled from past experience in guiding future actions. They learn to apply these tools to gain understanding of perception, memory, motor control, language, action planning, problem solving, decision making, reasoning, intelligence, and creativity.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1003, "title": "Neurochemistry of Human Behavior", "code": "COGST 3250", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "This course will focus on the complex interactions between neurochemicals and their receptors (pharmacodynamics) that drive human behavior. It will provide an overview of the principles of neurotransmission of chemicals as well as how alterations in their normal function can manifest in pathological behavior/mind processes.", "tags": "BIO-AS|SSC-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1004, "title": "Deductive Logic", "code": "COGST 3310", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "A mathematical study of the formal languages of standard first-order propositional and predicate logic, including their syntax, semantics, and deductive systems. The basic apparatus of model theory will be presented. Various formal results will be established, most importantly soundness and completeness.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1005, "title": "Human Perception: Application to Computer Graphics, Art, and Visual Display", "code": "COGST 3420", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Our present technology allows us to transmit and display information through a variety of media. To make the most of these media channels, it is important to consider the limitations and abilities of the human observer. The course considers a number of applied aspects of human perception with an emphasis on the display of visual information. Topics include \"three-dimensional\" display systems, color theory, spatial and temporal limitations of the visual systems, attempts at subliminal communication, and \"visual\" effects in film and television.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1006, "title": "Computational Linguistics", "code": "COGST 4240", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Computational models of natural languages. Topics include tree syntax and treebank databases; broad-coverage probabilistic grammars; finite state generative phonology; computational semantics; computational minimalist grammar; finite state optimality-theoretic phonology; Hidden Markov models of acoustic realization; text and speech corpora; lab methods in Unix/Linux environment.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1007, "title": "Topics in Cognitive Science", "code": "COGST 4310", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "A seminar series examining current and classical ideas in human sciences and the humanities.\u00a0 Themes vary from semester to semester", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1008, "title": "Current Topics in Cognitive Development", "code": "COGST 4340", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Discussion of current research in the area of cognitive development.", "tags": "ETM-AS|SSC-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1009, "title": "Pragmatics", "code": "COGST 4425", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "What is the relationship between what words mean and how they are used? What is part of the grammar and what is a result of general reasoning? Pragmatics is often thought of as the study of how meaning depends on the context of utterance. However, it can be difficult to draw a line between pragmatics and semantics.\u00a0In this course, we will investigate various topics that walk this line, including varieties of linguistic inference (including entailment, presupposition, and implicature), anaphora, indexicals, and speech acts.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1010, "title": "Topics in Philosophy of Mind", "code": "COGST 4625", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Advanced discussion of a topic in Philosophy of Mind.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1011, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Cognitive Science", "code": "COGST 4700", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Experience in planning, conducting, and reporting independent laboratory, field, and/or library research in an interdisciplinary area relevant to Cognitive Science.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1012, "title": "Cognitive Science Research Workshop", "code": "COGST 4710", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Provides a research workshop in which undergraduate students who are engaged in research in a particular area relevant to cognitive science can meet across disciplines to learn and practice the essentials of research using interdisciplinary approaches. In this workshop, students critique and discuss the existing literature in a field of inquiry, individual students present their research designs, methods, and results from their independent research studies, debate the interpretation of their research results, and participate in the generation of new research hypotheses and designs, in a peer group of other undergraduate students involved in related research.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1013, "title": "Research Methods in Psychology", "code": "COGST 4910", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Research methods are the tools that allow psychologists to test the validity of hypotheses. This course provides a survey of the methods used by scientists in personality and social psychology as well as related behavioral sciences to empirically test hypotheses. Specifically, this course will discuss the following topics: (1) philosophy of science; (2) research designs and methods; (3) data collection, analysis, and validity; (4) report writing; and (5) recurrent and emerging trends and issues in the field of research methods and quantitative analysis. The final project consists of writing a research proposal and giving a short oral presentation.", "tags": "SDS-AS|COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1014, "title": "Cognitive Science Proseminar", "code": "COGST 6101", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "This course surveys the study of how the mind/brain works, drawing primarily from six disciplines: philosophy, psychology, developmental science, neuroscience, linguistics, and computer science.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1015, "title": "Human Perception: Applications to Computer Graphics, Art, and Visual Display", "code": "COGST 6420", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Our present technology allows us to transmit and display information through a variety of media. To make the most of these media channels, it is important to consider the limitations and abilities of the human observer. The course considers a number of applied aspects of human perception with an emphasis on the display of visual information. Topics include \"three-dimensional\" display systems, color theory, spatial and temporal limitations of the visual systems, attempts at subliminal communication, and \"visual\" effects in film and television.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1016, "title": "Pragmatics", "code": "COGST 6425", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "What is the relationship between what words mean and how they are used?\u00a0 What is part of the grammar and what is a result of general reasoning?\u00a0 Pragmatics is often thought of as the study of how meaning depends on the context of utterance.\u00a0 However, it can be difficult to draw a line between pragmatics and semantics.\u00a0 In this course, we will investigate various topics that walk this line, including varieties of linguistic inference including entailment, presupposition, and implicature), anaphora, indexicals, and speech acts.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1017, "title": "Topics in Philosophy of Mind", "code": "COGST 6620", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Advanced discussion of a topic in Philosophy of Mind.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1018, "title": "Research Methods in Psychology", "code": "COGST 6910", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Research methods are the tools that allow psychologists to test the validity of hypotheses. This course provides a survey of the methods used by scientists in personality and social psychology as well as related behavioral sciences to empirically test hypotheses. Specifically, this course will discuss the following topics: (1) philosophy of science; (2) research designs and methods; (3) data collection, analysis, and validity; (4) report writing; and (5) recurrent and emerging trends and issues in the field of research methods and quantitative analysis. The final project consists of writing a research proposal and giving a short oral presentation.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1019, "title": "Developmental Psychology", "code": "COGST 7090", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "One of four introductory courses in cognition and perception. A comprehensive introduction to current thinking and research in developmental psychology that approaches problems from both psychobiological and cognitive perspectives. We will use a comparative approach to assess principles of development change. The course focuses on the development of perception, action, cognition, language, and social understanding in infancy and early childhood.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1020, "title": "Computational Seminar", "code": "COGST 7710", "subject": "COGST", "descr": "Addresses current theoretical and empirical issues in computational linguistics.", "tags": "COGST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1021, "title": "College Scholar Seminar", "code": "COLLS 2001", "subject": "COLLS", "descr": "The seminar is an interdisciplinary research methods course that will teach College Scholar students methods for finding, evaluating, using, and presenting both qualitative and quantitative data. In addition to learning specific techniques, we will examine disciplinary differences in the way fields define subjects, design arguments, and ascertain truth. We will also develop skills for presenting complex ideas in written research proposals and oral presentations.", "tags": "COLLS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1022, "title": "Independent Study - Senior Project", "code": "COLLS 3970", "subject": "COLLS", "descr": "Topic and credit hours as arranged between faculty and student. A copy of the proposal must be sent to the College Scholar Program at\u00a0as_csp@cornell.edu.", "tags": "COLLS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1023, "title": "Honors Research I", "code": "COLLS 4990", "subject": "COLLS", "descr": "COLLS 4990 is the first part of the year-long thesis course in the College Scholar Program. Students submit their completed proposals to as_csp@cornell.edu and to their honors thesis committee by the add deadline in their penultimate semester. COLLS 4990 is added to the students' schedules once the thesis proposed has been approved.", "tags": "COLLS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1024, "title": "Honors Research II", "code": "COLLS 4991", "subject": "COLLS", "descr": "COLLS 4991 is the second part of the year-long honors thesis course in the College Scholar Program. All students enrolled in COLLS 4991 present their findings at an event in the spring (exact dates TBD).", "tags": "COLLS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1025, "title": "FWS: Books with Big Ideas", "code": "COML 1105", "subject": "COML", "descr": "What do Frankenstein and Things Fall Apart have in common? What lies behind the fantastical stories of Aladdin? Do we have to like Garcia M\u00e1rquez and Shakespeare? These texts and authors re-imagine the human experience at its most intriguing level. In this course, we will discuss human rights, intimacy, joy, isolation, and other controversies at the heart of these books. Throughout the semester, students will learn how to articulate an informed and nuanced position on these issues via formal practices in analytical readings, drafting, peer review, and self-editing. Actual selection of readings may vary depending on the instructor's focus.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1026, "title": "FWS: Robots", "code": "COML 1106", "subject": "COML", "descr": "In 2015, Japan's SoftBank Robotics Corporation announced the world's first robot with feelings. Many people were excited, many more disturbed. If robots are simply, as the dictionary suggests, machines \"designed to function in the place of a living agent,\" then what is so disturbing about them? Since robots are designed to replace human labor (first economic, and now also emotional), do they represent a threat as much as they do an aid? What happens when robots exceed their purpose, and become more humanlike? How do robots read, write, and feel? How do the activities of coding and writing, or decoding and reading differ? Students will be equipped with the vocabulary and writing strategies to rigorously analyze, compare, and debate the meaning of robots in the human imagination from different epochs, countries, languages, and media. In doing so, they will write in a variety of registers about works such as the play R.U.R. by Karel \u010capek, who invented the term \"robot\". Other materials may include philosophical texts, fiction, videogames, films, graphic novels, and hip-hop concept albums.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1027, "title": "FWS: A Taste of Russian Literature", "code": "COML 1119", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Explore the culinary tradition and culture of Russia in broad historical, geopolitical and socioeconomic context through the lens of Russian folklore, short stories of Gogol, Chekhov, and Bulgakov, works of contemporary Russian-American writers, visual art, and international film. The literary journey will take you from the lavish tables of the XVIII century aristocracy, to the hardship and austerity of GULAG prison, to the colorful and savory regional fare of the former Russian Empire and Soviet Union, to the fridge and pantry staples in the everyday life of Russian family. Your writing assignments will help you develop critical thinking and argumentative skills, precision and clarity of expression, ability to write with discipline, creativity, and sense of style.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1028, "title": "FWS: Reading Poetry", "code": "COML 1134", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Poems are puzzles, or are they plants? In this class, you'll learn to read\u00a0with\u00a0poetry as a fellow writer. You'll respond to key questions like \"How does this poem work?\" or \"Why do I like it?\" Poems are often thought of as infinite in the possibilities of perception and wonder they produce. Together we will grapple with the paradox of writing about poetry in a closed, concise form without domesticating it, by investigating how reading poetry can teach us how to write anew. How are lines and stanzas related to sentences and paragraphs? Can ideas \"rhyme?\" Are notions such as deixis, voice, metaphor, apostrophe, prosody, and the \"lyric I\" essential to producing a cogent and truthful argument in any discipline? In addition to poems and essays by poets, this course may include relevant literary theory, scientific texts, musical works, and extracts from novels or films.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1029, "title": "Introduction to Visual Studies", "code": "COML 2000", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to modes of vision and the historical impact of visual images, visual structures, and visual space on culture, communication, and politics. It examines all aspects of culture that communicate through visual means, including 20th-century visual technologies\u2014photography, cinema, video, etc., and their historical corollaries. The production and consumption of images, objects, and events is studied in diverse cultures. Students develop the critical skills necessary to appreciate how the approaches that define visual studies complicate traditional models of defining and analyzing art objects.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ETM-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1030, "title": "Contemporary Narratives by Latina Writers", "code": "COML 2032", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course will provide an introduction to some of the most important fictional work by US Latina writers, including short stories, novel, and film, with a particular focus on social justice, gender advocacy work, and work by Afro Latinx writers.\u00a0 We will begin with discussion of canonical figures like Gloria Anzald\u00faa and Cherr\u00ede Moraga, to provide a basis for our focus on more recent writers like Angie Cruz, Elizabeth Acevedo, Linda Yvette Ch\u00e1vez, and Carmen Maria Machado.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1031, "title": "Black Holes: Race and the Cosmos", "code": "COML 2034", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Conventional wisdom would have it that the \"black\" in black holes has nothing to do with race. Surely there can be no connection between the cosmos and the idea of racial blackness. Can there? Contemporary Black Studies theorists, artists, fiction writers implicitly and explicitly posit just such a connection. Theorists use astronomy concepts like \"black holes\" and \"event horizons\" to interpret the history of race in creative ways, while artists and musicians conjure blackness through cosmological themes and images. Co-taught by professors in Comparative Literature and Astronomy, this course will introduce students to the fundamentals of astronomy concepts through readings in Black Studies. Texts may include works by theorists like Michelle Wright and Denise Ferreira da Silva, authors like Octavia Butler and Nalo Hopkinson, music by Sun Ra, Outkast and Janelle Mon\u00e1e. Astronomy concepts will include the electromagnetic spectrum, stellar evolution, and general relativity.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PHS-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1032, "title": "Literature and the Elements of Nature", "code": "COML 2036", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Literature has long been understood as a window into the human condition, with nature serving as its mere backdrop. How would our relationship with literature change if we reversed this hierarchy? In an age when human activity has irreversibly transformed all four elements of nature -- air, water, earth, and fire \u2013 how do we rediscover the active role that the elements have always played in the constitution of the literary imagination? Through a journey with texts from six continents, this course offers a new model of world literature, one predicated not on social actors and cultural forces alone but on the configurations, flows, and disruptions of the elements. In the process, it addresses the place and work of literature in an increasingly threatened planet.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1033, "title": "Introduction to Poetry", "code": "COML 2050", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Could a meter have a meaning?\u00a0 Could there be a reason for a rhyme?\u00a0 And what is lost and gained in translation?\u00a0 We'll think about these and other questions in this introduction to poetry.\u00a0 We'll see how poems are put together and we'll learn how to figure them out.\u00a0 Poets may include Herbert, Hardy, Hopkins, Housman, Dickinson, Frost, W. C. Williams, Gw. Brooks, Heine, Pushkin, Lermontov, Akhmatova.\u00a0 All reading is in English; we'll make use of non-English originals when possible.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1034, "title": "Reading for the End of Time", "code": "COML 2271", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course will explore how in the body of world literature humans have construed, narrated, imagined the end of time and of the world and sometimes its new beginning.\u00a0 Spanning from ancient epic and origin myths through nineteenth century novels and colonial narratives to contemporary science fiction, we will inquire, through our reading: what is a world?\u00a0 How does the labor of the imagination construct a world or the world and deconstruct or undo worlds?\u00a0 Readings will range widely across time and world space (with authors such as Hesiod, Balzac, Marquez, Murakami, Alexievich, Bacigalupi) and will include attention to contemporary theories of world literature.", "tags": "LA-AS|GLC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1035, "title": "Imagining the Holocaust", "code": "COML 2580", "subject": "COML", "descr": "How is the memory of the Holocaust kept alive by means of the literary and visual imagination? Within the historical context of the Holocaust and how and why it occurred, we shall examine major and widely read Holocaust narratives that have shaped the way we understand and respond to the Holocaust. We also study ethical and psychological issues about how and why people behave in dire circumstances. We shall begin with first-person reminiscences\u2014Wiesel's Night, Levi's Survival at Auschwitz, and The Diary of Anne Frank\u2014before turning to realistic fictions such as Kineally's Schindler's List (and Spielberg's film), Kertesz's Fateless, Kosinski's The Painted Bird, and Ozick's \"The Shawl.\" We shall also read the mythopoeic vision of Schwarz-Bart's The Last of the Just, the illuminating distortions of Epstein's King of the Jews, the Kafkaesque parable of Appelfeld's Badenheim 1939, and the fantastic cartoons of Spiegelman's Maus books.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1036, "title": "Thinking Media", "code": "COML 2703", "subject": "COML", "descr": "From hieroglyphs to HTML, ancient poetry to audiotape, and Plato's cave to virtual reality, \"Thinking Media\" offers a multidisciplinary introduction to the most influential media formats of the last three millennia. Featuring an array of guests from across Cornell, including faculty from Communication, Comparative Literature, English, German Studies, Information Science, Music, and Performing & Media Arts, the course will present diverse perspectives on how to think with, against, and about media in relation to the public sphere and private life, archaeology and science fiction, ethics and aesthetics, identity and difference, labor and play, knowledge and power, expression and surveillance, and the generation and analysis of data.", "tags": "ALC-AS|CA-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1037, "title": "Desire", "code": "COML 2760", "subject": "COML", "descr": "\"Language is a skin,\" the critic Roland Barthes once wrote: \"I rub my language against the other. It is as if I had words instead of fingers, or fingers at the tip of my words. My language trembles with desire.\" Sexual desire has a history, even a literary history, which we will examine through an introductory survey of European dramatic literature from the Ancient Greeks to the present, as well as classic readings in sexual theory, including Plato, Freud, Foucault, and contemporary feminist and queer theory.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1038, "title": "Desire and Modern Drama", "code": "COML 2762", "subject": "COML", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1039, "title": "Literary Theory on the Edge", "code": "COML 3021", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Without literary theory, there is no idea of literature, of criticism, of culture. While exciting theoretical paradigms emerged in the late 20th century, including structuralism and poststructuralism, this course extends theoretical inquiry into its most exciting current developments, including performance studies, media theory and cinema/media studies, the digital humanities, trauma theory, transgender studies, and studies of the Anthropocene. Taught by two Cornell professors active in the field, along with occasional invited guests, lectures and class discussions will provide students with a facility for close textual analysis, a knowledge of major currents of thought in the humanities, and an appreciation for the uniqueness and complexity of language and media. This course may involve presentation of performance art.\u00a0 Course open to all levels; no previous knowledge of literary or cultural theory required.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1040, "title": "Video and New Media: Art, Theory, Politics", "code": "COML 3115", "subject": "COML", "descr": "The course will offer an overview of video art, alternative documentary video, and digital installation and networked art. It will analyze four phases of video and new media: (1) the development of video from its earliest turn away from television; (2) video's relation to art and installation; (3) video's migration into digital art; (4) the relation of video and new media to visual theory and social movements. Screenings will include early political and feminist video (Ant Farm, Rosler, Paper Tiger TV, Jones), conceptual video of the '80s and '90s (Vasulka, Lucier, Viola, Hill), gay and multicultural video of the '90s (Muntadas, Riggs, Piper, Fung, Parmar), networked and activist new media of the 21st century (Critical Art Ensemble, Electronic Disturbance Theater, SubRosa, Preemptive Media). Secondary theoretical readings on postmodernism, video theory, multicultural theory, and digital culture will provide students with a cultural and political context for the discussion of video and new media style, dissemination, and reception.", "tags": "LA-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1041, "title": "Global Cinema II", "code": "COML 3262", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Global Cinema I and II together offer an overview of international film history from the late nineteenth century to today. Through a focus on key films and significant epochs, the course traces the evolution of form, style and genre, the medium's changing technologies and business models, as well as film's relation to broader cultural, social and political contexts. Screenings of narrative, documentary and experimental films will be accompanied by readings in film theory and history.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1042, "title": "Music and Money", "code": "COML 3315", "subject": "COML", "descr": "From the 1720 South Sea Bubble to the 2008 global financial crisis, from Handel's operas to Spotify's algorithms, music has chronicled the booms and busts of markets. This course investigates how music and money are entwined in discourse and practice by tracing an origin story of capitalism that began in eighteenth-century Europe. We will ask how music has captured the spirit of capitalism since its inception, stoking its fantasies and attuning to its effects. In turn, we will contemplate how systems of economic thought reckon with shifting ways of creating and consuming music. In allowing music ranging from broadside ballads to commercial jingles to illuminate mutually the writings of such thinkers as Smith, Marx, Adorno, and Graeber, our discussions will unravel varied musical lives through themes including credit and debt, labor and property, media and interest, trade and slavery, nature and environment.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1043, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "COML 3336", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1044, "title": "Minorities of the Middle East", "code": "COML 3743", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course examines the historic diversity of the modern Middle East, exploring histories of inter-communal contact and conflict. We begin by investigating the legacy of the Ottoman Empire and the impact of its dissolution. We will focus our attention on commercial centers that fostered inter-communal relations, as well as investigating sites of strife and cases of minority repression. We will read histories, memoirs, and fiction, and view films that help us better understand inter-communal relations, tensions, and conflict. We will also interrogate the terms for exploring a range distinctions among majority and minority populations including: religious difference (Muslims, Christians, and Jews); divisions of religious rite (Sunni and Shi'a); entho-linguistic minorities (Armenians and Kurds); national identities (Israelis and Palestinians); cultures of origin (Mizrahi, Sephardi, and Ashkenazi Jews). We will explore how these divisions inform urgent current conflicts: the civil war in Syria and the refugee crisis; the civil war in Iraq and the campaign by ISIS against minorities; as well as tensions between Saudi Arabia and Iran.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1045, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "COML 3781", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Psychoanalysis considers the human being not as an object of treatment, but as a subject who is called upon to elaborate an unconscious knowledge about what is disrupting her life, through analysis of dreams, symptoms, bungled actions, slips of the tongue, and repetitive behaviors.\u00a0 Freud finds that these apparently irrational acts and behavior are ordered by the logic of the fantasy, which provides a mental representation of a traumatic childhood experience and the effects it unleashes in the mind and body-effects he called drives.\u00a0 As \"unbound\" energies, the drives give rise to symptoms, repetitive acts, and fantasmatic stagings that menace our health and sometimes threaten social coexistence, but that also rise to the desires, creative acts, and social projects we identify as the essence of human life.\u00a0 Readings will include fundamental texts on the unconscious, repression, fantasy, and the death drive, as well as case studies and speculative essays on mythology, art, religion, and group psychology.\u00a0 Students will be asked to keep a dream journal and to work on their unconscious formations, and will have the chance to produce creative projects as well as analytic essays.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1046, "title": "Poetry and Poetics of the Americas", "code": "COML 3800", "subject": "COML", "descr": "As globalization draws the Americas ever closer together, reshaping our sense of a common and uncommon American culture, what claims might be made for a distinctive, diverse poetry and poetics of the America? How might we characterize its dominant forms and alternative practices? What shared influences, affiliations, concerns and approaches might we find and what differences emerge? Ranging across North and South America, Central America and the Caribbean, this course will place in conversation such figures as Poe, Stein, Eliot, Pound, Williams, Neruda, Vallejo, Borges, Parra, C\u00e9saire, Walcott, Bola\u00f1o, Espada, Waldrop, Vicu\u00f1a, Hong, and Rankine.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1047, "title": "Apes and Language", "code": "COML 3921", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Talking chimpanzees, orangutans, bonobos or gorillas are certainly widespread in myths, novels or movies (from Franz Kafka to The Planet of the Apes, from Tristan Garcia to We Are All Completely Beside Ourselves). But centuries of philosophical speculation and of scientific research have also endowed some great apes with the ability to communicate verbally with humans, either through sign language or with arbitrary symbols on computer keyboards. This class will explore the scientific, theoretical, imaginary, and legal underpinnings and consequences of such endeavors and narratives, thereby also serving as an introduction to the \"post-humanistic\" field of \"animal studies.\" Our course will take advantage of unique video resources, the Cornell archive documenting the life of Kanzi and other bonobos as well as the \"Ape Testimony Project.\"", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1048, "title": "Body Politics in African Literature, Cinema, and New Media", "code": "COML 3977", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "GLC-AS|LA-AS|SCD-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1049, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "COML 4200", "subject": "COML", "descr": "COML 4190\u00a0and COML 4200 may be taken independently of each other. Undergraduate student and faculty advisor to determine course of study and credit hours.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1050, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "COML 4352", "subject": "COML", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1051, "title": "Medieval Technologies of the Self", "code": "COML 4626", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Recent years have seen a boom in ways to use technology in order to learn about and improve the self. This course examines contemporary cultural orientations toward technology by exploring how medieval thinkers turned to language, images, books, and other tools and means of making in order to develop a sense of themselves in ethical relationship to others and to the world around them. We will place medieval work (such as Chaucer and Kempe) in conversation with resonant modern and contemporary writing (including Haraway, hooks, and Foucault). Advertisements and marketing for apps like \"Co-Star\", and \"Calm\" will supplement our discussions. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1052, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "COML 4798", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relations of politics to art in general and the cultural politic of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers, and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape culture and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rule) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others; with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of the situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say post autonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1053, "title": "Genres, Platforms, Media", "code": "COML 4861", "subject": "COML", "descr": "How do questions of genre persist and evolve in the digital age? To what extent do we choose our genres, and in what ways do they choose us? How do genres, platforms, and media intersect and inform one another? What hierarchies do they establish, and to what purposes? What are the implications of such questions for what Jacques Ranciere has called the \"distribution of the sensible,\" for democratic consensus and dissensus? Moving among websites, social media, and streaming services, from Poetry Foundation and PennSound to podcasts and serial TV, from FaceBook and Twitter to Instagram and YouTube, from Netflix and Amazon to Roku and Hulu, this course will explore the accelerating interplay of genres, platforms, and media and their impact in contemporary culture and politics.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1054, "title": "Senior Essay", "code": "COML 4930", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Times TBA individually in consultation with director of Senior Essay Colloquium. Approximately 50 pages to be written over the course of two semesters in the student's senior year under the direction of the student's advisor. An R grade is assigned on the basis of research and a preliminary draft completed in the first semester. A letter grade is awarded on completion of the second semester, COML 4940.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1055, "title": "Senior Essay", "code": "COML 4940", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Times TBA individually in consultation with director of Senior Essay Colloquium. Approximately 50 pages to be written over the course of two semesters in the student's senior year under the direction of the student's advisor. An R grade is assigned on the basis of research and a preliminary draft completed in the first semester.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1056, "title": "Pleasure and Neoliberalism", "code": "COML 4948", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1057, "title": "Literary Theory on the Edge", "code": "COML 6159", "subject": "COML", "descr": "Without literary theory, there is no idea of literature, of criticism, of culture. While exciting theoretical paradigms emerged in the late 20th century, including structuralism and poststructuralism, this course extends theoretical inquiry into its most exciting current developments, including performance studies, media theory and cinema/media studies, the digital humanities, trauma theory, trangender studies, and studies of the Anthropocene. Taught by two Cornell professors active in the field, along with occasional invited guests, lectures and class discussions will provide students with a facility for close textual analysis, a knowledge of major currents of thought in the humanities, and an appreciation for the uniqueness and complexity of language and media. This course may involve presentation of performance art.\u00a0 Course open to all levels; no previous knowledge of literary or cultural theory required.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1058, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "COML 6200", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course gives students the opportunity to work with a selected instructor to pursue special interests or research not treated in regularly scheduled courses. After getting permission of the instructor, students should enroll online in the instructor's section. Enrolled students are required to provide the department with a course description and/or syllabus along with the instructor's approval by the end of the first week of classes.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1059, "title": "Postcolonial Theory: Then and Now", "code": "COML 6221", "subject": "COML", "descr": "\"All decolonization,\" wrote Frantz Fanon, \"is successful at the level of description.\"\u00a0 With a focus on the difference between description and critique and on the uneven relation between the academic project underlying the subfield of postcolonial studies and histories of colonialism and aspirations to decolonization across the twentieth century,\u00a0 this seminar will offer a retrospective survey on the assemblage of texts that has come under the name \"Postcolonial Theory\" and inquire into its purchase on this present with particular emphasis on questions of indigeneity and environmental crisis.\u00a0 Authors may include: Edward Said, Gayatri Chakravorty Spivak, Homi Bhabha, Frantz Fanon, Amilcar Cabral, Aim\u00e9 C\u00e9saire, Edouard Glissant, Achille Mbembe, Sylvia Wynter, David Scott, Leela Gandhi, Marlene Nourbese Philip, Jason Moore, Glenn Coulthard, Dipesh Chakrabarty, Rob Nixon.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1060, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "COML 6336", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1061, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "COML 6352", "subject": "COML", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1062, "title": "Black Feminist Theories: Sexuality, Creativity, and Power", "code": "COML 6465", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course examines black feminist theories as they are articulated in the cross-cultural experiences of women across the African Diaspora. We will explore a variety of theories, texts and creative encounters within their socio-political and geographical frames and locations, analyzing these against, or in relation to, a range of feminist activisms and movements. Some key categories of discussion will include Black Left Feminism, Feminist Movements in Latin America and the Caribbean and African feminisms. Texts like the Combahee River Collective statement and a variety of US Black feminist positions and the related literature as well as earlier black feminist articulations such as the Sojourners for Truth and Justice will also be engaged. Students will have the opportunity to develop their own research projects from a range of possibilities.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1063, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "COML 6783", "subject": "COML", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1064, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "COML 6798", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relation of politics to art in general and the cultural politics of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape cultural and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rude) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others: with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say postautonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1065, "title": "Genres, Platforms, Media", "code": "COML 6861", "subject": "COML", "descr": "How do questions of genre persist and evolve in the digital age? To what extent do we choose our genres, and in what ways do they choose us? How do genres, platforms, and media intersect and inform one another? What hierarchies do they establish, and to what purposes? What are the implications of such questions for what Jacques Ranciere has called the \"distribution of the sensible,\" for democratic consensus and dissensus? Moving among websites, social media, and streaming services, from Poetry Foundation and PennSound to podcasts and serial TV, from FaceBook and Twitter to Instagram and YouTube, from Netflix and Amazon to Roku and Hulu, this course will explore the accelerating interplay of genres, platforms, and media and their impact in contemporary culture and politics.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1066, "title": "Pleasure and Neoliberalism", "code": "COML 6948", "subject": "COML", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "COML", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1067, "title": "Visual Communication", "code": "COMM 1300", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Introduction to visual communication theory. Examines how visuals influence our attention, perspectives, and understanding. Uses examples of visuals drawn from advertising, TV news, documentaries, entertainment movies, print, and interactive media to develop a theoretical framework for becoming more visually aware and for thinking more critically about how visuals influence us.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1068, "title": "Oral Communication", "code": "COMM 2010", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "The course focuses on face-to-face, public communication, but the principles and practices addressed transfer to all purposeful communication situations. While many assume a good speech rests in how well it is delivered, students will learn that a good speech is equally dependent on the development, structure, and integrity of one's ideas. The objectives of the course are for students to speak effectively and ethically, and listen critically.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1069, "title": "Writing about Communication", "code": "COMM 2310", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "America's employers consistently rank the ability to communicate as one of the most important career skills for hiring and advancement. This course will strengthen your ability to craft effective written communication for a variety of formats, providing you with a skill set that is applicable in professional and academic settings. Assignments explore social science and communication concepts.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1070, "title": "Persuasion and Social Influence", "code": "COMM 2760", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Social influence and persuasion are the most basic and important functions of communication. The course covers characteristics of persuasive messages, message sources, and targets; interpersonal influence; and influence in groups. Special emphasis is given to topics in health, science, risk. This course features interactive lectures, assignments that apply principles of persuasion to real world contexts, and an applied group research project. Exams, homework assignments, and the group research project comprise the bulk of student evaluation.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1071, "title": "Communication, Environment, Science, and Health", "code": "COMM 2850", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Environmental problems, public health issues, scientific research-in each of these areas, communication plays a fundamental role. From the media to individual conversations, from technical journals to textbooks, from lab notes to the web, communication helps define scientifically based social issues and research findings. This course examines the institutional and intellectual contexts, processes, and practical constraints on communication in the sciences.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1072, "title": "Directed Research Experience", "code": "COMM 2990", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Intended for freshmen and sophomore students who are new to undergraduate research. Students may be reading scientific literature, learning research techniques, or assisting with ongoing research. The faculty supervisor determines the work goals and the form of the final report.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1073, "title": "Writing and Producing the Narrative for Digital Media", "code": "COMM 3010", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "New media communication has been blurring the traditional roles of content creator and consumer. Professional communicators\u2014such as journalists, screenwriters, advertising executives, documentarians, and podcasters\u2014are now expected to know how to use alternative storytelling forms to reach their audiences. They need to know how to gather information through a variety of sources such as crowdsurfing and social media; quickly and efficiently write, edit, and record audio and video. This course will explore these new delivery systems and provide guided practice of emerging communication forms. Fundamentally, this course is about writing\u2014concisely and accurately with a clear and active voice\u2014for new digital media with a focus on the personal narrative.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1074, "title": "Capstone Course in Environmental and Sustainability Communication: From the Lab to the World", "code": "COMM 3080", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This Capstone course in Environmental and Sustainability communication bridges students' understanding of communication theory with a spring seminar and summer internship focused on the communication goals of our partner environmental organizations. Class meetings will involve a mix of lecture, readings, activities, case studies, and guest visits from local and national environmental organizations, focused on understanding and addressing communications challenges common to the field as well as those specific to individual organizations.", "tags": "KCM-AG|SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1075, "title": "Educational Psychology", "code": "COMM 3110", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Educational psychology is the application of psychological principles and concepts to cases of teaching and learning. We study behavioral, cognitive, embodied, and social-cultural perspectives on learning and thinking, and we use them in planning and reflecting on weekly fieldwork outside the classroom. In the process, we become more mindful and skilled learners ourselves and better facilitators of others' learning.", "tags": "CA-AG|KCM-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1076, "title": "New Media and Society", "code": "COMM 3200", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Media and culture are undergoing a series of transformations as new technologies, new forms of entertainment, new venues for political debate, and new models of public discourse emerge online. This course looks at how the social, political, and cultural landscape is changing in relation to digital media and information technologies. We develop critical resources to better understand the history of these new technologies and communicative forms, the economics behind them, the policies developing around them, and the sociocultural shifts from which they have emerged, and that they have helped provoke. We will aim to discard commonplace assumptions about these tools and phenomena, to ask deeper questions about their impact on society.", "tags": "CA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1077, "title": "Communication and the Environment", "code": "COMM 3210", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Students investigate how values, attitudes, social structure, and communication affect public perceptions of environmental risk and public opinion about the environment. A primary focus is mass media's impact on public perceptions of the environment, how the media portray the environment, and discussion of the implications of public consumption of environmental content.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1078, "title": "Presenting Information Visually", "code": "COMM 3350", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "As communication professionals, we often present information orally and via written words. Spoken and written words alone, however, are frequently not enough to convey the information that we need to deliver. Visual objects can help us in such cases. In this course you will learn to master the basics of clean layout and design of visual objects such as tables, graphs, dashboards, slide decks, and professional reports. We will build your practical skills in presenting information visually based on fundamental theories in areas such as cognitive psychology and communication that explain how people perceive and construe sensory input. No incoming software skills are required, but I expect you to be willing to explore and learn on your own or with peers beyond classroom instruction.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1079, "title": "Social Behavior and Technology", "code": "COMM 3400", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This course explores personal connections in the digital age, and how information and communication technologies impact our lives and relationships. It focuses on how people manage interactions and identities, develop and maintain relationships, accomplish social goals, create shared meanings, and engage in collaboration and conflict in social media. Emphasis will be placed on how current thinking in relational communication can explain and anticipate interpersonal dynamics on the Internet, but also on how online behaviors may challenge traditional principles of human communication. A major part of the course is a semester-long research project in which students working in small groups design, run, and present their own empirical study of personal relationships and technology.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1080, "title": "Human-Computer Interaction Design", "code": "COMM 3450", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This course focuses on user experience design (UX) and the life cycle of interface design from the user perspective. We will discuss key aspects of the human-centered design process: understanding, analyzing, and formalizing user needs, exploring possible design solutions to address user needs, creating prototypes to externalize design ideas, and evaluating the usability of these prototypes.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1081, "title": "Computing Cultures", "code": "COMM 3560", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Computers are powerful tools for working, playing, thinking, and living. Laptops, PDAs, webcams, cell phones, and iPods are not just devices, they also provide narratives, metaphors, and ways of seeing the world. This course critically examines how computing technology and society shape each other and how this plays out in our everyday lives. Identifies how computers, networks, and information technologies reproduce, reinforce, and rework existing cultural trends, norms, and values. Looks at the values embodied in the cultures of computing and considers alternative ways to imagine, build, and work with information technologies.", "tags": "CA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1082, "title": "Information Policy: Applied Research and Analysis", "code": "COMM 4201", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This course will address a wide range of information policy issues such as privacy, security, antitrust, intellectual property, algorithmic fairness, net neutrality, risk mitigation strategies, and other legal and policy compliance concerns in a simulated project management environment. Patterned on life cycle project management for products and services in contemporary large-scale technology companies, students will adopt specific topic areas for applied research and analysis working dynamically with other team members.\u00a0 Course outcomes include conducting upper-level research in specific information policy domains, experiential group dynamics, persuasive analytic presentations, fundamentals of project management in the technology sector, and insights into corporate hierarchies, organization, and functionalities.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1083, "title": "Psychology of Entertainment Media", "code": "COMM 4220", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Every media format uses entertainment, including video games, advertising, television, movies, sports, and news. This course examines the psychology (conscious and unconscious) of entertainment, including why people like entertainment, what makes a story entertaining, how people mentally process entertainment, what makes things frightening or funny, and whether or not entertainment can persuade.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1084, "title": "The Design and Governance of Digital Experiments", "code": "COMM 4242", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Online platforms, which monitor and intervene in the lives of billions of people, routinely host thousands of experiments to evaluate policies, test products, and contribute to theory in the social sciences. These experiments are also powerful tools to monitor injustice and govern human and algorithm behavior. How can we do field experiments reliably at scale and also govern their power in society? In this hands-on class, students will develop practical experimentation skills, engaging with methods, theory, ethics, and governance of large-scale behavioral research online.", "tags": "KCM-AG|SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1085, "title": "Communication Networks and Social Capital", "code": "COMM 4360", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Course covers the relationship between communication networks and social capital and explores the tension between individual and group capital.", "tags": "CA-AG|SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1086, "title": "Communication in Virtual Worlds", "code": "COMM 4380", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This course deals with the psychological, social, and technical aspects of being embodied in virtual environments. During this course, students will learn how human\u2014and non-human\u2014entities and their actions are represented as virtual bodies. The course is organized around three areas: an overview of how a sense of embodiment is created in virtual reality, an overview of research on virtual embodiment, and current and future applications. Students will experience virtual environments, relate course topics to current events, and experiment with the creation of immersive virtual content.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1087, "title": "Qualitative User Research and Design Methods", "code": "COMM 4400", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This upper-level course provides an in-depth understanding of and experience with advanced concepts and techniques for researching, ideating, critiquing, designing, prototyping, and evaluating interactive technologies intended for people to use and incorporate in their lives. The course focuses on advanced user research and design methods.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1088, "title": "Computer-Mediated Communication", "code": "COMM 4450", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "For description, see COMM 4450.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1089, "title": "Public Communication of Science and Technology", "code": "COMM 4660", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Explores the structure, meanings, and implications of \"public communication of science and technology\" (PCST). Examines the contexts in which PCST occurs, looks at motivations and constraints of those involved in producing information about science for nonprofessional audiences, and analyzes the functions of PCST. Ties existing ideas about PCST to general communication research, and leads to developing new knowledge about PCST. Format is primarily seminar/discussion.", "tags": "SBA-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1090, "title": "Individual Study in Communication", "code": "COMM 4970", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Individual study under faculty supervision. Work should concentrate on locating, assimilating, synthesizing, and reporting existing knowledge on a selected topic. Attempts to implement this knowledge in a practical application are desirable.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1091, "title": "Communication Teaching Experience", "code": "COMM 4980", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Periodic meetings with the instructor cover realization of course objectives, evaluation of teaching methods, and student feedback. In addition to aiding with the actual instruction, each student prepares a paper on some aspect of the course.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1092, "title": "Independent Research", "code": "COMM 4990", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Permits outstanding students to conduct laboratory or field research in communication under appropriate faculty supervision. The research should be scientific: systematic, controlled, empirical. Research goals should include description, prediction, explanation, or policy orientation and should generate new knowledge.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1093, "title": "Science Communication Workshop", "code": "COMM 5660", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "This weekend workshop trains researchers in the sciences (including natural sciences, engineering, experimental social sciences, etc.) to communicate effectively with nonscientists such as policy makers, political stakeholders, the media, and the general public. Training activities may include role-play, reading/discussion, writing press releases and other outreach materials, and discussion with invited speakers.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1094, "title": "Seminar in Social Networks", "code": "COMM 6100", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Reviews theories and research on communication and social networks in groups, organizations, and communities. Students will learn how to collect, analyze, and interpret social network data using UCINET.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1095, "title": "Computer-Mediated Communication", "code": "COMM 6450", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "For description, see COMM 6450.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1096, "title": "Revolutions of the Mind: Media, Technology and Epistemological Change", "code": "COMM 6710", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Revolution: a change in organizational structure or power balance; turn-around; modification of an existing constitution. Current technologies and media are revolutionizing the way we think, what we know, and what we do. This course examines what it means to \"think about knowledge differently\" and \"change your mind\" by looking at the dynamic interaction between how people and society transform and are transformed by various forms of information and new media technologies. Examples from education (e.g., MOOCs), entertainment, virtual reality, and connective media contextualize this investigation into epistemological development, thought and action, and ethics of change. (graduate students; advanced undergraduates with permission)", "tags": "KCM-AG|COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1097, "title": "Advanced Communication Theory", "code": "COMM 6810", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Development of, and contemporary issues in, communication theory. Discusses the interaction between communication and society, social groupings, and mental processing.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1098, "title": "Qualitative Research Methods in Communication", "code": "COMM 6830", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Reviews qualitative methods used in communication research, including interviews, focus groups, fieldwork (ethnography), and case studies. Students practice the various methods so they can learn to apply them to their own research. Students also discuss how researchers analyze qualitative data and build theories from their observations.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1099, "title": "Graduate Independent Study", "code": "COMM 7970", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Individual study concentrating on locating, assimilating, synthesizing, and reporting existing knowledge on a selected topic.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1100, "title": "Graduate Research", "code": "COMM 7990", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Small-group or individual research based on original, empirical, data-based designs regarding topical issues in communication not otherwise examined in a graduate field course.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1101, "title": "Doctoral-Level Dissertation Research", "code": "COMM 9900", "subject": "COMM", "descr": "Dissertation research for Ph.D. candidates.", "tags": "COMM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1102, "title": "The Global City", "code": "CRP 1101", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The\u00a0course introduces students to contemporary urbanization processes, patterns and trends with a focus on cities of the Global South. It examines the demographic, economic and historical processes that create cities. Attention is given to the role of the state, market, non-governmental actors and communities in shaping cities. The course investigates the most pressing problems facing cities. Possible topics may include poverty and inequality, access to shelter and infrastructure, and environmental degradation.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1103, "title": "People, Planning, and Politics in the City", "code": "CRP 2010", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Seminar examining various bases of political and professional power. What do professionals who want to serve the public need to know about power and decision-making processes in the institutional settings in which they operate? How and why can professionals make a difference when facing problems characterized by great complexity and severe inequalities among affected groups? The course addresses these and others questions.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1104, "title": "Land Use, Environmental Planning, and Urban Design Workshop", "code": "CRP 3072", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Land Use and Environmental Planning workshop courses focus on the forces and actions that directly affect the physical character, transformation, rehabilitation, and preservation of natural landscapes, cities, and regions. Participants provide technical assistance to communities, and have the opportunity to work with communities in resolving critical planning issues. Topics may include development of land use and natural conservation plans, community redevelopment plans,\u00a0design and analysis of public spaces,\u00a0and strategies for making communities more environmentally and economically sustainable.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1105, "title": "Research Design and Qualitative Methods", "code": "CRP 3201", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The course explores theoretical and practical dimensions of research design and qualitative methods, particularly as they apply to city and regional planning. It critically analyzes how different paradigms of knowledge construction have shaped planning research and practice. Students learn elements of research design, data collection methods,\u00a0and data analysis procedures, as well as how to evaluate research for its rigor, generalizability, and validity. The course also reviews questions related to research ethics and respect for human subjects.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1106, "title": "Affordable Housing Policy and Programs", "code": "CRP 3430", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Overview of federal, state, and local policies and programs to deliver affordable housing to low-income people; public housing, vouchers, inclusionary zoning, rent control, and much more. Lectures, debates, short papers, and term paper.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1107, "title": "Contemporary Italy: Politics and Society", "code": "CRP 3720", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course provides background on contemporary Italian politics and society, as an essential foundation to students with various disciplinary interests, from planning to architecture, from the fine arts to sociology and anthropology.\u00a0This course provides a comprehensive survey of Italian society today, starting with Italy's geography and the historical forces that shaped the nation. It examines tensions between north and south, and such broad features of Italian social life as community structure, urban development, and family forms. The course also reviews selected institutional issues, such as gender, the system of education, problems of criminality and justice, economic reform, social class, religion, and politics.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1108, "title": "European Cities", "code": "CRP 3723", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The course will focus on European Cities and the challenges they are facing in a globalized economy. Introducing the main characteristics of European cities and their role in the European integration process, the student will achieve a critical understanding of different forms of government and governance, and modalities that European cities have chosen in order to face the challenge of the contemporary city.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1109, "title": "Special Topics in Planning", "code": "CRP 3850", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of\u00a0planning. Topics vary each semester.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1110, "title": "Special Topics in Urban History, Society, and Politics", "code": "CRP 3852", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of urban history, society, and politics. Topics vary each semester.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1111, "title": "City and Regional Futures: Planning Practice, Policy and Design", "code": "CRP 3900", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This colloquium brings domestic and international experts to Cornell to talk about research and practice aimed at shaping the future of communities and regions. It includes an array of topics that span urban policy, planning practice and research, design, and applied research on technology and society. Course can be repeated for credit.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1112, "title": "Resource Management and Environment Law", "code": "CRP 4440", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Introduces the application of legal concepts and processes to the management of natural resources and natural-resource areas. Explores the role of the common law, statutory law, administrative regulations, and judicial decisions in managing these resources. Particular focus is given to the management of wildlife, wetlands, and critical resources on public lands, and to the conflicts inherent in government attempts to regulate important natural resources on private lands.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1113, "title": "Legal Aspects of Land Use Planning", "code": "CRP 4590", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Survey of leading cases and legal concepts in land-use planning, with particular attention to zoning, subdivision control, condemnation, and growth-control issues.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1114, "title": "Seminar on Issues in African Development", "code": "CRP 4770", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Examines a broad range of critical concerns in contemporary Africa including food production, human resource development, migration, urbanization, environmental resource management, economic growth, and policy guidance. The weekly presentations are made by invited specialists. Students are required to write a term paper.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1115, "title": "Student-Faculty Research", "code": "CRP 4900", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Research, reading, and/or writing project in which a student and faculty member choose a topic related to urban and regional studies.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1116, "title": "Undergraduate Honors Thesis Research", "code": "CRP 4920", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Honors students conduct research to prepare a thesis on a topic of their own choosing under the direction of a faculty member.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1117, "title": "Undergraduate Honors Thesis Writing", "code": "CRP 4930", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Honors students prepare a thesis on a topic of their own choosing under the direction of a faculty member.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1118, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "CRP 4970", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1119, "title": "Modular Course", "code": "CRP 5000", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Skill-acquisition based or topical issue mini-courses, organized by department faculty, visitors or groups of students with a faculty sponsor.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1120, "title": "Land Use, Environmental Planning, and Urban Design Workshop", "code": "CRP 5072", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Land Use and Environmental Planning workshop courses focus on the forces and actions that directly affect the physical character, transformation, rehabilitation, and preservation of natural landscapes, cities, and regions. Participants provide technical assistance to communities, and have the opportunity to work with communities in resolving critical planning issues. Topics may include development of land use and natural conservation plans, community redevelopment plans,\u00a0design and analysis of public spaces,\u00a0and strategies for making communities more environmentally and economically sustainable.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1121, "title": "International Planning and Development Workshop", "code": "CRP 5076", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The workshop exposes students to the complexity as well as the nuances of planning with poor communities in the Global South. It places a strong emphasis on an engaged model of learning, research and planning practice. An important part of the workshop is building effective working relationships across cultures, disciplinary perspectives and professional orientations. The workshop emphasizes the use of diverse sources of data and information, and effective communication of deliverables. Because the workshop responds to the needs of international collaborators and stakeholders, the substantive focus of the workshop and the deliverables changes from one year to the next. In recent years the workshop has focused on issues related to poverty, water, shelter and participatory planning.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1122, "title": "Introduction to GIS for Planners", "code": "CRP 5080", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course is designed to provide students with a conceptual understanding of geographic information systems (GIS) and sciences, practical hands on experience with GIS software, and understanding of how GIS can be applied to planning practice and research. Students will be introduced to the basic concepts, structures, and functions of GIS as well as their applications and limitations.\u00a0 By the end of this course students should be familiar with a range of available tools and methods to address planning related problems and issues, and be able to conceive of and manage a GIS project. This involves a) identifying a planning analysis/research problem that requires GIS data and spatial analysis to address/analyze the problem; and b) collecting, processing, and analyzing spatial data to interpret the findings.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1123, "title": "Introductory Methods of Planning Analysis", "code": "CRP 5250", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to methods for developing and evaluating (for the most part) quantitative information in support of planning. The methods considered are widely used by planning practitioners and policy analysts and embody modalities of thinking that often structure the ways that issues are framed for public discussions and policy decisions.\u00a0CRP 5250 is a four-credit-hour course; hence, by university expectations, it is assumed that students will spend up to eight hours per week on readings and assignments or in attending recitation sessions outside of class.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1124, "title": "Real Estate Development Process I", "code": "CRP 5320", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Examination of various forms of development as well as the role of major participants in the processes. Reviews issues in residential, retail, industrial, office, and low-income housing projects.\u00a0This course is a prerequisite for CRP 5321.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1125, "title": "Real Estate Development Process II", "code": "CRP 5321", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Examination of various forms of development, as well as the role of the major participants by a review of case studies of residential, retail, industrial, office, and low-income housing projects.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1126, "title": "Design Connect", "code": "CRP 5348", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Design Connect Workshop is the for-credit option for students participating in the local and regional projects solicited, reviewed and executed by the independent student organization of the same name.\u00a0 It provides planning and design services to upstate New York communities. Student teams engage community partners to create conceptual designs, with research and analysis, participatory visioning and design charrettes, town and master planning for public spaces. Course can be repeated for credit.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1127, "title": "Real Estate Seminar Series", "code": "CRP 5370", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Designed to bring students weekly into direct contact with real-estate professionals mainly through the use of videoconferences originating from locations around the world.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1128, "title": "Resource Management and Environmental Law", "code": "CRP 5440", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Introduces the application of legal concepts and processes to the management of natural resources and natural-resource areas. Explores the role of the common law, statutory law, administrative regulations, and judicial decisions in managing these resources. Particular focus is given to the management of wildlife, wetlands, and critical resources on public lands, and to the conflicts inherent in government attempts to regulate important natural resources on private lands.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1129, "title": "Inferential Statistics for Planning and Public Policy", "code": "CRP 5450", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the inferential statistical methods and econometrics/regression analysis needed to understand empirical public policy and planning research and to do basic applied policy analysis. The statistical concepts are illustrated using data and examples primarily from the fields of public policy and planning.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1130, "title": "Introduction to Community and Environment Dispute Resolution", "code": "CRP 5460", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Explores the theories and techniques of dispute resolution as they apply to community, environmental, and related public-policy disputes. Analysis complements skill-building. Issues of power, participation, and strategy are central to our examinations of negotiation and mediation practice.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1131, "title": "Land Use Planning Methods", "code": "CRP 5530", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to land use planning methods, especially those that are used in comprehensive planning by local governments and regional framework plans. The course surveys analytical and participatory methods to shape land use and urban form and to guide infrastructure provision in order to achieve more sustainable urban systems. Land use planning concepts and\u00a0methods are included at other scales as well, including statewide frameworks for Smart Growth and small area plans. Other skills include the application of planning support tools and geodesign methods, drafting and applying land use regulations such as zoning and Smart Codes; creation of natural resource inventories, conservation areas, and green infrastructure plans, and planning at the nexus of transportation and land use. Includes methods of participation in land use planning processes.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1132, "title": "Real Estate Project Workshop", "code": "CRP 5563", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Students undertake a self-selected real estate development project and must \"pitch\" the proposed development to a panel of real world potential investors. Students are required to demonstrate an advanced understanding of real estate development, including project feasibility, marketing, planning and design, and land use law constraints. Student projects focus on real-world skills and require professional-level reports suitable for oral and written presentations. Real Estate Shark Tank.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1133, "title": "Legal Aspects of Land Use Planning", "code": "CRP 5590", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Survey of leading cases and legal concepts in land-use planning, with particular attention to zoning, subdivision control, condemnation, and growth-control issues.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1134, "title": "Problems in Contemporary Preservation Practice", "code": "CRP 5630", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Topics of critical concern for preservation professionals preparing to enter practice.\u00a0Recent topics include forming and managing preservation non-profit organizations, tools for grassroots preservation advocacy, fundraising and grant writing, and effective oral and written communication for preservation planners.\u00a0Presented by staff and guest lecturers.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1135, "title": "Building Materials Conservation", "code": "CRP 5640", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A survey of the development of building materials in the United States, chiefly during the 19th and early 20th centuries, and a review of the measures that might be taken to conserve them.\u00a0Students prepare a Historic Structure Report (HSR) on a property of their own choosing to be given to the site owner. The HSR includes historical research, a detailed written description, building condition analysis, recommendations for treatment, and a cost estimate.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1136, "title": "Contemporary Italy: Politics and Society", "code": "CRP 5720", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course provides background on contemporary Italian politics and society, as an essential foundation to students with various disciplinary interests, from planning to architecture, from the fine arts to sociology and anthropology. This course provides a comprehensive survey of Italian society today, starting with Italy's geography and the historical forces that shaped the nation. It examines tensions between north and south, and such broad features of Italian social life as community structure, urban development, and family forms. The course also reviews selected institutional issues, such as gender, the system of education, problems of criminality and justice, economic reform, social class, religion, and politics.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1137, "title": "European Cities", "code": "CRP 5723", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The course will focus on European cities and the challenges they are facing in a globalized economy. Introducing the main characteristics of European cities and their role in the European integration process, the student will achieve a critical understanding of different forms of government and governance, and modalities that European cities have chosen in order to face the challenge of the contemporary city. Graduate students will conduct a more involved research paper or project.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1138, "title": "Special Topics", "code": "CRP 5850", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to planning. Topics vary each semester.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1139, "title": "Special Topics in Urban History, Society, and Politics", "code": "CRP 5852", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of urban history, society, and politics. Topics vary each semester.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1140, "title": "Research Design and Qualitative Methods", "code": "CRP 6201", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The course explores theoretical and practical dimensions of research design and qualitative methods, particularly as they apply to city and regional planning. It critically analyzes how different paradigms of knowledge construction have shaped planning research and practice. Students learn elements of research design, data collection methods, and data analysis procedures, as well as how to evaluate research for its rigor, generalizability, and validity. The course also reviews questions related to research ethics and respect for human subjects.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1141, "title": "Advanced Topics in GIS", "code": "CRP 6290", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course is designed to engage graduate level planning students in some more advanced topics using GIS methodology. Topics may vary from year to year, but in the past, the course has included an introduction to spatial statistics. Topics addressed include exploratory spatial data analysis, spatial autocorrelation, point pattern analysis, spatial interpolation techniques, spatial regression (including geographically weighted regression), and both spatial lag and spatial error models.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1142, "title": "Affordable Housing Policy and Programs", "code": "CRP 6430", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Overview of federal, state, and local policies and programs to deliver affordable housing to low-income people; public housing, vouchers, inclusionary zoning, rent control, and much more. Lectures, debates, short papers, and term paper.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1143, "title": "Real Estate Transactions and Deal Structuring", "code": "CRP 6560", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Real estate transactions and deal structuring examines real estate deals through a practitioner perspective within a case study and transactional approach. The course looks at the transactional components and structuring of real estate deals and related parties at each step in creating value from real estate, including acquisition and assemblage; due diligence; sourcing and financing; structuring the venture/parties; operation; disposition; and tax consequences. Additional issues within deal structuring that may be included are negotiation, managing risk including litigation and environmental issues, analysis of financing techniques, and consequences when deals go bad, including work out and bankruptcy. The case study format will address deals from the perspectives of investment fund manager, banker/lender, developer, REIT, joint venture partner/investor, and owner.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1144, "title": "Special Topics in Real Estate", "code": "CRP 6595", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to real estate.\u00a0 Topics vary each semester.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1145, "title": "Real Estate Competitions II: ULI Hines", "code": "CRP 6597", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The ULI Hines Competition challenges students to collaborate across disciplines and imagine a better built environment. Groups of five students form teams to devise a development program for a real site in a North American city, providing designs, market-based financial data, and related narratives.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1146, "title": "Economics and Financing of Neighborhood Conservation and Preservation", "code": "CRP 6640", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The economic and financial aspects of historic preservation and neighborhood conservation. Topics include public finance, selected issues in urban economics, real estate economics, and private financing of real estate projects. Students will conduct a feasibility study for the re-use of an endangered historic property of their choosing, preparing a market study and proformas.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1147, "title": "International Institutions", "code": "CRP 6720", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "The course introduces students to the theory and practice of international development planning from an institutional perspective. It begins with an introduction to the field and provides a historical, institutional and theoretical overview. The course examines the main actors involved in the practice of international development planning: the public sector, civil society and NGOs, community-based organizations and the private sector. It critically analyzes some of the large international institutions engaged in planning, policy and global governance. These institutions are analyzed in the context of an issue that is central to their core mission. The last section of the course critically examines new configurations, forces for change and challenges to how we conceptualize as well as practice international development planning, including migration, transnationalism, social movements, post-democracy and anarchism.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1148, "title": "Seminar on Issues in African Development", "code": "CRP 6770", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Examines a broad range of critical concerns in contemporary Africa including food production, human resource development, migration, urbanization, environmental resource management, economic growth, and policy guidance. The weekly presentations are made by invited specialists. Students are required to write a term paper.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1149, "title": "Research Design", "code": "CRP 7201", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This course will help Ph.D. students select appropriate research design and field methods for dissertation research.\u00a0 The course provides a comprehensive review of the research design process and will result in each student developing his/her dissertation proposal.\u00a0 The course focuses on articulating research objectives, managing the research process, ethics, funding and professional development as a scholar.\u00a0The course also explores how to select the appropriate data collection strategy:\u00a0case studies, interviews, focus groups, surveys and archival data as well as\u00a0a review of major approaches to quantitative or qualitative analysis.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1150, "title": "City and Regional Futures: Planning Practice, Policy and Design", "code": "CRP 7850", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "This colloquium brings domestic and international experts to Cornell to talk about research and practice aimed at shaping the future of communities and regions. It includes an array of topics that span urban policy, planning practice and research, design, and applied research on technology and society. Course can be repeated for credit.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1151, "title": "Planning Internship", "code": "CRP 7940", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Students participate in a structured, unpaid internship under the supervision of planning professionals in cooperating organizations. The internship should be purposeful, provide opportunities for reflection, present continual challenge to the student, and incorporate active learning. The faculty supervisor and student should outline the conditions of the work assignment, learning outcomes, and faculty supervision on an independent study form. A final project linking planning theory and practical work experience is required. The academic credit, however, is not based on the on-the-job training itself but rather on the active learning and reflection demonstrated in a written paper or project.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1152, "title": "Independent Study for Graduate Students", "code": "CRP 7970", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "For course information contact the department coordinator in 106 West Sibley Hall.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1153, "title": "Planning Research Seminar", "code": "CRP 8900", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "Intended for doctoral candidates in city and regional planning; other students welcome. Presentation and discussion of current problem areas and research by advanced doctoral students, faculty members, and visitors.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1154, "title": "M.R.P. Exit Project: Research Paper-Research", "code": "CRP 8901", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A student preparing a Research Paper (as defined by the Department of City and Regional Planning) to satisfy the M.R.P. Exit Project Requirement must complete this course and CRP 8902. A student will use CRP 8901 for conducting research for the Research Paper. A student may not earn any credit connected to his/her Research Paper beyond that awarded for completion of CRP 8901 and CRP 8902.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1155, "title": "M.R.P. Exit Project: Research Paper-Writing", "code": "CRP 8902", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A student preparing a Research Paper (as defined by the Department of City and Regional Planning) to satisfy the M.R.P. Exit Project requirement must complete this course and CRP 8901. A student will use CRP 8902 for writing the Research Paper. A student may not earn any credit connected to his/her Research paper beyond that awardee for completion of CRP 8901\u00a0and CRP 8902.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1156, "title": "M.R.P. Exit Project: Professional Report-Research", "code": "CRP 8903", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A student preparing a Professional Report (as defined by the Department of City and Regional Planning) to satisfy the M.R.P. Exit Project Requirement must complete this course and CRP 8904. A student will use CRP 8903 for conducting research for the Professional Report. A student may not earn any credit connected to his/her Professional Report beyond that awarded for completion of CRP 8903 and CRP 8904.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1157, "title": "M.R.P. Exit Project: Professional Report-Writing", "code": "CRP 8904", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A student preparing a Professional Report (as defined by the Department of City and Regional Planning) to satisfy the M.R.P. Exit Project Requirement must complete this course and CRP 8903. A student will use CRP 8904 for writing the Professional Report. A student may not earn any credit connected to his/her Professional Report beyond that awarded for completion of CRP 8903\u00a0and CRP 8904.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1158, "title": "M.R.P. Exit Project: Thesis-Research", "code": "CRP 8905", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A student preparing a Thesis (as defined by the Department of City and Regional Planning) to satisfy the M.R.P. Exit Project Requirement must complete this course and CRP 8906. A student will use CRP 8905 for conducting research for the Thesis. A student may not earn any credit connected to his/her Thesis beyond that awarded for completion of CRP 8905 and CRP 8906.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1159, "title": "M.R.P. Exit Project: Thesis-Writing", "code": "CRP 8906", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "A student preparing a Thesis (as defined by the Department of City and Regional Planning) to satisfy the M.R.P. Exit Project Requirement must complete this course and CRP 8905. A student will use CRP 8906 for writing the Thesis. A student may not earn any credit connected to his/her Thesis beyond that awarded for completion of CRP 8905\u00a0and CRP 8906.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1160, "title": "Masters Thesis in Regional Science", "code": "CRP 8910", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1161, "title": "Masters Thesis in Historic Preservation Planning", "code": "CRP 8950", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1162, "title": "Doctoral Dissertation", "code": "CRP 9920", "subject": "CRP", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "CRP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1163, "title": "Introduction to Computing Using Python", "code": "CS 1110", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Programming and problem solving using Python. Emphasizes principles of software development, style, and testing. Topics include procedures and functions, iteration, recusion, arrays and vectors, strings, an operational model of procedure and function calls, algorithms, exceptions, object-oriented programming, and GUIs (graphical user interfaces). Weekly labs provide guided practice on the computer, with staff present to help. Assignments use graphics and GUIs to help develop fluency and understanding.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1164, "title": "Introduction to Computing Using MATLAB", "code": "CS 1112", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Programming and problem solving using MATLAB. Emphasizes the systematic development of algorithms and programs. Topics include iteration, functions, arrays, recursion, object-oriented programming, and MATLAB graphics. Assignments are designed to build an appreciation for complexity, dimension, fuzzy data, inexact arithmetic, randomness, simulation, and the role of approximation.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1165, "title": "Short Course in MATLAB", "code": "CS 1132", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Introduction to the MATLAB programming language. Covers the basic programming constructs of MATLAB, including assignment, conditionals, iteration, functions, arrays, vectorized computation, and scientific graphics. Designed for students who need MATLAB for research or other courses. Does not assume any previous programming experience.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1166, "title": "Short Course in Python", "code": "CS 1133", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Introduction to the Python programming language. Covers the basic programming constructs of Python, including assignment, conditionals, iteration, functions, object-oriented design, arrays, and vectorized computation. Designed for students who need Python for research or other courses. Does not assume any previous programming experience.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1167, "title": "Introductory Design and Programming for the Web", "code": "CS 1300", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The World Wide Web is both a technology and a pervasive and powerful resource in our society and culture. To build functional and effective web sites, students need technical and design skills as well as analytical skills for understanding who is using the web, in what ways they are using it, and for what purposes. In this course, students develop skills in all three of these areas through the use of technologies such as XHTML, Cascading Stylesheets, and PHP. Students study how web sites are deployed and used, usability issues on the web, user-centered design, and methods for visual layout and information architecture. Through the web, this course provides an introduction to the interdisciplinary field of information science.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1168, "title": "Choices and Consequences in Computing", "code": "CS 1340", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Computing requires difficult choices that can have serious implications for real people. This course covers a range of ethical, societal, and policy implications of computing and information. It draws on recent developments in digital technology and their impact on society, situating these in the context of fundamental principles from computing, policy, ethics, and the social sciences. A particular emphasis will be placed on large areas in which advances in computing have consistently raised societal challenges: privacy of individual data; fairness in algorithmic decision-making; dissemination of online content; and accountability in the design of computing systems. As this is an area in which the pace of technological development raises new challenges on a regular basis, the broader goal of the course is to enable students to develop their own analyses of new situations as they emerge at the interface of computing and societal interests.", "tags": "KCM-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1169, "title": "Data Science for All", "code": "CS 1380", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to data science. Given data from economics, medicine, biology, or physics, collected from internet denizens, survey respondents, or wireless sensors, how can one understand the phenomenon generating the data, make predictions, and improve decisions? We focus on building skills in inferential thinking and computational thinking, guided by the practical questions we seek to answer. The course teaches critical concepts and skills in computer programming and statistical inference, in conjunction with hands-on analysis of real-world datasets including economic data, document collections, geographical data, and social networks. We will also consider social issues in data analysis such as privacy and design.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1170, "title": "Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "CS 1710", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the science of the mind.\u00a0 Everyone knows what it's like to think and perceive, but this subjective experience provides little insight into how minds emerge from physical intities like brains.\u00a0 To address this issue, cognitive science integrates work from at least five disciplines: Psychology, Neuroscience, Computer Science, Linguistics, and Philosophy.\u00a0 This course introduces students to the insights these disciplines offer into the workings of the mind by exploring visual perception, attention, memory, learning, problem solving, language, and consciousness.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1171, "title": "Freshmen and Nontechnical Team Projects", "code": "CS 1998", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Freshmen and Nontechnical Team Projects.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1172, "title": "UNIX Tools and Scripting", "code": "CS 2043", "subject": "CS", "descr": "UNIX and UNIX-like systems are increasingly being used on personal computers, mobile phones, web servers, and many other systems. They represent a wonderful family of programming environments useful both to computer scientists and to people in many other fields, such as computational biology and computational linguistics, in which data is naturally represented by strings. This course takes students from shell basics and piping, to regular-expression processing tools, to shell scripting and Python. Other topics to be covered include handling concurrent and remote resources, manipulating streams and files, and managing software installations.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1173, "title": "Object-Oriented Programming and Data Structures", "code": "CS 2110", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Intermediate programming in a high-level language and introduction to computer science. Topics include object-oriented programming (classes, objects, subclasses, types), graphical user interfaces, algorithm analysis (asymptotic complexity, big \"O\" notation), recursion, testing, program correctness (loop invariants), searching/sorting, data structures (lists, trees, stacks, queues, heaps, search trees, hash tables, graphs), graph algorithms. Java is the principal programming language.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1174, "title": "Programming Practicum", "code": "CS 2111", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Meets weekly for one hour, in collaboration with CS 2110. Designed to enhance understanding of object-oriented programming, use of the application for writing Java programs, and other programming issues, as well as theoretical concepts that arise in CS 2110. The hour is spent in ways appropriate to the material under study -lecture, question-answer session, problem solving in small groups, one-on-one help, etc.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1175, "title": "Intermediate Design and Programming for the Web", "code": "CS 2300", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Web programming requires the cooperation of two machines: the one in front of the viewer (client) and the one delivering the content (server).\u00a0INFO 1300\u00a0concentrates almost exclusively on the client side. The main emphasis in INFO 2300 is learning about server side processing. Students begin with a short overview of the PHP server-side scripting language, then look at interactions with databases, learning about querying via the database language SQL. Through a succession of projects, students learn how to apply this understanding to the creation of an interactive, data-driven site via PHP and the MYSQL database. Also considered are technologies such as Javascript and Ajax and techniques to enhance security and privacy. Design and usability issues are emphasized. A major component of the course is the creation of a substantial web site.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1176, "title": "Excursions in Computational Sustainability", "code": "CS 2770", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Balancing environmental, economic, and societal needs for a sustainable future encompasses problems of unprecedented size and complexity. Computing and information science can play an important role in addressing critical sustainability challenges faced by present and future generations. The goal of the course is to introduce students to a range of sustainability challenges and to computational methods that can help address such challenges. Sustainability topics include sustainable development, biodiversity and wildlife conservation, poverty mitigation, food security, renewable resources, energy, transportation, and climate change. In the context of these sustainability topics, the course will introduce students to mathematical and computational modeling techniques, algorithms, and statistical methods. The course is at the introductory undergraduate level. Students are expected to have basic knowledge of probability theory and calculus.", "tags": "SBA-AG|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1177, "title": "Discrete Structures", "code": "CS 2800", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Covers the mathematics that underlies most of computer science. Topics include mathematical induction; logical proof; propositional and predicate calculus; combinatorics and discrete mathematics; some basic elements of basic probability theory; basic number theory; sets, functions, and relations; graphs; and finite-state machines. These topics are discussed in the context of applications to many areas of computer science, such as the RSA cryptosystem and web searching.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1178, "title": "Data Structures and Functional Programming", "code": "CS 3110", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Advanced programming course that emphasizes functional programming techniques and data structures. Programming topics include recursive and higher-order procedures, models of programming language evaluation and compilation, type systems, and polymorphism. Data structures and algorithms covered include graph algorithms, balanced trees, memory heaps, and garbage collection. Also covers techniques for analyzing program performance and correctness.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1179, "title": "Introduction to Computer Game Architecture", "code": "CS 3152", "subject": "CS", "descr": "A project-based course in which programmers and designers collaborate to make a computer game. This course investigates the theory and practice of developing computer games from a blend of technical, aesthetic, and cultural perspectives. Technical aspects of game architecture include software engineering, artificial intelligence, game physics, computer graphics, and networking. Aesthetic and cultural include art and modeling, sound and music, game balance, and player experience.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1180, "title": "Data-Driven Web Applications", "code": "CS 3300", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course will introduce students to working with data in the context of modern web applications. These include data representation with relational and non-relational databases, data mining to find patterns and make predictions, and graphical presentation for visualization.", "tags": "SDS-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1181, "title": "Computer System Organization and Programming", "code": "CS 3410", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Introduction to computer organization, systems programming and the hardware/ software interface. Topics include instruction sets, computer arithmetic, datapath design, data formats, addressing modes, memory hierarchies including caches and virtual memory, I/O devices, bus-based I/O systems, and multicore architectures. Students learn assembly language programming and design a pipelined RISC processor.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1182, "title": "Embedded Systems", "code": "CS 3420", "subject": "CS", "descr": "An introduction to the design of embedded systems, with an emphasis on understanding the interaction between hardware, software, and the physical world. Topics covered include assembly language programming, interrupts, I/O, concurrency management, scheduling, resource management, and real-time constraints.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1183, "title": "Autonomous Mobile Robots", "code": "CS 3758", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Creating robots capable of performing complex tasks autonomously requires one to address a variety of different challenges such as sensing, perception, control, planning, mechanical design, and interaction with humans. In recent years many advances have been made toward creating such systems, both in the research community (different robot challenges and competitions) and in industry (industrial, military, and domestic robots). This course gives an overview of the challenges and techniques used for creating autonomous mobile robots. Topics include sensing, localization, mapping, path planning, motion planning, obstacle and collision avoidance, and multi-robot control.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1184, "title": "Teaching Experience in Computer Science", "code": "CS 4090", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Earn course credit for working as a consultant or ugrad TA in a computer science course.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1185, "title": "Introduction to Compilers", "code": "CS 4120", "subject": "CS", "descr": "An introduction to the specification and implementation of modern compilers. Topics covered include lexical scanning, parsing, type checking, code generation and translation, an introduction to program analysis and optimization, and compile-time and run-time support for modern programming languages. As part of the course, students will build a working compiler for an object-oriented language.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1186, "title": "Practicum in Compilers", "code": "CS 4121", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Students will build a working compiler for an object-oriented language.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1187, "title": "Advanced Topics in Computer Game Architecture", "code": "CS 4152", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Project-based follow-up course to CS 3152. Students work in a multidisciplinary team to develop a game that incorporates innovative game technology. Advanced topics include 3D game development, mobile platforms, multiplayer gaming, and nontraditional input devices. There is a special emphasis on developing games that can be submitted to festivals and competitions.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1188, "title": "Numerical Analysis: Linear and Nonlinear Problems", "code": "CS 4220", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Introduction to the fundamentals of numerical linear algebra: direct and iterative methods for linear systems, eigenvalue problems, singular value decomposition. In the second half of the course, the above are used to build iterative methods for nonlinear systems and for multivariate optimization. Strong emphasis is placed on understanding the advantages, disadvantages, and limits of applicability for all the covered techniques. Computer programming is required to test the theoretical concepts throughout the course.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1189, "title": "Language and Information", "code": "CS 4300", "subject": "CS", "descr": "How to make sense of the vast amounts of information available online, and how to relate it and to the social context in which it appears? This course introduces basic tools for retrieving and analyzing unstructured textual information from the web and social media. Applications include information retrieval (with human feedback),\u00a0sentiment analysis, and social analysis of text. The coursework will include\u00a0programming projects that play on the interaction between knowledge and social factors.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1190, "title": "Operating Systems", "code": "CS 4410", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Introduction to the design of systems programs, with emphasis on multiprogrammed operating systems. Topics include concurrency, synchronization, deadlocks, memory management, protection, input-output methods, networking, file systems and security. The impact of network and distributed computing environments on operating systems is also discussed.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1191, "title": "Practicum in Operating Systems", "code": "CS 4411", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Studies the practical aspects of operating systems through the design and implementation of an operating system kernel that supports multiprogramming, virtual memory, and various input-output devices. All the programming for the project is in a high-level language.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1192, "title": "Introduction to Computer Networks", "code": "CS 4450", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course introduces the basic architectural and design principles of computer networking including the design of communication protocols, congestion control, routing and switching, Internet, data center networks and wireless networks.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1193, "title": "Introduction to Computer Vision", "code": "CS 4670", "subject": "CS", "descr": "An in-depth introduction to computer vision. The goal of computer vision is to compute properties of our world-the 3D shape of an environment, the motion of objects, the names of people or things-through analysis of digital images or videos. \u00a0The course covers a range of topics, including 3D reconstruction, image segmentation, object recognition, and vision algorithms fro the Internet, as well as key algorithmic, optimization, and machine learning techniques, such as graph cuts, non-linear least squares, and deep learning. \u00a0This course emphasizes hands-on experience with computer vision, and several large programming projects.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1194, "title": "Foundations of Artificial Intelligence", "code": "CS 4700", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Challenging introduction to the major subareas and current research directions in artificial intelligence. Topics include: knowledge representation, heuristic search, problem solving, natural-language processing, game-playing, logic and deduction, planning, and machine learning.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1195, "title": "Practicum in Artificial Intelligence", "code": "CS 4701", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Project portion of CS 4700. Topics include knowledge representation systems, search procedures, game-playing, automated reasoning, concept learning, reinforcement learning, neural nets, genetics algorithms, planning, and truth maintenance.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1196, "title": "Computational Linguistics", "code": "CS 4744", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Computational models of natural languages. Topics include tree syntax and treebank databases; broad-coverage probabilistic grammars; finite state generative phonology; computational semantics; computational minimalist grammar; finite state optimality-theoretic phonology; Hidden Markov models of acoustic realization; text and speech corpora; lab methods in Unix/Linux environment.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1197, "title": "Introduction to Machine Learning", "code": "CS 4780", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The course provides an introduction to machine learning, focusing on supervised learning and its theoretical foundations. Topics include regularized linear models, boosting, kernels, deep networks, generative models, online learning, and ethical questions arising in ML applications.", "tags": "SDS-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1198, "title": "Principles of Large-Scale Machine Learning Systems", "code": "CS 4787", "subject": "CS", "descr": "An introduction to the mathematical and algorithms design principles and tradeoffs that underlie large-scale machine learning on big training sets. Topics include: stochastic gradient descent and other scalable optimization methods, mini-batch training, accelerated methods, adaptive learning rates, parallel and distributed training, and quantization and model compression.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1199, "title": "Introduction to Reinforcement Learning", "code": "CS 4789", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Reinforcement Learning is one of the most popular paradigms for modelling interactive learning and sequential decision making. This course introduces the basics of Reinforcement Learning. The course will cover basics of Markov Decision Process, Planning and Learning in Markov Decision Processes. We will discuss potential applications of Reinforcement Learning. We will study and implement classic Reinforcement Learning algorithms.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1200, "title": "Introduction to Computational Complexity", "code": "CS 4814", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Explores the power and limitations of efficient computation. Understanding\u00a0how the notion of efficient\u00a0computation changes with respect to resources such as time, space, randomness, advice, and interaction.\u00a0Concrete computational models that we will study will include Turing machines, Boolean circuits, Decision trees, and Branching Programs. Advanced topics may include error-correcting codes,\u00a0probabilistic checkable proofs, and circuit lower bounds.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1201, "title": "Introduction to Analysis of Algorithms", "code": "CS 4820", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Develops techniques used in the design and analysis of algorithms, with an emphasis on problems arising in computing applications. Example applications are drawn from systems and networks, artificial intelligence, computer vision, data mining, and computational biology. This course covers four major algorithm design techniques (greedy algorithms, divide-and-conquer, dynamic programming, and network flow), undecidability and NP-completeness, and algorithmic techniques for intractable problems (including identification of structured special cases , approximation algorithms, local search heuristics, and online algorithms).", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1202, "title": "Introduction to Cryptography", "code": "CS 4830", "subject": "CS", "descr": "A rigorous introduction to the theoretical foundations of the cryptography\u00a0that powers much of the modern world. Topics include one-way functions, secret-key encryption, zero-knowledge proofs, signatures, public-key encryption etc.\u00a0As this is a theoretical class, the emphasis will be on formal definitions and proofs.", "tags": "SMR-AS|CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1203, "title": "Networks II: Market Design", "code": "CS 4852", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Networks II builds on its prerequisite course and continues to examine how each of the computing, economic, sociological and natural worlds are connected and how the structure of these connections affects these worlds. In this course, we will construct mathematical models for and analyze networked settings, allowing us to both make predictions about behavior in such systems, as well as reason about how to design such systems to exhibit some desirable behavior. Throughout, we will draw on real-world examples such as social networks, peer-to-peer filesharing, Internet markets, and crowdsourcing, that illustrate these phenomena.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1204, "title": "Practical Training in Computer Science", "code": "CS 4997", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This independent study course offers CS majors (i.e., undergraduates whose applications to affiliate with the CS major have been approved)\u00a0an opportunity to reflect on concepts from computer science as they were encountered and applied in a recent internship. Students write a short paper describing their work experience and how it connects to the educational objectives of the computer science major.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1205, "title": "Team Projects", "code": "CS 4998", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Advanced independent work in computer science as part of a student-led team project.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1206, "title": "Independent Reading and Research", "code": "CS 4999", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Independent reading and research for undergraduates.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1207, "title": "Algorithms and Data Structures for Applications", "code": "CS 5112", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Fundamental algorithms and data structures used in current applications. Algorithms include graph algorithms, hashing and streaming/sketching techniques. Applications will include selected topics in computer vision, image processing and machine learning.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1208, "title": "Network Programming Languages", "code": "CS 5114", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to novel programming languages for controlling computer networks. It will examine recent proposals based on logic, functional, and streaming languages, as well as tools for establishing the correctness of programs written in such languages using SAT/SMT solvers, model checkers, and proof assistants. Evaluation will be based on class participation and projects.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1209, "title": "Introduction to Compilers", "code": "CS 5120", "subject": "CS", "descr": "An introduction to the specification and implementation of modern compilers. Topics covered include lexical scanning, parsing, type checking, code generation and translation, an introduction to program analysis and optimization, and compile-time and run-time support for modern programming languages. As part of the course, students will build a working compiler for an object-oriented language.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1210, "title": "Practicum in Compilers", "code": "CS 5121", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Students will build a working compiler for an object-oriented language.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1211, "title": "Software Testing", "code": "CS 5154", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Software testing is a widely used approach for detecting flaws in software. Systematic and organized approaches to software testing will be covered, including test adequacy criteria, manual and automatic generation of test inputs, regression testing, debugging, and dynamic analyses for detecting known classes of software errors.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1212, "title": "Building Startup Systems", "code": "CS 5356", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course aims to bridge the gap between academic studies of computer science and production software engineering. The course provides a fast-paced introduction to key tools and techniques that can facilitate the building of prototypes and of actual working systems. It introduces technologies for building Web applications and mobile applications, systems for effective storage of data, and tools that support and ease code writing, such as distributed version-control systems, editors and debuggers.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1213, "title": "Cloud Computing", "code": "CS 5412", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Focuses on cloud computing, large-scale Internet applications, and other practical issues in designing and implementing trustworthy, scalable distributed software.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1214, "title": "Developing and Designing Interactive Devices", "code": "CS 5424", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the human-centered and technical workings behind interactive devices ranging from cell phones and video controllers to household appliances and smart cars. This is a hands-on, lab-based course. For the final project, students will build a functional IoT prototype of their own design, using Javascript, single-board Linux computer, embedded microcontrollers, and other electronic components. Topics include electronics prototyping, interface prototyping, sensors and actuators, microcontroller development, physical prototyping, and user testing.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1215, "title": "Advanced System Security", "code": "CS 5432", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course is concerned with system security solutions that build on ideas from logic, programming languages, and distributed systems. Topics include: information-flow policies and enforcement (static and dynamic), authorization logics, measured principals, distributed trust, and moving-target defenses. Some homework assignments could involve programming.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1216, "title": "Privacy in the Digital Age", "code": "CS 5436", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course introduces students to privacy technologies and surveys the current state of digital privacy from multiple perspectives, including technology, law, policy, ethics, economics, and surveillance.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1217, "title": "Interactive Computer Graphics", "code": "CS 5625", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Methods for interactive computer graphics, targeting applications including games, visualization, design, and immersive environments. Introduces students to state-of-the-art interactive techniques and programmable shading. Programming assignments use C++ and OpenGL, and students also propose and implement an open-ended final project.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1218, "title": "Introduction to Computer Vision", "code": "CS 5670", "subject": "CS", "descr": "An in-depth introduction to computer vision. The goal of computer vision is to compute properties of our world-the 3D shape of an environment, the motion of objects, the names of people or things-through analysis of digital images or videos. \u00a0The course covers a range of topics, including 3D reconstruction, image segmentation, object recognition, and vision algorithms from the Internet, as well as key algorithmic, optimization, and machine learning techniques, such as graph cuts, non-linear least squares, and deep learning. \u00a0This course emphasizes hands-on experience with computer vision and several large programming projects.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1219, "title": "Topics in Mixed Reality", "code": "CS 5678", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Head-worn mixed reality devices require real-time computer vision for multiple purposes, such as motion tracking, scene understanding, and interaction input. This course presents a hands-on overview of these computer vision techniques for mixed reality, from monocular pose estimation to stereo-view hand tracking, and scene reconstruction with depth sensors and multiple cameras. Fundamental approaches as well as current challenges, from geometric vision to learning-based approaches, are presented in the context of mixed reality, with readings from textbooks and relevant papers. Students will complete three individual assignments and one group project, in the form of mixed reality research prototypes and conference-style report.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1220, "title": "Natural Language Processing", "code": "CS 5740", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course constitutes an introduction to natural language processing (NLP), the goal of which is to enable computers to use human languages as input, output, or both. NLP is at the heart of many of today's most exciting technological achievements, including machine translation, automatic conversational assistants and Internet search. Possible topics include: methods for handling underlying linguistic phenomena (e.g., syntactic analysis, word sense disambiguation and discourse analysis) and vital emerging applications (e.g., machine translation, sentiment analysis, summarization and information extraction).", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1221, "title": "Introduction to Machine Learning", "code": "CS 5780", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The course provides an introduction to machine learning, focusing on supervised learning and its theoretical foundations. Topics include regularized linear models, boosting, kernels, deep networks, generative models, online learning, and ethical questions arising in ML applications.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1222, "title": "Deep Learning", "code": "CS 5787", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Students will learn deep neural network fundamentals, including, but not limited to, feed-forward neural networks, convolutional neural networks, network architecture, optimization methods, practical issues, hardware concerns, recurrent neural networks, dataset acquisition, dataset bias, adversarial examples, current limitations of deep learning, and visualization techniques. We still study applications to problems in computer vision and to a lesser extent natural language processing and reinforcement learning. There will also be a session on understanding publications in deep learning, which is a critical skill in this fast moving area.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1223, "title": "Introduction to Reinforcement Learning", "code": "CS 5789", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Reinforcement Learning is one of the most popular paradigms for modelling interactive learning and sequential decision making. This course introduces the basics of Reinforcement Learning. The course will cover basics of Markov Decision Process, Planning and Learning in Markov Decision Processes. We will discuss potential applications of Reinforcement Learning. We will study and implement classic Reinforcement Learning algorithms.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1224, "title": "Decision Theory I", "code": "CS 5846", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Research on decision theory resides in a variety of disciplines including computer science, economics, game theory, philosophy, and psychology. This course attempts to integrate these various approaches. The course is taught jointly by faculty from Game Theory and Computer Science. The course covers several areas: (1) basic decision theory. This theory, sometimes known as \"rational choice theory,\" is part of the foundation for the disciplines listed above. It applies to decisions made by individuals or by machines; (2) the limitations of and problems with this theory. Issues discussed here include decision theory paradoxes revealed by experiments, cognitive and knowledge limitations, and computational issues; (3) new research designed in response to these difficulties. Issues covered include alternative approaches to the foundations of decision theory, adaptive behavior and shaping the individual decisions by aggregate/evolutionary forces and more computationally based approaches.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1225, "title": "Networks and Markets", "code": "CS 5854", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The course examines how the computing, economic and sociological worlds are connected and how these connections affects these worlds. Tools from computer science, game theory and mathematics are introduced and then used to analyze network structures present in everyday life. Topics covered include social networks, web search, auctions, markets, voting, and crypto-currencies (e.g. bitcoin).", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1226, "title": "Master of Engineering Internship", "code": "CS 5998", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Off-campus internship with industry in which a student gains knowledge and experience in the field of computer science.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1227, "title": "Master of Engineering Project", "code": "CS 5999", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Independent or group project under the direction of a CS field member or researcher. Projects involve the development of a computer science application (software or hardware) useful in exploring and/or solving an engineering problem with a computer science focus.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1228, "title": "Advanced Programming Languages", "code": "CS 6110", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Study of programming paradigms: functional, imperative, concurrent, and probabilistic programming. Mathematical foundations: inductive definitions, fixed points, and formal semantics. Models of programming languages including the lambda calculus. Type systems, polymorphism, modules, and object-oriented constructs. Program transformations, program logic, and applications to programming methodology.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1229, "title": "Network Programming Languages", "code": "CS 6114", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to novel programming languages for controlling computer networks. It will examine recent proposals based on logic, functional, and streaming languages, as well as tools for establishing the correctness of programs written in such languages using SAT/SMT solvers, model checkers, and proof assistants. Evaluation will be based on class participation and projects.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1230, "title": "Data-Sparse Matrix Computations", "code": "CS 6220", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Matrices and linear systems can be data-sparse in a wide variety of ways, and we can often leverage such underlying structure to perform matrix computations efficiently. This course will discuss several varieties of structured problems and associated algorithms. Example topics include randomized algorithms for numerical linear algebra, Krylov subspace methods, sparse recovery, and assorted matrix factorizations.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1231, "title": "Numerical Methods for Data Science", "code": "CS 6241", "subject": "CS", "descr": "A discussion of numerical methods in the context of data analysis, machine learning, and network science problems. The course will focus on matrix and tensor decompositions, numerical algorithms for graph data, least squares, regression, and iterative methods.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1232, "title": "Advanced Database Systems", "code": "CS 6320", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Covers a variety of advanced issues ranging from transaction management to query processing to data mining. Involves extensive paper reading and discussion.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1233, "title": "Computation for Content Creation", "code": "CS 6682", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course will focus on computational tools and methods for content creation in different domains. We will cover methods used in interactive artistic applications (visual arts, film, music, video games) as well as domains where complete automation is the goal (e.g., photometric reconstruction and image-based rendering, data augmentation). The course will involve a mix of lectures given by the instructor and presentations/discussions about research papers that will be assigned to students. Topics will include: different representations of images (e.g., vector and raster graphics), 3D models (e.g., surface manifolds vs volumetric representations), and audio (e.g., time signals vs short-time spectra), as well as parametric control of these representations and their relation to other types of data.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1234, "title": "Advanced Artificial Intelligence", "code": "CS 6700", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Covers a variety of areas in AI, including knowledge representation, automated reasoning, learning, game-playing, and planning, with an emphasis on computational issues.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1235, "title": "Advanced Language Technologies", "code": "CS 6740", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Graduate-level introduction to technologies for the computational treatment of information in human-language form, covering modern natural-language processing (NLP) and/or information retrieval (IR). Possible topics include language modeling, word embeddings,\u00a0text categorization and clustering, information extraction, computational syntactic and semantic formalisms, grammar induction, machine translation,\u00a0latent semantic analysis (LSI), and\u00a0clickthrough data for web search.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1236, "title": "Topics in Natural Language Processing and Machine Learning", "code": "CS 6741", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Robust language understanding has the potential to transform how we interact with computers, extract information from text and study language on large scale. This research-oriented course examines machine learning and inference methods for recovering language structure and meaning. Possible topics include structured prediction and deep learning, methods for situated language understanding, language grounding, and learning to generate text.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1237, "title": "Human-Robot Interaction: Algorithms and Experiments", "code": "CS 6754", "subject": "CS", "descr": "As robots move from factory floors and battlefields into homes, offices, schools, and hospitals, how can we build robotic systems made for human interaction?\u00a0 Course will cover core engineering, computational, and experimental techniques in human-robot interaction (HRI). Lectures will cover key algorithms in Probabilistic Robotics, including Bayesian Networks, Markov Models, HMMs, Kalman and Particle Filters, MDP and POMPD, Supervised Learning, and Reinforcement Learning. Seminal and recent papers in HRI will be discussed, including topics such as: generating intentional action, reasoning about humans, social navigation, teamwork and collaboration, machine learning with humans in the loop, and human-robot dialog. Students will learn methods for designing and analyzing HRI experiments.\u00a0 Presentation of papers in class, and an HRI-related research project in teams will be required.\u00a0 Intended for M.Eng to PhD students from multiple disciplines including MAE, CS, ECE and IS.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1238, "title": "Deep Probabilistic and Generative Models", "code": "CS 6785", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Generative models are a class of machine learning algorithms that define probability distributions over complex, high-dimensional objects such as images, sequences, and graphs. Recent advances in deep neural networks and optimization algorithms have significantly enhanced the capabilities of these models and renewed research interest in them. This course explores the foundational probabilistic principles of deep generative models, their learning algorithms, and popular model families, which include variational autoencoders, generative adversarial networks, autoregressive models, and normalizing flows. The course also covers applications in domains such as computer vision, natural language processing, and biomedicine, and draws connections to the field of reinforcement learning.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1239, "title": "Advanced Topic Modeling", "code": "CS 6788", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Statistical topic models such as LDA provide a powerful tool for discovering themes in large unlabeled text corpora. They are increasingly popular in a wide range of fields, both as a data-driven alternative to manual document coding methods, and also as an example of a difficult but tractable problem in statistical inference. This course will cover Bayesian model construction, inference techniques, evaluation, and applications beyond text such as community detection in networks and population admixture in genetics.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1240, "title": "Logics of Programs", "code": "CS 6860", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Topics in type theory as a foundation for programming languages and computing theory. The key prerequisites are CS 6110\u00a0and CS 4810. Topics will include: semantics of programming languages and logics, constructive and intuitionistic logics, the propositions-as-types principle, extracting proofs from programs, Hoare logics and Kleene algebras for reasoning about programs, computational complexity in type theory, formal relationships among type theories and programming logics, inductive and co-inductive types.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1241, "title": "Computer Science Colloquium", "code": "CS 7090", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Weekly meeting for the discussion and study of important topics in the field.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1242, "title": "Seminar in Programming Languages", "code": "CS 7190", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The Programming Languages Discussion Group meets weekly to discuss papers in the area of programming languages, program analysis, and compilers. The goal is to encourage interactions and discussions between students, researchers, and faculty with interests in this area. The seminar is open to everybody interested in languages and compilers. First-year and second-year students are especially encouraged to participate.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1243, "title": "Great Works in Programming Languages", "code": "CS 7194", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This seminar covers classic papers in the area of programming languages. The goal is to give students an in-depth introduction to some of the most important ideas in the field, to provide a foundation for advanced research. Participants will be expected to read one or two papers each week, and to lead one presentation each semester. The seminar is open to everybody interested in programming languages. First and second-year graduate students are especially encouraged to participate.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1244, "title": "Seminar on Scientific Computing and Numerics", "code": "CS 7290", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Talks on various methods in scientific computing, the analysis of their convergence properties and computational efficiency, and their adaptation to specific applications.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1245, "title": "Systems Research Seminar", "code": "CS 7490", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The Systems Research Seminar discusses recent, interesting papers in the systems area, broadly defined to span operating systems, distributed systems, networking, architecture, databases, security, and programming languages. The goal is to foster technical discussions among the Cornell systems research community.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1246, "title": "Computer Security Seminar", "code": "CS 7493", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This is a graduate seminar primarily aimed at Ph.D. students. Students will read, present, and discuss recent and classic papers in the computer security area. Outside speakers will also be invited to present current research.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1247, "title": "Computer Graphics and Vision Seminar", "code": "CS 7690", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The Graphics/Vision Research Seminar discusses recent research in the areas of computer graphics and computer vision. The goal is to foster technical discussions and collaboration among the Cornell graphics and vision research community.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1248, "title": "Seminar in Artificial Intelligence", "code": "CS 7790", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The AI seminar will meet weekly for lectures by graduate students, faculty, and researchers emphasizing work-in-progress and recent results in AI research.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1249, "title": "Seminar in Natural Language Understanding", "code": "CS 7794", "subject": "CS", "descr": "This course, the NLP seminar, is a weekly meeting for people currently or soon to be actively doing research in NLP. (Students simply looking to learn more about NLP should not enroll, but should take one of our lecture courses instead.) One participant leads discussion each week, either of a recently published paper or of their own work in progress. Attendance at all sessions is mandatory.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1250, "title": "Seminar in Theory of Algorithms and Computing", "code": "CS 7890", "subject": "CS", "descr": "The theory seminar will meet weekly for lectures by graduate students, faculty, and researchers emphasizing work-in-progress and recent results related to theory of computing.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1251, "title": "Independent Research", "code": "CS 7999", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Independent research for CS PhD students who have not yet passed their A-exam.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1252, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "CS 9999", "subject": "CS", "descr": "Doctoral research.", "tags": "CS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1253, "title": "Elementary Czech II", "code": "CZECH 1132", "subject": "CZECH", "descr": "This course aims to expand basic proficiency in understanding, reading, speaking, and writing the Czech language.\u00a0 The course works through a selection of dialogues, texts and exercises to develop mastery of the most essential idiomatic vocabulary and grammatical structures necessary for basic communications in Czech and for laying a solid foundation for further study of the language.", "tags": "CZECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1254, "title": "Intermediate Czech II", "code": "CZECH 1134", "subject": "CZECH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "CZECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1255, "title": "Career Explorations", "code": "DEA 1050", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Survey course for students interested in careers that influence habitat and human behavior. Careers may include employment in the fields of design (user experience design, interaction design, interior architecture, etc.), design strategy and consulting, ergonomics, facility planning, business, and real estate. Experts and young alumni representing these disciplines discuss their work while addressing current issues, trends, key skill sets, and career opportunities (especially those favoring the knowledge and skill sets that the curriculum of Design and Environmental Analysis supports to develop).", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1256, "title": "Design Graphics and Visualization", "code": "DEA 1150", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course immerses students in the act and art of design communication.\u00a0 Students focus on a series of exercises covering both manual and digital visualization techniques to effectively present and communicate ideas to oneself and others. Students will become experienced with Adobe Suite (Photoshop, Illustrator, InDesign), AutoCAD, SketchUp and Revit software applications in addition to manual hand skill development (sketching, drafting, rendering).", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1257, "title": "Art and Science: Sustainability, Multiculturalism and Transdisciplinarity", "code": "DEA 2200", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "The relationship between art and science has been thoroughly discussed by philosophers.\u00a0 This course will review the discussion on this topic and investigate the role of art/science in a variety of professions and its role in creativity. Sustainability, multiculturalism and transdisciplinarity will be explored as manifestations of integrated minds and communities.", "tags": "D-HE|LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1258, "title": "StudioShift", "code": "DEA 2203", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Temporal spaces dominate the interior landscape at this point in history, reflecting the fleeting nature of information in a society consumed with momentary experiences. This studio will both expand and contract notions of spatial/environmental communication through brand-forward environments, exhibit-forward environments, and social advocacy experiences.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1259, "title": "Lighting Design: Light InForming Space", "code": "DEA 2750", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Light brings both necessity and nuance to the built environment, creating functional spaces and conjuring apparitions in perception, scale, time and sensory impulses.\u00a0 Developing a working knowledge of lighting design while seeking light as a transformative element, students will create lighting design / documentation and build light fixtures.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1260, "title": "Construction Documentation: CAD and BIM", "code": "DEA 3050", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "A continuous dialogue between the idea for an interior space and the reality of its final built form is contained within construction documents, also known as working drawings and specifications. Students study the history of architectural documentation, the organization of construction drawings, schedules, and specifications, and the detailing of interior elements and construction methods by touring a local millwork shop. Each student completes a comprehensive set of construction documents.\u00a0 Student must be experienced with AutoCad.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1261, "title": "Hospitality, Health and Design Industry Immersion Seminar", "code": "DEA 3055", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course provides students the opportunity to learn directly from invited industry speakers with expertise in a spectrum of industries that link health, wellness, senior living with hospitality and design thinking.\u00a0 The speakers share their views on business, managerial, career, and other critical industry-related issues.", "tags": "LAD-HE|SBA-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1262, "title": "Positive Design Studio", "code": "DEA 3308", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This 4-credit studio-based course focuses on the practice of 'Positive Design'\u2014design that aims to proactively promote or support the well-being of individuals or communities by evoking valuable experiences.", "tags": "KCM-HE|LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1263, "title": "Research Methods in Human-Environment Relations", "code": "DEA 3550", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Develops students' understanding and competence in the use of research and analytical tools to study the relationship between the physical environment and human behavior. Emphasizes evaluation of internal and external validity as well as measurement reliability and validity. Topics include research design, unobtrusive and obtrusive data-collecting tools, the processing of data, and effective communication of empirical research findings. Students will need to see instructor for section assignments.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1264, "title": "Directed Readings", "code": "DEA 4000", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves library research and independent reading.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1265, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "DEA 4010", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves data collection and analysis or laboratory or studio projects.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1266, "title": "Supervised Fieldwork", "code": "DEA 4020", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that involves both responsible participation in a community setting and reflection on that experience through discussion, reading, and writing. Academic credit is awarded for this integration of theory and practice.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1267, "title": "Teaching Apprenticeship", "code": "DEA 4030", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that includes teaching methods in the field and assisting faculty with instruction. Students must have demonstrated a high level of performance in the subject to be taught and in the overall academic program.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1268, "title": "Professional Practices and Ethics", "code": "DEA 4040", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Professional Practice/Ethics is designed to prepare graduating seniors with the working knowledge and essential skills needed to pursue professional jobs and other opportunities in the competitive field of design. This course is an introduction to the Professional Practice of the design disciplines; and concepts, conventions and processes related to the design and construction industry. Emphasis is placed on professionalism, professional ethics, leadership skills, regulation of the profession, business management, contracts and negotiations, specifications, building planning controls, and other aspects of professional practice.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1269, "title": "Ecological Literacy and Design", "code": "DEA 4220", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course is a design-oriented lecture/seminar course for students who are concerned about the role they play as design professionals in affecting the biophysical world. The course's prime objective is to develop a new worldview founded on a broader sensitivity for things living and an accompanying set of meaningful environmental ethics. The course's secondary objectives are to develop a deeper knowledge of environmental issues, construct conceptual frameworks for analysis of these issues and to demonstrate how ecological knowledge can be applied to design.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1270, "title": "Disruptive Design: Competitions Studio", "code": "DEA 4402", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "What do the White House and a tin can of beans share in common? Both were the result of a design competition. The last studio in the undergraduate design sequence will engage the \"real world\" in a series of design challenges. Each student will participate in at least 3 design competitions of various scale, requirements and origin.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1271, "title": "Applied Ergonomic Methods", "code": "DEA 4700", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Covers physical and cognitive ergonomic methods and techniques and their application to the design of products and modern work environments. Covers conceptual frameworks for ergonomics analysis, systems methods and processes, a repertoire of ergonomics methods, and techniques for the analysis of products, work activities and work systems.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1272, "title": "Senior Honors Thesis", "code": "DEA 4990", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Opportunity for DEA majors to undertake original research and scholarly work leading to the preparation of a thesis. Students work closely with their thesis advisor on a topic of interest. For information, students should visit https://www.human.cornell.edu/dea/academics/undergraduate/honors.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1273, "title": "Virtual Experience of Designed Environments", "code": "DEA 5520", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course will immerse students in advanced techniques of design communication and evaluation for simulation-based research on user experience in designed environments. Through lectures, readings, demos, and hands on exercises, the course explores advanced visualization media for design and design research.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1274, "title": "Workplace Strategy Studio", "code": "DEA 5540", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course provides students with a unique \"hands-on\" experience of working with real clients to simulate workplace strategic consulting practice. Students will learn and apply concepts, techniques (both strategic and tactical), and tools to plan, design, evaluate, and reinvent workplaces to support the achievement of ambitious business goals, inspire today's connected and mobile knowledge workers, facilitate the management of uncertainty and change in large complex organizations, and envision future work modes and its implications for the creation of future workplace. Professional communication in multiple forms and settings for effective client interaction and project development is emphasized.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1275, "title": "Designing Age Friendly Environments", "code": "DEA 5700", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course focuses on the role of the built environment in fostering healthy development and aging across the lifespan, as well as examining how designed environments can support or limit healthy development and aging.\u00a0 Specifically, it will examine the relationship between children and older adults and their everyday environments at three scales: the city/community, individual spaces/interiors, and at the product/technology level. Through presentations, readings, fieldwork, site visits, design case studies, and community-engaged projects, students will critically explore age-friendly frameworks, and research and design strategies to gain an appreciation of the potential impacts, as well as opportunities and challenges, of designing age-friendly environments. Students will also be introduced to effective strategies and tools for assessing the age-friendliness of communities, spaces, and products, and translating findings from research and best practices into successful, supportive designed environments for children and older adults.", "tags": "D-HE|LAD-HE|SBA-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1276, "title": "Special Problems for Graduates", "code": "DEA 6000", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study of special problems in the areas of interior design, human environment relations, or facilities planning and management.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1277, "title": "Directed Readings", "code": "DEA 6010", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves library research and independent study.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1278, "title": "Graduate Empirical Research", "code": "DEA 6020", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves collection and analysis of research data.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1279, "title": "Graduate Practicum", "code": "DEA 6030", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves field experience in community settings.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1280, "title": "Hospitality, Health and Design Industry Immersion Seminar", "code": "DEA 6055", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This course provides students the opportunity to learn directly from invited industry speakers with expertise in a spectrum of industries that link health, wellness, senior living with hospitality and design thinking.\u00a0 The speakers share their views on business, managerial, career, and other critical industry-related issues.", "tags": "LAD-HE|SBA-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1281, "title": "Studies in Design Thinking", "code": "DEA 6100", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This is a graduate design theory course. The primary objective is to introduce topical issues of design in the built environment, with a focus on enclosure. Different theoretical themes will be introduced and explored each week through critical readings, discussions, and creative synthesis.", "tags": "LAD-HE|DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1282, "title": "Healthcare Innovations", "code": "DEA 6550", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Engage in a dialogue among design, health, medicine, policy, engineering, and management disciplines on innovations in healthcare through multidisciplinary practice. Learn about the latest concepts of evidence-based design (EBD) and healing environments, discuss practical applications, and have the option to gain skills for Evidence-based Design Accreditation and Certification (EDAC).", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1283, "title": "Applied Ergonomic Methods", "code": "DEA 6700", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "Intended for graduate students who want a more thorough understanding of applied ergonomic methods than is provided by DEA 4700. Each student is required to attend DEA 4700\u00a0lectures, meet with the instructor and other graduate students for an additional class each week, and complete additional readings and projects.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1284, "title": "DEA Graduate Pro Seminar", "code": "DEA 7100", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "This pro seminar meets once per week, and consists of bi-weekly guest lectures from DEA, Cornell, and guest faculty members, as well as student presentations of thesis development. The goal is to build research and professional practice skills in the context of real world applications.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1285, "title": "Master's Thesis and Research", "code": "DEA 8990", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1286, "title": "Ph.D. Thesis and Research", "code": "DEA 9990", "subject": "DEA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "DEA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1287, "title": "Coding for Design I", "code": "DESIGN 1297", "subject": "DESIGN", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of design and coding. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content.", "tags": "DESIGN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1288, "title": "Special Topics in Design II", "code": "DESIGN 4197", "subject": "DESIGN", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "DESIGN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1289, "title": "Coding for Design II", "code": "DESIGN 4297", "subject": "DESIGN", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of design and coding. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content.", "tags": "DESIGN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1290, "title": "Special Topics in Design III", "code": "DESIGN 6197", "subject": "DESIGN", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "DESIGN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1291, "title": "Coding for Design III", "code": "DESIGN 6297", "subject": "DESIGN", "descr": "This course addresses pertinent issues relative to the subject of design and coding. The instructor(s) of the course are drawn from the permanent and visiting faculty who may either broadly or narrowly define the course's scope and content.", "tags": "DESIGN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1292, "title": "Introduction to Sociology", "code": "DSOC 1101", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Introduction to theory and research in sociology. Demonstrates how the insights, theories, and methods of sociological analysis can be brought to bear on major issues of social life. A primary goal is to convey a sense of the manner in which sociologists formulate theories and how the collection and analysis of data are used to evaluate those theories. Provides \"hands-on\" experience in analyzing sociological issues. Students undertake guided research exercises that involve using computers to analyze actual data. No prior background is presumed; necessary skills are covered in class and section meetings.", "tags": "D-AG|KCM-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1293, "title": "FWS: Topics in Development Sociology", "code": "DSOC 1200", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "The department offers first-year writing seminars on a wide range of development sociology topics. Topics vary by section.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1294, "title": "Population Dynamics", "code": "DSOC 2010", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Introduction to population studies. The primary focus is on the relationships between demographic processes (fertility, mortality, and immigration) and social and economic issues. Discussion covers special topics related to population growth and spatial distribution, including marriage and family formation, population aging, changing roles and statuses of women, labor force participation, immigrations, urban growth and urbanization, resource allocation, and the environment.", "tags": "SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1295, "title": "Social Inequality", "code": "DSOC 2090", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This course reviews contemporary approaches to understanding social inequality and the processes by which it comes to be seen as legitimate, natural, or desirable. We address questions of the following kind: what are the major forms of stratification in human history? Are inequality and poverty inevitable? How many social classes are there in advanced industrialism societies? Is there a \"ruling class\"? Are lifestyles, attitudes, and personalities shaped fundamentally by class membership? Can individuals born into poverty readily escape their class origins and move upward in the class structure? Are social contacts and \"luck\" important forces in matching individuals to jobs and class positions? What types of social processes serve to maintain and alter racial, ethnic, and gender discrimination in labor markets? Is there an \"underclass\"? These and other questions are addressed in light of classical and contemporary theory and research.", "tags": "D-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1296, "title": "Society and Natural Resources", "code": "DSOC 2201", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "The actions of people are crucial to environmental well-being. This course addresses the interrelationships between social phenomena and the natural (i.e., biophysical) environment. It is intended to (1) increase student awareness of these interconnections in their everyday lives; (2) introduce students to a variety of social science perspectives, including sociology, economics, psychology, and political science, that help us make sense of these connections; (3) identify the contributions of each of these perspectives to our understanding of environmental problems; and (4) discuss how natural resource management and environmental policy reflect these perspectives.", "tags": "SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1297, "title": "Designing and Facilitating Learning for Development", "code": "DSOC 2210", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "In Designing and Facilitating Learning for Development, we look for commonalities across a variety of venues and settings where people meet together to learn, deliberate, and act. From professional development to social change, town hall to union hall, or citizen science to workplace training, adult and community learning is everywhere. Yet, for many, the design and facilitation of meaningful learning experiences can be as mysterious as an unopened black box. How does one go about creating inclusive educational experiences for diverse learners in our increasingly interconnected context? In this course we open the box to become better leaders of learning and action. A democratic and socially just society should enable all of its citizens to develop their potential to the full and to have the capacity, individually and collectively, to meet the challenge of change. Through learning, people can come to make a real contribution to their own communities and participate in local and national democratic processes. Two of the most ubiquitous formats of adult learning are 1) the workshop, and 2) one-on-one mentoring. As a backwards design approach and interactive facilitation principles can serve each application well, we will learn and practice both! In this course you will a) design and facilitate workshops, and b) mentor a Cornell employee as they pursues a learning goal, and do both by learning and applying design process and facilitation arts. Meaningful. Practical. Fun.", "tags": "D-AG|KCM-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1298, "title": "Latinos in the United States", "code": "DSOC 2650", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Exploration and analysis of the Hispanic experience in the United States. Examines the sociohistorical background and economic, psychological, and political factors that converge to shape a Latino group identity in the United States. Perspectives are suggested and developed for understanding Hispanic migrations, the plight of Latinos in urban and rural areas, and the unique problems faced by the diverse Latino groups. Groups studied include Mexican Americans, Dominicans, Cubans, and Puerto Ricans.", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1299, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "DSOC 2710", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This course is a blending of the Sociology of Education and Public Policy. Front and center in this course is the question of why consistent differential educational and economic outcomes exists in American society. We explore the broad sociological functions of schooling (socialization, sorting, caretaking, training) as well as local, state, and federal policies and court decisions.", "tags": "D-AG|HA-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1300, "title": "Spatial Thinking, GIS, and Related Methods", "code": "DSOC 3140", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Everything occurs in space. Knowing where organizations are located and events occur in space provides clues to understanding social order and processes not revealed by traditional social analysis techniques. At the same time, spatial thinking and methods are becoming increasingly used in the social sciences. The purpose of this course is to introduce the undergraduate to both aspects of spatial patterns, trends, and themes but also to methodologies for bringing spatial considerations into their research. The course provides a practical introduction to GIS via lab assignments.", "tags": "KCM-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1301, "title": "Environmental Sociology", "code": "DSOC 3240", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Humans have fraught relationships with the animals, plants, land, water\u2014even geological processes\u2014around us. We come together to revere, conserve, protect the things many call nature. We struggle over who gets to use what, which resources to use or to keep intact, which scientific claims are true and worthy of action. Every environmental concern is on some level a social concern, and more social concerns than we often realize are environmental concerns. In this course, we will examine how people make and respond to environmental change and how groups of people form, express, fight over, and work out environmental concerns. We will consider how population change, economic activity, government action, social movements, and changing ways of thinking shape human-environmental relationships. The fundamental goal of this course is to give you knowledge, analytical tools, and expressive skills that make you confident to address environmental concerns as a social scientist and a citizen.", "tags": "SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1302, "title": "Comparative Social Inequalities", "code": "DSOC 3700", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This course offers a sociological understanding of social inequality and the social construction of difference. Designed from the perspective of comparative historical analysis, we will examine the ways in which class, gender, race/ethnicity, religion, and sexuality differences work across place and time within a shared set of global dynamics. The course will pay special attention to how difference is constructed, institutionalized, and experienced. Thus, the course will not only address inequality based on economic and labor relations, but also emphasize complicated notions of difference and identity to offer an analysis that links inequality to power and forms of rule.", "tags": "D-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1303, "title": "Demographic Techniques", "code": "DSOC 4080", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This is the second course in the demographic techniques sequence. It has two foci. First, we will learn the basics of constructing single and multiple decrement life tables, along with extensions to cause-deleted life tables. Second, we will learn the basics of survival analysis, as well as how survival analysis relates to life tables. Although the primary goal is learning to use these techniques, this class also has a heavy emphasis on thinking about how to use these methods to produce something new and important for research.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1304, "title": "Gender and Health: Concepts, Data, Theories and Evidence", "code": "DSOC 4230", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This course will provide a broad, policy-oriented introduction to the subject of gender as a factor in health and development. In recent years the literature on the subject has grown and led to several calls to make gender issues central to policies for health in particular and development in general. While much of this literature is focused on the special disadvantages of women and girls, the course will include this focus but will also ask important questions related to the ignored distinction between sex and gender. When we think about the health impact of the social and economic disadvantages of women, we will look at the ways in which these female handicaps also translate into poor health outcomes for others, as well as put a brake on development in general.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1305, "title": "Senior Capstone Course", "code": "DSOC 4700", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "The course is required for all Development Sociology majors and will be limited to DSOC majors and minors who will take the course in the second semester of their junior year or sometime during their senior year. The objective of this course is to synthesize and recapitulate the development sociology major for majors or minors. This objective is implemented by reading and discussing thematic content areas of the major including state, economy and society; population and development; the food system and society; and environment and society. The course requires a term paper (senior honors theses can substitute for these) and in-class presentations of student work.", "tags": "KCM-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1306, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "DSOC 4721", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1307, "title": "Independent Study in Development Sociology", "code": "DSOC 4970", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Informal study may include a reading course, research experience, or public service experience.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1308, "title": "Teaching Experience in Development Sociology", "code": "DSOC 4980", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Designed to give an undergraduate student practical teaching experience and deepened subject matter knowledge through working with a Development Sociology faculty member in planning and teaching a course. An enrolled student will regularly discuss teaching topics with the supervising faculty member; topics such as course objectives, subject matter, teaching techniques, and assessment strategies. The specific responsibilities will be negotiated between the faculty member and student, but, as appropriate for the particular course, may include researching course-related topics, preparing course materials, leading discussions, commenting on assignments, writing exam questions, assisting with grading, gathering student feedback, and tutoring.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1309, "title": "Independent Research in Development Sociology", "code": "DSOC 4990", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Permits outstanding students to conduct laboratory or field research in sociology under appropriate faculty supervision. The research should be scientific: systematic, controlled, empirical. Research goals should include description, prediction, explanation, or policy orientation and should generate new knowledge.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1310, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "DSOC 5710", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Examines the goals, roles, inputs, and outcomes of schooling in American society, and the policy environment in which schools operate. Analyzes controversies and tensions (e.g., equity, market forces, state control) surrounding public education at local, state, and federal levels. Includes current and historical, urban, and rural issues and problems.", "tags": "D-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1311, "title": "Demographic Techniques", "code": "DSOC 6080", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This is the second course in the demographic techniques sequence. It has two foci. First, we will learn the basics of constructing single and multiple decrement life tables, along with extensions to cause-deleted life tables. Second, we will learn the basics of survival analysis, as well as how survival analysis relates to life tables. Although the primary goal is learning to use these techniques, this class also has a heavy emphasis on thinking about how to use these methods to produce something new and important for research. The grad students will also be asked to complete a 10 page research proposal.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1312, "title": "Qualitative Research Methods", "code": "DSOC 6150", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This seminar introduces students to a number of qualitative research methods in the social sciences. Discusses field observation, archival research, in-depth individual interviews, and focus group interviews. Assesses the strengths and weaknesses of various strategies of field research and consider a range of practical matters such as choice of research site (and sample where appropriate). Considers choice of research questions and issues of feasibility in research plans. Ethical considerations are highlighted. Students produce a full-length research proposal of their own by the course's end.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1313, "title": "State, Economy, and Society", "code": "DSOC 6250", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Reviews major issues concerning the relations between political and economic institutions and the role of states, markets, firms, social movements, and cultural institutions in the process of social change. Theoretical perspectives are drawn from classical and modern social theory, including the application of comparative and world/historical methodologies.", "tags": "HA-AG|SBA-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1314, "title": "Community Organizing and Development", "code": "DSOC 6820", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This course is designed to provoke students from a wide variety of gradate fields to question and examine the cultural and political dimensions of development practice in everyday community settings and contexts. It's specifically focused on the history, theory and practice of community organizing, and the roles NGO, government, academic, and other professionals do, can, and should play in the public work of democracy.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1315, "title": "Special Topics in Development Sociology", "code": "DSOC 6940", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1316, "title": "Historical Sociology of Modernity", "code": "DSOC 7001", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "The idea of modernity, as a postulated relationship between social change and institutional form, and as a conceptual schema for making sense of large-scale social transformations, constitutes the primary object of inquiry of classical social theory. Conceived as a uniquely European phenomenon that spread to the rest of the world through the impact of colonial empires and the world market, it also supplies the normative frameworks for many contemporary theories of development. This conception of modernity, and the meta-theories that legitimate it, has been the subject of increasingly heated scholarly controversy. In this course, we explore some of the critical debates that animate this field of historical sociology, alternating our focus between contrasting studies of the institutional dynamics of modernity and critical reflections on how these studies are shaped by the adoption of particular epistemologies.", "tags": "HA-AG|KCM-AG|DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1317, "title": "Food, Ecology, and Agrarian Change", "code": "DSOC 7500", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "This seminar is concerned with agri-food systems and their socio-ecological relations. Modernization narratives, in casting agriculture as an original baseline of human development, have (inadvertently or not) consigned agriculture, and food, to the margins of social thought and analysis. The current crisis of the global food economy has focused attention and public discourse on agriculture, and its increasingly evident health and ecological implications. This seminar works with analytical approaches and contemporary issues and processes concerning food, ecology and agrarian change. Pressing health and ecological questions, in addition to the latest food crisis, are forcing a new look at the agri-food system and its social and environmental functions. The goal of the seminar is to develop analytical perspectives on the relationships embedded in food and agrarian systems and their political, social and ecological implications, and to explore various alternatives to the dominant mode of agriculture and agrarian relations.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1318, "title": "Graduate-Level Thesis Research", "code": "DSOC 7900", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1319, "title": "Teaching Experience", "code": "DSOC 7910", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Participation in the ongoing teaching program of the department.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1320, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "DSOC 8900", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1321, "title": "Doctoral-Level Thesis Research", "code": "DSOC 9900", "subject": "DSOC", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "DSOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1322, "title": "Intermediate Dutch II", "code": "DUTCH 2040", "subject": "DUTCH", "descr": "This course will go beyond the textbook and will increase your understanding of the language by making use of authentic Dutch material. Through compositions, presentations and discussions, you will develop your productive language skills. We will explore different topics, which may include the languages, cultures, literature, societies and history of the Dutch-speaking world, depending on the needs and interests of the students. After completing this course, you will be able to handle most Dutch texts comfortably on your own and will be able to engage in conversation with native speakers on a wide range of topics.", "tags": "DUTCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1323, "title": "Advanced Dutch II", "code": "DUTCH 3021", "subject": "DUTCH", "descr": "This advanced course is focused on Dutch literature and films. Students will be reading two novels, which are both considered to be cornerstones of Dutch literature; both deal with crucial historical events. After finishing each novel, students will see the film adaptation of these novels. Students will prepare and read the novels in installments at home, and will get a deep understanding of the historical background of the events described in the novels in class. Relevant Dutch history will be highlighted through background readings and video.", "tags": "DUTCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1324, "title": "17th Century Dutch Texts", "code": "DUTCH 5010", "subject": "DUTCH", "descr": "The course is specifically meant for PhD candidates, but undergraduates are welcome as well. Each week we read a different text, mainly from the 17th century, based on students' needs: topics of texts typically cover art history, law, history, literature etc.\u00a0 These materials help students greatly with the difficult task of reading challenging printed and handwritten texts from the late 16th and 17th centuries.\u00a0The course starts with an overview of reading strategies that students learn to apply when approaching texts written in the 1600's. As the semester progresses, we read more and more complex texts. The last two weeks of the semester are devoted to handwritten texts and students get an introduction to various hands. The goal of the course is to prepare students for archival research.", "tags": "DUTCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1325, "title": "Introductory Weather Analysis and Forecasting", "code": "EAS 1340", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "This course serves as an extension of the EAS 1330\u00a0first year major's lab. It provides opportunity for formal weather briefings, explores specific atmospheric storms (synoptic and mesoscale, including the climatology of each storm type), through assigned readings, map analysis, and weather discussions.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1326, "title": "Environmental Physics", "code": "EAS 1600", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Fundamentals of radiation, thermodynamics, and mechanics will be introduced and used to understand energy and mass transfers in natural and built environments. Students will describe, identify and use basic principles of physics to discuss and assess renewable energy systems and solve environmental physics problems, using a physics vocabulary and appropriately quantifying results. The course is offered in the spring semester as a flipped class, meeting twice weekly. The course is offered in the fall semester as a web-based, online course and covers the same material.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1327, "title": "Evolution of the Earth and Life", "code": "EAS 1700", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "This class covers events and organisms in the history of the Earth and its life, especially those that commonly appear in popular media such as documentaries, books, and science journalism. The class is intended for students of any background interested in an introductory exploration of how the Earth and life came to look the way they do and the science by which we study the geological past. Learn about movements of the continents and implications for climate and life; coevolution of life and the atmosphere; climate change through geologic time; and major patterns of biological evolution, including dinosaur diversification, mass extinctions, and human evolution. The course includes assignments to visit the Museum of the Earth and geological sites around the Cornell campus.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1328, "title": "The Earth System", "code": "EAS 2250", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "EAS 2250 provides a broad math-, physics-, and chemistry-based introduction to the earth sciences, including geology, paleontology, oceanography, and atmospheric science. Topics covered include formation of the Earth, the chemistry and physics of the Earth's interior, plate tectonics, weathering and erosion, soil development, stream and groundwater flow, volcanism and crustal deformation, the evolution of life, ocean and atmospheric structure, circulation and heat transport, ocean waves and tides, generation of storms, seawater chemistry, mineral and energy resources, and climate change.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1329, "title": "Meteorological Observations and Instruments", "code": "EAS 2500", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Covers methods and principles of atmospheric measurements and observations including in situ surface, free-air, and remote systems. Students will gain practical experience in analysis of atmospheric data, and use of state-of-the-art instrumentation.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PHS-AS|SDS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1330, "title": "Observing the Earth: Remote Sensing and GIS", "code": "EAS 2550", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "While the challenges facing society over the next decades are diverse and complex, the next generation of scientists can look forward to a steadily increasing family of space-based observations that will help inform decisions about the environment - both to highlight potential problems and gain the attention of decision-makers, and to illustrate the effects of attempts at mitigation so that we can redirect our efforts into the most useful avenues. In this course, we will explore the key questions facing our planet today, and the relevant data from current and future satellite missions. We will introduce students to Geographical Information Systems (GIS) and other methods for viewing and manipulating.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|SDS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1331, "title": "Climate and Global Warming", "code": "EAS 2680", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Familiarizes students from a range of disciplines with such contemporary issues in climatology as global warming and El Ni\u00f1o. Introduces the natural greenhouse effect, past climates, and observed and projected climate changes and impacts. Also covers natural climate variations (e.g., El Ni\u00f1o) and their consequences and predictability. Readings focus on recent scientific findings related to climate change.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1332, "title": "Computer Programming and Meteorology Software", "code": "EAS 2900", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Introduction to Python computer programming and visual software packages specifically tailored for meteorological application usage. Topics include: basic Python programming (this includes problem analysis, algorithm development, and program writing and execution), data manipulation, and instruction in the use of GrADS, and GEMPACK visual display tools.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1333, "title": "Earth Materials", "code": "EAS 3090", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Materials of the solid Earth (minerals, rocks) record the formation and evolution of our planet and the solar systems. This course will prepare students to identify minerals, understand their significance as a record of fundamental processes for our planet, and other rocky worlds in the solar system. This course will introduce geochemical concepts that include: element formation in the solar nebula, thermodynamic and kinetic properties that control the formation and chemical diversity of minerals, the mineral and rock record of deep Earth and surface processes. The lectures will be complemented by labs where students will learn to identify minerals using crystallography and polarized microscopy techniques. The labs will also include an introduction to modern analytical methods such as Raman and infrared spectroscopy, scanning electron microscopy, mass spectrometry, with hands-on projects where the students will collect and interpret their own data.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1334, "title": "Atmospheric Dynamics", "code": "EAS 3420", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Introduction to the basic equations and techniques used to understand motion in the atmosphere, with an emphasis on the space and time scales typical of storm systems (the synoptic scale). Derives the governing equations of atmospheric flow from first principles and applies them to middle latitude and tropical meteorology. Topics include balanced flow, atmospheric waves, circulation, and vorticity.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1335, "title": "Atmospheric Dynamics Discussion: Quantitative Visualization", "code": "EAS 3421", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Students will develop familiarity with concepts in atmospheric dynamics through quantitative visualizations of atmospheric data. Through the semester, they will progress from interactive activities and discussions based around computational 'notebooks' to developing their own pedagogical visualization of an atmospheric concept, phenomenon, or event.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1336, "title": "Physical Oceanography", "code": "EAS 3530", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Covers thermohaline and wind-driven circulation and surface-ocean boundary-layer dynamics. Mathematical expressions for describing conservation of momentum, mass, and heat in a fluid are used to explain the ocean's responses to wind and buoyancy forcing.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1337, "title": "Marine Microbes and Disease in a Changing Ocean", "code": "EAS 3555", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Marine microorganisms fuel globally significant elemental cycles through their activities. They also drive diseases in multicellular life through pathogenesis, modulation of host-associated microbiomes, and through induction of stressors (e.g. toxins, hypoxia). The purpose of this course is to provide junior- and senior-level students a background in biological oceanography, marine microbial ecology, biogeochemistry, and disease pathogenesis in marine habitats. The emphasis of the course is on understanding how biology affects and is affected by the oceans, and how organisms interact to produce ocean biological phenomena. The course is divided into 4 modules: 1) Marine microbial diversity and ocean structure; 2) Ocean biogeochemistry; 3) Marine disease pathogenesis; and 4) Pollution and climate change. This course will equip students with foundations for further undergraduate courses in ocean sciences and environmental dynamics, and for graduate studies in biological oceanography and marine biology.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1338, "title": "Global Geophysics", "code": "EAS 3880", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Covers global tectonics and the deep structure of the solid Earth as revealed by investigations of earthquakes, earthquake waves, the Earth's gravitational and magnetic fields, and heat flow. Students are highly encouraged to have either the math/phys prerequisites OR an introductory geologic sciences course before taking this class.", "tags": "PBS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1339, "title": "Fundamentals of Energy and Mineral Resources", "code": "EAS 4010", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "The sustainable development of humanity requires natural resources for the basics of life and for increasing global standards of living. Minerals and energy are critical for human existence now and for future generations, and so new resources must be discovered, developed efficiently, and kept in the circular economy through reuse and recycling. Discovery means fully understanding the Earth, including the geological processes that concentrate resources in the subsurface and the surficial conditions that may challenge resource extraction. Realistic estimates needed for future consumption include changing global demand and new technologies. Finally, we need to be aware of the social and political dimensions of mineral and energy resource management that regulate and control aspects of resource-related social development.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1340, "title": "Climate Smart Communities: State and Local Climate Change Science and Policy", "code": "EAS 4444", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "New York State will be challenged to meet the goals of the \"Climate Leadership and Community Protection Act\" without large GHG reductions from businesses, farms and communities. Local municipalities have considerable power to address environmental and land use issues within their jurisdiction, but often lack the capacity to plan for or implement climate change projects at the local level. In this course, students will critically analyze the theory of multilevel governance and debate the importance of non-state (NGO) and sub-national (regional, state and local government) actors involved in climate change policy. Students will work with a local community or NGO to assess climate action plans and identify and address their needs for research, policy recommendations, project planning, grant writing or educational outreach to become NYS Registered or Certified Climate Smart Communities.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1341, "title": "Geochemistry", "code": "EAS 4550", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Chemistry applied to understanding the Earth and the Solar System including its formation and evolution, and processes occurring on the Earth's surface and in its interior. The course covers thermodynamics and kinetics of geochemical processes, aquatic and environmental chemistry, geochronology, trace element and isotope geochemistry, paleoclimatology, and the carbon cycle and organic geochemistry.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1342, "title": "Advanced Weather Forecasting and Analysis", "code": "EAS 4700", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Applied course focusing on weather forecasting and analysis techniques for various regions around the world. Lectures emphasize the application of student's knowledge of atmospheric dynamics, thermodynamics, and computer-data analysis to forecast the development and movement of multiscale weather systems. Students participate in weekly forecast discussions; write daily forecasts that include a synoptic discussion, quantitative precipitation forecasts, and severe weather outlook for the forecast region; and lead class discussion on assigned readings.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|PHS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1343, "title": "Introduction to Groundwater", "code": "EAS 4710", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Fresh water has become a limited resource in many parts of the world. In arid and semi-arid regions, groundwater levels are declining at unstainable levels. In many industrial areas, groundwater is contaminated and unsuitable for drinking water. Sustainability and pollution will be addressed in this course; we will study these problem by first learning the theory of saturated flow and contaminant transport under ideal conditions. Subsequently, we will learn how to simplify a complex groundwater system so solutions can be found. At the end of the course, we will put conceptual, analytical and simulation models, in the broader context of past, current, and potential future groundwater quantity and quality issues, as they are affected by natural or human actions. Throughout the course, guest speakers will discuss topics of current interest related to water. This elective course is intended for seniors and graduate students interested in sub surface water and solute transport applications to sustainable ground water use and prevention of \u00a0pollution. Well prepared juniors are welcome too.", "tags": "PBS-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1344, "title": "Paleobiology", "code": "EAS 4790", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Surveys the major groups of invertebrate organisms and their evolutionary histories, and the theoretical and practical principles of paleontology, from biostratigraphy to macroevolution. Intended to fill out the biological backgrounds of Earth and atmospheric science students concerning the nature and significance of the fossil record for their respective studies, and the paleontological backgrounds of biology students interested in ecology and evolution.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|BIO-AS|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1345, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "EAS 4920", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Introduction to the techniques and philosophy of research in the earth sciences and an opportunity for undergraduates to participate in current faculty research projects. Topics chosen in consultation with, and guided by, a faculty member. A short written report is required, and outstanding projects are prepared for publication.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1346, "title": "Special Topics in Earth and Atmospheric Sciences", "code": "EAS 4940", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the beginning of the semester. The same course is not offered more than twice.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1347, "title": "Internship Experience", "code": "EAS 4960", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Students with internship opportunities may be able to receive credit through this course.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1348, "title": "Individual Study in Atmospheric Science", "code": "EAS 4970", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Topics are arranged at the beginning of the semester for individual study or for group discussions.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1349, "title": "Teaching Experience in Earth and Atmospheric Sciences", "code": "EAS 4980", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "The student assists in teaching an EAS course appropriate to his or her previous training. The student meets with a discussion or laboratory section, prepares course materials, grades assignments, and regularly discusses course objectives and teaching techniques with the faculty member in charge of the course.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1350, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Atmospheric Science", "code": "EAS 4990", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Independent research on current problems in atmospheric science.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1351, "title": "Master Engineering Design Project", "code": "EAS 5000", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Project with significant engineering content that is required for the M.Eng. program.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1352, "title": "Fundamentals of Energy and Mineral Resources", "code": "EAS 5010", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "The sustainable development of humanity requires natural resources for the basics of life and for increasing global standards of living. Minerals and energy are critical for human existence now and for future generations, and so new resources must be discovered, developed efficiently, and kept in the circular economy through reuse and recycling. Discovery means fully understanding the Earth, including the geological processes that concentrate resources in the subsurface and the surficial conditions that may challenge resource extraction. Realistic estimates needed for future consumption include changing global demand and new technologies. Finally, we need to be aware of the social and political dimensions of mineral and energy resource management that regulate and control aspects of resource-related social development.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1353, "title": "Atmospheric Dynamics", "code": "EAS 5420", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Introduction to the basic equations and techniques used to understand motion in the atmosphere, with an emphasis on the space and time scales typical of storm systems (the \"synoptic\" scale). Derives the governing equations of atmospheric flow from first principles and applies them to mid-latitude meteorology. Topics include balanced flow, atmospheric waves, vorticity, and baroclinic instability. Students taking this course at the graduate level (EAS 5420) will have to complete additional questions on the biweekly problem sets and on the prelim and final exams.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1354, "title": "Numerical Techniques for Weather and Climate Modeling", "code": "EAS 5555", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "This class will present an introductory overview of the common methodological approaches used today for numerical weather prediction and global climate modeling. Technical skills and in-depth understanding of the approaches will be emphasized through short weekly reading assignments and programming activities. An historical perspective on weather and climate modeling will be covered as well in the scope of this course because it helps put state-of-the-art numerical modeling in an appropriate context. Final projects will include running a weather or climate model on the National Center for Atmospheric Research's Cheyenne supercomputer, or other supercomputing facilities if students have access to other resources they would like to use. Cloud computing based solutions to numerical weather and climate modeling will also be covered.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1355, "title": "Planet Formation and Evolution", "code": "EAS 5780", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Survey of chemical and physical processes important to the origin and evolution of planetary systems. The first part of the course will cover the formation of planets including the astronomical context, nucleosynthesis, meteoritics, condensation sequence, accretion, dynamical evolution, and observational constraints (disks, exoplanets, major planets, satellites, and small bodies). The second part of the course will cover planetary internal structure and evolution including melting, differentiation, core formation, convection, thermal evolution, and magnetic fields.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1356, "title": "Special Topics in Earth and Atmospheric Sciences", "code": "EAS 6920", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Study of topics in earth and atmospheric science that are more specialized or different from other courses. Special topics depend on staff and student interests.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1357, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "EAS 7020", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Thesis research for geological sciences graduate students.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1358, "title": "Advanced Topics in Paleobiology", "code": "EAS 7620", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Advanced work on original investigations in paleobiology. Topics change from semester to semester. Contact the instructor for more information.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1359, "title": "Topics in Paleoecology", "code": "EAS 7650", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Advanced work on original investigations in paleoecology. Topics change from semester to semester. Contact the instructor for more information.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1360, "title": "Advanced Topics in Sedimentology and Stratigraphy", "code": "EAS 7710", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Advanced readings on specific themes in sedimentology, stratigraphy, and sedimentary basins. Topics change from semester to semester and will be chosen in consultation between student and instructor.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1361, "title": "Andes-Himalaya Seminar", "code": "EAS 7930", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Seminar course for graduate students in geological sciences with topics in tectonics, seismology, petrology, and similar disciplines. Emphasis on mountain belts, but other topics entertained.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1362, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research in Atmospheric Science", "code": "EAS 8500", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Thesis research for atmospheric science master's students.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1363, "title": "Graduate-Level Dissertation Research in Atmospheric Science", "code": "EAS 9500", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Dissertation research for atmospheric science Ph.D. students only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1364, "title": "Doctoral-Level Dissertation Research in Atmospheric Science", "code": "EAS 9510", "subject": "EAS", "descr": "Dissertation research for atmospheric science Ph.D. students after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "EAS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1365, "title": "The Computing Technology Inside Your Smartphone", "code": "ECE 1210", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "The organization of the computer system found within devices used in everyday living, such as smartphones and tablets.\u00a0Computer systems are presented in a bottom up fashion, from bits to digital logic,\u00a0computer organization, instruction sets, assembly language, and the connection to high-level languages.\u00a0Discussion of the computing engines found in smart phones, tablets, and wearables.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1366, "title": "Introduction to Circuits for Electrical and Computer Engineers", "code": "ECE 2100", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course is an introduction to electronic circuits. We start with the basic quantities used to characterize circuit operation (like current, voltage, and power) and then enforce several physical laws to form the basis of our approach to circuit analysis. Networks comprising passive circuit elements such as resistors, inductors, and capacitors will be examined under constant dc, transient, and sinusoidal steady-state conditions. Active components including transistors and Op-Amps will be introduced and used to build simple amplifiers and switching power converters. Many of these ideas will be unified mathematically through the use of Laplace transforms and associated transfer functions. In the lab part of the course, we will learn how to use modern instruments to test circuits, and explore the concepts from lecture applied to real circuits. Finally, we will develop some simple modeling software in MATLAB to numerically predict the results from analysis and experiment.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1367, "title": "Signals and Information", "code": "ECE 2200", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Introduction to signal processing. Topics include frequency-based representations: Fourier analysis and synthesis; discrete time linear systems: input/output relationships, filtering, spectral response; analog-to-digital and digital-to-analog conversion; continuous time signals and linear time invariant systems: frequency response and continuous-time Fourier transform.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1368, "title": "Digital Logic and Computer Organization", "code": "ECE 2300", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the design and implementation of digital circuits and microprocessors. Topics include transistor network design, Boolean algebra, combinational circuits, sequential circuits, finite state machine design, processor pipelines, and memory hierarchy. Design methodology using both discrete components and hardware description languages is covered in the laboratory portion of the course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1369, "title": "Embedded Systems", "code": "ECE 3140", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "An introduction to the design of embedded systems, with an emphasis on understanding the interaction between hardware, software, and the physical world. Topics covered include assembly language programming, interrupts, I/O, concurrency management, scheduling, resource management, and real-time constraints.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1370, "title": "Introduction to Microelectronics", "code": "ECE 3150", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This is a comprehensive undergraduate level course on microelectronics. Topics covered include basic semiconductor physics, electrons and holes in semiconductors, electrical transport in semiconductors, PN junctions and diodes, photodetectors and solar cells, Metal-Oxide-Semiconductor (MOS) capacitors, MOS field effect transistors (FETs), bipolar junction transistors (BJTs), large signal and small signal models of electronic devices, single stage amplifiers, multistage amplifiers, differential amplifiers, analog circuit analysis and design, high-frequency models of devices, high-frequency circuit analysis, digital logic and MOS logic devices, complimentary MOS (or CMOS) logic gates, fundamental trade-offs in high speed analog and digital circuit design. The coursework includes labs and a final project.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1371, "title": "Intelligent Physical Systems", "code": "ECE 3400", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Students will engage in a holistic design approach to Intelligent Physical Systems which can perceive, reason about, and act upon their environment. This course will expand on the ECE 2000-level courses, and include topics on algorithms, field programmable gate arrays, wireless communication, sensors, actuators, power, and mechanics. Students will learn the value and trade-offs between theory, simulation, and physical implementations, and gain familiarity with rapid prototyping techniques, system debugging, team work, leadership skills, time management, and how to disseminate work to a broader audience through wiki-pages.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1372, "title": "Ethical Issues in Engineering Practice", "code": "ECE 3600", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Studies ethical issues involved in engineering practice. Explores the engineer's role in technical decision-making in organizations. Considers the engineer's relationship to the uses of technology in society, especially emerging technologies. Case studies covered include the Space Shuttle Challenger, the Space Shuttle Columbia, The\u00a0Macondo Well Blowout, The Ford Pinto Case, The VW Emissions scandal, the Tesla Automatic Driving accident, Three Mile Island, Chernobyl, Fukushima, and the Bhopal case, among others. Technology topics considered include brain-machine interface, human enhancement, genetic engineering, intelligent autonomous systems,\u00a0privacy and surveillance,\u00a0energy\u00a0technologies, and environmental issues, among others. Codes of ethics in engineering, ethical theory, philosophical models of knowledge production, and sociological models of human and technological agency are introduced to analyze these issues.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1373, "title": "Physics of Semiconductors and Nanostructures", "code": "ECE 4070", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Covers basic solid state and semiconductor physics relevant for understanding electronic and optical devices. Topics include crystalline structures, bonding in atoms and solids, energy bands in solids, electron statistics and dynamics in energy bands, effective mass equation, carrier transport in solids, Boltzmann transport equation, semiconductor homo- and hetero-junctions, optical processes in semiconductors, electronic and optical properties of semiconductor nanostructures, semiconductor quantum wells, wires, and dots, electron transport in reduced dimensions, semiconductor lasers and optoelectronics, high-frequency response of electrons in solids and plasmons.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1374, "title": "Autonomous Mobile Robots", "code": "ECE 4180", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Creating robots capable of performing complex tasks autonomously requires one to address a variety of different challenges such as sensing, perception, control, planning, mechanical design, and interaction with humans. In recent years many advances have been made toward creating such systems, both in the research community (different robot challenges and competitions) and in industry (industrial, military, and domestic robots). This course gives an overview of the challenges and techniques used for creating autonomous mobile robots. Topics include sensing, localization, mapping, path planning, motion planning, obstacle and collision avoidance, and multi-robot control.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1375, "title": "Digital Signal and Image Processing", "code": "ECE 4250", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Introduces statistical signal processing. Signal representation and manipulation are covered via correlation and using the DFT/FFT to estimate other transforms; applications of these topics are then covered, including quantization, quantization effects in digital filters, multirate DSP, filter banks, delta-sigma modulation, power spectrum estimation, and introductions to Wiener and Kalman filtering and image processing.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1376, "title": "Lasers and Optoelectronics", "code": "ECE 4300", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Introduction to the operation, physics, and application of lasers. The course covers diffraction-limited optics, Gaussian beams, optical resonators, the interaction of radiation with matter, stimulated emission, rate equations, and laser design. Examples of coherent radiation to nonlinear optics, communication, and leading-edge research are frequently used.\u00a0 Course concludes with a lab where students design and then build a laser.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1377, "title": "Integrated Micro Sensors and Actuators: Bridging the Physical and Digital Worlds", "code": "ECE 4320", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Introduction to micro and nano devices that allow the digital world to both sense and actuate in the physical world. Design and analysis of modern MEMS/NEMS (Micro/Nano Electromechanical Systems) touch, accelerometers, gyroscopes, pressure, microphones, neural probe sensors. Design and analysis of electrostatic, piezoelectric, thermal, and magnetic actuators for frequency control and micro robotic applications. This is an interdisciplinary course drawing from mechanics, materials, solid state devices, CMOS electronics, and micro and nano fabrication. The students design, fabricate, and test a microsensor chip to implement class concepts.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1378, "title": "Nanofabrication and Characterization of Electronics", "code": "ECE 4360", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course will give an introduction to modern nanofabrication technologies with emphasis on integrated circuits manufacturing. Thermal budget, scaling of geometry, pitch and registry and control of parametric yield will be used for integration guidelines. Physical principles and process modeling will be covered in lectures and labs will include a series of fabrication steps of lithography, metallization, plasma etching and annealing to produce semiconductor devices (Schottky diodes, pn junction diodes, MOS capacitors, and MOSFETs). Recent advances in nanofabrication will be briefly reviewed for their possible technology insertion and main integration challenges.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1379, "title": "Nanofabrication and Characterization of Electronics Laboratory", "code": "ECE 4361", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to nanofabrication technologies with emphasis on Si-based integrated circuits manufacturing as well as modern electronics based on GaN, 2D materials etc. The lab, primarily taught in the Cornell Teaching Cleanroom, includes basic fabrication steps of lithography, metallization, plasma etching and annealing. A series of devices will be fabricated: solar cells, MOS capacitors and transistors, 2D transistors, GaN HEMTs and LEDs.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1380, "title": "Power Systems and Market Operations", "code": "ECE 4520", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Examines the operations of electric power systems, the smart grid, and electricity markets. Topics include modeling of power systems, power flow analysis, economic dispatch, optimal power flow, unit commitments, electricity markets, demand response, smart grid technology, and transactive energy.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1381, "title": "Digital Communication System Design", "code": "ECE 4670", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "The goal of this course is to understand how state-of-the-art digital communication systems are designed and why they are designed in the way they are. The course will cover communication theory, transceiver algorithms that enable reliable communication, wireless channels, and modern communication standards (such as 3GPP LTE and WiFi). The students will design a working audio-band communication system that relies on orthogonal frequency-division multiplexing (OFDM).", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1382, "title": "Introduction to Digital (VLSI) Design", "code": "ECE 4740", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Course is equal parts analytical and real-world practical design. Analytical topics include basic transistor physics, switching behavior of transistors, interconnect modelling, combinational and sequential logic, memories, timing analysis, optimization, computer arithmetic, and architecture transforms. Practical topics include routing strategies, floor planning and other application/specification-driven decision-making considerations for the multi-variate CMOS digital design space. Emphasis will be on full-custom design using Cadence. Supervised access to Phillips 314 will be offered, but course can be completed remotely.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1383, "title": "Digital Systems Design Using Microcontrollers", "code": "ECE 4760", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Design of real-time digital systems using microprocessor-based embedded controllers. Students working in pairs design, debug, and construct several small systems that illustrate and employ the techniques of digital system design acquired in previous courses. The content focuses on the laboratory work. The lectures are used primarily for the introduction of examples, description of specific modules to be designed, and instruction in the hardware and high-level design tools to be employed.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1384, "title": "Introduction to Controlled Fusion: Principles and Technology", "code": "ECE 4840", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Introduction to the physical principles and various engineering aspects underlying power generation by controlled fusion. Topics include fuels and conditions required for fusion power and basic fusion-reactor concepts; fundamental aspects of plasma physics relevant to fusion plasmas and basic engineering problems for a fusion reactor; and an engineering analysis of proposed magnetic and/or inertial confinement fusion-reactor designs.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1385, "title": "Principles of Neurophysiology", "code": "ECE 4910", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Laboratory-oriented course designed to teach the concepts and tools of cellular neurophysiology through hands-on experience with extracellular and intracellular electrophysiological techniques, and computer acquisition and analysis of laboratory results. Students explore signal transmission in the nervous system by examining the cellular basis of resting and action potentials, and synaptic transmission\u00a0and optogenetic control of behavior and physiology. Lecture time is used to review nervous system physiology, introduce laboratory exercises, discuss lab results and primary research papers, and for presentation of additional experimental preparations and methods. Invertebrate preparations are used as model systems. BIONB4910 website", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1386, "title": "ECE Technical Writing", "code": "ECE 4920", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Technical writing aimed at having students write up their ECE projects in a formal fashion, with a view to publication. Projects may be existing, or may be created as part of the independent study, but the writing requirement will match the current College technical writing requirement.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1387, "title": "Special Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering", "code": "ECE 4950", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1388, "title": "Special Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering", "code": "ECE 4960", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1389, "title": "Supervised Teaching Experience", "code": "ECE 4980", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course is designed to give qualified undergraduates experience through actual involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of department faculty. Students cannot receive both pay and credit for the same hours of preparation and teaching. Enrollment is with permission of instructor only. One credit of ECE 4980 is equivalent to 5 weekly work hours, including both student contact hours and preparatory/other time.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1390, "title": "International Research Internship", "code": "ECE 4990", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1391, "title": "Electrical and Computer Engineering Group Projects", "code": "ECE 4998", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Group study, analysis, and, usually, experimental tests in connection with a special engineering project chosen by the students after consultation with the faculty member directing the project. New projects are added upon faculty request. Written progress reports are required.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1392, "title": "Electrical and Computer Engineering Independent Projects", "code": "ECE 4999", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Individual study or directed reading in connection with\u00a0a special engineering problem chosen by the student after consultation with the faculty member directing the project. An engineering report on the project is required. Students must make individual arrangements with a faculty sponsor.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1393, "title": "Systems Analysis Behavior and Optimization", "code": "ECE 5130", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This is an advanced course in the application of analytical methodologies and tools to the analysis and optimization of complex systems. On completion of this course, students should be able to use probability and statistics as a modeling and analysis tool for systems exhibiting uncertainty; be able to use algorithms and dynamic programming to model and optimize systems with a recursive structure; be able to use optimization tools to optimize complex systems and tune parameters.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1394, "title": "Theory of Linear Systems", "code": "ECE 5210", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "State-space and multi-input-multi-output linear systems in discrete and continuous time. The state transition matrix, the matrix exponential, and the Cayley-Hamilton theorem. Controllability, observability, stability, realization theory. At the level of Linear Systems by Kailath.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1395, "title": "Intelligent Autonomous Systems", "code": "ECE 5242", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "How can intelligent machines perceive, make decisions, and execute their plans in an uncertain, dynamic world? This course will cover algorithms for robotic perception, planning, and control with a focus on real-time adaptation and learning. Students should have prior experience with methods in signal processing and machine learning. Topics covered include probabilistic methods for scene segmentation, multimodal sensory integration, latent variable models for dynamical systems, path planning, and reinforcement learning for motor control.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1396, "title": "Quantum Optics for Photonics and Optoelectronics", "code": "ECE 5310", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This is a graduate level course on quantum optics. Topics covered include density matrices, semi-classical light matter interactions, Rabi oscillations, electromagnetically induced transparency and interference effects, dressed states, quantization of fields in cavity and free space, properties of photons, field commutation relations, number states, coherent states, quadrature and amplitude-phase squeezed states, vacuum fluctuations, matter-photon interactions, stimulated and spontaneous emission processes, classical/quantum descriptions of photon detection, coherent homodyne and heterodyne detection, coherence functions, cavity quantum optics and microcavity effects in spontaneous emission, cavity quantum optics in strong coupling and weak coupling limits, generation of quantum states of light, phase sensitive and phase insensitive optical amplifiers, parametric amplifiers, fundamental performance limits of optical amplifiers, photon statistics and characteristic functions, laser oscillators, numberand phase characteristics of laser light, parametric oscillators and squeezing, quantum opto-mechanics, opto-mechanical cooling and squeezing, noise penalty in simultaneous detection of two non-commuting field quadratures, bit error rates in optical communication systems, classical and quantum information and information carrying capacity of quantum states of light, quantum communications.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1397, "title": "Developing and Designing Interactive Devices", "code": "ECE 5413", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the human-centered and technical workings behind interactive devices ranging from cell phones and video controllers to household appliances and smart cars. This is a hands-on, lab-based course. For the final project, students will build a functional IoT prototype of their own design, using Javascript, single-board Linux computer, embedded microcontrollers, and other electronic components. Topics include electronics prototyping, interface prototyping, sensors and actuators, microcontroller development, physical prototyping, and user testing.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1398, "title": "Advanced Analog VLSI Circuit Design", "code": "ECE 5540", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Advanced analog integrated circuit and system design. Topics include integrated continuoustime filter design, translinear circuits and systems, dynamic analog techniques, integrated discrete-time filter design, and Nyquist-rate data converter design.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1399, "title": "Stochastic Systems: Estimation and Control", "code": "ECE 5555", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "The problem of sequential decision making in the face of uncertainty is ubiquitous. Examples include: dynamic portfolio trading, operation of power grids with variable renewable generation, air traffic control, livestock and fishery management, supply chain optimization, internet ad display, data center scheduling, and many more.\nIn this course, we will explore the problem of optimal sequential decision making under uncertainty over multiple stages - stochastic optimal control. We will discuss different approaches to modeling, estimation, and control of discrete time stochastic dynamical systems (with both finite and infinite state spaces) over finite horizons. Solution techniques based on dynamic programming will play a central role in our analysis. Topics include: Fully and Partially Observed Markov Decision Processes, Linear Quadratic Gaussian control, Bayesian Filtering, and Approximate Dynamic Programming. Applications to various domains will be discussed throughout the semester.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1400, "title": "Fundamentals of Data Compression", "code": "ECE 5620", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Fundamental limits and practical algorithms for data compression. Entropy and other information measures. Variable and \ufb01xed-length lossless and lossy source codes. Universal compression. Single-source and network con\ufb01gurations. Applications to text and multimedia compression.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1401, "title": "Datacenter Computing", "code": "ECE 5710", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "The course provides a strong foundation for students to understand the entire system stack in cloud computing systems today, from hardware to OS, resource management, and application frameworks, as well as considerations such as reliability, privacy, and security. The course consists of a mix of lectures and discussions of the latest papers in datacenter design and management. Topics include, but are not limited to: server design, hardware accelerators, cloud OS, cluster management, distributed programming frameworks, microservices, serverless computing, and cloud security and privacy.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1402, "title": "Introduction to Parallel Computing", "code": "ECE 5720", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Course covers introduction to parallel computing in disciplines where parallel computing is required either to solve problems in real time, perform large scale simulations, or analyze big data sets. The course will present essential approaches to parallel solutions for shared memory, distributed memory, and hybrid environments. Students will be expected to design, implement and evaluate application programs using OpenMP, MPI and NVIDIA CUDA systems.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1403, "title": "Design with Embedded Operating Systems", "code": "ECE 5725", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Design of microcontroller based systems using embedded Linux. Student teams design and debug example solutions on a target microcontroller (for example, Raspberry Pi) during lab sessions. Emphasis will be on application and Linux programming skills, processor and microcontroller architecture with some discussion of hardware interfaces. Students create a final, end-ofsemester project using the microcontroller platform and development techniques discussed during the semester.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1404, "title": "Embedded Systems Laboratory", "code": "ECE 5727", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This Master's level laboratory course covers how to interface real world sensors and actuators to embedded microprocessor systems. Concepts needed for building electronic systems for real-time operation and user interaction, such as digital input/outputs, analog-to-digital conversion, interrupt service routines, communications, and event-driven programming will be covered. The course will conclude with a student-designed final project demonstration and presentation.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1405, "title": "Complex Digital ASIC Design", "code": "ECE 5745", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Principles and practices involved in the design, implementation, testing, and evaluation of complex standard-cell ASIC chips using automated state-of-the-art CAD tools. Topics include hardware description languages; CMOS logic, state, and interconnect fundamentals; chip design methodologies; automated cell-based design; CAD algorithms; details of accurately modeling ASIC delay, energy, and area; robustness issues; testing, verification, and debugging; power distribution and clocking; packaging and I/O. Includes a six-week open ended project where small groups of students design, implement, test, and evaluate an interesting technique in computer architecture using functional-, microarchitectural-, registertransfer-, and layout-level modeling.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1406, "title": "Autonomous Mobile Robots", "code": "ECE 5772", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Creating robots capable of performing complex tasks autonomously requires one to address a variety of different challenges such as sensing, perception, control, planning, mechanical design, and interaction with humans. In recent years many advances have been made toward creating such systems, both in the research community (different robot challenges and competitions) and in industry (industrial, military, and domestic robots). This course gives an overview of the challenges and techniques used for creating autonomous mobile robots. Topics include sensing, localization, mapping, path planning, motion planning, obstacle and collision avoidance, and multi-robot control.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1407, "title": "Computer Analysis of Biomed Images", "code": "ECE 5780", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Powerful imaging modalities with attending computer image processing methods are evolving for the evaluation of health and the detection of disease. This course focuses on the quantitative analysis of such images and Computer Aided Diagnosis (CAD), i.e., the automatic identification and classification of abnormalities by the computer.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1408, "title": "Energy Seminar II", "code": "ECE 5880", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Energy resources, their conversion to electricity or mechanical work, and the environmental consequences of the energy cycle are discussed by faculty members from several departments in the university and by outside experts. Topics include energy resources and economics; coal-based electricity generation; nuclear reactors; solar power; energy conservation by users; and air pollution control.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1409, "title": "Advanced Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering", "code": "ECE 5960", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1410, "title": "Special Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering", "code": "ECE 5970", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1411, "title": "MEng Technical Internship", "code": "ECE 5999", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "This course offers M.Eng. students the opportunity to receive credit for ECE relevant work occurring as part of a summer (or semester) internship. Normally taken in the semester following the internship, students in the course will be required to write a detailed report describing the ECE related technical work performed during internship.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1412, "title": "Bio-inspired Coordination of Multi-Agent Systems", "code": "ECE 6680", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Autonomous multi-agent systems are becoming an integral part of our daily lives with thousands of robots and drones operating in places from warehouses to entertainment lightshows. With robot costs dropping to mainstream consumer levels, the current technological wave is driven by industry, researchers, and ambitious hobbyists, and spans applications in autonomous vehicles, construction, agriculture, and more. With this eminent technological revolution, it is critical that we look beyond robots working efficiently in parallel, and towards actual swarm intelligence for superior system ability and robustness beyond the sum of its parts. As a proof of concept, natural swarms exhibit efficient, error tolerant, and adaptive properties far beyond the individual scope. Beyond serving as an introduction to research, reading and review of scientific papers, this course also offers insights into both biology and the systems they have inspired.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1413, "title": "Multivariable Control Theory", "code": "ECE 6780", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Introduction to multivariable feedback control theory in both time and frequency domain. Topics include model-based control, performance limitations, Linear Quadratic and H-infinity optimal control, control synthesis vis convex optimization, and model predictive control. Additional topics at the discretion of the instructor.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1414, "title": "Master of Engineering Design Project II", "code": "ECE 6931", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Two-semester Design Project: must enroll in both semesters; students will receive a letter\u00a0grade for each individual\u00a0semester. For students enrolled in M.Eng. (Electrical and Computer Engineering) degree program. Uses real engineering situations to present fundamentals of engineering design. Each professor is assigned a section for the fall and spring. Students who do not complete the Design Project in the spring receive a grade only for the work completed up to the point of the required submission date, which is the last day of Finals Week. Students must then enroll for the summer with the ECE M.Eng. director to complete the work remaining for the design project.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1415, "title": "Graduate Topics in ECE", "code": "ECE 6970", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1416, "title": "Graduate Topics in Electrical and Computer Engineering", "code": "ECE 6980", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "Seminar, special interest, or temporary course.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1417, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "ECE 7920", "subject": "ECE", "descr": "For students enrolled in master's or doctoral program. Each professor is assigned a section number. To register, see roster for appropriate six-digit course ID numbers.", "tags": "ECE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1418, "title": "Principles of Micro-Economics Supplement", "code": "ECON 1001", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Reviews lecture material presented in ECON 1110\u00a0lectures; provides problem-solving techniques, study tips, and additional problems to prepare for exams and problem sets; provides additional time for questions and discussion of concepts. Provides additional instruction for students who need reinforcement.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1419, "title": "Principles of Macro-Economics Supplement", "code": "ECON 1002", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Reviews lecture material presented in ECON 1120\u00a0lectures; provides problem-solving techniques, study tips, and additional problems to prepare for exams and problem sets; provides additional time for questions and discussion of concepts. Provides additional instruction for students who need reinforcement.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1420, "title": "Introductory Microeconomics", "code": "ECON 1110", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Explanation and evaluation of how the price system operates in determining what goods are produced, how goods are produced, who receives income, and how the price system is modified and influenced by private organizations and government policy.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1421, "title": "Introductory Macroeconomics", "code": "ECON 1120", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Analysis of aggregate economic activity in relation to the level, stability, and growth of national income. Topics may include the determination and effects of unemployment, inflation, balance of payments, deficits, and economic development, and how these may be influenced by monetary, fiscal, and other policies.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1422, "title": "International Trade and Finance", "code": "ECON 2300", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "One-semester introduction to international economic principles and issues. Begins by surveying key topics such as the elements of comparative advantage, tariff and nontariff barriers, and multilateral institutions. The second part of the course treats selected topics in international finance, including exchange rates, balance of payments, and capital markets. Discusses current issues such as the effects of trade liberalization, trade and economic growth, and instability in international capital markets. Designed as a less technical introduction to concepts developed at a more advanced level in AEM 4300\u00a0and ECON 4510-ECON 4520.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1423, "title": "Intermediate Microeconomic Theory", "code": "ECON 3030", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "The pricing processes in a private enterprise economy are analyzed under varying competitive conditions, and their role in the allocation of resources and the functional distribution of national income is considered.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1424, "title": "Intermediate Macroeconomic Theory", "code": "ECON 3040", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Introduces the theory of national income and determination and economic growth in alternative models of the national economy. Examines the interaction and relation of these models to empirical aggregate economic data. Reviews national accounts, output and employment determination, price stability and economic growth, in the context of alternative government policy programs and the impact of globalization.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1425, "title": "Probability Models and Inference for the Social Sciences", "code": "ECON 3110", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to probability and parametric inference. Topics include: random variables, standard distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, likelihood-based estimation, sampling distributions and hypothesis testing.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|SMR-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1426, "title": "Applied Econometrics", "code": "ECON 3120", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Introduction to the theory and application of econometric techniques. Emphasis is on both development of techniques and applications of econometrics to economic questions. Topics include estimation and inference in bivariate and multiple regression models, instrumental variables, regression with qualitative information, heteroskedasticity, and serial correlation. Students are expected to apply techniques through regular empirical exercises with economic data.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1427, "title": "Econometrics", "code": "ECON 3140", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Introduction to the theory and application of econometric techniques. Emphasis is on foundations and development of econometric models, focusing on how a theoretical economic model can be placed into a statistical framework where data is used for the purposes of prediction/forecasting, measurement, and/or testing of economic theory. Topics include estimation and inference in bivariate and multiple regression models, instrumental variables, regression with qualitative information, heteroskedasticity, serial correlation.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1428, "title": "Development of Economic Thought and Institutions", "code": "ECON 3300", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Examines the causes and consequences of sustained economic growth, and the development of economics as a discipline, from pre-industrial mercantilist thought through the economics of John Maynard Keynes. Stresses the relationship between the consequences of 19th-century economic growth and the evolution of economic thought.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1429, "title": "Compensation, Incentives, and Productivity", "code": "ECON 3430", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Examines topics in labor economics of particular relevance to individual managers and firms. Representative topics include recruitment, screening, and hiring strategies; compensation (including retirement pensions and other benefits); training, turnover, and the theory of human capital; incentive schemes and promotions; layoffs, downsizing, and buyouts; teamwork; and internal labor markets. Focuses on labor-related business problems using the analytic tools of economic theory and should appeal to students with strong quantitative skills who are contemplating careers in general business, consulting, and human resource management as well as in economics.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1430, "title": "Race and the American Labor Market in Historical Perspective", "code": "ECON 3480", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This class investigates race and class in the American labor market from Colonial America to the present day. We investigate the circumstances and labor institutions that brought labor to the U.S. and how laborers of various classes were received. A primary goal of the class is to understand the degree to which social mobility was historically possible in different time periods in American history. Social mobility is intimately tied to labor market institutions and the ability for workers to get ahead within those institutions. Some of the institutions we study are Indentured Servitude, Slavery, tenant farming, the Great Migration and labor organization in the industrial north. Ultimately we hope to build an understanding of the historical roots of the role of race and class today.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1431, "title": "New Technologies and the Labor Market", "code": "ECON 3485", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course examines economic approaches to how new technologies impact the labour market. We will study how robots and digital technologies affect the nature of jobs and tasks, how technological developments affect the nature and flexibility of work contracts, as well as how firms and workers search and find each other. We will discuss the emergence of flexible work arrangements (gig economy, teleworking). The goal is to learn how economists approach and analyse these phenomena, both theoretically and empirically.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1432, "title": "Economics of Developing Countries", "code": "ECON 3550", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "The goal of this course is to expand students' understanding of the economics of developing countries. We will address questions like: why do some countries grow quickly and others slowly? What factors prevent countries, households, and individuals from escaping the cycle of poverty? How do policymakers balance economic growth and environmental sustainability? Why don't financial markets work well in most developing countries, and do informal institutions fill the gap? How do we analyze the challenges facing small-scale farming households, and how do decisions by those households influence migration, labor markets, and the growth of industry? How do we evaluate policies and programs in order to understand what works for development? The approach in this course will be primarily microeconomic, although a basic understanding of macroeconomics is important for some topics. Emphasis will be on theory, real-world examples, and reading and interpreting research and policy papers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1433, "title": "The Economics of Consumer Policy", "code": "ECON 3610", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Familiarizes students with the economic analysis of consumer policy issues. Uses the tools of microeconomic analysis to investigate the interaction between government and the marketplace, with an emphasis on how that interaction affects consumers. Examines the rationale for and effects of regulation of industry. Considers alternative theories of regulation, including the capture, economic, and public interest theories. Applies those theories to specific types of regulation, including economic regulation of specific industries (e.g., telecommunications, electricity, trucking, railroads, postal services) as well as to broader social regulation (e.g., health, safety, environmental). The effects of regulatory reform in numerous industries are also examined. An attempt is made to examine current topics relating to consumer policy.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1434, "title": "Behavioral Economics and Public Policy", "code": "ECON 3670", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Standard economic theory assumes that individuals are rational decision-makers; however, that is often not the case in the real world. Behavioral economics uses findings from psychology to determine ways in which individuals are systematically irrational to improve upon existing models. The first part of this course reviews these theories, while the second part of the course focuses on how these findings have been used to design better education, health, and tax policies as well as many others.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1435, "title": "Decision Theory I", "code": "ECON 3810", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research on decision theory resides in a variety of disciplines including computer science, economics, game theory, philosophy, and psychology. This course attempts to integrate these various approaches. The course is taught jointly by faculty from Game Theory and Computer Science. The course covers several areas: (1) basic decision theory. This theory, sometimes known as \"rational choice theory,\" is part of the foundation for the disciplines listed above. It applies to decisions made by individuals or by machines; (2) the limitations of and problems with this theory. Issues discussed here include decision theory paradoxes revealed by experiments, cognitive and knowledge limitations, and computational issues; (3) new research designed in response to these difficulties. Issues covered include alternative approaches to the foundations of decision theory, adaptive behavior and shaping the individual decisions by aggregate/evolutionary forces and more computationally based approaches.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1436, "title": "Networks II: Market Design", "code": "ECON 3825", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Networks II builds on its prerequisite course and continues to examine how each of the computing, economic, sociological and natural worlds are connected and how the structure of these connections affects these worlds. In this course, we will construct mathematical models for and analyze networked settings, allowing us to both make predictions about behavior in such systems, as well as reason about how to design such systems to exhibit some desirable behavior. Throughout, we will draw on real-world examples such as social networks, peer-to-peer filesharing, Internet markets, and crowdsourcing, that illustrate these phenomena.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1437, "title": "Resource Economics", "code": "ECON 3860", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course introduces students to the economics of renewable and nonrenewable natural resources. Topics covered include the valuation and use of land; the extraction and management of nonrenewable resources such as minerals, rare earth elements, and energy resources; renewable and nonrenewable sources of energy; forest management; water and groundwater economics, management, and conservation; and sustainability. Students will learn how to use dynamic models to analyze decision-making over time, and to solve dynamic optimization problems analytically and numerically. Students will also learn how to analyze and explain the intuition and logic behind the theory and concepts. Students will apply the methods, quantitative tools, and concepts to analyze natural resource issues at global and local levels; to introspectively reflect on their own lives and future aspirations; and to draw lessons and implications for leadership, management, and policy. A solid background in calculus is required.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1438, "title": "Environmental Economics", "code": "ECON 3865", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This class will focus on the role of the environment in the theory and practice of economics. It will make use of microeconomic analysis at the intermediate level and will incorporate real-world examples. It examines market failure, externalities, benefit-cost analysis, nonmarket valuation techniques, and cost-effective policy instruments.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1439, "title": "Policy Analysis: Welfare Theory, Agriculture, and Trade", "code": "ECON 3875", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "The first half of the course surveys the theory of welfare economics as a foundation for public policy analysis. Major issues addressed include the problem of social welfare measurement, the choice of welfare criteria, and the choice of market or nonmarket allocation. Basic concepts covered include measurement of welfare change, including the compensation principle, consumer and producer surplus, willingness-to-pay measures, externalities, and the general theory of second-best optima. The second half focuses on public policy analysis as applied to domestic agricultural policy and international trade. The domestic policy component examines major U.S. farm commodity programs and related food and macroeconomic policies and analyzes their effects on producers, consumers, and other groups. The international trade component examines the structure of world agricultural trade, analytical concepts of trade policy analysis, and the principal trade policies employed by countries in international markets.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1440, "title": "Game Theory I", "code": "ECON 4020", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Studies mathematical models of conflict and cooperation in situations of uncertainty (about nature and about decision makers).", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1441, "title": "Game Theory II", "code": "ECON 4022", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course is meant to be a second game theory course for those students, who have had exposure to game theory. The class will be organized topically, and some topic choice will depend upon student interest.\u00a0About half the term will be devoted to evolutionary game theory --- static theory, deterministic dynamics, and stochastic dynamics.\u00a0Other core topics include potential games and strategic complementarities. Additional topics may be selected from among cooperative game theory, refinements of Nash equilibrium, and estimation in games.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1442, "title": "Money and Credit", "code": "ECON 4210", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "A systematic treatment of the determinants of the money supply and the volume of credit. Economic analysis of credit markets and financial institutions in the United States.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1443, "title": "Economic Analysis of Politics", "code": "ECON 4290", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This is an advanced course intended for upper level economics undergraduates who enjoy learning about and analyzing economic models. The course provides an introduction to the economic analysis of politics. Part I discusses collective choice and introduces some core ideas from social choice theory. Part II provides an overview of economic theories of political behavior. Part III discusses how political decisions are distorted away from those that would be made by the benevolent governments from public economics textbooks. Part IV offers economic perspectives on a number of contemporary issues in American politics.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1444, "title": "International Trade Theory and Policy", "code": "ECON 4510", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Surveys the sources of comparative advantage. Studies commercial policy and analyzes the welfare economics of trade between countries. Some attention is paid to the institutional aspects of the world trading system.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1445, "title": "Industrial Organization I", "code": "ECON 4610", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course takes a game theoretic approach to the study of markets and market power. Topics include pricing, collusion, entry, product differentiation, advertising, and bargaining.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1446, "title": "Banks", "code": "ECON 4902", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Covers bank management and supervision, with special reference to international supervisory agreements (Basel II) and U.S. Federal guidance. Sources of risk are considered-market, credit, operational, and others. Quantitative methods for modeling and measuring risk are covered.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1447, "title": "Honors Program", "code": "ECON 4991", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Students should consult the director of undergraduate studies for details. Admission is competitive. Interested students should apply to the program in the spring of their junior year.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1448, "title": "Cross-Cultural Work Experiences", "code": "ECON 4997", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1449, "title": "Cross-Cultural Work Experiences", "code": "ECON 4998", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1450, "title": "Independent Study in Economics", "code": "ECON 4999", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1451, "title": "Microeconomic Theory II", "code": "ECON 6100", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Topics in consumer and producer theory, equilibrium models and their application, externalities and public goods, intertemporal choice, simple dynamic models and resource depletion, choice under uncertainty.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1452, "title": "Microeconomic Theory III", "code": "ECON 6110", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Topics in Non-Cooperative Game Theory.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1453, "title": "Macroeconomics II", "code": "ECON 6140", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Covers the following topics: dynamic programming; stochastic growth; search models; cash-in-advance models; real business-cycle models; labor indivisibilities and lotteries; heterogeneous agents models; optimal fiscal and monetary policy; sustainable plans; and endogenous growth.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1454, "title": "Econometrics II", "code": "ECON 6200", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "A continuation of ECON 6190\u00a0covering statistics: estimation theory, least squares methods, method of maximum likelihood, generalized method of moments, theory of hypothesis testing, asymptotic test theory, and nonnested hypothesis testing; and econometrics: the general linear model, generalized least squares, specification tests, instrumental variables, dynamic regression models, linear simultaneous equation models, nonlinear models, and applications.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1455, "title": "Health Economics II", "code": "ECON 6420", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course belongs to the health economics sequence. In addition to health economics, some topics cover public and labor economics. Students will also learn how to develop research sketches. First, we talk about U.S. health insurance and its intersection with the labor market. Then, we talk about health care providers, their reimbursement and behavior. Next, we study social insurance systems for health risks, such as disability or sick leave insurance. Finally, we cover specific topics like health measurement, the value of a statistical life or cost-benefit analysis. The lectures will not cover health behaviors (PAM 6410), human capital and early childhood effects, the environment-health literature, and effects of income, education, and unemployment on health (behaviors).", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1456, "title": "Empirical Strategies for Policy Research II", "code": "ECON 6591", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course is the second of a two-course sequence. Both PAM 6090\u00a0and this course are, for the most part, targeted at students looking to do empirical research into the effects of some X on some Y. Both courses require students to complete problem sets that involve \"hands-on\" exercises \u2013 some based on real data and some using Monte Carlo simulations. The hope is that this \"learning by doing\" will reinforce what is taught in class. Usually, the first course covers core methods, specifically regression adjustment, matching and instrumental variables. This second course covers additional topics in matching (we will touch on machine learning methods in the process), regression discontinuity designs, panel data methods, and mediation analysis in spring 2019.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1457, "title": "Decision Theory I", "code": "ECON 6760", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research on decision theory resides in a variety of disciplines including computer science, economics, game theory, philosophy, and psychology. This course attempts to integrate these various approaches. The course is taught jointly by faculty from Game Theory and Computer Science. The course covers several areas: (1) basic decision theory. This theory, sometimes known as \"rational choice theory,\" is part of the foundation for the disciplines listed above. It applies to decisions made by individuals or by machines; (2) the limitations of and problems with this theory. Issues discussed here include decision theory paradoxes revealed by experiments, cognitive and knowledge limitations, and computational issues; (3) new research designed in response to these difficulties. Issues covered include alternative approaches to the foundations of decision theory, adaptive behavior and shaping the individual decisions by aggregate/evolutionary forces and more computationally based approaches.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1458, "title": "Game Theory II", "code": "ECON 6822", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course is meant to be a second game theory course for those students who have had exposure to game theory. The class will be organized topically, and some topic choice will depend upon student interest. About half the term will be devoted to evolutionary game theory --- static theory, deterministic dynamics, and stochastic dynamics. Other core topics include potential games and strategic complementarities. Additional topics may be selected from among cooperative game theory, refinements of Nash equilibrium, and estimation in games.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1459, "title": "Foundations of the Social Sciences", "code": "ECON 6910", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Social science research almost always combines empirical observation (data), the construction of concepts (language), and the logical analysis of the relations between observations and concepts (statistics).\u00a0 This course examines the relations between these three dimensions as the analyst moves from one to the other both as practice and in the crafting of a formal summary of findings and argument. We will be particularly interested in the foundational assumptions that underpin the connections between empirical reality, language, and statistical analysis. While these foundational assumptions are often taken for granted by social scientists, they vary dramatically between social science disciplines.\u00a0 The implicit contradiction between that variance and their doxic acceptance within disciplines will be a primary focus of the course.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1460, "title": "Empirical Public Finance and Taxation", "code": "ECON 6970", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "The principal objective of this course is to explore empirical evidence on the role of government intervention in the economy. The focus of the course will be on reading important papers and learning techniques that will allow you to produce original research in public economics and to analyze critically existing research in the field.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1461, "title": "Readings in Economics", "code": "ECON 6990", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1462, "title": "Semi/Non Parametric Econometrics", "code": "ECON 7230", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Analyzes the ways identification problems limit the conclusions that may be drawn in empirical economic research and studies how identified and partially identified parameters can be estimated. In the first part of the course, the focus is on nonparametric models. Ways data can be combined with weak assumptions to yield partial identification of population parameters are discussed.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1463, "title": "Applied Bayesian Time Series Methods", "code": "ECON 7300", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "The course introduces students to Bayesian time series methods. Students will learn how to make likelihood-based inference about unobserved quantities, e.g. model parameters, policy impacts or future outcomes, conditional on the observed data. Applications include structural vector autoregressions, state space models and linearized dynamic stochastic general equilibrium macro models. Student will become familiar with numerical posterior simulation techniques such as Gibbs sampling and the Metropolis-Hasting algorithm. The course is useful for any students interested in empirical work that involves time series and/or structural\u00a0likelihood-based estimation.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1464, "title": "Introduction to Information Economics", "code": "ECON 7335", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Many economic decisions have to be made in settings in which many interacting agents have imperfect and diverse information about pay-off relevant variables. This course gives an overview of existing research in macroeconomics and finance that deviates from settings with perfectly informed rational agents. The course will cover both methodological and substantial aspects of the existing literature.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1465, "title": "Advances in Labor Economics", "code": "ECON 7465", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "This course aims to provide an in-depth perspective on three important themes in modern labor economics: (1) Job search, (2) Technological change and new forms of work, (3) Sorting of workers and firms. Both micro and macro perspectives will be considered.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1466, "title": "Industrial Organization and Regulation II", "code": "ECON 7520", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Rounds out some topics in the theory of industrial organization with the specific intent of addressing the empirical implications of the theory. Reviews empirical literature in the SCP paradigm and in the NEIO paradigm.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1467, "title": "Development Microeconomics Graduate Research Seminar", "code": "ECON 7650", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Graduate students and the instructor present draft research proposals, papers, and preliminary thesis results for group review and discussion. Students who actively participate by offering written and oral comments on others' work receive 1 credit. Students who also present their own proposal or paper receive 2 credits. Presentations last 75 minutes and thus represent a substantial investment of time. Students who present a second proposal or paper receive 3 credits.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1468, "title": "Microeconomics of International Development", "code": "ECON 7660", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Focuses on models of individual, household, firm/farm, and market behavior in low- and middle-income developing economies. Topics include agricultural land, labor, and financial institutions; technology adoption; food security and nutrition; risk management; intra-household analysis; reciprocity networks; and product/factor markets analysis. Emphasizes empirical research.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1469, "title": "Econometrics Workshop", "code": "ECON 7841", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guest lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1470, "title": "Microeconomic Theory Workshop", "code": "ECON 7842", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guest lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1471, "title": "Industrial Organization Workshop", "code": "ECON 7843", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guest lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1472, "title": "Workshop in Labor Economics", "code": "ECON 7845", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Presentations of completed papers and work in progress by faculty members, advanced graduate students, and speakers from other universities. Focuses on the formulation, design, and execution of dissertations.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1473, "title": "S.C. Tsiang Macroeconomics Workshop", "code": "ECON 7846", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guest lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1474, "title": "Public Economics Workshop", "code": "ECON 7848", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guest lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1475, "title": "Behavioral Economics Workshop", "code": "ECON 7849", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guest lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1476, "title": "Third Year Research Seminar II", "code": "ECON 7851", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Ph.D. students in the Field of Economics are required to take this year-long research seminar, and receive a grade of Satisfactory, in order to remain in good standing in the Ph.D. program. Students present and discuss each second-year paper, which must be completed before the semester opens and Economics 7850 meets for the first time. Students also present at least two additional papers or paper plans. These are intended to be part of the core of the student's thesis proposal, which must be given as part of the student's A Exam prior to the start of the fourth year of graduate study in the economics Ph.D. program. Economics 7851 ends with a mini-conference, attended by faculty and other Ph.D. students, in which each student makes a formal presentation in standard economics conference format, and each student discusses one of these presentations. Professional writing and presentation coaching is also provided.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1477, "title": "Applied Microeconomics Workshop", "code": "ECON 7853", "subject": "ECON", "descr": "Research workshop featuring guests lecturers.", "tags": "ECON", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1478, "title": "Designing and Facilitating Learning for Development", "code": "EDUC 2210", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "In Designing and Facilitating Learning for Development, we look for commonalities across a variety of venues and settings where people meet together to learn, deliberate, and act. From professional development to social change, town hall to union hall, or citizen science to workplace training, adult and community learning is everywhere. Yet, for many, the design and facilitation of meaningful learning experiences can be as mysterious as an unopened black box. How does one go about creating inclusive educational experiences for diverse learners in our increasingly interconnected context? In this course we open the box to become better leaders of learning and action. A democratic and socially just society should enable all of its citizens to develop their potential to the full and to have the capacity, individually and collectively, to meet the challenge of change. Through learning, people can come to make a real contribution to their own communities and participate in local and national democratic processes. Two of the most ubiquitous formats of adult learning are 1) the workshop, and 2) one-on-one mentoring. As a backwards design approach and interactive facilitation principles can serve each application well, we will learn and practice both! In this course you will a) design and facilitate workshops, and b) mentor a Cornell employee as they pursues a learning goal, and do both by learning and applying design process and facilitation arts. Meaningful. Practical. Fun.", "tags": "D-AG|KCM-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1479, "title": "The Art of Teaching", "code": "EDUC 2410", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "This exploratory course is designed for students of all backgrounds and interests who have a desire to learn more about education and teaching. Teaching takes place in a variety of contexts from the family to the workplace, and this course endeavors to examine the elements of teaching that transcend the typical school-teaching environment. Designed to guide students in reflecting upon their experiences to help them better understand the decisions they make as teachers. Students have the opportunity to pursue their own interests through a teaching fieldwork assignment. Possible field experiences range from large group to tutorial situations, from preschool to adult education, from traditional school subject matters to recreational and occupational areas, and from school-based to nonformal situations. The course work and readings are designed to build on these experiences throughout the semester and provide concepts and skills to apply in the field.", "tags": "CA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1480, "title": "Intergroup Dialogue", "code": "EDUC 2610", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Intergroup Dialogue is a structured, peer facilitated course offering an opportunity for students to develop the skills of/for dialogue in complex and dynamic social and institutional contexts. Students meet in intimate, small group settings to explore personal and social identity formation while examining historical, psychological, and sociological course readings. More broadly intergroup dialogue fosters a critical awareness of the ways in which sexism, heterosexism, religious intolerance and racism disable social justice and undermine deliberative democracy. Through a variety of in class exercises, written assignments and collaborative action projects students engage, analyze and develop the skills of dialogue for effective communication across social differences in highly diverse social contexts.", "tags": "CA-AG|D-AG|SBA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1481, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "EDUC 2710", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "This course is a blending of the Sociology of Education and Public Policy. Front and center in this course is the question of why consistent differential educational and economic outcomes exists in American society. We explore the broad sociological functions of schooling (socialization, sorting, caretaking, training) as well as local, state, and federal policies and court decisions.", "tags": "D-AG|HA-AG|SBA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1482, "title": "Educational Psychology", "code": "EDUC 3110", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Educational psychology is the application of psychological principles and concepts to cases of teaching and learning. We study behavioral, cognitive, embodied, and social-cultural perspectives on learning and thinking, and we use them in planning and reflecting on weekly fieldwork outside the classroom. In the process, we become more mindful and skilled learners ourselves and better facilitators of others' learning.", "tags": "CA-AG|KCM-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1483, "title": "Multicultural Issues in Education", "code": "EDUC 3405", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "This course explores research on race, ethnicity and language in American education. It examines historical and current patterns of school achievement for minoritized youths. It also examines the cultural and social premises undergirding educational practices in diverse communities and schools. Policies, programs and pedagogy, including multicultural and bilingual education, are explored.", "tags": "D-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1484, "title": "Engaged Learning through Extension, Outreach, and Instruction", "code": "EDUC 3510", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Course is designed to explore strategies and instruction across three aspects of adult education: the Cooperative Extension Service as a structured delivery vehicle, outreach in more informal and non-traditional formats, and college instruction as a formal structure to deliver technical expertise. The intent is to develop a program to meet our target audience, then implement a plan that successfully meets the needs and expectations of instructor and participants alike.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1485, "title": "Perspectives in Collegiate Teaching and Learning", "code": "EDUC 4050", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "EDUC 4050 builds off of the broad nature of EDUC 2410. This course incorporates extensive field work in teaching, lesson planning, and evaluation based upon current theories in instruction at the collegiate level. The course is intended to integrate theory and practice associated with learning and teaching in college classroom settings and includes a minimum of 40 hours of supervised fieldwork in specific college classes.", "tags": "KCM-AG|SBA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1486, "title": "Anthropology of Education", "code": "EDUC 4402", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "This seminar examines public schools and other educational spaces as sites where knowledge, learning,\u00a0learner, and identities are produced and contested. It explores how power and cultural norms work in educational settings, and the unintended teaching and learning that happens outside the purported curriculum. Topics include issues of multiculturalism and pluralism in schools and society, the school achievement of racial and ethnic minorities, youth cultures and identities, and literacy in adult learning spaces. This course is for students interested in the advanced study of multicultural schooling and education.", "tags": "CA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1487, "title": "Leading Dialogue Across Difference: Practicum in Intergroup Relations", "code": "EDUC 4826", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Through theoretical and experiential learning, students in EDUC 4826 will further develop knowledge and skills gained in EDUC 2610\u00a0for leadership across social, cultural, and political differences. Through weekly seminar sessions, students gain a working knowledge of scholarly literature drawn from the fields of critical intergroup dialogue, practice theory, social identity theory, and social justice education. Students learn about the theories and empirical evidence on why and how communication and collaboration across difference work. Moreover, through unique experiential learning opportunities in the classroom, students practice communication and collaboration across difference, as well as facilitation skills fundamental to leading intergroup dialogue processes.", "tags": "CA-AG|SBA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1488, "title": "Special Topics in Education", "code": "EDUC 4940", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and will be advertised by the department before the semester starts. Courses offered under this number will be approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1489, "title": "Undergraduate Internship In Education", "code": "EDUC 4960", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "On-the-job learning experience under the supervision of professionals in a cooperating organization. A learning contract is written between the faculty supervisor and students, stating the conditions of the work assignment, supervision, and reporting. All 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at cals.cornell.edu/academics/student-research/internship.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1490, "title": "Individual Study in Education", "code": "EDUC 4970", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "A student may, with approval of a faculty advisor, study a problem or topic not covered in a regular course or may undertake tutorial study of an independent nature in an area of educational interest.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1491, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching", "code": "EDUC 4980", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Participating students assist in teaching a course allied with their education and experience. Students are expected to meet regularly with a discussion or laboratory section, to gain teaching experience, and regularly to discuss teaching objectives, techniques, and subject matter with the professor in charge.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1492, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "EDUC 4990", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Affords opportunities for students to carry out independent research under appropriate supervision. Each student is expected to review pertinent literature, prepare a project outline, conduct the research, and prepare a report.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1493, "title": "Engaged Learning Through Extension, Outreach, and Instruction", "code": "EDUC 5510", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Course is designed to explore strategies and instruction across three aspects of adult education: the Cooperative Extension Service as a structured delivery vehicle, outreach in more informal and non-traditional formats, and college instruction as a formal structure to deliver technical expertise. The intent is to develop a program to meet our target audience, then implement a plan that successfully meets the needs and expectations of instructor and participants alike. The graduate level option will incorporate workshop, outreach, and instructional presentations developed from the grad student's area of expertise. A unit plan of instruction will also be developed.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1494, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "EDUC 5710", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "Examines the goals, roles, inputs, and outcomes of schooling in American society, and the policy environment in which schools operate. Analyzes controversies and tensions (e.g., equity, market forces, state control) surrounding public education at local, state, and federal levels. Includes current and historical, urban, and rural issues and problems.", "tags": "HA-AG|SBA-AG|EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1495, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "EDUC 7010", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves collection and analysis of research data.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1496, "title": "Anthropology of Education", "code": "EDUC 7402", "subject": "EDUC", "descr": "This seminar examines public schools and other educational spaces as sites where knowledge, learning, learner, and identities are produced and contested. It explores how power and cultural norms work in educational settings, and the unintended teaching and learning that happens outside the purported curriculum. Topics include issues of multiculturalism and pluralism in schools and society, the school achievement of racial and ethnic minorities, youth cultures and identities, and literacy in adult learning spaces. This course is for students interested in the advanced study of multicultural schooling and education.", "tags": "EDUC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1497, "title": "Improving Pronunciation", "code": "ELSO 6210", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "When we think about pronunciation, we often think about individual sounds, but other features of speech are often more important for making oneself understood. These features, such as pausing, intonation and stress, make up the melody of English. By the end of this course, students will increase their awareness of and control over the aspects of spoken English that most affect intelligibility, gain confidence for being understood by listeners, and develop strategies for more self-directed learning beyond the course.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1498, "title": "Taking Part in Discussions", "code": "ELSO 6220", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "In academia, students participate in discussions to share and create new knowledge, challenge ideas, and negotiate their identities. Thus participating in discussions is essential for students to become part of their academic community and have a voice in their fields. This course gives students strategies and practice working in range of discussion contexts, from one-on-one to planning and leading class discussions. By the end of this course, students will have learned strategies for preparing for, entering in, responding to, and being the leader of different types of discussions. Students will leave this course with more confidence to assert their voices.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1499, "title": "Designing and Delivering Effective Presentations", "code": "ELSO 6230", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "Whether presenting for seminars, journal club meetings, conferences, or in classes, being comfortable presenting is an essential part of graduate studies. This course will provide students with strategies for preparing and delivering presentations that are clear, compelling, persuasive, concise, and visually effective, as well as offer opportunities to practice delivering presentations in front of a supportive audience.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1500, "title": "Preparing to Write Workshop", "code": "ELSO 6515", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "This course is designed for international graduate and professional students who are in the early stages of a writing project or who want to learn strategies in preparation for future writing projects. During this course, students will explore general and discipline-specific writing processes, approaches to understanding types of writing in their field, strategies for reading and note-taking, library resources specific to their field, and approaches for generating ideas and prose with more ease.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1501, "title": "Research Paper Writing Workshop", "code": "ELSO 6535", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "This course is designed to assist international graduate and professional students in making progress on drafting a research paper (e.g. article for publications, dissertation chapter, seminar paper, or conference paper). Students will learn strategies for setting and meeting writing goals as well as strategies for developing particular sections of research papers.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1502, "title": "Thesis and Dissertation Writing Workshop", "code": "ELSO 6565", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "This course is designed to assist international graduate and professional students in making progress on drafting parts of their theses and dissertations. This course provides structured writing time, a supportive writing community, and access to writing resources.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1503, "title": "Revising and Editing Workshop", "code": "ELSO 6595", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "This course is designed to assist international graduate and professional students who have completed drafts of written pieces and wish to learn strategies for improving them. Students will learn how revise for organization and structure; edit for style, including flow, cohesion, and syntax; proofread for surface-level errors; assess the incorporation of source material (i.e. references); and improve overall readability.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1504, "title": "Communicating in the Workplace", "code": "ELSO 6610", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "This course is designed for international graduate and professional students who will need to communicate in English in professional contexts. Students will learn about differences between academic and workplace writing, explore North American workplace culture, investigate writing practices in particular professions, and gain experience with oral and written professional communication through a team project.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1505, "title": "Preparing for the Academic Job Search", "code": "ELSO 6630", "subject": "ELSO", "descr": "This course is designed to assist advanced international doctoral students as they prepare to apply for academic positions. Students will learn strategies for planning an academic job search, developing application materials (i.e. CVs, application letters, teaching statements, and research statements), and preparing for first- and second-stage interviews. This course would be useful to students who are just starting to become acquainted with the academic job search process as well as those preparing to apply for positions the following fall.", "tags": "ELSO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1506, "title": "How Reading Changes Your Life", "code": "ENGL 1100", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Reading changes your life. Sometimes it's a specific book; sometimes it's a way of reading that's new and different. This course will introduce different ways we can read and write about books and media, and their life-changing potential.\u00a0Designed as an introduction to literary studies, the class will sample different approaches, including (but not limited to) media studies, the novel (\"classical\" as well as \"young adult,\" whatever that means), graphic novel, memoir, short stories, poetry, and drama.\u00a0There will be guest speakers representing a range of different approaches. Emphasis will be on building skills and creating community.\u00a0This is a course for bookworms and wannabe bookworms who want to know what to do next about how books move them.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1507, "title": "FWS: Writing and Sexual Politics", "code": "ENGL 1105", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Topics and reading lists vary from section to section, but all will in some way address the subject of sexual politics. Some sections may deal with fiction, poetry, film, or drama, and many include a mix of literary genres. Students will practice close, attentive, and imaginative reading and writing.\u00a0Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1508, "title": "FWS: Writing Across Cultures", "code": "ENGL 1111", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Topics and reading lists vary from section to section, but all will engage in some way with an aspect of culture or subculture. Some sections may deal with fiction, poetry, film, or drama, and many include a mix of literary genres. Students will practice close, attentive, and imaginative reading and writing. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1509, "title": "FWS: Writing and Community Engagement", "code": "ENGL 1120", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "From literature to literacy, comics to archival work, writing can build bridges between campus and communities. Sections vary in topic, and issues may include healthcare, social justice, environmental studies, and others, but all will enable students to work with community partners. Students will learn skills in critical thinking and reflection, writing for specialized and non-specialized audiences, community engagement, and cultural awareness. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1510, "title": "FWS: Writing the Environment", "code": "ENGL 1130", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Our human abilities to communicate about nature, the environment, and climate change are challenged by the scale and scope of the topics. This course enables students to read, write, and design forms of communication that engage with the environment, in order to inform, advocate, and to connect with our world. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1511, "title": "FWS: True Stories", "code": "ENGL 1134", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "How do we understand the reality of others? For that matter, how do we know and understand our own experience? One answer is writing: writing can crystalize lived experience for others. We can record our observations, our thoughts, our feelings and insights and hopes and failures, to communicate them, to understand them. In this course, we will read nonfiction narratives that explore and shape the self and reality, including the personal essay, memoir, autobiography, documentary film, and journalism. We will write essays that explore and explain these complex issues of presenting one's self and others.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1512, "title": "FWS: Mystery in the Story", "code": "ENGL 1147", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What makes a story, and what makes it a mystery story? In this course, we'll study and write about the nature of narratives, taking the classic mystery tale written by such writers as Arthur Conan Doyle, Agatha Christie, and Raymond Chandler as typical of intricately plotted stories of suspense and disclosure that have been written and filmed in many genres: Greek tragedy, horror tales by Poe and Shirley Jackson, psychological thrillers by Ruth Rendell and Patricia Highsmith, neo-noir films such as Memento and Fight Club, and postmodern mystery parodies such as those of Paul Auster and Jorge Luis Borges. We'll look at the way they hold together, the desire and fear that drive them, and the secrets they tell\u2014or try to keep hidden.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1513, "title": "FWS: American Voices", "code": "ENGL 1158", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Topics and reading lists vary from section to section, but all will engage in some way with an aspect of American culture. Some sections may deal with fiction, poetry, film, or drama, and many include a mix of literary genres. Students will practice close, attentive, and imaginative reading and writing. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1514, "title": "FWS: Reading Now", "code": "ENGL 1167", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Reading is experiencing a new revolution in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries. We still read paper books, but we also read by scrolling on screen, through search engines, and in images and memes. What kinds of texts are emerging in this new era, and how do we read them? How do writing\u2014and our ways of reading\u2014connect with the urgent topics before us now: technology and social control, truth and media, climate change and apocalypse, identity, equality, and human rights? This course will examine the past twenty years of writing in a variety of genres, printed and/or online, from fiction to memoir to poetry and beyond. As we read, we will explore and discover the forms that our own writing can take in response.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1515, "title": "FWS: Cultural Studies", "code": "ENGL 1168", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "From TV news to rock lyrics, from ads to political speeches to productions of Shakespeare, the forms of culture surround us at every moment. In addition to entertaining us or enticing us, they carry implied messages about who we are, what world we live in, and what we should value. Topics and reading lists vary from section to section, but all are built on the assumption that learning to decode these messages is a survival skill in today's media-saturated world and also excellent training for reading literature. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1516, "title": "FWS: Short Stories", "code": "ENGL 1170", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What can a short story do that no other art form can do? We all consume and produce stories. To write about how narrative works, both within and against tradition, is to touch the core of identity, the quick of what makes us human. Storytelling informs all writing. Engaging diverse authors, we will practice not only reading sensitively and incisively but also making evidence-based arguments with power and grace, learning the habits of writing, revision, and documentation that allow us to join public or scholarly conversation. We will embrace \"shortness\" as a compression of meaning to unpack. Our own writing may include close analyses of texts, syntheses that place stories in critical dialogue, and both creative and research-based projects.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1517, "title": "FWS: Word and Image", "code": "ENGL 1183", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What happens when we adapt books into movies, write fan-fiction about video games, or create poetry about paintings? What happens when we write about one genre as though it were another? We have been writing about images and making images about writing for a long time. In addition to conventional types of art and literature like paintings, novels, or poetry, other forms such as film, video games, exhibitions, and virtual reality offer lively areas for analysis. In this class, we will engage with widely varied cultural forms\u2014including, perhaps, experimental poetry, medieval manuscripts, graphic novels, memoirs, plays, films, podcasts, and more\u2014to develop multiple media literacies as we sharpen our own writing about culture, literature, and art.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1518, "title": "FWS: British Literature", "code": "ENGL 1191", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Topics and reading lists vary from section to section, but all will engage in some way with the subject of British literature. Some sections may deal with fiction, poetry, or drama, and many include a mix of literary genres. Students will practice close, attentive, and imaginative reading and writing. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1519, "title": "FWS: Writing About Literature", "code": "ENGL 1270", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Reading lists vary from section to section, but close, attentive, and imaginative reading and writing are central to all. Some sections may deal with fiction, poetry, or drama, or include a mix of literary kinds. By engaging in discussions and working with varied writing assignments, students will explore major modes and genres of English poetry and prose, and may learn about versification techniques, rhetorical strategies, performance as interpretation, and thematic and topical concerns. In the process students will expand the possibilities of their own writing. Sections that invite students to study and write critically about plays or films in a variety of dramatic idioms and cultural traditions may require attendance at screenings or at live productions by the theatre department. All sections are taught by Department of English faculty. Consult the John\u00a0S. Knight Institute Current Courses webpage to access current year offerings, instructors and section descriptions.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1520, "title": "Introduction to Cultural Analytics: Data, Computation, and Culture", "code": "ENGL 1350", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course will prepare students in the humanities to analyze, interpret, and visualize cultural data with computational methods. After a basic introduction to the programming language Python, we will cover topics such as data collection and curation through web scraping and data retrieval, text mining, image analysis, network analysis, and data visualization. We will survey and discuss how these computational tools are applied in humanistic research. We will also reflect on the specific problems, challenges, and ethical dilemmas posed by the computational study of culture.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1521, "title": "Literature in English II: 1750 to the Present", "code": "ENGL 2020", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What is a self? An integrated whole or a mass of fragments? Is each of us connected to others, and if so, which others? Are we mired in the past, or can we break from old habits and beliefs to create new selves and new worlds? How affected are we by status: as servant or slave, explorer or settler, indigenous or immigrant? These are some of the most vital questions in literatures from Britain, the U.S, the Caribbean, and Africa. We will consider some of the texts that engage these questions including those by authors such as\u00a0Olaudah Equiano, John Keats, Edgar Allan Poe, Charlotte Bront\u00eb, Emily Dickinson, Zitkala-\u0160a, Una Marson, Mulk Raj Anand, Virginia Woolf, Chinua Achebe, Toni Morrison, and J.M. Coetzee.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1522, "title": "Shakespeare in the Twenty-First Century", "code": "ENGL 2080", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "More than 400 years after his death, Shakespeare remains an inescapable part of world culture.\u00a0His influence can be traced at every level, from traditional art forms like theater, poetry, and opera to popular genres like Broadway musicals, science fiction, crime thrillers, and romcoms. Contemporary adaptations and bold re-stagings of his plays abound that reflect his deep understanding of sexual and gender fluidity, racial and class antipathy, and the complex workings of political power.\u00a0In this course, we'll focus on five plays that continue to generate creative responses across many media: Romeo and Juliet, A Midsummer Night's Dream, Much Ado about Nothing, Julius Caesar, and Macbeth.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1523, "title": "Medieval Romance: Voyages to the Otherworld", "code": "ENGL 2100", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Romances were, essentially, medieval science fiction and fantasy writing. They were how authors in the Middle Ages imagined things beyond rational understanding that, at the same time, greatly extended the possibilities of the world around them.\u00a0 The course will survey some medieval narratives concerned with representative voyages to the otherworld or with the impinging of the otherworld upon ordinary experience. The syllabus will normally include some representative Old Irish otherworld literature:\u00a0 selections from\u00a0The Mabinogion; selections from the\u00a0Lays\u00a0of Marie de France; Chretian de Troye's\u00a0Erec,\u00a0Yvain, and\u00a0Lancelot; and the Middle English\u00a0Sir Gawain and the Green Knight.\u00a0 We will finish by looking at a few contemporary otherworld romances, such as selections from J.R.R. Tolkein. All readings will be in modern English. This class counts toward the pre-1800 requirement for English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1524, "title": "Popular Medievalisms", "code": "ENGL 2130", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Why is popular culture so obsessed with the Middle Ages? Why are new fantasy worlds so often \"medievalesque\"? Why are we compelled to imitate, reinvent, and even relive aspects of the medieval past? What do these continuities and repetitions reveal about contemporary narratives of progress and identity formation (race, gender)? Examples of\u00a0popular medieval forms we will examine\u00a0include: premodern fandom (relics, saints' lives, heroic culture); fantasy series and movies (Game of Thrones;\u00a0Harry Potter); \"histories\" of medieval epochs (e.g.\u00a0The Saxon Stories; The Vikings); Tolkien and C.S. Lewis; gaming culture (Dungeons and Dragons\u00a0to\u00a0Assassin's Creed); medieval-inspired satire (Monty Python,\u00a0The Knight's Tale); Arthuriana; and children's films (Shrek, Frozen). Assignments will include medieval texts and translations as well as theoretical, analytical, and creative writing. This course may be used as one of the three pre-1800 courses required of English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1525, "title": "Literature and Medicine", "code": "ENGL 2350", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "How does literary language depict the experience of physical suffering? Can a poem or a novel palliate pain, illness, even the possibility of death? From darkly comic narratives of black plague to the rise and fall of hysteria to depictions of the AIDS crisis, this course examines literature centered on medical practices from the early modern period through the twentieth century. Why have medical practices changed, and how do writers address their political, social, and ideological implications? Readings will include a broad range of genres, including poetry (Dickinson, Whitman, Keats), fiction (McEwan, Chekhov, Gilman, Kafka, Camus), theater (Kushner), nonfiction prose (Woolf, Freud), and critical theory (Foucault, Scarry, Canguilhem, Sontag).", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1526, "title": "Imagining the Holocaust", "code": "ENGL 2580", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "How is the memory of the Holocaust kept alive by means of the literary and visual imagination? Within the historical context of the Holocaust and how and why it occurred, we shall examine major and widely read Holocaust narratives that have shaped the way we understand and respond to the Holocaust. We also study ethical and psychological issues about how and why people behave in dire circumstances. We shall begin with first-person reminiscences\u2014Wiesel's Night, Levi's Survival at Auschwitz, and The Diary of Anne Frank\u2014before turning to realistic fictions such as Kineally's Schindler's List (and Spielberg's film), Kertesz's Fateless, Kosinski's The Painted Bird, and Ozick's \"The Shawl.\" We shall also read the mythopoeic vision of Schwarz-Bart's The Last of the Just, the illuminating distortions of Epstein's King of the Jews, the Kafkaesque parable of Appelfeld's Badenheim 1939, and the fantastic cartoons of Spiegelman's Maus books.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1527, "title": "Millennial Jewish Stars: Race, Gender and Sexuality", "code": "ENGL 2585", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "The rap superstar Drake, comedian Ilana Glazer, and muscleman Zac Efron are just three of the millennial Jewish stars examined in this course. We will ask how millennial Jewish stars depict Jewishness in terms of race, gender, sexuality. For instance, why has the rapper Lil Dicky chosen such an emasculating stage name, and why does Ilana Glazer embrace the outdated racial term \"Jewess?\" How do these names use historical Jewish stereotypes to fuel present-day comedy? We will trace racial, gendered, and sexual tropes about Jews from 19th-century theater to the newest YouTube sketches. We'll cluster these media around themes like women's pleasure, Jewish identity, cultural appropriation, anti-Semitism, and millennial financial struggles. We'll laugh hard, learn a lot, and see today's media through new eyes.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1528, "title": "Introduction to African American Literature", "code": "ENGL 2650", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course will introduce students to the African American literary tradition. Through aesthetic and contextual approaches, we will consider how African American life and culture has defined and constituted the United States of America. From slave narratives to Hip-Hop music, we will trace the range of artistic conventions and cultural movements while paying close attention to broader historical shifts in American life over the past three centuries. We will ask: How do authors create and define a tradition? What are some of the recurring themes and motifs within this tradition? Authors will include: David Walker, Frederick Douglass, Ida B. Wells-Barnett, W.E.B. DuBois, Zora Neale Hurston, Lorraine Hansberry, James Baldwin, Toni Morrison, Claudia Rankine, and Chimamanda Adichie.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1529, "title": "Cultures of the Cold War", "code": "ENGL 2675", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This class aims to approach the literature and culture of the Cold War as the birth of the present \"Age of Information,\" as well as the origin of modern notions of privacy that are now being superseded. We will begin with Hiroshima and the several forms of American anti-communism, and proceed from \"containment culture\" to the beginning of the counterculture, and from atomic weapons to the start of the environmental movement. Units of study will include intelligence (espionage), advertising (publicity), civil rights, and the public questioning of gender roles.\u00a0 We will also view a few films and discuss music and painting of the period. Authors include James Baldwin, Sylvia Plath, Marshall McLuhan, John Okada, Jack Kerouac, Frank O'Hara, Patricia Highsmith, and Rachel Carson.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1530, "title": "Thinking Media", "code": "ENGL 2703", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "From hieroglyphs to HTML, ancient poetry to audiotape, and Plato's cave to virtual reality, \"Thinking Media\" offers a multidisciplinary introduction to the most influential media formats of the last three millennia. Featuring an array of guests from across Cornell, including faculty from Communication, Comparative Literature, English, German Studies, Information Science, Music, and Performing & Media Arts, the course will present diverse perspectives on how to think with, against, and about media in relation to the public sphere and private life, archaeology and science fiction, ethics and aesthetics, identity and difference, labor and play, knowledge and power, expression and surveillance, and the generation and analysis of data.", "tags": "ALC-AS|CA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1531, "title": "Memoir", "code": "ENGL 2715", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What does it mean to put a life story on the page? How does memory shape the present, and vice versa? What stories resonate in memoir, and why is it such a popular genre? This course will address these questions through reading memoir, a genre that became widely popular in the late Twentieth Century but that has deep historical roots. We will explore the questions it raises primarily through reading contemporary memoirs by writers such as Primo Levi, Maxine Hong Kingston, Michael Ondaatje, Alison Bechdel, and others.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1532, "title": "Philosophy and Literature", "code": "ENGL 2725", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What can I know? What ought I do? What may I hope for? The three fundamental questions Kant says philosophy aims to answer have also been traditionally asked by literature: What kinds of truths and knowledge of ourselves, others, and the world can literature offer us? Does literature help us act morally or foster faith that history bends towards justice? This course introduces students to how literature and philosophy work with and sometimes against each other in addressing these concerns through problems such as the construction of identity, passions and human community, body-mind interrelations, the nature of aesthetic experience. We will also examine the role of metaphors, narrative, and dialogue in philosophy. Authors include Plato, Sophocles, Hume, Sterne, Kant, Shelley, Nietzsche, Merleau-Ponty, Woolf, Adorno, Beckett.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1533, "title": "Movies, Stories, Ethics", "code": "ENGL 2735", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Stories are the most popular way we make sense of our lives and the world around us, and this introductory, discussion-based course focuses on stories told in different media \u2013 especially literary and cinematic -- to explore ethical issues. We see how, in everyday life, people have experienced moral quandaries and sought to understand and resolve them. We examine short texts and videos about our duties not only to others but also to ourselves \u2013 as well as to non-human creatures and our planet. We view films that focus on: acts of conscience and dissent (Official Secrets; Spotlight); organized political resistance (Gandhi; Amazing Grace); gendered self-deception ( TV's Mad Men); and go on to compare representations of major socio-political events (Central Park Five; When They See Us).", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1534, "title": "Desire", "code": "ENGL 2760", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "\"Language is a skin,\" the critic Roland Barthes once wrote: \"I rub my language against the other. It is as if I had words instead of fingers, or fingers at the tip of my words. My language trembles with desire.\" Sexual desire has a history, even a literary history, which we will examine through an introductory survey of European dramatic literature from the Ancient Greeks to the present, as well as classic readings in sexual theory, including Plato, Freud, Foucault, and contemporary feminist and queer theory.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1535, "title": "Desire and Modern Drama", "code": "ENGL 2762", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1536, "title": "Creative Writing", "code": "ENGL 2810", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "An introductory course in the theory, practice, and reading of fiction, poetry, and allied forms. Both narrative and verse readings are assigned. Students will learn to savor and practice the craft of poetry and narrative writing, developing techniques that inform both. Some class meetings may feature peer review of student work, and instructors may assign writing exercises or prompts.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1537, "title": "Expository Writing", "code": "ENGL 2890", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course offers guidance and an audience for students who wish to gain skill in expository writing\u2014a common term for critical, reflective, investigative, and creative nonfiction. Each section provides a context for writing defined by a form of exposition, a disciplinary area, a practice, or a topic intimately related to the written medium. Course members will read in relevant published material and write and revise their own work regularly, while reviewing and responding to one another's. Students and instructors will confer individually throughout the term. Topics differ for each section.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1538, "title": "American Shakespeare", "code": "ENGL 2983", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "What is distinctive about American Shakespeare? Is it merely a less confident cousin of its more prestigious UK relative; or does it have a character of its own? What is currently happening with 'American Shakespeare' that is not happening anywhere else? This course is designed explicitly to exploit the wide variety of human and material resources of the DC and surrounding area, such as the Folger Shakespeare Library and Theatre, the Shakespeare Theatre and the Blackfriars Playhouse at Staunton. While encountering a number of plays, students will have the opportunity to see at least three live performances and numerous movies, consider the history of Shakespeare in America and learn from actors, directors, scholars and designers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1539, "title": "The First American University", "code": "ENGL 2999", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Educational historian Frederick Rudolph called Cornell University \"the first American university,\" referring to its unique role as a coeducational, nonsectarian, land-grant institution with a broad curriculum and diverse student body. In this course, we will explore the history of Cornell, taking as our focus the pledge of Ezra Cornell and Andrew Dickson White to found a university where \"any person can find instruction in any study.\" The course will cover a wide range of topics and perspectives relating to the faculty, student body, evolution of campus, and important events and eras in Cornell history. Stories and vignettes will provide background on the current university and its administrative structure, campus traditions, and the names that adorn buildings and memorials throughout campus. Finally, the course will offer a forum for students to address questions on present-day aspects of the university.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1540, "title": "Literary Theory on the Edge", "code": "ENGL 3021", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Without literary theory, there is no idea of literature, of criticism, of culture. While exciting theoretical paradigms emerged in the late 20th century, including structuralism and poststructuralism, this course extends theoretical inquiry into its most exciting current developments, including performance studies, media theory and cinema/media studies, the digital humanities, trauma theory, transgender studies, and studies of the Anthropocene. Taught by two Cornell professors active in the field, along with occasional invited guests, lectures and class discussions will provide students with a facility for close textual analysis, a knowledge of major currents of thought in the humanities, and an appreciation for the uniqueness and complexity of language and media. This course may involve presentation of performance art.\u00a0 Course open to all levels; no previous knowledge of literary or cultural theory required.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1541, "title": "Video and New Media: Art, Theory, Politics", "code": "ENGL 3115", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "The course will offer an overview of video art, alternative documentary video, and digital installation and networked art. It will analyze four phases of video and new media: (1) the development of video from its earliest turn away from television; (2) video's relation to art and installation; (3) video's migration into digital art; (4) the relation of video and new media to visual theory and social movements. Screenings will include early political and feminist video (Ant Farm, Rosler, Paper Tiger TV, Jones), conceptual video of the '80s and '90s (Vasulka, Lucier, Viola, Hill), gay and multicultural video of the '90s (Muntadas, Riggs, Piper, Fung, Parmar), networked and activist new media of the 21st century (Critical Art Ensemble, Electronic Disturbance Theater, SubRosa, Preemptive Media). Secondary theoretical readings on postmodernism, video theory, multicultural theory, and digital culture will provide students with a cultural and political context for the discussion of video and new media style, dissemination, and reception.", "tags": "LA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1542, "title": "Beowulf", "code": "ENGL 3120", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Beowulf is about monsters, dragons and heroes and is the longest and most interesting Old English heroic poem. In this course we will read the poem in the original and discuss the critical and scholarly problems which the poem presents. Some knowledge of Old English is appropriate, but the class is open to beginners in Old English who will be provided with tutorial help in preparing and reading assigned passages. Among the topics we will discuss are the relationship of Beowulf to \"pagan\" practice and belief, the related question of\u00a0 \"Christianity and Paganism \" in the poem, \"Beowulf and the tradition of\u00a0 Germanic heroic poetry\", \" Orality and Christian Latin learning \"and \"Beowulf, Tolkien, and the modern age\". The course will be open to student initiatives, if students wish to explore such topics as Beowulf and archeology or the historical context of the poem. The class counts toward the pre-1800 requirement for English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1543, "title": "Jane Austen", "code": "ENGL 3390", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "It is a truth universally acknowledged, that students who have read Jane Austen must be in want of an opportunity to continue that delicious experience, and that those who have not read her novels should. This course explores Austen's characters, culture, and narrative art against the backdrop of films, novels, and poems which resonate with her fiction. We will investigate Austen's importance in literary history as well as her continuing attraction in the twenty-first century. By immersing ourselves in her fictional world we will enrich our experience of her novels and sharpen our awareness of the pleasures of reading.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1544, "title": "African American Literature Through the 1930's", "code": "ENGL 3507", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "One way to think of African American literature is to recognize that certain themes and motifs recur and tell a story that one can study across time from slavery to freedom.\u00a0 Solid literacies in this field not only provide valuable interpretive contexts for analyzing various aspects of African American and diasporan life and culture, but can reinforce work in a range of other fields, from Africana studies to American literature.\u00a0 Additionally, they reinforce skills in reading and analysis of literature, as well as writing, that will pay off now and as time goes on.\u00a0 We will examine selections from authors in African American literary history from the 18th century into the 1930s.\u00a0 Authors who will be examined include Phillis Wheatley, Olaudah Equiano, Frederick Douglass, David Walker, Harriet Jacobs, Harriet Wilson, Charles Chesnutt, Paul Laurence Dunbar, Booker T.\u00a0 Washington, W.E.B. DuBois, James Weldon Johnson, Jean Toomer, Nella Larsen, and Langston Hughes.\u00a0 The production of early African American literature was grounded in genres such as poetry, the novel, the short story, the slave narrative, the spiritual narrative, and autobiography, all of which will be explored.\u00a0 It will be especially important for us to recognize the foundational contributions of African Americans to such fiction genres as the short story and the novel by the 1850s, forming a renaissance of sorts.\u00a0 Additionally, we will consider the impact of oral forms on African American writing such as spirituals and folk tales.\u00a0 We will consider the development of African American literature across a range of historical contexts, including the Revolutionary/Enlightenment period, the antebellum period, the Civil War and Reconstruction, and the Harlem Renaissance/Jazz Age.", "tags": "LA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1545, "title": "Imagining India, Home and Diaspora", "code": "ENGL 3530", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "A modern country and an ancient civilization, India has been imagined through the ages in many different ways. This introductory course focuses on the 20th and 21st centuries, drawing on films (Bollywood and Hollywood), TV shows, music, novels, and political thought. Readings from Gandhi, Ambedkar, Tagore, Kipling, Forster, Premchand, Senapati, Manto, Ananthamurthy and Roy as well as such diasporic writers as Rushdie, Lahiri, and Naipaul.", "tags": "LA-AS|GLC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1546, "title": "Thinking from a Different Place: Indigenous Philosophies", "code": "ENGL 3560", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "The Western nation-state has failed to solve the two most pressing, indeed catastrophic, global problems: poverty and climate change. This failure is due to the inability of national policy to imagine a world beyond a boundary drawn by the formative capitalist ideas of property, production, and profit. The course will begin by discussing the historical origin and continuing force of these ideas while raising questions about their limits. Then it will look at a range of alternative ideas about how the world should work if we want to keep it socially, economically, and ecologically in balance. The alternatives we will query come from a range of Indigenous writers of fiction, poetry, and theory, who locate themselves in Native American (north and south), Aboriginal, and Maori communities.", "tags": "LA-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1547, "title": "Playing God: Medieval and Early Renaissance Drama", "code": "ENGL 3720", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "After Rome's collapse, drama was gradually re-created from many sources: school-room debates, popular festivals, and, especially, religious liturgy. By the 17th century it was one of the most polished literary arts (and one of the sleaziest). This long span allows us to consider what happened in the middle. This course traces the residues of Roman drama and some \"rebeginnings\" of European drama, 10th to 13th centuries, then focuses mainly on late medieval drama in English in the 15th century, following that into the drama of the early Renaissance. We'll consider what became \"modern\"-and what was utterly unlike anything later. Discussion, lecture, regular writing, some experiments with production. English texts will be read in Middle English with lots of help; no previous knowledge required. This class counts as one of the three pre-1800 courses required of English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1548, "title": "Design Thinking, Media, and Community", "code": "ENGL 3741", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course collaborates with a Civic Storytelling project supporting media\u00a0\u200blocal\u00a0projects\u00a0around issues such as health and wellbeing, the environment, economics, and social identity. Cornell students will role-play as critical design firms working with real stakeholders. Students will learn human-centered design skills through design thinking, media-making, and multivalent performance assessment while helping develop transmedia lesson kits for schools and community organizations. Our goal is to support youth-based civic discourse through transmedia knowledge-making: real stories about real issues for real audiences. Students will also document and reflect on their work by building a class website.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1549, "title": "Africans and African Americans in Literature", "code": "ENGL 3742", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "When an African and an African American meet, solidarity is presumed, but often friction is the result. In this course, we will consider how Africans and African Americans see each other through literature. What happens when two peoples suffering from double consciousness meet? We will examine the influence of historical forces including slavery, colonialism and pan-Africanism on the way writers explore the meeting between Africans and African Americans. Specifically we will look at how writers such as W.E.B DuBois, Maya Angelou, NoViolet Bulawayo, Chimamanda Adichie, Richard Wright, Eugene Robinson, Philippe Wamba, Teju Cole, and Malcolm X have understood the meeting.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1550, "title": "Free Speech, Censorship, and the Age of Global Media", "code": "ENGL 3778", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course will help us understand how our ideas about free speech are shifting in an age of global information by surveying the history of censorship from the late 16th-century to the present day. In democratic societies, freedom of expression is both a cultural value and protected right, and yet governments also routinely regulate speech through a variety of mechanisms: from direct censorship, to licensing and copyright laws, to high court decisions about what qualifies as \"speech\". We will consider how the categories of dangerous speech\u2014blasphemy, pornography, treason, libel\u2014and thresholds of toleration, have changed over time. And we will also consider forms of censorship that have sought to protect freedoms and ensure civil discourse, such as restrictions on hate speech, genocide denial, and \"fake news\". Authors and subjects may include Milton, Defoe, Freud, Foucault, Joyce, MacKinnon, Butler, Wiki-Leaks, campus speech debates, Anonymous, social media, net neutrality and the economic determinants of free speech.", "tags": "ALC-AS|CA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1551, "title": "Communicating Climate Change", "code": "ENGL 3795", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "There is a lot of consensus about the science of climate change. But many members of the public remain confused or uninformed about the severity of the situation. Some are paralyzed by fear. Others are blissfully ignorant. What are the best ways of communicating climate change to a variety of audiences? Should we tell stories? Make documentaries? Dramatize the science? This course will ask you to read, write and design many different forms and genres in order to experiment with the problem of communicating climate change, from pie-charts to science fiction and from photography to TED Talks. What can each form tell us about climate change that the others cannot? We will take on a real-world communication project over the course of the semester.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1552, "title": "Literary Translation", "code": "ENGL 3805", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This workshop is designed to enrich your literary imagination and exercise your craft through the art of translation. Introduction to translation theory will guide you through the intriguing relationship between author, reader and text. Reading like a translator will challenge your understanding of the nuances of voice, tone and style. The act of translation\u2014close reading accompanied by the mastery of language that measures up to the great writers\u2014will engage with all of your creative resources.\u00a0Knowledge of other languages is a plus, but not a requirement.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1553, "title": "Narrative Writing", "code": "ENGL 3830", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course focuses upon the writing of fiction or related narrative forms. May include significant reading and discussion, explorations of form and technique, completion of writing assignments and prompts, and workshop peer review of student work. Many students will choose to write short stories, but excerpts from longer works will also be accepted.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1554, "title": "Poetry Writing", "code": "ENGL 3850", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course focuses upon the writing of poetry. May include significant reading and discussion, explorations of form and technique, completion of writing assignments and prompts, and workshop peer review of student work.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1555, "title": "The Personal Voice: Nonfiction Writing", "code": "ENGL 3890", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Writers of creative nonfiction plumb the depths of their experience and comment memorably on the passing scene. They write reflectively on themselves and journalistically on the activities and artifacts of others. The voice they seek is at once uniquely personal, objectively persuasive, and accessible to others who want relish their view of the world and learn from it. This course is for the maturely self-motivated writer (beyond the first year of college) who wants to experiment with style and voice to find new writerly personae in a workshop environment. During the semester, we'll read enabling models of literary nonfiction, including one another's, and work to develop a portfolio of diverse and polished writing.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1556, "title": "Poetry and Poetics of the Americas", "code": "ENGL 3910", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "As globalization draws the Americas ever closer together, reshaping our sense of a common and uncommon American culture, what claims might be made for a distinctive, diverse poetry and poetics of the America? How might we characterize its dominant forms and alternative practices? What shared influences, affiliations, concerns and approaches might we find and what differences emerge? Ranging across North and South America, Central America and the Caribbean, this course will place in conversation such figures as Poe, Stein, Eliot, Pound, Williams, Neruda, Vallejo, Borges, Parra, C\u00e9saire, Walcott, Bola\u00f1o, Espada, Waldrop, Vicu\u00f1a, Hong, and Rankine.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1557, "title": "Apes and Language", "code": "ENGL 3921", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Talking chimpanzees, orangutans, bonobos or gorillas are certainly widespread in myths, novels or movies (from Franz Kafka to The Planet of the Apes, from Tristan Garcia to We Are All Completely Beside Ourselves). But centuries of philosophical speculation and of scientific research have also endowed some great apes with the ability to communicate verbally with humans, either through sign language or with arbitrary symbols on computer keyboards. This class will explore the scientific, theoretical, imaginary, and legal underpinnings and consequences of such endeavors and narratives, thereby also serving as an introduction to the \"post-humanistic\" field of \"animal studies.\" Our course will take advantage of unique video resources, the Cornell archive documenting the life of Kanzi and other bonobos as well as the \"Ape Testimony Project.\"", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1558, "title": "Staging Faith: Contemporary Theatre and Lived Religions", "code": "ENGL 3947", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Religious beliefs, practices, and conflicts shape our world and influence global politics.\u00a0 Yet mediatized depictions of religion can be reductive and polarizing.\u00a0 Moreover, these depictions may be different from what people experience in their everyday lives.\u00a0 In the contemporary theatre, we have the opportunity to consider representations of individuals' lived religion, the complex questions of belief, and challenges to faith from within and outside religious communities.\u00a0 Through close readings of plays and related materials engaging with Christian, Jewish, Muslim, Sikh and other faith traditions, we will explore and discuss together the religious motivations, tensions, and dilemmas facing us today.\u00a0 Our texts include, among others, Jesus Christ Superstar, Indecent, Angels in America, and Heroes of the Fourth Turning.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1559, "title": "Body Politics in African Literature, Cinema, and New Media", "code": "ENGL 3977", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "GLC-AS|LA-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1560, "title": "Latinx Popular Culture Matters", "code": "ENGL 3980", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course examines several areas of Latinx popular culture that influence U.S. politics and society, artistic productions, and aesthetic sensibilities, as well as popular and civic cultures. Mapping a historical trajectory of Chicanidad and Latinidad in art, music, film, and popular media in the twentieth century, the course also engages contemporary art practices that are rooted in 1960s and 1970s civil rights and community art movements. Topics include Latinx people in film and TV, muralism and street art, music, spoken word as well as close examinations of representations of Latinx people in American mainstream culture.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1561, "title": "Poetry in Process", "code": "ENGL 4030", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Like all of us, poets change over time. In this course we'll track the shifting visions and styles of three major American poets whose work spans two centuries. Whitman, Stevens, and Ammons differ in many ways, but they share an expansive perspective that celebrates mind, body, and creativity while acknowledging violence, loss, and death. Rather than reading each poet separately, we'll move back and forth among them, comparing the phases of their careers, charting their formal and stylistic innovations, and exploring the lines of influence that connect them. Ammons taught at Cornell from 1964 to 1998, and we'll consider how his work synthesizes Whitman's rugged physicality and Stevens's meditative subtlety to produce a poetry that draws equally on scientific thought and religious feeling.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1562, "title": "Fictional Worlds in the Nineteenth-Century British Novel", "code": "ENGL 4470", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Why are prequels and sequels snapped up so eagerly by today's audiences? Extending the story-line backwards or forwards allows us to gain new insights into characters we thought we knew. The same can happen with the fictional worlds that surround the characters. Some Victorian novels gain this sort of richness by themselves, without extending their stories backward or forward. We will read two such novels, Dickens's\u00a0Little Dorrit and Eliot's Middlemarch. Both are quite long, but our course syllabus will give you time to enjoy them. Wuthering Heights joins them, reminding us that memorable fictional worlds can come in smaller packages. These three novels allow us to experience life in a city and a town, as well as in isolated dwellings on the English moors. They are among the greatest novels written in the Victorian era, or in any other.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1563, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "ENGL 4505", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1564, "title": "New Black Southern Women Writers", "code": "ENGL 4603", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Anna Julia Cooper's pioneering publication of A Voice from the South (1892) underscores the centrality of black women in determining the possibilities for black racial uplift in the nation. Areas from local color and regionalism, to contemporary fields such as cultural geography, have underscored the impact of geography on identity. Such insights have increasingly underscored that region matters in shaping black women's identities in the U.S., along with their various cultural productions. Black women writers in the U.S. South played a salient role in shaping the black women's literature renaissance of the 1970s in both writing and theorizing literature, and thus, in expanding the conventional canons in African American and American literature more broadly. This course considers the new generation of writers of black women that has emerged in the U.S. South in more recent years in the twenty first century, whose writings have increasingly impacted the development of contemporary African American literature. This course is designed to meet this body of material with serious reading, study and critical analysis. Genres that we will explore include the novel, poetry, the essay and the memoir, along with visual art. We will consider a range of newer authors, including Edwidge Danticat, Honor\u00e9e Jeffers, Tayari Jones, Valdez Perkins, Natasha Tretheway, Jesmyn Ward, and Shay Youngblood. Concomitantly, we will explore the visual art of Kara Walker. We will consider ways in which these writers build upon established themes and conventions in African American and black women's writing and the implications of their work for black feminist theory. Furthermore, we will examine the impact of their work within the emergent field of twenty first century African American literature and criticism.", "tags": "LA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1565, "title": "Contemporary Native American Fiction", "code": "ENGL 4625", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "If you haven't read contemporary U.S. American Indian fiction, then it might be fair to ask how much you know about the United States, its origins and its current condition. Since the 1960s, American Indians have been producing a significant body of award-wining novels and short stories. In 1969, for example, N. Scott Momaday, from the Kiowa nation, won the Pulitzer Prize for his novel House Made of Dawn and in 2012 Louise Erdrich, who is Anishinaabe, won the National Book Award for her novel The Round House. In between these two notable moments and since we can list an impressive number of Native storytellers whose work is aesthetically powerful, offering us a narrative of the United States that counters the official history. Centrally the course will focus on the various formal approaches Native writers take from surrealism to realism in representing the (post)colonial situation of Indian country and the ongoing resistance in Indian country to the U.S. legal and political regime.", "tags": "ALC-AS|LA-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1566, "title": "Reading Joyce's Ulysses", "code": "ENGL 4700", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "A thorough episode-by-episode study of the art and meaning of\u00a0 the most influential book of the twentieth century, James Joyce's Ulysses.\u00a0 The emphasis is on the joy and fun of reading this wonderful and often playful masterwork. We shall place Ulysses in the context of Joyce's writing career, Irish culture, and literary modernism. We shall explore the relationship between Ulysses and other experiments in modernism\u2014including painting and sculpture\u2014and show how Ulysses redefines the concepts of epic, hero, and reader. We shall examine Ulysses as a political novel, including Joyce's response to Yeats and the Celtic Renaissance; Joyce's role in the debate about the direction of Irish politics after Parnell; and Joyce's response to British colonial occupation of Ireland. We shall also consider Ulysses as an urban novel in which Bloom, the marginalized Jew and outsider, is symptomatic of the kind of alienation created by nativist xenophobia. No previous experience with Joyce is required.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1567, "title": "Be a Man! Masculinity, Race, and Nation", "code": "ENGL 4757", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course analyzes how cultural beliefs about masculinity intersect with race, sexuality, and citizenship. To emphasize how masculine norms vary across cultures, we will use the plural term \"masculinities.\" Treating gender as a relational system of power, we will investigate how masculinities are defined against femininities, and how different masculinities are defined against each other (for example, the stereotypes of the Latino \"bad hombre\" vs. the white \"all-American football player\"). Combining sociological studies with media analysis, we will ask the following questions and more: Where do beliefs about masculinities come from, and how do they change over time? How do these beliefs naturalize certain kinds of violence? How do these beliefs interact with, and help to create, ideas about race and nation?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1568, "title": "Advanced Poetry Writing", "code": "ENGL 4810", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course is intended for creative writers who have completed\u00a0ENGL 3840\u00a0or\u00a0ENGL 3850\u00a0and wish to refine their poetry writing. It may include significant reading and discussion, explorations of form and technique, completion of writing assignments and prompts, and workshop peer review of student work. In addition to the instructor's assigned writing requirements, students may work on longer-form verse writing projects.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1569, "title": "Advanced Narrative Writing", "code": "ENGL 4811", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course is intended for narrative writing students who have completed ENGL 3820\u00a0or ENGL 3830\u00a0and wish to refine their writing. It may include significant reading and discussion, explorations of form and technique, completion of writing assignments and prompts, and workshop peer review of student work. In addition to the instructor's assigned writing requirements, students may work on longer-form narrative writing projects.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1570, "title": "Shakespeare's Hamlet: The Seminar", "code": "ENGL 4820", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1571, "title": "Medieval Technologies of the Self", "code": "ENGL 4909", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Recent years have seen a boom in ways to use technology in order to learn about and improve the self. This course examines contemporary cultural orientations toward technology by exploring how medieval thinkers turned to language, images, books, and other tools and means of making in order to develop a sense of themselves in ethical relationship to others and to the world around them. We will place medieval work (such as Chaucer and Kempe) in conversation with resonant modern and contemporary writing (including Haraway, hooks, and Foucault). Advertisements and marketing for apps like \"Co-Star\", and \"Calm\" will supplement our discussions. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1572, "title": "Honors Seminar II", "code": "ENGL 4920", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "The purpose of the Honors Seminar is to acquaint students with methods of study and research to help them write their senior Honors Essay. However, all interested students are welcome to enroll. The seminar will require a substantial essay that incorporates literary evidence and critical material effectively, and develops an argument. Topics and instructors vary each semester. For Spring 2021, the topic for section 101 will be The Jazz Age, and the topic for section 102 will be Race, Class, Gender, and Violence.", "tags": "ALC-AS|ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1573, "title": "Honors Essay Tutorial I", "code": "ENGL 4930", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Students should secure a thesis advisor by the end of the junior year and should enroll in that faculty member's section of ENGL 4930. Students enrolling in the fall will automatically be enrolled in a discussion section, which will meet a few times throughout the semester and will give students a chance to get together with other honors students to discuss issues pertinent to writing a thesis. Topics will include compiling a critical bibliography and writing a prospectus. Professor Elisha Cohn, the Honors Director in English, will contact students to set up the first meeting time.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1574, "title": "Honors Essay Tutorial II", "code": "ENGL 4940", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course is the second of a two-part series of courses required for students pursuing a Bachelor of Arts with Honors in English. The first course in the series is ENGL 4930\u00a0Honors Essay Tutorial I.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1575, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "ENGL 4950", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1576, "title": "Literary Theory on the Edge", "code": "ENGL 6021", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Without literary theory, there is no idea of literature, of criticism, of culture. While exciting theoretical paradigms emerged in the late 20th century, including structuralism and poststructuralism, this course extends theoretical inquiry into its most exciting current developments, including performance studies, media theory and cinema/media studies, the digital humanities, trauma theory, trangender studies, and studies of the Anthropocene. Taught by two Cornell professors active in the field, along with occasional invited guests, lectures and class discussions will provide students with a facility for close textual analysis, a knowledge of major currents of thought in the humanities, and an appreciation for the uniqueness and complexity of language and media. This course may involve presentation of performance art.\u00a0 Course open to all levels; no previous knowledge of literary or cultural theory required.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1577, "title": "Medieval Allegorical Poetry", "code": "ENGL 6115", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This seminar treats allegorical poetry spanning the Middle Ages but aimed at later medieval England, interlarded with modern and medieval theory. The modes of medieval allegory, entailing religious, historical, moral, economic, and political interpretation, merge with ideas of signification and figural language in general, but also with the practice of distinctive medieval genres such as debate, visions, homily, and morality drama. Selections, in Latin and French followed by medieval English works, include Augustine, Macrobius, Boethius, Bernardus Silvestris, Alan of Lille, the Owl and the Nightingale, Roman de la rose, Nicholas Bozon, the Ovide moralis\u00e9, and Piers Plowman, plus debates, lyrics, drama, and political allegories. Translations of Latin and French and some of the Middle English works will be available. Informal writings, two essays, take-home final.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1578, "title": "Beowulf", "code": "ENGL 6120", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Beowulf is about monsters, dragons and heroes and is the longest and most interesting Old English heroic poem. In this course we will read the poem in the original and discuss the critical and scholarly problems which the poem presents. Some knowledge of Old English is appropriate, but the class is open to beginners in Old English who will be provided with tutorial help in preparing and reading assigned passages. Among the topics we will discuss are the relationship of Beowulf to \"pagan\" practice and belief, the related question of\u00a0 \"Christianity and Paganism \" in the poem, \"Beowulf and the tradition of\u00a0 Germanic heroic poetry\", \" Orality and Christian Latin learning \"and \"Beowulf, Tolkien, and the modern age\". The course will be open to student initiatives, if students wish to explore such topics as Beowulf and archeology or the historical context of the poem.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1579, "title": "Black Feminist Theories: Sexuality, Creativity, and Power", "code": "ENGL 6207", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course examines black feminist theories as they are articulated in the cross-cultural experiences of women across the African Diaspora. We will explore a variety of theories, texts and creative encounters within their socio-political and geographical frames and locations, analyzing these against, or in relation to, a range of feminist activisms and movements. Some key categories of discussion will include Black Left Feminism, Feminist Movements in Latin America and the Caribbean and African feminisms. Texts like the Combahee River Collective statement and a variety of US Black feminist positions and the related literature as well as earlier black feminist articulations such as the Sojourners for Truth and Justice will also be engaged. Students will have the opportunity to develop their own research projects from a range of possibilities.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1580, "title": "Women Writers in North America, 1830-1930", "code": "ENGL 6410", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "Not quite a survey, this course investigates several terms that its title might obscure. Drawing on theoretical constructions of gender, genre, race, and history, the course considers the historical conditions for women writers as they produce works under conditions of necessity, pleasure, politics, and polemical insistence. We will read poetry, short stories, letters, and novels. Authors will include Harriet Prescott Spofford, Harriet Wilson, Harriet Jacobs, and Harriet Beecher Stowe as well as Emily Dickinson, Alice and Phoebe Cary, Sui Sin Far, Sarah Winnemucca, Maria Ruiz de Burton, Edith Wharton, Nella Larsen, and Zora Neale Hurston.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1581, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "ENGL 6505", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1582, "title": "African American Print Culture", "code": "ENGL 6585", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course focuses on early African American print culture as archive, emerging field, and method. We will historicize and theorize modes of antebellum authorship, circulation, infrastructure, and readership as well as attend to particular genres and forms (slave narrative, serial fiction, sketches, poetry, etc.). We'll place special emphasis on periodicals (Freedom's Journal, Frederick Douglass's Paper, the Anglo-African Magazine, etc.), the colored conventions movement, and digital projects, such as the Colored Conventions Project. We will think about what the study of print culture brings to early African American studies, as well as how early African American studies challenges print culture methodologies.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1583, "title": "Joyce's Ulysses", "code": "ENGL 6700", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "A thorough episode-by-episode study of the art and meaning of\u00a0 the most influential book of the twentieth century, James Joyce's Ulysses. The emphasis is on the joy and fun of reading this wonderful and often playful masterwork. We shall place Ulysses in the context of Joyce's writing career, Irish culture, and literary modernism. We shall explore the relationship between Ulysses and other experiments in modernism\u2014including painting and sculpture\u2014and show how Ulysses redefines the concepts of epic, hero, and reader. We shall examine Ulysses as a political novel, including Joyce's response to Yeats and the Celtic Renaissance; Joyce's role in the debate about the direction of Irish politics after Parnell; and Joyce's response to British colonial occupation of Ireland. We shall also consider Ulysses as an urban novel in which Bloom, the marginalized Jew and outsider, is symptomatic of the kind of alienation created by nativist xenophobia. No previous experience with Joyce is required.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1584, "title": "Playing God: Medieval and Early Renaissance Drama", "code": "ENGL 6721", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "After Rome's collapse, drama was gradually re-created from many sources: school-room debates, popular festivals, and, especially, religious liturgy. By the 17th century it was one of the most polished literary arts (and one of the sleaziest). This long span allows us to consider what happened in the middle. This course traces the residues of Roman drama and some \"rebeginnings\" of European drama, 10th to 13th centuries, then focuses mainly on late medieval drama in English in the 15th century, following that into the drama of the early Renaissance. We'll consider what became \"modern\"-and what was utterly unlike anything later. Discussion, lecture, regular writing, some experiments with production. English texts will be read in Middle English with lots of help; no previous knowledge required.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1585, "title": "MFA Seminar: Poetry", "code": "ENGL 7810", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "The MFA poetry seminar is a required course for MFA poetry students.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1586, "title": "MFA Seminar: Fiction", "code": "ENGL 7811", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "The MFA fiction seminar is a required course for all MFA fiction students.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1587, "title": "Pedagogical and Thesis Development", "code": "ENGL 7890", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This is a required course for students pursuing an MFA degree in Creative Writing. The course will focus on the pedagogical methodology and philosophical approaches to teaching creative writing. The workshop format will include readings, guest speakers, lesson plan development, and the vetting of syllabi. Graduate students in both poetry and fiction will share ideas on teaching and thesis development.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1588, "title": "Directed Study", "code": "ENGL 7940", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course gives students the opportunity to work with a selected instructor to pursue special interests or research not treated in regularly scheduled courses. After getting permission of the instructor, students should enroll online in the instructor's section. Enrolled students are required to provide the department with a course description and/or syllabus along with the instructor's approval by the end of the first week of classes.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1589, "title": "Group Study", "code": "ENGL 7950", "subject": "ENGL", "descr": "This course should be used for an independent study in which a small group of students works with one member of the graduate faculty. After getting permission of the instructor, students should enroll online in the instructor's section. Enrolled students are required to provide the department with a course description and/or syllabus along with the instructor's approval by the end of the first week of classes.", "tags": "ENGL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1590, "title": "Communication Intensive Opportunity: Practicum in Technical Writing", "code": "ENGRC 3023", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "One-credit attachment to an existing engineering course that is not one of the officially designated W-I courses. It may be taken more than once, with different courses by permission of a particular engineering faculty member.", "tags": "ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1591, "title": "Communication for Game Development", "code": "ENGRC 3152", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1592, "title": "Independent Study in Engineering Communications", "code": "ENGRC 3340", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "Members of the ECP occasionally give independent (also called \"directed\") studies in engineering communications, typically with students who are ready for advanced work in technical communication. A student doing a directed study works one-on-one with an ECP instructor to pursue an aspect of professional communications in more depth than is possible in the ECP's regular courses. Various types of projects are possible, e.g., studying forms of technical documentation, creating user manuals, analyzing and producing technical visuals, reading and writing about problems in engineering performance, and communicating about technical topics for the public.", "tags": "ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1593, "title": "Communications for Engineering Managers", "code": "ENGRC 3350", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "Like ENGRC 3500\u00a0in that students write various types of documents (e.g., letters, memos, executive summaries, progress reports), give talks, and incorporate graphics in both their oral and written work. However, ENGRC 3350 focuses on understanding communication within engineering organizations and within student teams. Students work in project teams throughout the semester to write reports and deliver talks. The focus of the project teams depends on instructor, but might include analyzing case studies of engineering organizations, studying organizations on-site, and analyzing concepts in organizational communication and behavior.", "tags": "CE-EN|ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1594, "title": "Engineering Communications", "code": "ENGRC 3500", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "Prepares students for important communication activities. They communicate using various types of documents (e.g., emails, memos, problem analyses, proposals, progress reports), give oral presentations, and incorporate graphics in their oral and written work. Students learn how to communicate specialized information to different audiences (e.g., technical and nontechnical audiences, colleagues and clients, peers and supervisors, and in-house departments), work in teams, and address organizational and ethical issues. The course material is drawn from professional contexts, principally engineering, and it generates lively discussion. The class size ensures close attention to each student's work.", "tags": "CE-EN|ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1595, "title": "Communication for Transportation Engineering", "code": "ENGRC 3610", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "Supplemental technical communication course linked with CEE 3610 (Introduction to Transportation Engineering).", "tags": "ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1596, "title": "Communication for Advanced Game Development", "code": "ENGRC 4152", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1597, "title": "Communication for Computer-aided Engineering", "code": "ENGRC 4530", "subject": "ENGRC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ENGRC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1598, "title": "Statics and Mechanics of Solids", "code": "ENGRD 2020", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "Covers principles of statics, force systems, and equilibrium in solid structures. Topics include: free body diagrams in two and three dimensions; frames; mechanics of deformable solids; stress and strain; axial force; shear force, bending moment, and torsion in bars and beams; thermal stress; pressure vessles; statically indeterminate problems; buckling and yielding.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1599, "title": "Introduction to Circuits for Electrical and Computer Engineers", "code": "ENGRD 2100", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "This course is an introduction to electronic circuits. We start with the basic quantities used to characterize circuit operation (like current, voltage, and power) and then enforce several physical laws to form the basis of our approach to circuit analysis. Networks comprising passive circuit elements such as resistors, inductors, and capacitors will be examined under constant dc, transient, and sinusoidal steady-state conditions. Active components including transistors and Op-Amps will be introduced and used to build simple amplifiers and switching power converters. Many of these ideas will be unified mathematically through the use of Laplace transforms and associated transfer functions. In the lab part of the course, we will learn how to use modern instruments to test circuits, and explore the concepts from lecture applied to real circuits. Finally, we will develop some simple modeling software in MATLAB to numerically predict the results from analysis and experiment.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1600, "title": "Object-Oriented Programming and Data Structures", "code": "ENGRD 2110", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "Intermediate programming in a high-level language and introduction to computer science. Topics include object-oriented programming (classes, objects, subclasses, types), graphical user interfaces, algorithm analysis (asymptotic complexity, big \"O\" notation), recursion, testing, program correctness (loop invariants), searching/sorting, data structures (lists, trees, stacks, queues, heaps, search trees, hash tables, graphs), graph algorithms. Java is the principal programming language.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1601, "title": "Signals and Information", "code": "ENGRD 2220", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "Introduction to signal processing. Topics include frequency-based representations: Fourier analysis and synthesis; discrete time linear systems: input/output relationships, filtering, spectral response; analog-to-digital and digital-to-analog conversion; continuous time signals and linear time invariant systems: frequency response and continuous-time Fourier transform.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1602, "title": "The Earth System", "code": "ENGRD 2250", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "EAS 2250 provides a broad math-, physics-, and chemistry-based introduction to the earth sciences, including geology, paleontology, oceanography, and atmospheric science. Topics covered include formation of the Earth, the chemistry and physics of the Earth's interior, plate tectonics, weathering and erosion, soil development, stream and groundwater flow, volcanism and crustal deformation, the evolution of life, ocean and atmospheric structure, circulation and heat transport, ocean waves and tides, generation of storms, seawater chemistry, mineral and energy resources, and climate change.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1603, "title": "Digital Logic and Computer Organization", "code": "ENGRD 2300", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the design and implementation of digital circuits and microprocessors. Topics include transistor network design, Boolean algebra, combinational circuits, sequential circuits, finite state machine design, processor pipelines, and memory hierarchy. Design methodology using both discrete components and hardware description languages is covered in the laboratory portion of the course.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1604, "title": "Engineering Quantum Information Hardware", "code": "ENGRD 2550", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "This course examines the physical hardware of quantum information processing, quantum communication, and quantum sensing technologies. Topics include an analysis of qubit attributes and an introduction to the operational principles of physical qubits. Specific systems will include photonic circuits, trapped ions, superconducting quantum circuits, isolated solid-state spins and quantum dots.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1605, "title": "Electronic Materials for the Information Age", "code": "ENGRD 2620", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "Examines the electrical and optical properties of materials. Topics include the mechanism of electrical conduction in metals, semiconductors and insulators; tuning of electrical properties in semiconductors, charge transport across metal/semiconductor and semiconductor/semiconductor junctions, and the interaction of materials with light; semiconductor electronic devices; and the materials science of device fabrication. Applications in microelectronics, solar cells, electronics, and display technologies are discussed.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1606, "title": "Basic Engineering Probability and Statistics", "code": "ENGRD 2700", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "Gives students a working knowledge of basic probability and statistics and their application to engineering. Includes computer analysis of data and simulation. Topics include random variables, probability distributions, expectation, estimation, testing, experimental design, quality control, and regression.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1607, "title": "Engineering Computation", "code": "ENGRD 3200", "subject": "ENGRD", "descr": "Introduction to numerical methods, computational mathematics, and probability and statistics. Development of programming and graphics proficiency with MATLAB and spreadsheets. Topics include Taylor-series approximations, numerical errors, condition numbers, operation counts, convergence, and stability, probability distributions, hypothesis testing. Included are numerical methods for solving engineering problems that entail roots of functions, simultaneous linear equations, statistics, regression, interpolation, numerical differentiation and integration, and solution of ordinary and partial differential equations, including an introduction to finite difference methods. Applications are drawn from different areas of engineering. A group project uses these methods on a realistic engineering problem.", "tags": "ENGRD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1608, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: CHEM 2090", "code": "ENGRG 1009", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for CHEM 2090. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in CHEM 2090.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1609, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: CS 1110", "code": "ENGRG 1010", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for CS 1110. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in CS 1110.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1610, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: CS 2110", "code": "ENGRG 1011", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for CS 2110. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in CS 2110.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1611, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: CS 1112", "code": "ENGRG 1012", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for CS 1112\u00a0. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in CS 1112.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1612, "title": "Kessler Fellows Entrepreneurship Cohort Seminar", "code": "ENGRG 1022", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Course introduces Kessler Fellows to the startup culture, job skills, and methods to evaluate possible internship opportunities. Students will also be introduced to the entrepreneurship ecosystem at Cornell and the various entrepreneurship resources available. Topics to be discussed include: interview skills and expected questions, conducting research on private companies, employee roles and responsibilities at startups, role of a product manager, creating \"OKRs\" (Objectives and Key Results), venture financing, and the Business Model Canvas and critically thinking about startups. Will include guest speakers from current startups.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1613, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: MATH 1920", "code": "ENGRG 1092", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for MATH 1920. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in MATH 1920.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1614, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: MATH 2930", "code": "ENGRG 1093", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for MATH 2930. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in MATH 2930.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1615, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: MATH 2940", "code": "ENGRG 1094", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for MATH 2940. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions. Peer-facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in MATH 2940.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1616, "title": "Engineering in Reality", "code": "ENGRG 1400", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Overview of engineering fundamentals and disciplines for enhanced interactions between non-engineers and engineers. Topics include Engineering Disciplines, Engineering Nomenclature, Project Planning, Organizational Structure, and Quality. Through Engineering Student Project Teams, students are in an applied setting that fosters knowledge transfer from the classroom to practice and development of professional skills necessary to work in multidisciplinary teams. Students will participate on their team and regularly attend team meetings as well as course seminars held during the semester.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1617, "title": "Career Development in Engineering", "code": "ENGRG 2350", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Prepare to engage, reflect, and explore! This discussion based course will consist of in-class activities, journaling exercises, and homework assignments for shaping your career goals, choices, and planning. Through this course, you will develop an awareness of and ability to manage the career development process. You will be able to communicate with confidence about your values, skills, and strengths. You will learn to make connections with others who can assist you in your career development and advancement. You will create your own personal mission and vision statements. And, you will apply engineering knowledge to product design. If you are looking for a challenging and thought-provoking experience that encourages asking question, being curious, and taking risks, you've found it!", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1618, "title": "AEW Collaborative Workshop: ENGRD 2700", "code": "ENGRG 2700", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Academic Excellence Workshop for ENGRD 2700. Weekly two-hour collaborative learning sessions.\u00a0 Peer facilitated group works on problems at or above the level of course material, designed to enhance understanding of core concepts in ENGRD 2700\u00a0(Basic Engineering Probability and Statistics).", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1619, "title": "Engineering Economics and Management", "code": "ENGRG 3230", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Introduction to engineering and business economics investment alternatives and to project management. Intended to give students a working knowledge of money management and how to make economic comparisons of alternatives involving future benefits and cost. The impact of inflation, taxation, depreciation, financial planning, economic optimization, project scheduling, and legal and regulatory issues are introduced and applied to economic investment and planning and project-management problems.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1620, "title": "Engineering in Reality", "code": "ENGRG 3400", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Overview of engineering fundamentals and disciplines for enhanced interactions between non-engineers and engineers. Topics include Engineering Disciplines, Engineering Nomenclature, Project Planning, Organizational Structure, and Quality. Through Engineering Student Project Teams, students are in an applied setting that fosters knowledge transfer from the classroom to practice and development of professional skills necessary to work in multidisciplinary teams. Students will participate on their team and regularly attend team meetings as well as course seminars held during the semester.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1621, "title": "Ethical Issues in Engineering Practice", "code": "ENGRG 3600", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Studies ethical issues involved in engineering practice. Explores the engineer's role in technical decision-making in organizations. Considers the engineer's relationship to the uses of technology in society, especially emerging technologies. Case studies covered include the Space Shuttle Challenger, the Space Shuttle Columbia, The\u00a0Macondo Well Blowout, The Ford Pinto Case, The VW Emissions scandal, the Tesla Automatic Driving accident, Three Mile Island, Chernobyl, Fukushima, and the Bhopal case, among others. Technology topics considered include brain-machine interface, human enhancement, genetic engineering, intelligent autonomous systems,\u00a0privacy and surveillance,\u00a0energy\u00a0technologies, and environmental issues, among others. Codes of ethics in engineering, ethical theory, philosophical models of knowledge production, and sociological models of human and technological agency are introduced to analyze these issues.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1622, "title": "Entrepreneurship for Engineers", "code": "ENGRG 4610", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Develops skills necessary to identify, evaluate, and begin new business ventures. Topics include intellectual property, competition, strategy, business plans, technology forecasting, finance and accounting, and sources of capital. A rigorous, quantitative approach is stressed throughout, and students create financial documents and plans, analyze human resource models, and work with sophisticated valuation methods, complicated equity structures, and legal and business documents. As such, this course represents the \"red meat\" of entrepreneurship, and the soft skills are left for other courses. Course work consists of discussions, assignments, and the preparation and presentation of a complete business plan.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1623, "title": "Entrepreneurial Practicum in Engineering", "code": "ENGRG 4960", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "This course provides a means by which engineering students can develop and refine their innovative technical ideas.\u00a0 The course is tailored to individual student or student group needs, linking them with mentors and resources, including prototyping facilities, to help enable them to move their innovative ideas forward.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1624, "title": "Engineering Professionalism", "code": "ENGRG 5330", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "The primary focus is to prepare students for the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) exam, which is required as the first step in obtaining a Professional Engineering license. Other engineering professionalism topics will be covered in some of lectures. The FE exam is valid in any state and does not expire. Students complete a formal comprehensive review of engineering subjects associated with the FE Exam.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1625, "title": "Professional Development for Master of Engineering Students", "code": "ENGRG 5351", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Discussion-based course designed to enhance students' competencies in communication and self-awareness/self-assessment. Essential skills of written & verbal communication for the workplace, networking strategy, increasing emotional intelligence, and developing professional identity (\"brand\") will be key focus areas.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1626, "title": "Teaching Seminar", "code": "ENGRG 6780", "subject": "ENGRG", "descr": "Independent study promoting reflection on teaching styles and experiences for graduate student teaching assistants in the College of Engineering. Participants must be concurrently fulfilling a TA assignment. Requirements include participation in the College of Engineering's TA Development Program, consisting of an initial one and one-half day training session, followed by one evening microteaching session early in the semester; participation in the TA midterm evaluation process, followed by a formal feedback session with program staff; and completion of a reflective journal on teaching experiences. Designed to provide TAs with the opportunity to process their understanding of teaching and learning through the formulation of questions, concepts, and theories related to their experiences.", "tags": "ENGRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1627, "title": "Lasers and Photonics", "code": "ENGRI 1100", "subject": "ENGRI", "descr": "Lasers have had an enormous impact on communications, medicine, remote sensing, and material processing. This course reviews the properties of light that are essential to understanding the underlying principles of lasers and these photonic technologies. There also is a strong, hands-on laboratory component in which the students build and operate a nitrogen laser and participate in several demonstration experiments such as holography, laser processing of materials, optical tweezers, and fiber optics.", "tags": "ENGRI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1628, "title": "Engineering Applications of Operations Research", "code": "ENGRI 1101", "subject": "ENGRI", "descr": "Introduction to the problems and methods of operations research and information engineering focusing on problem areas (including inventory, network design, and resource allocation), the situations in which these problems arise, and several standard solution techniques. In the computational laboratory, students encounter problem simulations and use some standard commercial software packages.", "tags": "ENGRI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1629, "title": "Sustainable Engineering of Energy, Water, Soil, and Air Resources", "code": "ENGRI 1130", "subject": "ENGRI", "descr": "Course introduces concepts and tools required for the sustainable management of energy, water, soil, and air resources in our modern society.\u00a0 Semester is organized into four modules, each concentrating on one resource area and including a case study of local or regional significance.\u00a0 Students work in teams to address sustainability problems that arise in the case studies.\u00a0 Each module also includes presentations of technical approaches used in environmental engineering analyses. Project teams will be expected to apply those methods in their case study evaluations and management proposals. Technical approaches include life cycle analysis, mass balance computations, and mathematical modeling of pollutant dynamics in the environment.", "tags": "ENGRI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1630, "title": "The Computing Technology Inside Your Smartphone", "code": "ENGRI 1210", "subject": "ENGRI", "descr": "The organization of the computer system found within devices used in everyday living, such as smartphones and tablets.\u00a0Computer systems are presented in a bottom up fashion, from bits to digital logic,\u00a0computer organization, instruction sets, assembly language, and the connection to high-level languages.\u00a0Discussion of the computing engines found in smart phones, tablets, and wearables.", "tags": "ENGRI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1631, "title": "Interdisciplinary Master of Engineering Project", "code": "ENMGT 5050", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "Students will participate in a community-engaged, interdisciplinary Master of Engineering (M.Eng.) project to tackle pressing technological and societal challenges surrounding infrastructure, with a specific focus on energy and environmental systems. For example, in 2018/19, projects were focused on Puerto Rico post Hurricane Maria. As part of this course, you will work closely with local stakeholders to hear their perspective on prior challenges and future needs. Each subsequent year will then build upon the prior year's activity to tackle large, complex issues over multiple years. During the course, you will contribute to developing a library of monitoring tools and algorithms which will persist over time and then be applied to solve new challenges with each course iteration.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1632, "title": "Project Management", "code": "ENMGT 5900", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "Core graduate course in project management for people who will manage technical or engineering projects. Focuses both on the \"technical\" tools of project management (e.g., methods for planning, scheduling, and control) and the \"human\" side (e.g., forming a project team, managing performance, resolving conflicts), with somewhat greater emphasis on the latter.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1633, "title": "Engineering Management Project", "code": "ENMGT 5910", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "As Engineering Managers, you need to embrace both technical and business skills to tackle complex, sociotechnical challenges, while staying on top of the current pace of technological change. In this Engineering Management project course, we are bridging from your coursework to your role as an engineering manager. To get there, you will practice the tools, themes, and techniques learned in your Engineering Management coursework through the scaffolding of a large project. In CEE 5910, you will work in teams to lead and execute a project in collaboration with an industry partner. You will perform an intensive evaluation of some mixture of the technological and management aspects of a major engineering project or system, conducted with a team of students.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1634, "title": "Product Management", "code": "ENMGT 5920", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "Product Management is one of the fastest growing careers in engineering and technology-based industries. In this course, you will learn the foundations of product management including (i) preparing for success as a product manager, (ii) identifying and targeting customer needs, (iii) prioritizing your project needs, and (iv) designing, developing, and deploying your product across the product life cycle. Using skills developed through course lectures and discussions, you will complete in a project where you will practice the sprint model utilized in most product teams. This course is for students interested in pursuing a career as a product manager in engineering or technology-based companies, learning about the product management competency, or working in a non-traditional tech setting to apply these skills on complex systems.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1635, "title": "Data Analytics for Engineering Managers", "code": "ENMGT 5930", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "Big data is transforming organizations enabling vast improvements in operating efficiency, market identification and segmentation, and many other domains. This course focuses on data collection at all scales, the transformation of that data into knowledge using a variety of data analytic techniques, and the integration of that knowledge into system models for decision-making to better manage organizations. Expertise in R will be developed throughout this course.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1636, "title": "Negotiations and Contracts for Engineering Management", "code": "ENMGT 5960", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "An exploration of Negotiation types, skills, and tactics relevant to Engineers and Engineering Managers, and a study in contract types, details, and clauses common to engineering fields.\u00a0 Studies will include human factors and behavior in negotiations, understanding and managing the end game, and legal terminology engineers should know.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1637, "title": "Decision Framing and Analytics", "code": "ENMGT 5980", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "Framework to structure the way we think about decision situations that are complicated by uncertainty, complexity, and competing objectives. Specific decision analysis concepts and tools, such as decision trees, sensitivity analysis, value of information, and utility theory. Applications to all areas of engineering and life. Includes a group project to analyze a real-world decision.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1638, "title": "Seminar: Project Management", "code": "ENMGT 6091", "subject": "ENMGT", "descr": "Weekly seminar aimed at M.Eng students, in particular in the engineering management program. Weekly speaker will come from different engineering applications and discuss insights into project management. Seminar is non-participatory.", "tags": "ENMGT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1639, "title": "Alien Empire: Bizarre Biology of Bugs with Discussion", "code": "ENTOM 2011", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Insects are the most abundant and diverse animals on earth. This course explores the bizarre biology of insects and their interaction with humans. It examines both the detrimental roles insects play (e.g., pests and vectors of disease) as well as their beneficial roles (e.g., pollination, edible insects, insect products such as waxes, dyes, and silk). The course also explores the symbolic representation of insects in art, literature, and religion. Students taking the course for 3 credits meet once per week for small group discussions, debates, demonstrations, and documentary films on the biology of insects.\u00a0\u00a0Students taking the course for 3 credits meet once per week for small group discussions, debates, demonstrations, and documentary films on the biology of insects.", "tags": "BIONLS-AG|OPHLS-AG|ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1640, "title": "Applied Statistics: Biological Experiments in Practice", "code": "ENTOM 3030", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "In this course, you will get hands-on experience in how to design, analyze, and interpret biological experiments. This class will be particularly useful if you plan to conduct experiments in a greenhouse or field setting. You will learn to develop a scientific question, formulate biological and statistical hypotheses, derive testable predictions, design and conduct experiments, collect your own data, test the proposed hypotheses using appropriate statistical methods, interpret the statistical results within a broader conceptual framework, and finally present statistical methods and results in written and oral form. You will learn common statistical methods (chi-square tests, t-test, ANOVA, Regression) and in-class workshops will familiarize you with the software to run those statistical tests. This class will be based on the scientific method, and the role statistical analysis play within this method. Writing several papers, based on the experiments you performed and analyzed, will allow you to cement this knowledge for your future research.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1641, "title": "Chemical Ecology", "code": "ENTOM 3690", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Why are chilies so spicy? This course examines the chemical basis of interactions between species and is intended for students with a basic knowledge of chemistry and biology. Focuses on the ecology and chemistry of plants, animals, and microbes. Stresses chemical signals used in diverse ecosystems, using Darwinian natural selection as a framework. Topics include: plant defenses, microbial warfare, communication in marine organisms, and human pheromones.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PBS-AS|ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1642, "title": "Integrated Pest Management", "code": "ENTOM 4440", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Lectures integrate the principles of pest control, ecology, and economics in the management of pests across multiple systems. Labs consist of exercises to reinforce concepts presented in lecture and demonstrate pest monitoring techniques and the application of computer technology to management problems.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1643, "title": "Ecological Genetics", "code": "ENTOM 4700", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Ecological Genetics focuses on the application of population genetic concepts in ecological contexts, with emphases on measuring adaptation in natural populations, detecting the effects of population demography, and determining the genetic basis of quantitative traits. Illustrative examples will be drawn from the primary research literature to demonstrate experimental techniques and methods of data analysis on single-gene, multi-locus and genome-wide scales.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1644, "title": "Special Topics in Entomology", "code": "ENTOM 4940", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the semester starts. Courses offered under the number will be approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1645, "title": "Individual Study in Entomology", "code": "ENTOM 4970", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "A student may, with approval of a faculty advisor, study a problem or topic not covered in a regular course or may undertake tutorial study of an independent nature in an area of interest in Entomology.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1646, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching", "code": "ENTOM 4980", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Undergraduate teaching assistance in an entomology course by agreement with the instructor. Participating students assist in teaching a course allied with their education and experience. Students are expected to meet regularly with a discussion or laboratory section, to gain teaching experience, and regularly to discuss teaching objectives, techniques, and subject matter with the professor in charge.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1647, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Entomology", "code": "ENTOM 4990", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Students must register using CALS Special Studies form available online.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1648, "title": "Malaria Biology and Control", "code": "ENTOM 6520", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Malaria represents one of the most daunting global health challenges of the 21st century. Understanding this disease and the biological, social, and epidemiological dimensions of its persistence can aid future global health practitioners in their efforts to eradicate malaria and the many health and economic burdens it creates. This course will delve into the biology of malaria parasites and their interactions with invertebrate and vertebrate hosts during the different phases of their complex life cycles. Global disease trends, prospects for reducing disease burdens, and the most promising and innovative approaches currently in use or under development to control insect vectors and prevent transmission will be thoroughly discussed.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1649, "title": "Vector Biology in Practice", "code": "ENTOM 6540", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "This course will cover key laboratory and field techniques, methods and concepts in public health vector biology and control. Students will learn laboratory methods for determining blood meal hosts, methods for determining sugar feeding patterns of mosquitoes and how to conduct resistance bioassays for ticks and mosquitoes. In addition, data management and collection strategies, mapping and spatial analysis will be covered. Public health skills including program management and grant writing will be included. Additional skills may be addressed based on the student needs and interests. The goal is to provide students with hands on experience leading to competency in vector biology practice.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1650, "title": "Seminar in Ecology and Evolution of Infectious Diseases", "code": "ENTOM 6900", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Graduate-level discussion of the ecology, epidemiology, genetics, and evolution of infectious disease in animal and plant systems. Weekly discussion of research papers published in the primary scientific literature. Participation in discussion and presentation of at least one paper required for course credit.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1651, "title": "Individual Study for Graduate Students", "code": "ENTOM 7070", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Independent or small-group study of special topics of current interest.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1652, "title": "Teaching Entomology", "code": "ENTOM 7090", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Teaching entomology or for extension training.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1653, "title": "Seminar in Spatial Population Ecology", "code": "ENTOM 7570", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Examines the role of space for individuals, populations and communities in ecology. Each weekly meeting will be a discussion based on journal articles and book chapters. General topics will be individual movement, dispersal, range; observation scale, spatial synchrony; landscape ecology; habitat fragmentation: (meta) population dynamics, population genetics and evolution; species interactions and community structure; climate change, invasion, extinction and conservation.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1654, "title": "Plant-Insect Interactions Seminar", "code": "ENTOM 7640", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Group intensive study of current research in plant-insect interactions. Topics vary from semester to semester but include chemical defense, coevolution, insect community structure, population regulation, biocontrol, tritrophic interactions, and mutualism.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1655, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "ENTOM 8900", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Thesis research conducted by M.S. students in the field of entomology with advice and consultation of a major professor who is a member of the field.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1656, "title": "Doctoral Level Thesis Research", "code": "ENTOM 9900", "subject": "ENTOM", "descr": "Dissertation research conducted by a Ph.D. student in the field of entomology with advice and consultation of a major professor who is a member of the field.", "tags": "ENTOM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1657, "title": "Climate Smart Communities: State and Local Climate Change Science and Policy", "code": "ENVS 4444", "subject": "ENVS", "descr": "New York State will be challenged to meet the goals of the \"Climate Leadership and Community Protection Act\" without large GHG reductions from businesses, farms and communities. Local municipalities have considerable power to address environmental and land use issues within their jurisdiction, but often lack the capacity to plan for or implement climate change projects at the local level. In this course, students will critically analyze the theory of multilevel governance and debate the importance of non-state (NGO) and sub-national (regional, state and local government) actors involved in climate change policy. Students will work with a local community or NGO to assess climate action plans and identify and address their needs for research, policy recommendations, project planning, grant writing or educational outreach to become NYS Registered or Certified Climate Smart Communities.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|ENVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1658, "title": "Capstone Special Topics Course in Environment and Sustainability", "code": "ENVS 4940", "subject": "ENVS", "descr": "The E&S curriculum launched in 2018 includes a capstone experience. Faculty will offer \"trial\" capstone courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised to the major before the beginning of the semester.", "tags": "ENVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1659, "title": "Internship in Environment and Sustainability", "code": "ENVS 4960", "subject": "ENVS", "descr": "In this course, students participate in an experiential learning opportunity relevant to the student's focus of study or career goals in environment and sustainability. An E&S faculty member must serve as supervisor and complete the term grade report. Specific learning goals for the experience are arranged by the student with their internship faculty supervisor and the internship host prior to the start of the internship. All 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS Internship Guidelines.", "tags": "ENVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1660, "title": "Individual Study in Environment and Sustainability", "code": "ENVS 4970", "subject": "ENVS", "descr": "Individual studies are arranged under the supervision of one or several ESS faculty members. They provide opportunity to design a course that fills the need of an individual student and addresses pertinent issues in the environmental sciences.", "tags": "ENVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1661, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Environment and Sustainability", "code": "ENVS 4990", "subject": "ENVS", "descr": "Undergraduate research projects in environment and sustainability; contingent on student working with a faculty member to supervise their research. Enroll in credits using the CALS Special Studies form.", "tags": "ENVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1662, "title": "Leadership and Career Skills in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 1102", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Provides students with opportunities to learn more about their personality type and strengths while applying this information to leadership and team building skills, diversity and ethics issues, as well as career skills in the field of food science. Topics and concepts are reinforced through presentations, interactive exercises and activities, simulations, case studies, and networking with food science alumni. Students are required to participate in a project using the Food Science Alumni Career Link network.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1663, "title": "Introduction to Wines and Vines Laboratory", "code": "FDSC 1105", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Students learn in the vineyard, teaching winery, laboratory, and on a winery field trip. Includes practice of techniques relevant to growing grapes, making and evaluating wines, and writing scientific papers.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1664, "title": "Food Choices and Issues", "code": "FDSC 1500", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "The goals of this course are to help students make healthier and safer food choices and critically evaluate contemporary foodissues. Topics include: food systems, federal dietary guidelines, relationships between diet and health, the obesity epidemic,vegetarian diets, and the role of food processing and biotechnology in feeding an expanding global population. Contemporary issuesrelated to nutrition and food safety, including food ethics, genetically engineered foods, food allergens, world hunger, andsustainability of food systems, are discussed. Students analyze the nutritional quality of their personal diets using Food Tracker,USDA's on-line diet analysis software.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1665, "title": "Food Analysis", "code": "FDSC 2100", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Introduces basic analytical techniques for food analysis and other biological analysis. Emphasizes fundamental principles of analytical chemistry, basic laboratory techniques, and modern instrumental methods. Discusses gravimetric, volumetric, and spectrophotometric methods, gas chromatography, high-performance liquid chromatography, infrared spectra, and atomic absorption spectrometry.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1666, "title": "Food Analysis Laboratory", "code": "FDSC 2110", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "The experiments conducted in Food Analysis lab provide context for the application of principles of food analysis. Students will analyze complex food products for lipids, minerals, carbohydrates, proteins and other components, and through this process, hone their basic lab skills, including organization and time management. Experiments are designed to introduce a variety of techniques commonly used in food science and nutrition analytical labs. The techniques, process, and problems presented to students in this lab will have application for career paths in product development, research and development, quality control, food safety, and industry regulations, among others.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1667, "title": "Fermentation of Food", "code": "FDSC 2206", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Fermentation of food changed the course of human history. This course will help interested students learn about fermentations, generally, and concentrate on examples within major categories of fermented foods: fruit, vegetable, dairy, soybean, and grain. We will describe the cultures that developed and consume different fermented foods, and how microbes interact with their environments and with each other during food fermentations. Students in the course will develop an overview of the scientific principles and practices behind fermentation, and gain practical experience in sensory evaluation while increasing their enjoyment of foods.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1668, "title": "Culinary Science", "code": "FDSC 2300", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Learn the science behind some favorite and new foods. Working with chefs from Cornell Dining, the underlying principles of the foods prepared in class are explained. The final exam is the preparation of a class dinner.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1669, "title": "The Science and Technology of Beer", "code": "FDSC 2310", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "This course uses beer and brewing science as a starting point to explore topics in fermentation biology, food chemistry, food processing, and sensory perception. Students will learn to recognize the major sensory and chemical features that distinguish different beer styles or defects, and understand how raw materials and choices during production lead to these outcomes. Several guest lectures, including brewers and producers of raw materials, will also be included.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1670, "title": "Distillation Principles and Practices", "code": "FDSC 2360", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "As an introduction to the science of distillation this course uses the study of pre-fermentation and fermentation biology, phase separation and vapor-liquid equilibrium, and sensory perception as a vehicle to explore the role of science and technology in the production and enjoyment of distilled beverages. Sensory samples and commercial samples of spirits will be used to illustrate the sensory properties and chemical components which define different types of distilled spirits, with the goal of understanding how different raw materials, processing, and aging impact these sensory properties.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1671, "title": "Wines and Grapes: Composition and Analysis", "code": "FDSC 2400", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Investigates the composition of grapes and wine and the most common analytical tools used in their evaluation. Both the theoretical and practical aspects of grape and wine analyses are considered.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1672, "title": "Food Safety Assurance", "code": "FDSC 3960", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Food Science 3960/FDSC 5960\u00a0will focus on currently used food safety programs to control biological, chemical and physical hazards and assure the safety of foods. Topics include prerequisite programs such as Current Good Manufacturing Practices and Sanitation Standard Operating Procedures, Hazard Analysis Critical Control Point (HACCP), food safety management systems (SQF) and the application of current technologies in reducing foodborne illness. Upon successful completion of the course, the students will receive 1) General HACCP certification and 2) SQF implementation certification (through a collaboration with SQFI [Safe Quality Foods Institute]). These certificates will allow students to be highly qualified for food safety and quality jobs.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1673, "title": "Capstone Project in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 4000", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "This course is designed to provide students with the opportunity to apply Food Science knowledge and skills to solve specific, real life technical problems incurred by food processors. Under the guidance of faculty mentors, teams consisting of 4 \u2013 5 students will act as consultants for local industry partners working with the New York State Food Venture Center (NYSFVC).", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1674, "title": "Concepts of Product Development", "code": "FDSC 4010", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Introduction to topics and events sequence that provide the foundation for development of new food products, building upon knowledge acquired from other food science courses. The course allows students to integrate and apply basic concepts into case-based learning experiences to enhance professional skills, utilizing individual assessments and team-work assignments.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1675, "title": "Chemistry and Functional Properties of Food Ingredients", "code": "FDSC 4040", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "This is a course with an emphasis on understanding the interactions of food ingredients and their role and functionality in the food product. This course is designed to enable students to utilize a step by step problem solving approach to tackle challenges found in the food industry. Examples of these challenges will be presented as case studies obtained from literature and food industry.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1676, "title": "Flavor Perception", "code": "FDSC 4110", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "The successful preparation of food for personal joy, or culinary and manufacturing profitability is driven by consumer perceptions of flavor, value, nutrition, ecological implications, in that order. Therefore, understanding flavor perception is essential for the creation of successful foods.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1677, "title": "Food Chemistry I", "code": "FDSC 4170", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Covers the chemistry of foods and food ingredients. Discusses the chemical and physical properties of water, proteins, lipids, carbohydrates, and other food components and additives in the context of their interactions and functional roles in foods.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1678, "title": "Food Chemistry Laboratory", "code": "FDSC 4190", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Deals with the chemical properties of food components and changes they undergo in processing and storage. Stresses relationships between the chemical composition of foods and functional, nutritional, and sensory properties. Introduces lab techniques commonly used in food research. Requires a lab research project that involves writing a research proposal for the project, conducting laboratory research to test hypotheses described in the proposal, analyzing the data, and writing a paper following the format used by the Journal of Food Science.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1679, "title": "Functional Foods and Dietary Supplements For Health", "code": "FDSC 4220", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Covers functional foods and nutraceuticals, bioactive compounds, antioxidants and dietary supplements, micronutrient fortification, botanicals, and herbs in disease prevention and health promotion. Emphasizes the mechanisms of action and scientific evidence of efficacy. Biomarkers, safety and efficacy testing, and regulations for functional foods and nutraceuticals are discussed.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1680, "title": "Food Processing B: Dairy Processing and Emerging Technologies", "code": "FDSC 4250", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Combined lecture-laboratory course focusing on principles and practices fundamental to dairy foods processing. The first part deals with the main unit operations used in dairy processing and food processing in general (pasteurization, sterilization, centrifugal separation, homogenization, membrane separation, concentration, drying); the second part focuses on the science and technology that underpin the manufacture of dairy products (fluid milk, milk powder, ice cream, butter, cheese) and dairy ingredients. Laboratories are conducted in a food processing pilot plant facility, where students gain hands-on experience in operating food/dairy processing pilot scale equipment. One field trip to a dairy plant is also scheduled during the semester.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1681, "title": "The Science and Technology of Beer Laboratory", "code": "FDSC 4310", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "An introduction to the practical application of brewing. Students will make several different styles of beer in a laboratory setting to understand how raw materials and processing technologies influence the production of recognizable beer styles. Emphasis will be placed on sanitation, raw material selection, yeast selection, and the manipulation of process variables to control product outcomes. Students will also learn the alternatives in current practice for finishing, carbonation, and packaging.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1682, "title": "Distillation Principles and Practices Laboratory", "code": "FDSC 4360", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "As an introduction to the science of distillation this course uses the study of pre-fermentation and fermentation biology, phase separation and vapor-liquid equilibrium, and sensory perception as a vehicle to explore the role of science and technology in the production and enjoyment of distilled beverages. Sensory samples and commercial samples of spirits will be used to illustrate the sensory properties and chemical components which define different types of distilled spirits, with the goal of understanding how different raw materials, processing, and aging impact these sensory properties.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1683, "title": "Winemaking Theory and Practice II", "code": "FDSC 4700", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Winemaking Theory and Practice II specifically addresses the non-fermentation aspects of wine production. This area includes fining, stabilization, adjustments, clarification, filtration, bottling, general sanitation, government regulations, oxidation, aging, contributions of oak, and production equipment and materials.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1684, "title": "Winemaking Theory and Practice II Laboratory", "code": "FDSC 4710", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "In the laboratory of part II of the Winemaking Theory and Practice courses, students continue working with wines produced in the preceding fall term, focusing on aging options, stabilization, fining, and packaging. The laboratory also provides advanced training in wine chemical and sensory analysis.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1685, "title": "Undergraduate Internship in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 4960", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "On-the-job learning experience under the supervision of professionals in a cooperating organization. A learning contract is written between the faculty supervisor and students, stating the conditions of the work assignment, supervision, and reporting. All 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at cals.cornell.edu/academics/student-research/internship.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1686, "title": "Individual Study in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 4970", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "May include individual tutorial study, a special topic selected by a professor or a group of students, or selected lectures of a course already offered. Since topics vary, the course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1687, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching Experience", "code": "FDSC 4980", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Students assist in teaching a course appropriate to their previous training and experience. Students meet with a discussion or laboratory section and regularly discuss objectives with the course instructor.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1688, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 4990", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Students conduct original research directed by a food science faculty member.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1689, "title": "Wine and Grapes: Composition and Analysis", "code": "FDSC 5400", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "VIEN 5400 is a 2-credit course (1 credit lecture, 1 credit lab) with an emphasis on understanding the practice and theory behind analytical techniques routinely used in the wine and grape industries, and the statistical tools used to evaluate the effectiveness of both analyst and assay. The course is designed to provide practical skills complementary to other courses. VIEN 5400 is restricted to graduate students; undergraduates should enroll in VIEN 2400.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1690, "title": "Food Safety Assurance", "code": "FDSC 5960", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Food Science 3960 /5960 will focus on currently used food safety programs to control biological, chemical and physical hazards and assure the safety of foods. Topics include prerequisite programs such as Current Good Manufacturing Practices and Sanitation Standard Operating Procedures, Hazard Analysis Critical Control Point (HACCP), food safety management systems (SQF) and the application of current technologies in reducing foodborne illness. Upon successful completion of the course, the students will receive 1) General HACCP certification and 2) SQF implementation certification (through a collaboration with SQFI [Safe Quality Foods Institute]).", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1691, "title": "Seminar in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 6000", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Weekly seminar series on contemporary topics and issues in the field of food science and technology. Representatives from academia, industry, and government provide presentations on a wide variety of topics. Graduate students in the field of food science and technology may use the forum to present their required thesis research seminar.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1692, "title": "Food Science Graduate Student Research Seminar", "code": "FDSC 6060", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "This course is designed to foster connections between our graduate student population in the Field of Food Science. The class meets once per week, where students will present on their own research. Each presentation will be followed by questions and written feedback from the class.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1693, "title": "Functional Foods and Dietary Supplements For Health", "code": "FDSC 6220", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Covers functional foods and nutraceuticals, bioactive compounds, antioxidants and dietary supplements, micronutrient fortification, and botanicals and herbs in disease prevention and health promotion. Emphasizes the mechanisms of action and scientific evidence of efficacy. Biomarkers, safety and efficacy testing, and regulations for functional foods and nutraceuticals are discussed.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1694, "title": "Current Readings in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 6950", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Seminar series on current topics chosen by participating faculty members and students on a rotating basis. Format consists of weekly discussion groups with each participant presenting at least one oral report based on independent reading. Multiple sections focusing on different topics may be taught in any given semester. Topics include food microbiology and food safety, food chemistry, sensory evaluation, and food engineering and materials science. Interested students should contact the designated instructor(s) for each semester.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1695, "title": "Graduate Internship in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 6960", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "On-the-job learning experience under the supervision of professionals in a cooperating organization. A learning contract is written between the faculty supervisor and students, stating the conditions of the work assignment, supervision, and reporting. All 6960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at www.cals.cornell.edu/cals/current/student-research/internship/index.cfm.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1696, "title": "Graduate Individual Study in Food Science", "code": "FDSC 6970", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Independent study for graduate students.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1697, "title": "Graduate Teaching Experience", "code": "FDSC 6980", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Designed to give graduate students teaching experience through involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of field faculty members. The experience may include leading discussion sections; preparing, assisting in, or teaching lectures and laboratories; and tutoring.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1698, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "FDSC 8900", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Thesis Research for MS students in the Field of Food Science & Technology.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1699, "title": "Doctoral-Level Thesis Research", "code": "FDSC 9900", "subject": "FDSC", "descr": "Dissertation research for PhD students in the Field of Food Science & Technology.", "tags": "FDSC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1700, "title": "FWS: Writing and Performing LGBTQ+ Histories", "code": "FGSS 1118", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "When we think of history, we tend to think of the archive, of tangible items that tell us about the past. These archives, however, often omit the experiences of marginalized groups, including members of LGBTQ+ communities. How does performance \u2013 from daily performances of identity to dramatic works to drag \u2013 help us understand LGBTQ+ histories that might otherwise be forgotten? This course explores this question through the analysis of scholarly and dramatic texts, including Brian Freeman's\u00a0Civil Sex, about gay civil rights activist Bayard Rustin, David Rom\u00e1n's work on \"archival drag,\" and an opera about Mexican painter Frida Kahlo. With an emphasis on in-class discussions, peer-review, and collaborative writing workshops, this course fosters students' ability to analyze scholarly arguments and produce coherent, persuasive prose.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1701, "title": "A Global History of Love", "code": "FGSS 1940", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "By posing seemingly simple questions such as what is love and who has the right to love, this introductory-level lecture course surveys how love has been experienced and expressed from the pre-modern period to the present. Through case studies of familial and conjugal love in Africa, Asia, the US, Europe, and South and Latin America, the course will examine the debates about and enactment's of what constitutes the appropriate way to show love and affection in different cultures and historical contexts. Among the themes we will explore are questions of sexuality, marriage, kinship, and gender rights. A final unit will examine these themes through modern technologies such as the Internet, scientific advances in medicine, and a growing awareness that who and how we love is anything but simple or universal.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1702, "title": "Introduction to Feminist, Gender, and Sexuality Studies", "code": "FGSS 2010", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Feminist, Gender, & Sexuality Studies is an interdisciplinary program focused on understanding the impact of gender and sexuality on the world around us and on the power hierarchies that structure it. This course provides an overview of key concepts, questions, and debates within feminist studies both locally and globally, focusing mainly on the experiences, historical conditions, and concerns of women as they are shaped by gender and sexuality. We will read a variety of texts--personal narratives, historical documents, and cultural criticism--across a range of disciplines, and will consider how larger structural systems of both privilege and oppression affect individuals' identities, experiences, and options. We will also examine forms of agency and action taken by women in the face of these larger systems.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1703, "title": "Introduction to Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, and Transgender Studies", "code": "FGSS 2290", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to central issues, debates, and theories that characterize the field of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, and Transgender (LGBT) Studies. Starting from the assumption that neither \"sex\" nor \"sexuality\" is a private experience or category, we will explore some of the ways that these powerfully public and political terms have circulated in social, legal, economic, and cultural spheres. We will also examine how these categories are situated in relation to other formative categories including race, ethnicity, religion, family, marriage, reproduction, the economy, and the state. Using a comparative and intersectional approach, we will read from various disciplines to assess the tools that LGBT studies offers for understanding power and culture in our contemporary world.", "tags": "LA-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1704, "title": "Literature and Medicine", "code": "FGSS 2350", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "How does literary language depict the experience of physical suffering? Can a poem or a novel palliate pain, illness, even the possibility of death? From darkly comic narratives of black plague to the rise and fall of hysteria to depictions of the AIDS crisis, this course examines literature centered on medical practices from the early modern period through the twentieth century. Why have medical practices changed, and how do writers address their political, social, and ideological implications? Readings will include a broad range of genres, including poetry (Dickinson, Whitman, Keats), fiction (McEwan, Chekhov, Gilman, Kafka, Camus), theater (Kushner), nonfiction prose (Woolf, Freud), and critical theory (Foucault, Scarry, Canguilhem, Sontag).", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1705, "title": "Contemporary Narratives by Latina Writers", "code": "FGSS 2460", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course will provide an introduction to some of the most important fictional work by US Latina writers, including short stories, novel, and film, with a particular focus on social justice, gender advocacy work, and work by Afro Latinx writers.\u00a0 We will begin with discussion of canonical figures like Gloria Anzald\u00faa and Cherr\u00ede Moraga, to provide a basis for our focus on more recent writers like Angie Cruz, Elizabeth Acevedo, Linda Yvette Ch\u00e1vez, and Carmen Maria Machado.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1706, "title": "Medicine, Culture, and Society", "code": "FGSS 2468", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Medicine has become the language and practice through which we address a broad range of both individual and societal complaints. Interest in this medicalization of life\u00a0may be one of the reasons that medical anthropology is currently the fastest-growing subfield in anthropology. This course encourages students to examine concepts of disease, suffering, health, and well-being in their immediate experience and beyond. In the process, students will gain a working knowledge of ecological, critical, phenomenological, and applied approaches used by medical anthropologists. We will investigate what is involved in becoming a doctor, the sociality of medicines, controversies over new medical technologies, and the politics of medical knowledge. The universality of biomedicine, or hospital medicine,\u00a0will not be taken for granted, but rather we will examine the plurality generated by the various political, economic, social, and ethical demands under which biomedicine has developed in different places and at different times. In addition, biomedical healing and expertise will be viewed in relation to other kinds of healing and expertise. Our readings will address medicine in North America as well as other parts of the world. In class, our discussions will return regularly to consider the broad diversity of kinds of medicine throughout the world, as well as the specific historical and local contexts of biomedicine.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1707, "title": "Millennial Jewish Stars: Race, Gender and Sexuality", "code": "FGSS 2585", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "The rap superstar Drake, comedian Ilana Glazer, and muscleman Zac Efron are just three of the millennial Jewish stars examined in this course. We will ask how millennial Jewish stars depict Jewishness in terms of race, gender, sexuality. For instance, why has the rapper Lil Dicky chosen such an emasculating stage name, and why does Ilana Glazer embrace the outdated racial term \"Jewess?\" How do these names use historical Jewish stereotypes to fuel present-day comedy? We will trace racial, gendered, and sexual tropes about Jews from 19th-century theater to the newest YouTube sketches. We'll cluster these media around themes like women's pleasure, Jewish identity, cultural appropriation, anti-Semitism, and millennial financial struggles. We'll laugh hard, learn a lot, and see today's media through new eyes.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1708, "title": "Performing Death and Desire: Vampires on Stage and Screen", "code": "FGSS 2620", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Why are the undead so long-lived? This course hunts the dangerous and subversive figure of the vampire across a variety of pages, stages and screens. From campy melodramas and raucous stage comedies, to lush cinematic epics and politically savvy television---and all the Draculas that have come and gone in between--we will explore how the vampire changes with medium, period, and genre. Using a variety of critical approaches we will consider why this most persistent cultural metaphor emerges in particular cultural moments, and what social anxieties and desires it articulates. We will interrogate the vampire's relationship to race and gender and analyze how the vampire is constructed, appropriated, adapted, reinvented, and performed in its many contexts, asking what it means for us to consume these texts.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1709, "title": "Desire", "code": "FGSS 2760", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "\"Language is a skin,\" the critic Roland Barthes once wrote: \"I rub my language against the other. It is as if I had words instead of fingers, or fingers at the tip of my words. My language trembles with desire.\" Sexual desire has a history, even a literary history, which we will examine through an introductory survey of European dramatic literature from the Ancient Greeks to the present, as well as classic readings in sexual theory, including Plato, Freud, Foucault, and contemporary feminist and queer theory.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1710, "title": "Desire and Modern Drama", "code": "FGSS 2762", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1711, "title": "Gender and the Brain", "code": "FGSS 3210", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Why are boys more likely than girls to be diagnosed with autism, and why are women more likely than men to be diagnosed with depression? Are there different \"gay\" and \"straight\" brains? And how does brain science interact with gender and sexuality in popular debate? Reading and discussing the original scientific papers and related critical texts, we will delve into the neuroscience of gender. In this course, we will delve into the neuroscience of gender difference. Reading the original scientific papers and related critical texts, we will ask whether we can find measurable physical differences in male and female brains, and what these differences might be. Do men and women solve spatial puzzles differently, as measured physiologically? Do nonhuman animals display sex-specific behaviors mediated by brain structure, and can we extrapolate these findings to human behavior? Why are boys three times more likely than girls to be diagnosed as autistic, and is there any connection between the predominantly male phenomenon of autism and other stereotypically male mental traits? Are there physical representations of sexual orientation in the brain, and how are these related to gender identity? And how are scientific studies represented and misrepresented in popular debate?", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1712, "title": "Gender and Psychopathology", "code": "FGSS 3320", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course examines the ways in which sex and gender impact the expression of severe psychopathology. We will study biological, psychological, and cultural factors associated with sex and gender as they influence the epidemiology, phenomenology, etiology, diagnosis, and course of illness in major forms of psychopathology: specifically, schizophrenia, major affective illness, anxiety disorders, eating disorders, and personality disorders. We will also examine the complicated roles of race, class, sexuality, and gender identity as they relate to these conditions. These topics will be examined through the frameworks of psychological science and feminism in an attempt to understand the effects that gender and science have on one another and the ways in which they influence the understanding of mental illness.", "tags": "SBA-AS|BIO-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1713, "title": "Gendering Enlightenment: Attitudes toward Women in Buddhist Traditions", "code": "FGSS 3374", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Women have from the beginning been integral members of Buddhist traditions. But their voices have often been silenced by male clergy. This course will explore ways in which images of women and the feminine have been manipulated within normative literature to serve a variety of ends. We will also look at the lives of real Buddhist women in premodern and contemporary times as we think about the complex ways women have made space for their own interests.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1714, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "FGSS 3651", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Psychoanalysis considers the human being not as an object of treatment, but as a subject who is called upon to elaborate an unconscious knowledge about what is disrupting her life, through analysis of dreams, symptoms, bungled actions, slips of the tongue, and repetitive behaviors.\u00a0 Freud finds that these apparently irrational acts and behavior are ordered by the logic of the fantasy, which provides a mental representation of a traumatic childhood experience and the effects it unleashes in the mind and body-effects he called drives.\u00a0 As \"unbound\" energies, the drives give rise to symptoms, repetitive acts, and fantasmatic stagings that menace our health and sometimes threaten social coexistence, but that also rise to the desires, creative acts, and social projects we identify as the essence of human life.\u00a0 Readings will include fundamental texts on the unconscious, repression, fantasy, and the death drive, as well as case studies and speculative essays on mythology, art, religion, and group psychology.\u00a0 Students will be asked to keep a dream journal and to work on their unconscious formations, and will have the chance to produce creative projects as well as analytic essays.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1715, "title": "Women in New Media Art", "code": "FGSS 3655", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "The work of women artists\u00a0has been central to the development of new media art. These rich and varied practices include installation, virtual reality environments, net art, digital video, networked performance, tactical media, video games, remix and robotics. This course will begin with an overview of feminist art and early experiments in performance and video art to then investigate multiple currents of digital media. Discussions will focus primarily on works by women artists from Europe, the Americas and Australia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1716, "title": "Staging Faith: Contemporary Theatre and Lived Religions", "code": "FGSS 3747", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Religious beliefs, practices, and conflicts shape our world and influence global politics.\u00a0 Yet mediatized depictions of religion can be reductive and polarizing.\u00a0 Moreover, these depictions may be different from what people experience in their everyday lives.\u00a0 In the contemporary theatre, we have the opportunity to consider representations of individuals' lived religion, the complex questions of belief, and challenges to faith from within and outside religious communities.\u00a0 Through close readings of plays and related materials engaging with Christian, Jewish, Muslim, Sikh and other faith traditions, we will explore and discuss together the religious motivations, tensions, and dilemmas facing us today.\u00a0 Our texts include, among others, Jesus Christ Superstar, Indecent, Angels in America, and Heroes of the Fourth Turning.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1717, "title": "Body Politics in African Literature, Cinema, and New Media", "code": "FGSS 3977", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "GLC-AS|LA-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1718, "title": "Undergraduate Independent Study", "code": "FGSS 3991", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Individual study program intended for juniors and seniors working on special topics with selected reading or research projects not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with a FGSS faculty member who has agreed to supervise the independent study.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1719, "title": "Senior Seminar in Feminist, Gender, and Sexuality Studies", "code": "FGSS 4000", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This senior seminar constitutes the culmination of the FGSS major-it provides a unique opportunity to come together with all the other FGSS seniors to both put to use what has been learned and explore new aspects of feminist, gender, and sexuality studies. In this particular seminar, we will attempt to answer, in short, the question of what it means to be a feminist today, at this point in time and place. Pursuing the intersections of theory and practice, we will explore issues and concerns in the areas that you have identified as central to your concept and/or critique of feminism.", "tags": "SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1720, "title": "Intersectionality in Disability Studies", "code": "FGSS 4035", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "A recognition of the importance of intersectionality has become increasingly key to not only understand the complexity of social identity and lived experience, but to combat discrimination and oppression. While the course has a centering focus on the disability experience-in part because of the way in which disability is often left out of intersectional considerations-it will reveal how the economic, legal, and political structures of power and privilege that disadvantage people with disabilities cannot be looked at on a disability-specific basis alone. Thus we will give necessary attention to the disability experience as it overlaps and connects with lived experiences of race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, socioeconomic status, and citizenship, among others. In looking particularly at the realms of employment, education, the law, and health care, we will explore the efficacy of legal and policy initiatives that are already in place, and in doing so, strongly consider the growing need for, and value of, intersectional approaches to discrimination and oppression.", "tags": "SCD-AS|SSC-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1721, "title": "Topics in Feminist Media Arts", "code": "FGSS 4153", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Topic: Feminist Posthumanisms in the Visual Arts. While some feminist works of art in new media address traditional feminist concerns such as the female body, identity, representation, feminist history, and consumerism, others directly engage with recent theoretical currents on the Anthropocene, posthumanism and new materialisms that view humans and non-humans as co-dependent. Non-humans include environmental factors, animals, plants, bacteria, and machines. This seminar will examine work by contemporary artists engaged with posthumanist perspectives in relation to a body of relevant theoretical texts and previous feminist media arts.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1722, "title": "New Black Southern Women Writers", "code": "FGSS 4403", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Anna Julia Cooper's pioneering publication of A Voice from the South (1892) underscores the centrality of black women in determining the possibilities for black racial uplift in the nation. Areas from local color and regionalism, to contemporary fields such as cultural geography, have underscored the impact of geography on identity. Such insights have increasingly underscored that region matters in shaping black women's identities in the U.S., along with their various cultural productions. Black women writers in the U.S. South played a salient role in shaping the black women's literature renaissance of the 1970s in both writing and theorizing literature, and thus, in expanding the conventional canons in African American and American literature more broadly. This course considers the new generation of writers of black women that has emerged in the U.S. South in more recent years in the twenty first century, whose writings have increasingly impacted the development of contemporary African American literature. This course is designed to meet this body of material with serious reading, study and critical analysis. Genres that we will explore include the novel, poetry, the essay and the memoir, along with visual art. We will consider a range of newer authors, including Edwidge Danticat, Honor\u00e9e Jeffers, Tayari Jones, Valdez Perkins, Natasha Tretheway, Jesmyn Ward, and Shay Youngblood. Concomitantly, we will explore the visual art of Kara Walker. We will consider ways in which these writers build upon established themes and conventions in African American and black women's writing and the implications of their work for black feminist theory. Furthermore, we will examine the impact of their work within the emergent field of twenty first century African American literature and criticism.", "tags": "LA-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1723, "title": "Writing Ethnography: Theory, Genre and Practice", "code": "FGSS 4418", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "What are the poetics and politics of ethnographic writing? How is this genre, what many would call the signature of cultural anthropology, distinct from other modes of scholarly writing? What are its possibilities, limits and effects? In this course we will read classic and experimental ethnographies and undertake exercises in ethnographic writing as a means to investigate ethnography as epistemology, genre and craft.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1724, "title": "Feminism and Philosophy", "code": "FGSS 4491", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Feminist approaches to questions in metaphysics, epistemology, language, and value theory.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1725, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "FGSS 4505", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1726, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "FGSS 4658", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1727, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "FGSS 4691", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1728, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "FGSS 4701", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday,\u00a0alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1729, "title": "Be a Man! Masculinity, Race, and Nation", "code": "FGSS 4757", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course analyzes how cultural beliefs about masculinity intersect with race, sexuality, and citizenship. To emphasize how masculine norms vary across cultures, we will use the plural term \"masculinities.\" Treating gender as a relational system of power, we will investigate how masculinities are defined against femininities, and how different masculinities are defined against each other (for example, the stereotypes of the Latino \"bad hombre\" vs. the white \"all-American football player\"). Combining sociological studies with media analysis, we will ask the following questions and more: Where do beliefs about masculinities come from, and how do they change over time? How do these beliefs naturalize certain kinds of violence? How do these beliefs interact with, and help to create, ideas about race and nation?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1730, "title": "Labor, Race, and Gender", "code": "FGSS 4845", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "The majority of existing union members are women and workers of color, and, since the mid-1980s, the majority of newly organized workers have been women of color, particularly black women and recent immigrants from Latin America. Yet, with the exception of just a handful of unions, the labor movement still has been slow to build on this support and enthusiasm. This course will focus on the challenges and possibilities created by the changing demographics of race and gender in the contemporary labor movement. Through a combination of readings, small group discussions, guest speakers, and library and on line research, short essays and one longer research paper; the course will examine these issues from an historical, demographic, labor relations, and sociological perspective.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1731, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "FGSS 4876", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1732, "title": "Pleasure and Neoliberalism", "code": "FGSS 4948", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1733, "title": "Gender, Power, and Authority in England, 1600 to 1800", "code": "FGSS 4950", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "It is a truism that early modern society was a 'patriarchal' one in which men had authority -- but how did that authority operate and what were its limits? How did the exercise of power between men and women intersect with religious, literary, legal and political institutions? We will approach these questions chronologically, examining the impact of the Reformation, the English Revolution, the Enlightenment, the rise of middle class and polite culture. We will also explore them methodologically and generically, with an eye to how different kinds of evidence and sources can produce different kinds of conclusions. Historians' hypotheses will be tested by analysis of primary sources.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1734, "title": "Senior Honors Thesis II", "code": "FGSS 4991", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "To graduate with honors, FGSS majors must complete a senior thesis under the supervision of an FGSS faculty member and defend that thesis orally before an honors committee. To be eligible for honors, students must have at least a cumulative GPA of 3.3 in all course work and a 3.5 average in all courses applying to their FGSS major. Students interested in the honors program should consult the DUS late in the spring semester of their junior year or very early in the fall semester of their senior year.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1735, "title": "Topics in Feminist Media Arts", "code": "FGSS 6153", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Topic: Feminist Posthumanisms in the Visual Arts. While some feminist works of art in new media address traditional feminist concerns such as the female body, identity, representation, feminist history, and consumerism, others directly engage with recent theoretical currents on the Anthropocene, posthumanism and new materialisms that view humans and non-humans as co-dependent. Non-humans include environmental factors, animals, plants, bacteria, and machines. This seminar will examine work by contemporary artists engaged with posthumanist perspectives in relation to a body of relevant theoretical texts and previous feminist media arts.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1736, "title": "Black Feminist Theories: Sexuality, Creativity, and Power", "code": "FGSS 6207", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course examines black feminist theories as they are articulated in the cross-cultural experiences of women across the African Diaspora. We will explore a variety of theories, texts and creative encounters within their socio-political and geographical frames and locations, analyzing these against, or in relation to, a range of feminist activisms and movements. Some key categories of discussion will include Black Left Feminism, Feminist Movements in Latin America and the Caribbean and African feminisms. Texts like the Combahee River Collective statement and a variety of US Black feminist positions and the related literature as well as earlier black feminist articulations such as the Sojourners for Truth and Justice will also be engaged. Students will have the opportunity to develop their own research projects from a range of possibilities.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1737, "title": "New Black Southern Women Writers", "code": "FGSS 6403", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Anna Julia Cooper's pioneering publication of A Voice from the South (1892) underscores the centrality of black women in determining the possibilities for black racial uplift in the nation. Areas from local color and regionalism, to contemporary fields such as cultural geography, have underscored the impact of geography on identity. Such insights have increasingly underscored that region matters in shaping black women's identities in the U.S., along with their various cultural productions. Black women writers in the U.S. South played a salient role in shaping the black women's literature renaissance of the 1970s in both writing and theorizing literature, and thus, in expanding the conventional canons in African American and American literature more broadly. This course considers the new generation of writers of black women that has emerged in the U.S. South in more recent years in the twenty first century, whose writings have increasingly impacted the development of contemporary African American literature. This course is designed to meet this body of material with serious reading, study and critical analysis. Genres that we will explore include the novel, poetry, the essay and the memoir, along with visual art. We will consider a range of newer authors, including Edwidge Danticat, Honor\u00e9e Jeffers, Tayari Jones, Valdez Perkins, Natasha Tretheway, Jesmyn Ward, and Shay Youngblood. Concomitantly, we will explore the visual art of Kara Walker. We will consider ways in which these writers build upon established themes and conventions in African American and black women's writing and the implications of their work for black feminist theory. Furthermore, we will examine the impact of their work within the emergent field of twenty first century African American literature and criticism.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1738, "title": "Female Acts: From Antiquity to Jelinek", "code": "FGSS 6410", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Woman caring for the dead; women sacrificed; fatal female desire - these images have been constitutive for Western aesthetic and theoretical discourse. How is female agency, in word and deed, delimited in a world divided along the lines of public/private, state/family, visible/invisible, outside/inside, mind/body, culture/nature? How are knowledge and thought conditioned by positing gendered and racial others? Have investigations of \"public feelings\" (Cvetkovich, Berlant) changed the perspective on gendered affects (rage, revenge)?", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1739, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "FGSS 6505", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1740, "title": "Urban Representation", "code": "FGSS 6819", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Urban Representation Labs are intended to bring students and faculty into direct contact with complex urban representations spanning a wide media spectrum and evoking a broad set of humanist discourses. Students will leverage archival materials at Cornell to launch new observations and explore unanticipated approaches to urban culture that derive from previously understudied archival materials. The goal is twofold: to demystify the representational technologies involved in presenting the city, and to unpack the political, cultural, and aesthetic values and priorities embedded in every form of presentation. Urban Representation Labs are offered under the auspices of Cornell University's Andrew W. Mellon Foundation Collaborative Studies in Architecture, Urbanism, and the Humanities grant. For current special topic seminar description and application instructions, visit our urban seminars page.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1741, "title": "Labor, Race, and Gender", "code": "FGSS 6845", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "The majority of existing union members are women and workers of color, and, since the mid-1980s, the majority of newly organized workers have been women of color, particularly black women and recent immigrants from Latin America. Yet, with the exception of just a handful of unions, the labor movement still has been slow to build on this support and enthusiasm. This course will focus on the challenges and possibilities created by the changing demographics of race and gender in the contemporary labor movement. Through a combination of readings, small group discussions, guest speakers, and library and on line research, short essays and one longer research paper; the course will examine these issues from an historical, demographic, labor relations, and sociological perspective.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1742, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "FGSS 6876", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1743, "title": "Proseminar in Feminist, Gender, and Sexuality Studies", "code": "FGSS 6880", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to theoretical and practical aspects of the interdisciplinary field of Feminist, Gender and Sexuality Studies, providing graduate students with a range of disciplinary approaches and issues. We will explore both the disciplinary specifics of FGSS scholarship and the interdisciplinary breadth of gender/sexuality's reach as an analytic lens. While many of our graduate courses train students in highly specialized areas of feminist theory, this course aims to teach students how to find common intellectual ground from interdisciplinary perspectives without sacrificing the complexity of any disciplinary approach. The course is designed for graduate minors in FGSS and students with a specialized interest in feminist theory. Although it is not required, the course is strongly recommended for students obtaining a graduate minor in FGSS.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1744, "title": "Topics in Feminist, Gender, and Sexuality Studies", "code": "FGSS 6990", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "Independent reading course for graduate students on topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students develop a course of readings in consultation with a faculty member in the field of Feminist, Gender, & Sexuality Studies who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1745, "title": "Writing Ethnography: Theory, Genre and Practice", "code": "FGSS 7418", "subject": "FGSS", "descr": "What are the poetics and politics of ethnographic writing? How is this genre, what many would call the signature of cultural anthropology, distinct from other modes of scholarly writing? What are its possibilities, limits and effects? In this course we will read classic and experimental ethnographies and undertake exercises in ethnographic writing as a means to investigate ethnography as epistemology, genre and craft.", "tags": "FGSS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1746, "title": "Elementary Finnish II", "code": "FINN 1122", "subject": "FINN", "descr": "The Elementary Finnish II course is designed for students with some prior knowledge of Finnish. Students have an opportunity to practice listening, reading, writing and speaking in Finnish. Students learn to provide information about their opinions and feelings, their families, their immediate environment and their daily activities.", "tags": "FINN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1747, "title": "Elementary French", "code": "FREN 1220", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "FREN 1210-1220 is a two-semester sequence. This is the second half of the sequence designed to provide a thorough grounding in French language and an introduction to intercultural competence. French is used in contextualized, meaningful, and critical thinking activities to provide practice in speaking, listening, reading, and writing. Development of analytical skills for grammar leads students toward greater autonomy as language learners. Students continue developing their writing skills by writing and editing compositions. Readings are varied and include literary texts and a short novel.\u00a0 Daily preparations and active participation are required.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1748, "title": "Continuing French", "code": "FREN 1230", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "FREN 1230 is an all-skills course designed to improve oral communication, listening comprehension, and reading ability; to establish a groundwork for correct writing; and to provide a substantial grammar review. The approach in the course encourages the student to see the language within the context of its culture.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1749, "title": "Medical French", "code": "FREN 2070", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course is specifically designed for premed students and students at large with an interest in medical related topics who wish to be better equipped with language skills that will enable them to convey more empathy and multicultural sensitivity while communicating with diverse patient populations throughout the Francophone world.\u00a0 This course aims as well to prepare students to engage in global health equity and promote awareness of language barriers in today's medical field, both domestically and abroad. This is a mid-intermediate level course, and as such, it will continue to develop and reinforce writing, reading, speaking, listening and presentational skills via an array of communicative tasks based on real-life situations.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1750, "title": "French for Business", "code": "FREN 2080", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This intermediate conversation and composition French course is designed for students interested in business fields such as Hospitality, Business Management, and Marketing, those looking for an internship or a job in French-speaking businesses or students interested in exploring the language and cultures of the French-speaking business world.\u00a0 The course will focus on improving oral and written skills through the acquisition of specific vocabulary and the review of essential grammatical structures commonly used in business.\u00a0 Students will use authentic written, visual and listening materials and engage in interactive activities relevant to the professional world and its intercultural dimension.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1751, "title": "French Intermediate Composition and Conversation I", "code": "FREN 2090", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This intermediate-level course is designed for students who want to focus on their speaking and writing skills. Emphasis is placed on strengthening of grammar skills, expansion of vocabulary and discourse levels to increase communicative fluency and accuracy. The course also provides continued reading and listening practice as well as development of effective language learning strategies.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1752, "title": "French Intermediate Composition and Conversation II", "code": "FREN 2095", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This advanced-intermediate course is highly recommended for students planning to study abroad as it aims to develop the writing and speaking skills needed to function in a French speaking university environment. A comprehensive review of fundamental and advanced grammatical structures is integrated with the study of selected texts (short stories, literary excerpts, poems, articles from French periodicals, videos) all chosen for thematic or cultural interest. Students write weekly papers, participate in class discussions of the topics at hand, and give at least one oral presentation in class.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1753, "title": "Introduction to French and Francophone Literature and Culture", "code": "FREN 2310", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course, designed to follow FREN 2095, introduces students to an array of literary and visual material from the French and Francophone world.\u00a0 It aims to develop students' proficiency in critical writing and thinking, as well as presenting students with the vocabulary and tools of literary and visual analysis.\u00a0 Each section of FREN 2310 will have a different focus-for example, colonialism and the other, or the importance of women and sexual minorities in French and Francophone history, performance in literature and film, or image and narrative-but all sections of FREN 2310 will emphasize through writing assignments and in-class discussions, the development of those linguistic and conceptual tools necessary for cultural and critical fluency.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1754, "title": "Introduction to French and Francophone Film", "code": "FREN 2320", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course designed to follow FREN 2095, introduces students to key cinematic techniques used in analysis of films and to major movements in the twentieth century French cinema.\u00a0 Students will view a broad range of French and Francophone films spanning from 1945-2004 that includes canonical as well as contemporary works.\u00a0 Topics studied include: the evolution of gender representation in French and Franophone films, the depiction of decolonization, and the films de banlieu genre.\u00a0 The class will combine discussion, presentations, class scene analysis and readings from journalistic and film criticism tets, and will be conducted in French.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1755, "title": "French Foreign Language Across the Curriculum (FLAC)", "code": "FREN 3020", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This 1-credit optional course aims to expand the students' vocabulary, and advance their speaking and reading skills as well as enhance their knowledge and deepen their cultural understanding by supplementing non-language courses throughout the University.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1756, "title": "Readings in Modern French Literature and Culture", "code": "FREN 3210", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course is designed to teach ways of reading and understanding works created from the Romantic period to the present day, in their cultural context. A range of texts from various genres is presented, and students refine their analytical skills and their understanding of various methodologies of reading. Texts by authors such as Balzac, Baudelaire, Cixous, Duras, Genet, Mallarm\u00e9, Michaux, Proust, Rimbaud, Sarraute, and Sartre.", "tags": "LA-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1757, "title": "French Identities: 21st Century Culture and Society in France", "code": "FREN 3400", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course is conceived as a critical introduction to a cultural and political debate that appeared in the years of Mitterrand's France and reached its climax in the last decade.\u00a0 It will focus on a French society deeply shaped by immigration and globalization.\u00a0 In which way do the youth of the \"banlieue\" - mostly formed by postcolonial Blacks and Muslims - create their own culture with the French culture?\u00a0 How have literature, essays, movies, documentary films, \"national identity\" carried on by governments reacted to these transformations?\u00a0 Selecting literary texts (by Maryse Cond\u00e9, Zahia Rahmani, Adb El Malik) and other cultural productions, the course will explore the new expressions of France as an \"imagined community\".", "tags": "LA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1758, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "FREN 3560", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Psychoanalysis considers the human being not as an object of treatment, but as a subject who is called upon to elaborate an unconscious knowledge about what is disrupting her life, through analysis of dreams, symptoms, bungled actions, slips of the tongue, and repetitive behaviors.\u00a0 Freud finds that these apparently irrational acts and behavior are ordered by the logic of the fantasy, which provides a mental representation of a traumatic childhood experience and the effects it unleashes in the mind and body-effects he called drives.\u00a0 As \"unbound\" energies, the drives give rise to symptoms, repetitive acts, and fantasmatic stagings that menace our health and sometimes threaten social coexistence, but that also rise to the desires, creative acts, and social projects we identify as the essence of human life.\u00a0 Readings will include fundamental texts on the unconscious, repression, fantasy, and the death drive, as well as case studies and speculative essays on mythology, art, religion, and group psychology.\u00a0 Students will be asked to keep a dream journal and to work on their unconscious formations, and will have the chance to produce creative projects as well as analytic essays.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1759, "title": "African Sea Routes", "code": "FREN 3580", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This survey course will trace narratives of sea crossings in Francophone literature from Africa and its diaspora across the three bodies of water that surround the continent: the Atlantic Ocean, the Indian Ocean, and the Mediterranean Sea. It will consider literary and cinematic depictions of the trans-Atlantic slave trade, sea trading in the Caribbean, nuclear experiments in the Chagos islands, and the shipwreck of clandestine migrants in Lampedusa. Through forced displacement or willful journeys, exile or exploration, we will study how these aesthetic works articulate a global consciousness, which has radically redefined what it means to be African, cosmopolitan, and modern, from negritude to cr\u00e9olit\u00e9 and coolitude. Authors include Aim\u00e9 C\u00e9saire, Fatou Diome, Shenaz Patel, Salim Bachi, and others.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1760, "title": "Literary Theory on the Edge", "code": "FREN 3921", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Without literary theory, there is no idea of literature, of criticism, of culture. While exciting theoretical paradigms emerged in the late 20th century, including structuralism and poststructuralism, this course extends theoretical inquiry into its most exciting current developments, including performance studies, media theory and cinema/media studies, the digital humanities, trauma theory, transgender studies, and studies of the Anthropocene. Taught by two Cornell professors active in the field, along with occasional invited guests, lectures and class discussions will provide students with a facility for close textual analysis, a knowledge of major currents of thought in the humanities, and an appreciation for the uniqueness and complexity of language and media. This course may involve presentation of performance art.\u00a0 Course open to all levels; no previous knowledge of literary or cultural theory required.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1761, "title": "Body Politics in African Literature, Cinema, and New Media", "code": "FREN 3975", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "GLC-AS|LA-AS|SCD-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1762, "title": "Madness Narratives and Pop Culture in 21st Century", "code": "FREN 4070", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Madness fascinates, mental illness frightens. They are realms of scholarship as well as objects of practical knowledge and representation for the arts and the social actors themselves. This seminar aims to explore the ways in which people who are affected by psychological disorders and strive to face them, are depicted in the 20th and 21st century popular culture. What relationship exists between the medical understanding of these disorders and their portrayals in literature, recovery narratives, cinema, TV series and documentaries? Do contemporary pictures of madness in fiction contribute to demystify and destigmatize mental illness, or do they reinforce negative stereotypes? Are there differences between French fictions and American ones? This seminar will examine each oeuvre as a case study with the resources of critical studies.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1763, "title": "Special Topics in French Literature", "code": "FREN 4200", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Guided independent study of special topics.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1764, "title": "Honors Work in French", "code": "FREN 4300", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Consult director of undergraduate studies for more information.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1765, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "FREN 4375", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1766, "title": "Montaigne and the Philosophy of Catastrophe", "code": "FREN 4540", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "How might philosophy respond to catastrophe? The Wars of Religion in France and throughout Europe offered continual violence, trauma, and social upheaval. The Essais of Michel de Montaigne responded to this context by elaborating a new form of skepticism, which creates a space for more humane ethics (including some of the earliest discussions of religious and racial tolerance) and for freedom of thought (a relatively new concept in the western world), by means of a radical questioning of the functioning of political, religious, and intellectual authority. What Montaigne offers is both a practical and intellectual model for coping with extreme and omnipresent violence and social conflict, a model that presents difference as a necessary condition of physical and psychic survival.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ALC-AS|ETM-AS|FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1767, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "FREN 4715", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relations of politics to art in general and the cultural politic of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers, and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape culture and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rule) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others; with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of the situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say post autonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1768, "title": "French Reading for Graduates", "code": "FREN 6300", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Designed for those with little or no background in French. Aims primarily to develop skill in reading French. Covers grammar basics, extensive vocabulary, and strategies for reading in a foreign language. Some flexibility in selecting texts according to fields of interest.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1769, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "FREN 6375", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1770, "title": "Special Topics in French Literature", "code": "FREN 6400", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "Guided independent study for graduate students.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1771, "title": "Deleuze", "code": "FREN 6535", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "This seminar provides an opportunity to study aspects of the philosophical oeuvre of Gilles Deleuze. Our point of departure will be Deleuze's 1968 book Difference and Repetition.\u00a0 We'll later consider some of Deleuze's key concepts and problems, as they unfolded in essays co-authored with F\u00e9lix Guattari (including the two-volumne set on Capitalism and Schizophrenia), and beyond (such as the diptych devoted to Cinema).\u00a0 Our goal is neither to provide a chronological overview of Deleuze's scholarship, nor to add his ideas to a putative \"tool box\" that we might opportunistically use without much concern for intellectual provenience.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1772, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "FREN 6561", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1773, "title": "The Normal and the Pathological", "code": "FREN 6730", "subject": "FREN", "descr": "What does the term \"normal\" mean?\u00a0 It is a modern invention, but one based on millennia of theories on what is natural or unnatural, regular or irregular, orderly or monstrous.\u00a0 All of these terms are loaded with the histories of gender, racial, and ability-oriented differences.\u00a0 This course, based on the work of Georges Canguilhem and Michel Foucault, will explore current theories of the normal in the domain of disability studies and queer studies, and return to the past of these concepts to examine their ancient origins.\u00a0 Authors will include Shelly Tremain, Lennard Davis, Nirmala Erevelles, Robert McRuer, Elizabeth Beardon, and Jasbir Puar.", "tags": "FREN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1774, "title": "Fashion Computer-Aided Design", "code": "FSAD 1140", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Introduces two major graphic software programs (Adobe Photoshop and Illustrator) to develop original designs.\u00a0Class activities and projects include textile design, technical flat drawing design, digitized fashion illustration, 3D virtual fashion design, and story board.\u00a0 Projects include both individual work and group work.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1775, "title": "Fibers, Fabrics, and Finishes", "code": "FSAD 1350", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course introduces the properties and performance of textile materials and processes for FSAD majors and provides a general overview of the textile industry from a scientific perspective. Focus is on materials used in apparel and home furnishing markets. This course may also be used to fill a science requirement for non-FSAD majors in Human Ecology. Chemistry and mechanics of typical materials and processes used in the textile industry will be addressed with emphasis placed on the relationship between the materials and processes used and the final properties of the fabric.", "tags": "PBS-HE|FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1776, "title": "Fiber and Yarn Analysis Laboratory", "code": "FSAD 1360", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This laboratory provides an opportunity for investigation of the physical and chemical structure and properties of fibers and yarns commonly used in apparel and home furnishing applications. Students completing this class will have a strong understanding of fiber and yarn structure, the differences between common fiber and yarn types and will know techniques for positive identification of textile fibers.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1777, "title": "Fashion, Aesthetics and Society", "code": "FSAD 2190", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course is an introduction to fashion, beauty and trends and their integral relationship throughout history. Students will learn and explore various aspects of contemporary fashion phenomena, such as fashion-art collaborations, media-effects on body image, the impact of new technologies on fashion and lifestyle trends, and other significant issues of society manifest in fashion of the 20th and 21st centuries.", "tags": "CA-HE|HA-HE|FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1778, "title": "Fashion Draping", "code": "FSAD 2640", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "In this studio course we examine the process of creating a three-dimensional garment from the two-dimensional fabric. The principles and processes of draping, advanced flat-pattern making, and industrial construction methods using a variety of materials are investigated through project work. Assigned problems require students to make judgments regarding the design process, the nature of materials, body structure, function, and fashion.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1779, "title": "Activewear Design and Product Development", "code": "FSAD 2660", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Project-based course in which students explore the relationship between technology and design, and the impact of production issues on manufactured activewear. Students learn computer-aided patternmaking, activewear construction methods, manufacturing technologies, communication of technical details, flats, specifications, and costing of garments. Designs are developed to various stages from conceptual work to full specification of the product and its production details, with a concentration on the iterative design process.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1780, "title": "Special Topics in FSAD", "code": "FSAD 3000", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Special topics offered as one-time courses or as pilot courses still in development.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1781, "title": "Product Quality Assurance", "code": "FSAD 3320", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Covers evaluation of fibers, yarns, fabrics, and garments, with emphases on quality planning and evaluation based on industry standards.\u00a0Laboratory sections introduce students to common testing specified in the textile and apparel industry, data generation and analysis.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1782, "title": "New Technologies for Fashion Design", "code": "FSAD 3650", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "The focus of this course will be using 3D digital technologies such as 3D scanning, virtual prototyping and 3D printing, to create one-of-a kind and innovative fashion products. Students will develop digital prototypes. They will also experiment with laser cutting, Sonobond ultrasonic fusing technology, and digital textile printing. Experimental design samples will be used to create full-scale garments.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1783, "title": "Directed Reading", "code": "FSAD 4000", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves library research and independent reading by and individual student or a group of students in a field of FSAD not otherwise provided through course work in the department or elsewhere at the university.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1784, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "FSAD 4010", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves data collection and analysis, or laboratory or studio projects by an individual student or a group of students in a field of FSAD not otherwise provided through course work in the department or elsewhere at the university.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1785, "title": "Supervised Fieldwork", "code": "FSAD 4020", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "For study that involves both responsible participation in a community setting and reflection on that experience through discussion, reading, and writing by an individual student or a group of students in a field of FSAD not otherwise provided through course work in the department or elsewhere at the university.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1786, "title": "Teaching Apprenticeship", "code": "FSAD 4030", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1787, "title": "Global Fashion Management", "code": "FSAD 4440", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the global textile and apparel complex, particularly the importance of international trade, global sourcing, strategic management of global brands, and corporate social responsibility. There is a focus on multinational apparel firms with accompanying case study analysis.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1788, "title": "Fiber Science & Apparel Design Futures", "code": "FSAD 4444", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "In this course, students will work individually or in cross-disciplinary teams to synthesize knowledge and skills from their prior courses into new ideas and products. Projects will be developed and led by students with faculty mentorship.\u00a0 These projects should build on work from previous courses or projects and allow students to explore multiple aspects of design, performance, use, production, and marketing informed by the College of Human Ecology mission \"Improving lives by exploring and shaping human connections to natural, social and built environments\".", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1789, "title": "Nanotechnology in Fibers and Textiles", "code": "FSAD 4460", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course covers the development of functional fibers and textiles by nanotechnology. This course introduces nanomaterials, nano-finishes and nanocoating processes used for functional fibers and textiles. This course also emphasizes the structure-property of the nanofibers and nanotextiles and predict their end-use. Examples of nanotechnological products based on nanofibers and nanotextiles in the market are included. This course also discusses environmental issues and the sustainability aspects regard to nanotechnology used in fibers and textiles. Through lectures, readings, discussion, projects and presentations, this course highlights the role of nanotechnology for the development of functional fibers and textiles.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1790, "title": "Online Fashion Promotion and Presentation", "code": "FSAD 4700", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Students are expected to discover their personal philosophy of fashion and to discover and adopt current presentation techniques. Students gain an understanding of presentation methods currently used in fashion design, forecasting, and editorial illustration. Skills covered include fashion illustration, image manipulation, and photographic image, layout, and presentation.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1791, "title": "Honors Thesis Research", "code": "FSAD 4990", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "The student prepares a thesis, based on independent research, including a research statement, background, approach, results (which could be a description of a creative work), and discussion. The student may also produce creative work. Students make an open presentation of work, either a seminar or an exhibition, and an oral defense with the committee. Interested students should obtain a FSAD Honors Program application form from the FSAD undergraduate office (T57 HEB) and submit the application to the department before the end of the fall semester of junior year. For more information students should contact the Director of Undergraduate Studies at fsad-dus@cornell.edu.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1792, "title": "Special Problems for Graduate Students", "code": "FSAD 6000", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Independent advanced work by graduate students recommended by their chair and approved by the department chair and instructor.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1793, "title": "Rheology of Solids: Dynamic Mechanical Analysis of Fibers and Polymers", "code": "FSAD 6160", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Introduces students to Dynamic Mechanical Analysis (DMA) and its relevance in the characterization of polymer fibers and films. DMA is a materials characterization technique that supplies information about major transitions as well as secondary and tertiary transitions not readily identifiable by other methods. It also allows characterization of bulk properties directly affecting material performance. DMA can also be used to predict the behavior of polymeric materials as a function of time and their exposure to liquids and gases over a wide range of temperatures. Advanced use of MatlabTM programming is necessary for modeling rheological behavior.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1794, "title": "Physical Properties of Fiber - Forming Polymers and Fibers", "code": "FSAD 6200", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course covers formation and properties of fiber forming polymers - rubbery, glassy, and crystalline states - and their interconnection. Discusses fiber structure, relationship between chemical structure and physical properties of manufactured and natural fibers, mechanical, thermal, viscoelastic properties of fibers, and testing methods.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1795, "title": "Research Seminar in Apparel Design", "code": "FSAD 6370", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course for graduate students in apparel design offers a new topic every semester as supervised by a rotating team of professors.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1796, "title": "Fiber Formation: Theory and Practice", "code": "FSAD 6660", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "This course covers the rheological and mechanical behavior of polymeric melts and solutions undergoing fiber formation processes. Students completing this class will have a strong understanding of fiber formation including mathematical modeling of flow lines, polymer and solution properties necessary for fiber formation, and relationships between fiber formation process and resulting fiber properties. Fiber formation methods including melt spinning, gel spinning, dry spinning, wet spinning and electrospinning will be addressed.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1797, "title": "Fashion Theory", "code": "FSAD 6700", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "Provides students with theoretical insights that will enable them to conduct innovative debates and challenge extant creative strategies. The course considers a topical dilemma that students must respond to using conceptual foundations and methodologies that are bound in studio practice, criticism, education, management and the cultural context of fashion design.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1798, "title": "Master's Thesis and Research", "code": "FSAD 8990", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1799, "title": "Doctoral Thesis and Research", "code": "FSAD 9990", "subject": "FSAD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "FSAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1800, "title": "FWS: From Fairy Tales to the Uncanny: Exploring the Romantic Consciousness", "code": "GERST 1109", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "How did bawdy tales of peasants using magic to climb the social ladder get transformed into moral lessons for children? \u00a0The answer lies in Romanticism and its appropriation of the imagination as a force for social transformation. \u00a0As Romantics edited older tales for juvenile consumption they wrote new ones for adults. This new fiction created the matrix for modern pop genres like fantasy, science-fiction, murder mysteries, and gothic horror. \u00a0To understand this paradigm shift in modern culture, we will read, discuss, and write about a variety of texts the Romantics collected, composed, or inspired, including poetry and film, in addition to classic fairy tales and academic scholarship on the topic.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1801, "title": "FWS: Let's Play!", "code": "GERST 1118", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Why do we play games and why do we have fun with them? What makes us winners and losers? This course will explore various approaches to games and humans at play. We will try to understand why people play and why they prefer some games to others. Interdisciplinary in nature, the class will offer readings from areas of sociology, psychology, history, mathematics, and cultural studies (just to name a few). By reading and analyzing and playing with Nabokov, Hesse, Zweig, Berne, Huizinga, and Schenkel we will make connections between games, national identity, gender, class, and intelligence, and will construct arguments about various scholarly and fictional written and cinematic texts.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1802, "title": "FWS: Writing Berlin", "code": "GERST 1121", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Berlin is a city that reinvents itself by rewriting itself. In this writing seminar we'll study a variety of literary, visual, and sonic texts to create a virtual map of the city, from its emergence as modern metropolis in the 1920s, reduction to rubble in World War II, afterlife as refuge of the disaffected in the 1980s, and rebirth at the turn of the 21st century. As we make our way through the linguistic, visual and aural landscape of its ever-changing topography we'll create our own stories of a mythical Berlin in dialogue with texts written by the displaced persons who breached its real and imagined walls and navigated its illicit economies.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1803, "title": "FWS: Marx, Nietzsche, Freud", "code": "GERST 1170", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "A basic understanding of Marx, Nietzsche, and Freud is a prerequisite for participating in critical debates in the humanities and social sciences. Our seminar will explore key terms in the revolutionary models of critical analysis these thinkers pioneered: historical materialism, post-metaphysical philosophy, and psychoanalysis. \u00a0This will mean articulating points of contrast as well as convergence. \u00a0Discussions and writing exercises will focus on texts that created the discursive framework for critiquing society and culture today. \u00a0Our method will proceed from the premise that critical reading, thinking, and writing are inseparable moments in the same operation of critique. \u00a0The question that guides that method will be: Do alternative ways of thinking exist in opposition to the ones we view as natural, inevitable, or universal?", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1804, "title": "Exploring German Contexts I", "code": "GERST 1210", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Students develop basic abilities in listening, reading, writing, and speaking German in meaningful contexts through interaction in small group activities. Course materials including videos, short articles, and songs provide students with varied perspectives on German language, culture, and society.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1805, "title": "Exploring German Contexts II", "code": "GERST 1220", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Students build on their basic knowledge of German by engaging in intense and more sustained interaction in the language. Students learn more advanced language structures allowing them to express more complex ideas in German. Discussions, videos, and group activities address topics of relevance to the contemporary German-speaking world.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1806, "title": "Expanding the German Dossier", "code": "GERST 1230", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Students continue to develop their language skills by discussing a variety of cultural topics and themes in the German-speaking world. The focus of the course is on expanding vocabulary, reviewing major grammar topics, developing effective reading strategies, improving listening comprehension, and working on writing skills. Work in small groups increases each student's opportunity to speak in German and provides for greater feedback and individual help.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1807, "title": "Elementary Yiddish II", "code": "GERST 1777", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Intended for advanced beginners. Builds further competence in reading, writing, oral comprehension, speaking and grammar. Course material is presented and discussed in the context of Ashkenazi Jewish culture.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1808, "title": "Germany: Intercultural Context", "code": "GERST 2000", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Students examine important aspects of present-day German culture while expanding and strengthening their reading, writing, and speaking skills in German. Materials for each topic are selected from a variety of sources (fiction, newspapers, magazines, and the Internet). Units address a variety of topics including studying at a German university, modern literature, Germany online, and Germany at the turn of the century. Oral and written work and individual and group presentations emphasize accurate and idiomatic expression in German. Successful completion of the course enables students to continue with more advanced courses in language, literature, and culture.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1809, "title": "Perspectives on German Culture", "code": "GERST 2040", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "This course aims at sharpening your awareness of personal and cultural subjectivity by examining texts in a variety of media against the backdrop of cultural, political, and historical contexts.\u00a0 We will focus on improving your oral and written expression of idiomatic German by giving attention to more sophisticated aspects of using enriched vocabulary in a variety of conversational contexts and written genres. Materials will include readings in contemporary prose, newscasts, research at the Johnson Art Museum, and interviews with native speakers on a topic of contemporary cultural relevance.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1810, "title": "German in Business Culture", "code": "GERST 2060", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Learn German and understand German business culture at the same time.\u00a0 This is a German language course that examines the German economic structure and its major components: industry, trade unions, the banking system, and the government.\u00a0 Participants will learn about the business culture in Germany and how to be effective in a work environment, Germany's role within the European Union,\u00a0the importance of trade and globalization, and current economic issues in Germany.\u00a0 The materials consist of authentic documents from the German business world, TV footage, and a Business German textbook.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1811, "title": "Thinking Media", "code": "GERST 2703", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "From hieroglyphs to HTML, ancient poetry to audiotape, and Plato's cave to virtual reality, \"Thinking Media\" offers a multidisciplinary introduction to the most influential media formats of the last three millennia. Featuring an array of guests from across Cornell, including faculty from Communication, Comparative Literature, English, German Studies, Information Science, Music, and Performing & Media Arts, the course will present diverse perspectives on how to think with, against, and about media in relation to the public sphere and private life, archaeology and science fiction, ethics and aesthetics, identity and difference, labor and play, knowledge and power, expression and surveillance, and the generation and analysis of data.", "tags": "ALC-AS|CA-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1812, "title": "German Foreign Language Across the Curriculum (FLAC)", "code": "GERST 3013", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "This 1-credit optional course aims to expand the students' vocabulary, and advance their speaking and reading skills as well as enhance their knowledge and deepen their cultural understanding by supplementing non-language courses throughout the University.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1813, "title": "German Digital Culture: We live online", "code": "GERST 3080", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "In this course, we will encounter German culture of today in and through Web 2.0. No technical knowledge is required since, in the process, a solid base of knowledge concerning the use of media will be constructed. This knowledge will then be applied practically through discussing aspects of German culture visible in the WWW. The highlight of the course will be an intercultural encounter with a German Class from the University of Osnabr\u00fcck using Web 2.0 applications. In the produced content, students will become part of the Web 2.0 in German through an intercultural discussion of German life visible in the World Wide Web (WWW).", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1814, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "GERST 3561", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Psychoanalysis considers the human being not as an object of treatment, but as a subject who is called upon to elaborate an unconscious knowledge about what is disrupting her life, through analysis of dreams, symptoms, bungled actions, slips of the tongue, and repetitive behaviors.\u00a0 Freud finds that these apparently irrational acts and behavior are ordered by the logic of the fantasy, which provides a mental representation of a traumatic childhood experience and the effects it unleashes in the mind and body-effects he called drives.\u00a0 As \"unbound\" energies, the drives give rise to symptoms, repetitive acts, and fantasmatic stagings that menace our health and sometimes threaten social coexistence, but that also rise to the desires, creative acts, and social projects we identify as the essence of human life.\u00a0 Readings will include fundamental texts on the unconscious, repression, fantasy, and the death drive, as well as case studies and speculative essays on mythology, art, religion, and group psychology.\u00a0 Students will be asked to keep a dream journal and to work on their unconscious formations, and will have the chance to produce creative projects as well as analytic essays.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1815, "title": "Kant", "code": "GERST 3590", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "An intensive study of the metaphysical and epistemological doctrines of the Critique of Pure Reason. Some editions of the course may also consider Kant's ethical views as laid out in the Groundwork of the Metaphysics of Morals and related works.", "tags": "KCM-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1816, "title": "Premodern Literature and Media", "code": "GERST 4285", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "This course introduces the canon of premodern German literature, including lyric poetry (Minnesang), Arthurian romance (Gottfried's Tristan, Wolfram's Parzival, Hartmann's Iwein), and the heroic epic (Nibelungenlied). With a focus on medieval manuscript culture, we will investigate problems of form, genre, and representation, as well as post-medieval approaches to materiality, hermeneutics, and textuality. Our larger questions, centering on the mediation of words, images, and sounds, will address the contested legacy of the premodern period in German modernity.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1817, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "GERST 4375", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1818, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "GERST 4520", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Undergraduate student and faculty advisor to determine course of study and credit hours.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1819, "title": "Honors Research", "code": "GERST 4530", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "The Reading Course is administered by the director of the honors thesis. It carries 4 hours credit, and may be counted towards the work required for the German Major. The reading concentrates on a pre-determined topic or area. Students meet with their honors advisor about every two weeks throughout the term. Substantial reading assignments are given, and occasional short essays are written.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1820, "title": "Honors Thesis", "code": "GERST 4540", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "The thesis is to be written on a subject related to the work done in GERST 4530. \u00a0A suggested length for the thesis is 50-60 pages.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1821, "title": "Premodern Literature and Media", "code": "GERST 6285", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "This course introduces the canon of medieval German literature: lyric poetry (Minnesang), Arthurian romance (Gottfried's Tristan, Wolfram's Parzival, Hartmann's Iwein), and the heroic epic (Nibelungenlied). With a focus on twelfth-century courtly culture, we will investigate medieval problems of form, genre, and representation, as well as post-medieval approaches to materiality, hermeneutics, and textuality. Our larger questions, centering on the controversial concept of medieval alterity, will address the contested legacy of the Middle Ages in German modernity.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1822, "title": "Reading Academic German II", "code": "GERST 6320", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Emphasis on development of the specialized vocabulary of student's field of study.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1823, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "GERST 6375", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1824, "title": "Female Acts: From Antiquity to Jelinek", "code": "GERST 6410", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Woman caring for the dead; women sacrificed; fatal female desire - these images have been constitutive for Western aesthetic and theoretical discourse. How is female agency, in word and deed, delimited in a world divided along the lines of public/private, state/family, visible/invisible, outside/inside, mind/body, culture/nature? How are knowledge and thought conditioned by positing gendered and racial others? Have investigations of \"public feelings\" (Cvetkovich, Berlant) changed the perspective on gendered affects (rage, revenge)?", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1825, "title": "Fictions of Law: Literature, Philosophy, and Culture in the Long 18th Century", "code": "GERST 6610", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "This course examines the profound cultural and social changes that took place during the Enlightenment and their aftermath as reflected in German literature and philosophy. The main focus will be on the decay of old European norms and the establishment of new normative frameworks in the wake of the intensified functional differentiation of society that marks the 18th century. During this period, rule following and deviance are foregrounded in literature, ethics, and legal theory. Questions concerning the legitimacy of political change and revolution lead to a new understanding of the law; the state and society; the conscience of the individual; and the role of education and the arts.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1826, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "GERST 7540", "subject": "GERST", "descr": "Graduate student and faculty advisor to determine course of study and credit hours.", "tags": "GERST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1827, "title": "FWS: Power and Politics", "code": "GOVT 1101", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This First-Year Writing Seminar is devoted to the study of political power and the interaction of citizens and governments and provides the opportunity to write extensively about these issues. Topics vary by semester.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1828, "title": "Introduction to Comparative Government and Politics", "code": "GOVT 1313", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course will introduce students to comparative politics\u2014the study of the political institutions, identities, and organized interests in countries around the world. Emphasis is on how to make meaningful comparisons between systems in different countries. Towards that goal, we will be looking at a dozen countries with different histories, political systems, and from various regions around the world.\u00a0 We will also use a comparative framework to use our knowledge of these (and other) countries to examine questions about democracies and democratization, electoral systems and political parties, authoritarian regimes, political mobilization and change, economic development and globalization, nationalism and identity politics, among other topics.\u00a0 The meta theme of this course is the comparative method as a unique way of leveraging our understanding about social and political phenomena.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1829, "title": "Introduction to Africana Studies", "code": "GOVT 1503", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the study of Africa, the U.S., the Caribbean and other diasporas.\u00a0 This course will examine, through a range of disciplines, among them literature, history, politics, philosophy, the themes - including race/racism, the Middle Passage, sexuality, colonialism, and culture - that have dominated Africana Studies since its inception in the late-1960s. We will explore these issues in the attempt to understand how black lives have been shaped, in a historical sense; and, of course, the effects of these issues in the contemporary moment. This course seeks to introduce these themes, to investigate through one or more of the disciplines relevant to the question, and to provide a broad understanding of the themes so as to enable the kind of intellectual reflection critical to Africana Studies.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1830, "title": "Introduction to Political Theory", "code": "GOVT 1615", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course introduces students to political theory as a distinctive mode of political inquiry. By surveying the wide range of forms through which political theory has been practiced\u2014such as treatises, dialogues, plays, aphorisms, novels, manifestos, letters, speeches, illustrations, and films\u2014we explore the ways in which political theory reflects upon, criticizes, and reshapes the basic concepts, habits of perception, and modes of feeling through which people make sense of the political world, from big events like wars and revolutions to everyday experiences of felt injustice or alienation. Our approach will be both historical and conceptual, attending to the force of each theoretical intervention in its context, while also drawing out the broader philosophical and political questions it continues to pose to us now.", "tags": "HA-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1831, "title": "The Politics of Technology", "code": "GOVT 3042", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course will examine the politics of technology, with an emphasis on dual use technologies such as social media, artificial intelligence, and facial recognition. It will look at political consequences of those technologies, including the way that social media can be manipulated in an electoral context, how AI and automation can affect public policies (e.g., predictive policing) and ways to mitigate algorithmic biases embedded in these technologies, and questions of whether the United States and China are locked in a technology arms race and if global governance proposals can defuse the adverse consequences of great power competition over technology.", "tags": "SBA-AS|ETM-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1832, "title": "China's Next Economy", "code": "GOVT 3044", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course provides students with an analytical framework to understand China's ongoing economic transformation. The courses goals include: 1) to familiarize students with different perspectives on China's economic development and future prospects; 2) to provide a close working knowledge of the evolving current situation, with a focus on internal variation within China\u2014telling different Chinese stories, not one \"China story\"\u2014and particularly emphasizing urbanization and the goal of shifting from manufacturing and export-led to services and domestic-led economy; and 3) to give students hands-on experience using Chinese economic data in the context of a brief research note. Each week will connect to current events and debates, with students writing three blog posts over the course of the semester to bring academic research and social scientific analysis to bear upon policy-relevant questions and developments.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1833, "title": "Enduring Global and American Issues", "code": "GOVT 3071", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "The US and the global community face a number of complex, interconnected and enduring issues that pose challenges for our political and policy governance institutions and society at large.\u00a0 Exploring how the US and the world conceive of the challenges and take action on them is fundamental to understanding them.\u00a0 This course investigates such issues, especially ones that fit into the critically important areas of sustainability, social justice, technology, public health and globalization, security and conflict, among others. Students will engage with these areas and issues and the challenges they pose, using multiple frameworks and approaches, through weekly class discussions and lectures.\"", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1834, "title": "Crime and Punishment", "code": "GOVT 3121", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This is a class about the American criminal justice system\u2014from policing to prisons, from arrest to reentry. In many ways, the operation of the modern criminal justice system is taken for granted, which frequently allows it to escape close scrutiny. But we will examine it in great detail, with a focus on how it came about, how it sustains itself, its many roles in society (only some of which involve crime and justice), and how and why it may be changing. In Spring 21, the class will take a particular look at policing and examine the calls for police reform and abolition.\u00a0NB: This class is designed to challenge your settled assumptions and dearly held myths about what is right and wrong with the system. Those who have made up their mind about criminal justice in America should not take the course. This class was formerly GOVT 3141, PRISONS, taught by Prof. Margulies. It has been renamed and renumbered as GOVT 3121 to distinguish it from the distance learning course taught by Prof. Katzenstein.", "tags": "KCM-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1835, "title": "The Nature, Functions, and Limits of Law", "code": "GOVT 3131", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "A general-education course to acquaint students with how our legal system pursues the goals of society. The course introduces students to various perspectives on the nature of law, what functions it ought to serve in society, and what it can and cannot accomplish. The course proceeds in the belief that such matters constitute a valuable and necessary part of a general education, not only for pre-law students but especially for students in other fields. Assigned readings comprise legal materials and also secondary sources on the legal process and the role of law in society. The classes include discussion and debate about current legal and social issues, including equality, safety, the environment, punishment, and autonomy.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1836, "title": "Germany in Europe", "code": "GOVT 3253", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1837, "title": "Southeast Asian Politics", "code": "GOVT 3443", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course will give students the historical background and theoretical tools to understand the politics of Southeast Asia, one of the world's most diverse and fascinating regions. The first part of the course traces Southeast Asia's political development from the colonial period to the present day, examining common themes such as decolonization, state building, war and insurgency, ethnic relations, democratization, economic development, and nationalism. The second part of the course focuses on key issues in contemporary Southeast Asian politics, including political culture, representation and mass politics, globalization, regional politics, and civil violence. Our course will concentrate primarily but not exclusively on the six largest countries in the region-Burma, Indonesia, Malaysia, the Philippines, Thailand, and Vietnam-using the comparative method to understand variation across time, across countries, and within countries.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1838, "title": "Modern Political Philosophy", "code": "GOVT 3625", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course will primarily focus on studying and scrutinizing general conceptions of justice. Topics explored typically include liberty,economic equality, democracy, community, the general welfare, and toleration. We will also look at implications for particular political controversies such as abortion, welfare programs and pornography.", "tags": "KCM-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1839, "title": "Comparative Corruption", "code": "GOVT 3683", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Corruption, and the perception of corruption, pervades many aspects of society and has become a source of political protest around the world. This course focuses on the similarities and differences between forms, causes, and effects of corruption in various environments. The course starts with a discussion of the definitions, causes, and effects of corruption across countries, and then turns to particular forms and contexts where corruption is observed: for example, developed and developing countries, conflict-ridden societies, and international investment. We will also discuss some of the potential solutions to corruption and their costs and benefits for political and civil society.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1840, "title": "WIM: The Cold War", "code": "GOVT 3837", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "During more than four decades following the end of World War II international politics was dominated by a phenomenon known as the Cold War. This class examines the origins, course, and ultimate demise of this conflict that pitted the United States and NATO against the Soviet Union and its allies. It seeks to evaluate the competing explanations that political scientists and historians have put forward to explain the Cold War by drawing on the new evidence that has become available. The course considers political, economic, and strategic aspects of the Cold War, including the nuclear arms race, with particular focus on the link between domestic and foreign policy. The course emphasizes writing, and includes a final research paper for which students will use original archival materials. Please contact the instructor if you are interested in an optional extra-credit Russian-language section.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1841, "title": "Major Seminar", "code": "GOVT 4000", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Major seminars in the Government department are small, advanced courses that cover an important theme or topic in contemporary politics in depth. Courses place particular emphasis on careful reading and classroom discussion, and students can expect to write a significant research paper. The enrollment limit is 15 students. These courses are open to all Cornell students, but preference in admissions is given to seniors over juniors, and to Government majors over other students.\u00a0 Topics vary by semester and section.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1842, "title": "Making Sense of China: The Capstone Seminar", "code": "GOVT 4037", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course serves as a survey of major issues within Chinese politics and foreign policy and constitutes the capstone seminar for CAPS students.\u00a0\u00a0is intended to give students an opportunity to explore aspects related to Chinese politics, economics, and society that they may have touched upon in other China-focused courses at Cornell, but have not been able to examine as fully, and with the degree of care, that they would like.\u00a0\u00a0In this regard, the substance of the course will be developed through an iterative process between the instructor and the seminar participants.\u00a0\u00a0We will spend the first part of the course doing a series of recent influential readings on contemporary China and developing initial research projects.\u00a0\u00a0The second half of the class will be organized around student led presentations of research projects (accompanied by relevant academic, media, and policy readings).", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1843, "title": "Making Science Policy: The Real World", "code": "GOVT 4451", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course focuses on what happens when science meet the policy-making world. We will discuss theoretical and empirical studies in Science & Technology Studies that analyze the interactions between science, society and politics. We will specifically investigate the mechanisms by which science may impact policy-making by focusing on: the rise of science diplomacy, initiatives to use science in order to further development goals, and efforts to produce evidence-based foreign policy. We will also focus on currently hotly debated political issues in government affairs, including the politization and militarization of space, the rise of big data, the politics of climate change, and the construction of border walls. As part of this course we will hear from experts in the federal government on how they attempt to integrate science into the everyday workings of governance.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1844, "title": "Becoming a China Hand", "code": "GOVT 4503", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "China's prominence in the news cycle and policy discourse reflects the immense and growing tension in China's relations with the United States and other countries around the world. Substantively, there is hardly a profession or sector where what happens inside China does not touch upon or impact what happens outside China. Throughout this course, we will grapple with ongoing debates over China's rise and whether policies of engagement with China have succeeded or failed. These debates are unfolding in many different communities and idea marketplaces, across many different modes and styles of analysis and writing. Each of the reading and writing assignments are aimed at developing literacy and proficiency in three different modes of analysis and writing about China: academic, policy, and journalistic. While many courses provide introductions to different aspects of China, and many seminars examine more specialized questions at even deeper levels, there are few that directly invite students to examine and explore the different ways in which scholars and professionals have written about and come to understand China.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1845, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "GOVT 4723", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1846, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "GOVT 4745", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1847, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "GOVT 4846", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "KCM-AS|SCD-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1848, "title": "China and Asian Security", "code": "GOVT 4877", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course focuses primarily on China's evolving role in both Asia and world politics. While China may not necessarily be the sole determinant of the type of security order that will prevail in Asia, it has a profound influence on the region and potentially on the global order as well. To gain an understanding of security issues in Asia today, the seminar attempts to come to terms with the evolving nature of China's foreign policy and national security strategies. The course then concentrates on the most influential academic work on China's foreign relations and national security policies that has been published since the end of the Cold War.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1849, "title": "Honors Thesis: Research and Writing", "code": "GOVT 4959", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "GOVT 4959 is the second semester of honors thesis research, limited to students who have completed  GOVT 4949 - Honors Seminar: Thesis Clarification and Research. There is no formal class meeting. Instead, students will work on their own, with their advisers and other faculty they may consult. Following the plan developed in the fall semester, they will proceed to gather and analyze data or texts, turning in thesis chapters to the adviser on a regular schedule that the student and adviser develop.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1850, "title": "Undergraduate Independent Study", "code": "GOVT 4999", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "One-on-one tutorial arranged by the student with a faculty member of his or her choosing. Open to government majors doing superior work, and it is the responsibility of the student to establish the research proposal and to find a faculty sponsor. Applicants for independent study must present a well-defined program of study that cannot be satisfied by pursuing courses in the regularly scheduled curriculum. No more than 4 credits of independent study may count toward fulfillment of the major. Students who elect to continue taking this course for more than one semester must select a new theme or subject each semester. Credit can be given only for work that results in a satisfactory amount of writing. Emphasis is on the capacity to subject a body of related readings to analysis and criticism. Keep in mind that independent study cannot be used to fulfill the seminar requirement. The application form for independent study must be completed at the beginning of the semester in which the course is being taken.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1851, "title": "The American State", "code": "GOVT 6011", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Contemporary politics raise profound questions about the American past and how aspects of it have traveled across time and into the present, shaping US government and politics. This PhD-level seminar uses historical and institutional lenses to examine analytical questions about the origins and development of the American state as well as processes of political change. In Spring 2021, we will explore American political development with an eye toward understanding how threats to democracy have waxed and waned and combined over time, and the implications for the present. We will focus on topics such as political parties and polarization; conflict over belongs, with respect to race and gender; economic inequality; and executive aggrandizement. We will read some classic texts as well as new and recent ones.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1852, "title": "Advanced Regression Analysis", "code": "GOVT 6029", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course builds upon 6019, covering in detail the interpretation and estimation of multivariate linear regression models. We derive the Ordinary Least Squares estimator and its characteristics using matrix algebra and determine the conditions under which it achieves statistical optimality. We then consider the circumstances in social scientific contexts which commonly lead to assumption violations, and the detection and implications of these problems. This leads to modified regression estimators that can offer limited forms of robustness in some of these cases. Finally, we briefly introduce likelihood-based techniques that incorporate assumptions about the distribution of the response variable, focusing on logistic regression for binary dependent variables. Students are expected to produce a research paper built around a quantitative analysis that is suitable for presentation at a professional conference. Some time will be spent reviewing matrix algebra, and discussing ways to implement computations using statistical software.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1853, "title": "Comparative Method in International and Comparative Politics", "code": "GOVT 6053", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "An in-depth, graduate-level introduction to qualitative and comparative methods of political analysis, with special emphasis on the application of these methods in comparative and international politics. Through readings, discussions, and written assignments, students will explore strategies for concept formation, theory construction, and theory testing, using the craft and tools of comparative political analysis.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1854, "title": "Field Methods", "code": "GOVT 6109", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This graduate seminar introduces students to methods currently used by political scientists to develop and test for observable implications of theoretically-derived arguments using data collected away from their home institutions. Topics covered include the relationships between fieldwork and research design, case and site selection, ethnography and participant observation, interview methods, surveys and experiments in the context of field research, research ethics and human subjects, logistics of field research, grant-writing, safety protocols, and knowing when to come home. The course is designed primarily for students working on dissertation proposals or early stages of dissertation field research, but it may be helpful for students at other stages as well. A goal is to encourage students to specify a field research strategy that links testable hypotheses with methods of data gathering and analysis before commencing field work. Students, therefore, will develop their own research projects as the semester progresses, including writing actual grant proposals, IRB applications, and pre-analysis plans.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1855, "title": "Foundations of the Social Sciences", "code": "GOVT 6122", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Social science research almost always combines empirical observation (data), the construction of concepts (language), and the logical analysis of the relations between observations and concepts (statistics).\u00a0 This course examines the relations between these three dimensions as the analyst moves from one to the other both as practice and in the crafting of a formal summary of findings and argument. We will be particularly interested in the foundational assumptions that underpin the connections between empirical reality, language, and statistical analysis. While these foundational assumptions are often taken for granted by social scientists, they vary dramatically between social science disciplines.\u00a0 The implicit contradiction between that variance and their doxic acceptance within disciplines will be a primary focus of the course.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1856, "title": "Comparative Social Policy", "code": "GOVT 6223", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1857, "title": "The End of Regionalism?", "code": "GOVT 6254", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1858, "title": "Historical Analysis in Comparative Politics", "code": "GOVT 6304", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This is a graduate seminar in political science on the application of historical analysis in comparative politics. The goals of the course are for students to understand the contemporary application of historical analysis in comparative politics and to familiarize themselves with current scholarly standards of such research, and then to produce research that meets those standards. Students will read and analyze peer-reviewed research (or near published research) on this topic each week and write a final research paper.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1859, "title": "The Politics of Critical Theory", "code": "GOVT 6495", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "\"Critical theory\" is a mode of theory that aims not merely to understand the world as it is, but to place that understanding in the service of emancipation from domination. In this seminar, we will read works of critical theory from the eighteenth century to the present, some associated with the \"Frankfurt School\" but many not, which deal with such subjects as capitalism, authoritarianism, mass culture, enlightenment and reason, communication and violence, alienation and recognition, the domination of nature, European colonialism, white supremacy, and patriarchy; and we will ask how the practice of critical theory has been shaped by controversies (across generations, national contexts, intellectual and political orientations, and institutional settings) about what counts as \"critical.\"", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1860, "title": "HOPE: Human Odyssey to Political Existentialism", "code": "GOVT 6593", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "What sets us apart, and brings us together, as humans \u2013 and what are the socio-political implications? Seeking understanding, this course is an odyssey onto the human condition and its politics, honing together a new theoretical-empirical lens: political existentialism. As a philosophy, existentialism examines mortal man's search for meaning in a meaningless universe. Most philosophers ask, \"what is the good life?\" and answer: to feel good, or to be good, or to do good. Existentialism asks, \"what is life good for?\" and is still searching for answers. A host of fascinating quandaries emerge from this quest: Are we truly different than animals and machines? What does it mean to \"be yourself\"? What's the difference between freedom and liberty? Should we pursue happiness? Why do we yield to fear and anxiety? What are the roles of reflection, truth and morality in our society and politics? Is God dead, but religion alive? Can we defeat alienation? Is love all we need? How much can, and should, we hope for? In this course, utilizing edX HOPE online course, we will address these questions, and then some more. We shall examine, one by one, a dozen themes, on both the individual/universal level and the socio-political plane: Human/nature, identity & authenticity, freedom, reflection, happiness, death & dread, meaning, morality, truth & trust, God & religion, alienation & love, and finally \u2013 hope.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1861, "title": "Violence, Power, and Nonviolence", "code": "GOVT 6596", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course pursues a theoretical and comparative understanding of the relationship between violence and power. Beginning with an overview of disputes over the politics of 'naming' violence, we will examine a series of intersecting historical disputes about the nature, justification, and functions of political violence between a series of realist, Marxist, and pacifist\u00a0thinkers. Topics to be discussed will include the relationship between tactics and strategy, means and ends, the dynamics of political contention, revolution and mass politics, the relationship coercion and persuasion, and the power of nonviolence, as well\u00a0as revolutionary terror, general strikes, civil disobedience, hunger strikes, and political rioting. Thinkers studied may include Clausewitz, Tolstoy, Lenin, Luxemburg, Weber, Sorel, Gandhi, Trotsky, Niebuhr, Du Bois, Fanon, King, Arendt, and Deming.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1862, "title": "Democratic Theory", "code": "GOVT 6645", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "In contemporary political contexts \"democracy\" is often invoked as the very ground of political legitimacy.\u00a0There is very little agreement, however, on what democracy means or how it is best embodied in state institutions and law.\u00a0This seminar will introduce students to select debates in contemporary democratic theory over the normative meaning of democracy and the limitations of contemporary democratic practice.\u00a0Beginning with the work of Rousseau and ending with debates over \"radical democracy,\" we will explore the following themes:\u00a0How do democratic theorists and democratic actors negotiate the paradoxes of collective self-rule?\u00a0What is the relationship between liberalism and democracy? Do rights suspend democracy or establish its preconditions?\u00a0What are the best procedures for democratic decision-making?\u00a0How does democracy deal with difference?\u00a0Is democracy best understood as a form of government or a practice of resistance to domination?", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1863, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "GOVT 6745", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1864, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "GOVT 6846", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1865, "title": "International Political Economy", "code": "GOVT 6857", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Exploration into a range of contemporary theories and research topics in the field of international political economy. The seminar covers different theoretical perspectives and a number of substantive problems.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1866, "title": "China and Asian Security", "code": "GOVT 6877", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course focuses primarily on China's evolving role in both Asia and world politics. It does so based on the premise that what China does in Asia may not necessarily be the sole determinant of the type of security order that will prevail there, but, that it does have a profound influence on the region (and, potentially, on the global order as well). In other words, in order to gain an understanding of the state of security issues in Asia today the seminar attempts to come to terms with the evolving nature of China's foreign policy and national security strategies. The course then concentrates on the most influential academic work on China's foreign relations and national security policies that has been published since the end of the Cold War.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1867, "title": "Pleasure and Neoliberalism", "code": "GOVT 6945", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1868, "title": "Game Theory 1", "code": "GOVT 7073", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Game theory provides a scientific approach to the study of social, political, and economic interactions that focuses on the strategic aspects of decision-making between two or more individuals or groups. This course introduces students to the fundamentals of formal theory, as well as how to solve basic games frequently used in political science research. The first part of the course will focus on strategic coordination, games in normal and in extensive form, and Nash Equilibria. The second part of the course will cover repeated games and games where informational uncertainty plays a role. Each week will also focus on applications to political science and economics, which includes topics of legislative bargaining and veto players,\nelections and candidate selection, clientelism, as well as deterrence and international relations. Students will be expected to complete weekly problem sets, participate in class games and simulations, and complete an independent final paper.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1869, "title": "Proseminar in Peace Studies", "code": "GOVT 7937", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "The Proseminar in Peace Studies offers a multidisciplinary review of issues related to peace and conflict at the graduate level. The course is led by the director of the Judith Reppy Institute for Peace and Conflict Studies and is based on the Institute's weekly seminar series, featuring outside visitors and Cornell faculty.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1870, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "GOVT 7999", "subject": "GOVT", "descr": "Individualized readings and research for graduate students. Topics, readings, and writing requirements are designed through consultation between the student and the instructor. Graduate students in government who are looking to use this as an option to fulfill their course requirements should check with their chairs to be certain that the program of study is acceptable for this purpose. Applications must be completed and signed by the instructor and by the chairs of their special committees. They are available from, and must be returned to, the graduate assistant in 212 White Hall.", "tags": "GOVT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1871, "title": "Graduate-Level Research", "code": "GRAD 9010", "subject": "GRAD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "GRAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1872, "title": "Doctoral Dissertation Research", "code": "GRAD 9011", "subject": "GRAD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "GRAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1873, "title": "Master's Thesis Research", "code": "GRAD 9012", "subject": "GRAD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "GRAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1874, "title": "Elementary Ancient Greek II", "code": "GREEK 1102", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "Continuation of GREEK 1101, prepares students for GREEK 2101.", "tags": "GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1875, "title": "Homer", "code": "GREEK 2103", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "The study of selections from the Iliad and/or Odyssey in Greek, with a focus on Homeric grammar, dialect, meter, poetics and composition.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1876, "title": "Seminar in Greek", "code": "GREEK 3120", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "Undergraduate seminar in Greek. Topic: Fall, Aeschylus and Aristophanes; Spring, Lysias and Antiphon.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1877, "title": "Independent Study in Greek, Undergraduate Level", "code": "GREEK 3185", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "May be taken upon completion of one semester of work at the 3000-level. To be taken only in exceptional circumstances. Must be arranged by the student with his or her advisor and the faculty member who has agreed to direct the study. To be approved by the DUS.", "tags": "GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1878, "title": "Advanced Readings in Latin and Greek", "code": "GREEK 6112", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "The course will prepare students to read the texts that are on the Classics Reading List (https://classics.cornell.edu/phd#reading-lists).", "tags": "GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1879, "title": "Greek Philosophical Texts", "code": "GREEK 7161", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "Reading and translation of Greek Philosophical texts.", "tags": "GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1880, "title": "Graduate Seminar in Greek", "code": "GREEK 7172", "subject": "GREEK", "descr": "Topics for this course vary by instructor.", "tags": "GREEK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1881, "title": "Organizational Behavior and Leadership Skills", "code": "HADM 1150", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides students with the theoretical lenses and interpersonal skills required to become effective leaders of themselves and others at all organizational levels. With a particular emphasis on the hospitality industry, students develop an understanding and appreciation of the complexities of leading and managing individuals, teams and organizations, and acquire practical tools for accomplishing personal leadership and organizational goals within a service-based framework. Topics include understanding individual differences, leveraging conflict management, applying team-based problem-solving, understanding power and influence dynamics, principles of motivation, coaching and leadership, understanding of group process, and ethics.\u00a0 The course emphasizes practical application of all concepts to students' personal and professional lives and goals, with particular emphasis on work-life in hospitality and broadly, service contexts. Students learn through the use of case studies, self-assessments, experiential exercises, readings, discussions, papers, and group activities.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1882, "title": "Financial Accounting", "code": "HADM 1210", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "An introduction to financial accounting that studies transaction analysis, the balance sheet, income statement, statement of cash flows, and the statement of stockholder's equity. Accounting for investments, receivables, inventories, tangible and intangible assets, liabilities, long term bonds and capital stock transactions are studied. Basic financial ratios are introduced and interpreted. Ethical issues related to financial reporting are also discussed. Students who complete this course will have the pre-requisite knowledge to take HADM 2210\u00a0 Managerial Accounting and HADM 2220\u00a0Finance.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1883, "title": "Introduction to Hotel Operations", "code": "HADM 1350", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to the scope of the hotel industry and the organizational structure and operational mechanics of how the departments within the rooms division of an individual hotel operate. Understanding the scope of the industry involves understanding who the major players are and what market segments their brands serve. Students gain an understanding of how work is performed and how activities are coordinated within the rooms division and among other hotel departments. Completion of a rooms division practicum that exposes students to the housekeeping and front desk operations at the Statler Hotel is a required course activity. At the end of the course students will take the Certification in Hospitality Industry Analytics (CHIA) exam in hopes of achieving their CHIA. The certification is based upon content areas including hotel industry analytical foundations, hotel math fundamentals, property level benchmarking (STAR\u00a0Reports), and industry performance reports.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1884, "title": "Introduction to Foodservice Management", "code": "HADM 1360", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students are introduced to the principles of foodservice operations, beginning with an overview of the foodservice industry at large. Attention is initially focused on major industry segments, business practices, and trends. Subsequently, detailed consideration is given to the components of the foodservice system: marketing, menu planning, production, service, controls, and quality assurance. Product and systems differentiation in various industry segments are emphasized throughout the course. Completion of a work experience in the Statler Hotel is a required course activity.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1885, "title": "Microeconomics for the Service Industry", "code": "HADM 1410", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Introduces students to microeconomic principles and theories in the context of applications and solutions associated with the service industry with a focus on hospitality and travel. Topics include principles of production, supply and demand, firm behavior, costs, pricing, and topics specifically associated with the travel and hospitality industry. Course work includes readings, lectures, discussions, problem sets, and guest speakers.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1886, "title": "Business Writing for Hospitality Professionals", "code": "HADM 1650", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Introduces the role and importance of effective communication in managerial work, especially in the hospitality industry. Students develop abilities in analytical thinking and clear expression. With an emphasis on business writing, this course builds foundational skills for creating professional-level communications. Students plan, develop, and produce increasingly complex written communications and deliver oral presentations.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1887, "title": "Business Computing", "code": "HADM 1740", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Provides a foundation in information technology (IT) and how it relates to everyday business computing. Students learn IT concepts during lectures, and these concepts are reinforced in practical lab sessions using current standards of business computing. Topics include fundamental IT concepts; proficiency in Microsoft Office; understanding the issues of tool selection, standardization, and efficiency; integration of applications; and recognizing the importance of good computer management.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1888, "title": "Introduction to Management", "code": "HADM 1810", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the basic concepts and topics associated with managing and leading organizations, groups, and individuals.\u00a0 The traditional functions of management (planning, organizing, leading, and controlling) are discussed, with special attention paid to current workplace issues and developments, such as corporate social responsibility, ethics, and diversity.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1889, "title": "Distinguished Lectures in Hospitality Management", "code": "HADM 1910", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "The Dean's Distinguished Lecture Series is a long-standing School tradition that provides a unique opportunity for successful industry leaders to share their experiences with Cornell students. In its 92-year history, the Dean's Distinguished Lecture Series has hosted the most influential and accomplished leaders from every segment of the hospitality industry. Speakers share their views about successful management styles, possible career paths, critical industry-related issues, and qualities conducive to successful business leadership. Students have an unparalleled opportunity to learn and question how hospitality leaders view the current and future status of the industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1890, "title": "Hospitality Quantitative Analysis", "code": "HADM 2010", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This introductory statistics course is taught from the perspective of solving problems and making decisions within the hospitality industry. Students learn introductory probability, as well as how to gather data, evaluate the quality of data, graphically represent data, and apply some fundamental statistical methodologies. Statistical methods covered include: estimation and hypothesis testing relating to one- and two-sample problems of means, simple linear regression, and multiple regression. Excel is used as the statistical computing software and the class uses a very hands-on approach.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1891, "title": "Hotel Leadership Development Program", "code": "HADM 2170", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "The HLDP is a partnership among School faculty and Statler Hotel management, who together guide students and teach them how to become tomorrow's leaders. HADM 2170 is designed to assist you in obtaining a better understanding of the hotel's operations while developing your supervisory skills. As part of HLDP you will be managing your peers as well as individuals who have been in their jobs for many years, and both of these are challenging tasks. Our goal is to prepare you to become qualified and eligible for promotion to supervisor.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1892, "title": "Managerial Accounting", "code": "HADM 2210", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course focuses on the use of accounting information for management decision making and control in hospitality settings. Topics include costing objects, budgeting, financial decision making, cost behavior, and management control systems. There will be one common final exam at the end of the semester.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1893, "title": "Finance", "code": "HADM 2220", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to core ideas in finance as well as a foundation for further study.\u00a0 Upon completion of this course students should be able to (1) perform basic valuation of cash flows from projects, bonds, and stocks; (2) demonstrate basic understanding of capital budgeting decisions through the use of concepts including the time value of money and discounted cash flow analysis; (3) assess the relation between risk and return and integrate that knowledge in determining corporate cost of capital; and (4) demonstrate an understanding of the role of debt and equity in corporate capital structure.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1894, "title": "Financial Accounting Principles", "code": "HADM 2230", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This introduction to financial accounting covers the preparation of financial statements, from transactional analysis through journal entries to financial statement presentation. We will do in-depth analysis of receivables and payables, revenue and expenses, and major balance sheet items, such as inventory, investments, long term bonds, capital stock, and tangible and intangible assets. We will study preparation of the statement of cash flows using both the direct and indirect methods. Along the way we will introduce some of the concepts of financial statement analysis. We will also discuss ethics in accounting and business. Students will work in teams for some of the time. After successful completion of this course you will be prepared to take an intermediate accounting course.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1895, "title": "Finance", "code": "HADM 2250", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to core ideas in finance as well as a foundation for further study. Upon completion of this course students should be able to (1) perform basic valuation of cash flows from projects, bonds, and stocks; (2) demonstrate basic understanding of capital budgeting decisions through the use of concepts including the time value of money and discounted cash flow analysis; (3) assess the relation between risk and return and integrate that knowledge in determining corporate cost of capital; and (4) demonstrate an understanding of the role of debt and equity in corporate capital structure.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1896, "title": "Food Service Management, Theory and Practice", "code": "HADM 2360", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course introduces food and beverage operations management through four major components: fundamental food composition and properties; food products and preparation; food safety; and the application of management concepts to food and beverage operations. Students prepare recipes, menus, and production schedules; critically evaluate foods; and are involved in projects in which they create menus, develop and standardize recipes, and calculate yield percentages and food cost. Completion of a four-hour practicum experience in Establishment is a required course activity.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1897, "title": "Marketing Management for Services", "code": "HADM 2430", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students develop an understanding of marketing management for hospitality and related service organizations: the process through which organizations analyze, plan, implement, and control programs to develop and maintain beneficial exchanges with target buyers. Students learn about marketing management through a mix of readings, lectures, class discussions, individual and group exercises, industry guest speakers, and exams.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1898, "title": "Hospitality Development and Planning", "code": "HADM 2550", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students are introduced to the issues and opportunities inherent in the development and planning of hospitality facilities, specifically hotels and restaurants. Course components include the project development sequence, conceptual and space planning, architectural design criteria, construction management, and the interpretation of architectural design and consultant drawings. There is an emphasis on setting appropriate facilities requirements, understanding industry practice, and implementing properties decisions within a balanced design, operations, and financial framework.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1899, "title": "Information Retrieval and Research Methods", "code": "HADM 2720", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course introduces the tools necessary to locate, evaluate, and analyze information available online.\u00a0 Students will recognize that authority online is constructed and contextual, as well as the ethical, legal, and economic implications of information.\u00a0 In addition to gaining information management skills, students will enhance their ability to think critically and write professionally.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1900, "title": "Business Computing", "code": "HADM 2740", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Provides a foundation in information technology (IT) and how it relates to everyday business computing. Students learn IT concepts during lectures, and these concepts are reinforced in practical lab sessions using current standards of business computing. Topics include fundamental IT concepts; proficiency in Microsoft Office; understanding the issues of tool selection, standardization, and efficiency; integration of applications; and recognizing the importance of good computer management.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1901, "title": "Human Resources Management", "code": "HADM 2810", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Facilitates an understanding of the policies, procedures, and systems required to attract, select, develop, and retain quality employees. Students learn about the major environmental factors that affect the HR function, including legislation, economics, and demographics. The course emphasizes HR issues and challenges that are particularly relevant to the hospitality industry. Instruction is based on lecture, discussion, and experiential activities, as well as case analysis and project work.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1902, "title": "Service Operations Management", "code": "HADM 3010", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Operations management is the study of how things work. In this class, we will discuss how operations management can be used to help a hospitality company compete. After completing this course, you will: (1) understand core concepts, models and managerial issues in service operations management, (2) critically assess the performance of service delivery processes, (3) learn how to manage supply and demand, (4) learn how to manage quality, (5) develop proficiency in a range of quantitative and qualitative techniques necessary for hospitality service organizations, (6) learn how to manage a project, and (7) apply the concepts and techniques learned in class to the analysis of real-world service delivery processes.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1903, "title": "Hospitality, Health and Design Industry Immersion Seminar", "code": "HADM 3055", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides students the opportunity to learn directly from invited industry speakers with expertise in a spectrum of industries that link health, wellness, senior living with hospitality and design thinking.\u00a0 The speakers share their views on business, managerial, career, and other critical industry-related issues.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1904, "title": "Principles of Hospitality Real Estate", "code": "HADM 3210", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course emphasizes practical valuation and decision-making skills. You will receive an introduction to the business of hospitality and commercial real estate, including content on the major roles, activities and players, terminology, and how the relevant financial tools, institutional concepts, and economic models are used for sound investment decision-making.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1905, "title": "Introduction to Investments", "code": "HADM 3230", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to theoretical concepts and practical applications related to areas of investment analysis.\u00a0 Upon completion, students should be able to (1) understand different security types and investment processes in major financial markets; (2) perform bond and stock valuation, understand basic theories and practices of bond and stock portfolio management; (3) analyze options, futures and other financial derivatives, and understand their usage for risk management; (4) understand risk-neutral valuation and implement the approach in the binomial option pricing model; and (5) understand performance evaluation methods and assess the performance of passively and actively managed funds.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1906, "title": "Intermediate Corporate Finance", "code": "HADM 3235", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course covers capital budgeting, firm valuation, capital structure and payout policies by focusing on real-life problems faced by the hospitality industry. We will (1) evaluate projects; (2) analyze financial statements and develop pro-formas; (3) understand how investment and financing decisions impact firm value; (4) develop complex spreadsheet models.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1907, "title": "Restaurant Management", "code": "HADM 3350", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students synthesize foodservice concepts, business principles, and hospitality-management theories and apply them in a restaurant setting. The course covers issues and principles relevant to the restaurant industry, including market analysis, menu and service systems, and restaurant metrics. Students manage a restaurant open to the public and evaluate the process and outcomes. Students must complete TiPS and ServSafe certification for successful completion of the course.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1908, "title": "Foodservice Management Essentials", "code": "HADM 3365", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course in an introduction to the principles of foodservice operations management, beginning with an overview of the foodservice industry at large.\u00a0 We first focus on major industry segments, business practices, and trends.\u00a0 More consideration is subsequently given to the components of the foodservice system: creating useful financial statements, elements/use of a business plan, marketing, menu design/planning, facilities/production, human resource issues, purchasing/controls, and quality assurance.\u00a0 This fundamental understanding of operations and basic managerial responsibilities will set the stage for further exploration of these issues in subsequent SHA courses.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1909, "title": "Marketing Research", "code": "HADM 3430", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course helps students become better consumers of marketing research. Topics include issues involved in designing, conducting, and interpreting focus groups, depth interviews, surveys, and experiments. Special emphasis is placed on what each method should and should not be used for and why.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1910, "title": "Consumer Behavior", "code": "HADM 3470", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Helps students become better at understanding, predicting, and influencing consumer behavior. Topics include motivation, perception, learning, decision making, attitudes, persuasion, compliance, geodemographics, and psychographics. The practical implications of psychological principles are emphasized. Specific applications involve such areas as guest frequency programs, menu design, promotional strategy, personal selling, sales and marketing planning, and marketing research. Class time is used for discussions and application exercises as well as for the presentation of relevant information.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1911, "title": "Hospitality Facilities Design", "code": "HADM 3510", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This intensive studio course provides the graphic skills necessary for design and experience in applying these skills in hospitality planning and design.\u00a0 Using hand drafting skills learned in class, students prepare design projects including design of guest rooms, guest room floors and public space and back-of-house functions.\u00a0 In addition to studio critiques, the course includes in-class discussions of site analysis, target markets, architectural choices and the use of inspirational precedents.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1912, "title": "Hospitality Facilities Management", "code": "HADM 3550", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an overview of the operation of hospitality facilities, including operating costs for various types of facilities, types and characteristics of major building systems, sustainable aspects of building equipment and management, and the responsibilities of the engineering maintenance department. The renovation needs and key managerial aspects of hospitality facility renovation projects are examined.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1913, "title": "Persuasive Business Communication for Hospitality Leaders", "code": "HADM 3650", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Develops the knowledge and skills that hospitality managers need to face an array of persuasive communication challenges. This course builds on the principles of effective managerial communication (HADM 1650)\u00a0and organizational behavior and interpersonal skills\u00a0(HADM 1150). The course introduces the theory and principles of persuasion and focuses on their application in a range of management and leadership contexts.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1914, "title": "Fundamentals of Database Management and Data Analysis", "code": "HADM 3740", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Prepares students to create and manage information in a knowledge-based organization. Students learn to design and use database tools\u00a0 to perform analyses and to make decisions in today's information-rich business environment. The course provides both theoretical and practical perspectives of database design and administration, with a focus on application. To manage this balance, students first gain a foundation of database concepts from lecture and course readings, and subsequently apply these fundamentals through various projects and assignments. Topics include information and information management in organizations; fundamentals of relational database design and implementation; writing and running SQL queries; working in database design teams and as individual research analysts; database design and management using Microsoft Access; database normalization; data-driven decision making; conversion of data into information and knowledge that can be leveraged to achieve business objectives; the role of data and information management in contemporary society; and data management opportunities in the hospitality industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1915, "title": "Business and Hospitality Law", "code": "HADM 3870", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Provides students with an integrated presentation of employment discrimination, tort, and contract concepts as they apply to the legal aspects of hospitality management. Students examine relevant federal and state cases and statutes. The overall objective is to enable students to recognize, analyze, and evaluate legal issues for the purpose of making and articulating appropriate decisions in the workplace.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1916, "title": "Law for Hotel Owners and Operators", "code": "HADM 3880", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students interested in hotel operations, asset management, or real estate should take this course because it will examine three critical areas of the law as it relates to hotel owners and operators, including hotel management agreement disputes, franchise law, and managing legal risk to third parties.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1917, "title": "Operations Analysis and New Business Models", "code": "HADM 4015", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "New operating models (new ways of doing things) are disrupting the hospitality sector and beyond (think: AirBnB, delivery-only restaurants, focused hospitals, food-delivery startups, etc.). This course builds and uses operations management tools to understand these new models. In a course project, students use this understanding to identify new business opportunities.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1918, "title": "Hospitality Management Seminar", "code": "HADM 4100", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "HADM 4100 complements HADM 1910\u00a0by providing students with an extraordinary opportunity to interact with leaders in the hospitality industry in a limited-enrollment seminar. Students and guest speakers participate in roundtable discussions to gain a better understanding of industry trends, challenges, and opportunities.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1919, "title": "Entrepreneurial Management", "code": "HADM 4130", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course addresses the issues faced by managers who wish to take a nascent idea and turn it into a viable organization that creates value, and empowers students to develop their own approaches, guidelines, and skills for being entrepreneurial managers.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1920, "title": "Innovation and Corporate Renewal", "code": "HADM 4140", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Innovation is increasingly the source of sustainable competitive advantage for firms around the world. However, building an organization to successfully and repeatedly bring innovations to market has proven to be a challenge for many companies. This course explores the practices and processes that managers use to manage innovation effectively. This course also explores four aspects of innovation: exploring, executing, leveraging and renewing innovation.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1921, "title": "Business Model Innovation and Design", "code": "HADM 4145", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "The movement towards a service-based economy has coincided with a fundamental shift in technology and manufacturing ventures to a business model and plan in which the value proposition and customer experience has become central. As a result, the service component of products, based on the value they provide to consumers, has become dominant. Additionally, business modeling for service-based businesses is inherently different from for product or technology ventures. Students interested in starting service-based companies as well as those interested in developing service-based business models for technology and new product startups will find this course relevant and useful. This is an experientially based course. Students will be engaged in the process of business model and business plan development throughout the semester.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1922, "title": "Key Drivers for Making Innovation Happen", "code": "HADM 4190", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Successful innovators are able to rethink, reimagine, and grow.\u00a0 In this hands-on course, students will learn how to develop a perspectives mindset and how to take innovation from conception to creation. By interacting directly with high-level executives in the hospitality industry, government officials, technologists, investors, designers, and other interesting people, students will gain practical skills while creating meaningful relationships and adding value to organizations and stakeholders. By the end of the course, students will better recognize their role in a variety of group settings, have created productive real-world solutions, and know the ways to execute on their future roadmaps.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1923, "title": "Principles of Real Estate", "code": "HADM 4200", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This introduction to real estate finance and investment emphasizes developing valuation and decision-making skills. It introduces students to the business of real estate, including major roles, activities and players, terminology, and how the relevant financial tools, institutional concepts, and economic models are used in for sound investment decision-making in real estate.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1924, "title": "Real Estate Financial Modeling", "code": "HADM 4205", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course covers the basic financial models and frameworks used throughout the real estate industry today. In this introductory course, students will focus exclusively on a rigorous cash flow construction and scenario analysis to include the impact of deterministic inputs in ex-ante decision making. The course covers extensively the modeling of simple lease structures (for different property types), conventional and exotic debt instruments and simple equity waterfalls.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1925, "title": "Real Estate Development", "code": "HADM 4255", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an in-depth analysis of the concepts and paradigms that are most often encountered in real estate development. The course is designed to provide an overview of the real estate development process with an emphasis on analysis, risk management, and decision-making relative to changing economic, environmental, institutional, regulatory, and social contexts. Topics discussed include, but are not limited to, market analysis, site acquisition, due diligence, zoning entitlements, approvals, site planning, building design, construction, financing, leasing, ongoing management, and disposition.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1926, "title": "Real Estate Finance and Investments", "code": "HADM 4280", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course promotes sound real estate investment and finance decision making through\u00a0the use of advanced theory and techniques in financial economics. Real estate investment decisions are made\u00a0from applications of an extended version of the after-tax discounted cash flow model and other valuation models, including option pricing and regression models. Financing decisions are made using the techniques of modern financial analysis. A wide array of equity and debt financing options are considered including partnership agreements and commercial mortgages. Securitization of equity and debt claims to real estate also are covered. All types of income-producing residential and nonresidential real estate are analyzed, including hospitality properties.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1927, "title": "Introduction to Wines", "code": "HADM 4300", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Due to COVID-19 and the risk associated with removing one's mask for tasting, this class will be offered online for Fall 2020 and Spring 2021. Students will be introduced to the major wine-producing regions of the world. The course focuses on understanding the terms on a wine label, discussing aromas and flavors and connecting flavors to the growing and productions factors that influence them. Food and wine pairing, wine etiquette and responsible consumption are also topics. This forms the basis for what a consumer needs to know to confidently navigate a wine list and to make sound purchase decisions in retail wine shops or online.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1928, "title": "Wine and Food Pairing Principles and Promotion", "code": "HADM 4310", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Focuses on the pairing and creative marketing of wine and food. Students develop an understanding of regional and varietal wine styles, how food flavors can change a wine's flavor, and the promotion of wine and food. Topics include wine and food pairing principles, cuisines and their flavor components, food trends in restaurants and in the home, special event planning, and wine-list development. Students design and present wine and food tastings to industry guests.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1929, "title": "Nonprofit Social Enterprise and Food Justice", "code": "HADM 4315", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course will provide an overview of nonprofit food service management through service-learning, with a focus food systems, social ventures and economic policies.\u00a0Key objectives include identifying management best practices for leading nonprofit food service organizations, including strategy, managing employees/volunteers, fundraising, grant proposal writing, board governance, and marketing and social media. Through lectures, class discussions, case study analysis, research, community service work, and a service learning final project working in collaboration with HADM 4340, students will explore the economic, social, and political issues of combating poverty and hunger in the United States. The focus of the course will be on nonprofit food service organizations designed to combat hunger in our communities such as food banks, soup kitchens and shelters, and community outreach programs, and school feeding program.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1930, "title": "Contemporary Healthy Foods", "code": "HADM 4320", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course builds awareness among foodservice professionals regarding nutrition, sustainability, food policy, food ethics, and food insecurity. Sophisticated consumers embrace environmental health, are concerned about where their food comes from and how it impacts the environment along with food service and farmworkers. In-depth discussions will focus on topics including: food waste, sustainable farming and harvesting, consumer health needs, purchasing and sourcing, preparation, advertising, marketing, merchandising, and food insecurity, food policy, and food politics and ethics.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1931, "title": "Selection, Procurement, and Supply Chain Management", "code": "HADM 4350", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course deals with contemporary management issues related to procurement activities within the hospitality industry. Focus is on both the food distribution industry and the hospitality industry so that students understand the role the distributor plays in the movement of food and supplies from the producer to the hospitality operator and how the creation of distribution partnerships serves to improve efficiency and reduce costs. Topics include distribution channels and intermediaries in the supply chain, food distributor financial statement analysis, evaluation and selection of suppliers, development of buying strategies, influence of economic and environmental factors on supply, purchase timing and inventory management, the emerging role of the Internet, and e-procurement service providers.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1932, "title": "Beverage Management", "code": "HADM 4360", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Designed for students who intend to pursue a career in food and beverage management. Course work deals specifically with the management of beverage operations. Topics for discussion include tracking beverage trends; risk-liability management; staff training and responsible customer service; wine and spirits list development; beverage pricing; food and wine pairings; the beverage industry structure and beverage alcohol regulations; purchasing, storage, and service; major beverage categories; cost controls and loss prevention; and creative beverage merchandising.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1933, "title": "Introduction to Fermented Grains, Hard Ciders, and Sake", "code": "HADM 4375", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "The course will introduce students to fermented grain beverages and ciders from around the world. The class will explore basic production methods of the products. Demonstration of the proper way to examine the different products will be done through lecture and tastings.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1934, "title": "Strategic Management", "code": "HADM 4410", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Strategic management integrates all of student's previous courses, including marketing, finance, accounting, operations, etc., and introduces them to new strategic management concepts. The course examines the total enterprise, the industry, and the competitive environment in which it operates. The goal is to develop a mastery of the analytical tools to perform analyses of the industry and competitors. The course focuses on how firms formulate, implement, and evaluate strategies. Using a case-based approach, the course emphasizes critical thinking and decision making to maintain competitive advantage in a hypercompetitive and maturing industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1935, "title": "Introduction to the Global Leisure Cruise Industry", "code": "HADM 4425", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course immerses students in the global leisure cruise industry\u2014the economics, markets, and organizations that comprise the fastest-growing sector of the hospitality industry. The course features industry executives from a leading cruise company, Royal Caribbean Cruises, Ltd., who describe current practice in cruise finance, pricing, ship design, marketing, distribution, operations, and human resources management. Students conduct individual and team analyses that examine opportunities and challenges across the cruise industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1936, "title": "Wine Marketing", "code": "HADM 4430", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Study of wine marketing and sales on a global scale. Strategic issues involving branding, research, positioning for different consumer segments applicable to both large and small scale producers. Development of a marketing case in the wine industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1937, "title": "Advanced Topics in Strategic Management", "code": "HADM 4432", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1938, "title": "Luxury Marketing", "code": "HADM 4435", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Luxury Marketing is a new course designed to help students gain a thorough understanding of luxury service management and the specific challenges of marketing to luxury consumers. Marketing luxury services requires specific principles to enhance and preserve the image of finest quality, exclusiveness, and hedonic value. This course is designed to sharpen student knowledge in marketing by contrasting traditional versus luxury-specific marketing principles within the service sector. This 14-session course is structured around a mix of cases, company projects and guest lectures from industry professionals, and designed to provide real-world learning opportunities and exposure3 to various luxury sectors.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1939, "title": "Sustainable Development", "code": "HADM 4500", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "An advanced, experiential learning course in which students are primarily tasked to work directly with hospitality companies to solve real sustainability-related issues in the marketplace. Projects are related to the greening of current operations (operational), the refurbishment of existing assets and properties (brownfield), and the establishment of new businesses (Greenfield). The goal is to help students develop and refine critical analysis and decision-making skills related to hospitality management and sustainability through hands-on learning experiences. Short weekend practicum trip required.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1940, "title": "Hospitality Visioning and Concept Design", "code": "HADM 4515", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course is an interdisciplinary course where one can apply what they have learned in hospitality development & design, marketing, real estate and operations, to envision a hotel concept, or brand story, and fully develop it with a team to understand how this concept informs site selection, program, design, and operational procedures.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1941, "title": "Foodservice Facilities Design", "code": "HADM 4530", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course introduces the basic concepts of foodservice facilities design and planning with an emphasis on restaurant kitchens. This course emphasizes general practices among foodservice facilities designers, including program development, product and workflow, equipment selection, architectural and engineering considerations, and project management. A brief introduction to computer-aided design software will be provided. Students will learn to conceptualize, plan, and create a design for a medium-size restaurant kitchen and front-of-house service areas.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1942, "title": "Visual Basic for Applications: End-User Programming", "code": "HADM 4760", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This is an introductory programming course for end-users (e.g., business managers and consultants). Students develop fluency in the popular Visual Basic for Applications (VBA) language. Using VBA, students learn how to customize and extend the Microsoft Office Suite, with an emphasis on Excel. They also develop custom information systems using Microsoft Office applications as programmable building blocks. Secondary objectives of the course are to cover fundamental design and programming principles. The course is entirely lab-based.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1943, "title": "Advanced Business Modeling", "code": "HADM 4770", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Focuses on organizational systems, planning, and the decision process and how information is used for decision support in organizations. Students are provided with practical skills in developing spreadsheet computer models using Microsoft Excel. Topics include business planning and forecasting, numerical methods, advanced formulas and functions, user-interface design, data protection and validation, importing external data, and output presentation.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1944, "title": "Law for Entrepreneurs", "code": "HADM 4800", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "An analysis of key legal issues that a startup or growing business must address, including: (i) choosing type of business entity, (ii) proper establishment and utilization of corporate boards of directors, (iii) sources of capital and understanding capitalization structures (common stock, preferred stock, warrants, etc.) (iv) use of stock options as employee incentives, (v) protecting confidential information and inventions, (vi) fundamental employment practices, (vii) negotiating relationships with landlords, distributors, resellers and customers; and (viii) secured transactions and basic debtor-creditor law.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1945, "title": "Real Estate Law", "code": "HADM 4870", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides students with an understanding of the legal issues surrounding the ownership, transfer, and use and development of real estate. Students will learn to recognize and evaluate legal issues in order to inform the decision-making process with respect to real estate, whether as a business executive, an entrepreneur, or in personal life.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1946, "title": "Hotel Ezra Cornell (H.E.C.)", "code": "HADM 4910", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "For 90-plus years, Hotel Ezra Cornell has been an essential part of the Cornell Hotel School, allowing students the opportunity to put theory into practice while taking on the leadership responsibility for this student-run hospitality showcase.\u00a0 Through participation on the Board of Directors, students practice the complexities of leading and managing individuals, teams and the organization as well as growing their leadership skills through experiential learning. Critical course outcomes include applying fundamental business principles to plan, organize, staff, direct, and financially control the weekend-long HEC\u00a0conference; leading a diverse team of students and volunteers through understanding individual differences, leveraging conflict management and applying team-based problem-solving techniques; preparing and presenting professional-quality written and oral communications; and critically assessing personal strengths and development needs through the experiential learning process.\u00a0Board members receive credit for their participation in HEC: Students earn 3 credits toward HADM electives. Any additional credits will be applied to free electives.\u00a0Students interested in running for board positions in the spring must be in good academic standing with a minimum GPA of 2.5. Eligibility requirements for specific board positions can be obtained from the HEC Office (G75 Statler Hall) and will be distributed to the student body after the previous years' conference. Students interested in a board position are encouraged to discuss their intentions with the HEC course instructor", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1947, "title": "Hospitality Industry Practicum", "code": "HADM 4960", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1948, "title": "Distinction in Research Course I", "code": "HADM 4970", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1949, "title": "Special Studies Project II", "code": "HADM 4980", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students have the option of conducting a special studies project in any academic area of the School of Hotel Administration. Projects are conducted under the direction of a SHA faculty member, and regular, frequent consultations are mandatory.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1950, "title": "Special Studies Project I", "code": "HADM 4990", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Students have the option of conducting a special studies project in any academic area of the School of Hotel Administration. Projects are conducted under the direction of a SHA faculty member, and regular, frequent consultations are mandatory.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1951, "title": "Operations Analysis and New Business Models", "code": "HADM 6015", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "New operating models (new ways of doing things) are disrupting the hospitality sector and beyond (think: AirBnB, delivery-only restaurants, focused hospitals, food-delivery startups, etc.). This course builds and uses operations management tools to understand these new models. In a course project, students use this understanding to identify new business opportunities.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1952, "title": "Hospitality, Health and Design Industry Immersion Seminar", "code": "HADM 6055", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides students the opportunity to learn directly from invited industry speakers with expertise in a spectrum of industries that link health, wellness, senior living with hospitality and design thinking.\u00a0 The speakers share their views on business, managerial, career, and other critical industry-related issues.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1953, "title": "MMH Distinguished Lectures (DDLS)", "code": "HADM 6100", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "HADM 6100 is a required master's-level course that provides a unique opportunity for successful industry leaders to share their experiences with M.M.H. students in a small group setting. Speakers will share their views about the successful skill sets, temperaments, and leadership styles needed to be an effective and valuable executive. They will also focus on critical industry-related issues. The speakers are chosen for their knowledge, experience, and proven success in the hospitality industry. Students in HADM 6100 have an unparalleled opportunity to learn how hospitality executives view the current and future status of the industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1954, "title": "Entrepreneurial Management", "code": "HADM 6130", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course addresses the issues faced by managers who wish to take a nascent idea and turn it into a viable organization that creates value, and empowers students to develop their own approaches, guidelines, and skills for being entrepreneurial managers.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1955, "title": "Innovation and Corporate Renewal", "code": "HADM 6140", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Innovation is increasingly the source of sustainable competitive advantage for firms around the world. However, building an organization to successfully and repeatedly bring innovations to market has proven to be a challenge for many companies. This course explores the practices and processes that managers use to manage innovation effectively. This course also explores four aspects of innovation: exploring, executing, leveraging and renewing innovation.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1956, "title": "Business Model Innovation and Design", "code": "HADM 6145", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "The movement towards a service-based economy has coincided with a fundamental shift in technology and manufacturing ventures to a business model and plan in which the value proposition and customer experience has become central. As a result, the service component of products, based on the value they provide to consumers, has become dominant. Additionally, business modeling for service-based businesses is inherently different from for product or technology ventures. Students interested in starting service-based companies as well as those interested in developing service-based business models for technology and new product startups will find this course relevant and useful. This is an experientially based course. Students will be engaged in the process of business model and business plan development throughout the semester.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1957, "title": "Key Drivers for Making Innovation Happen", "code": "HADM 6190", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Successful innovators are able to rethink, reimagine, and grow.\u00a0 In this hands-on course, students will learn how to develop a perspectives mindset and how to take innovation from conception to creation. By interacting directly with high-level executives in the hospitality industry, government officials, technologists, investors, designers, and other interesting people, students will gain practical skills while creating meaningful relationships and adding value to organizations and stakeholders. By the end of the course, students will better recognize their role in a variety of group settings, have created productive real-world solutions, and know the ways to execute on their future roadmaps.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1958, "title": "Principles of Real Estate", "code": "HADM 6200", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This introduction to real estate finance and investment emphasizes developing valuation and decision-making skills. It introduces students to the business of real estate, both residential and commercial real estate, including roles, activities and players, terminology, and how the tools, concepts, and models in real estate are used in decision making. The objectives of this course are twofold: (1) to help students develop an understanding of real estate fundamentals, and (2) to introduce students to the quantitative aspects of real estate-investment decision making, valuation under uncertainty, and mortgage financing.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1959, "title": "Real Estate Financial Modeling", "code": "HADM 6205", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course covers the basic financial models and frameworks used throughout the real estate industry today. In this introductory course, students will focus exclusively on a rigorous cash flow construction and scenario analysis to include the impact of deterministic inputs in ex-ante decision making. The course covers extensively the modeling of simple lease structures (for different property types), conventional and exotic debt instruments and simple equity waterfalls.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1960, "title": "Intermediate Corporate Finance", "code": "HADM 6235", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course covers capital budgeting, firm valuation, capital structure and payout policies by focusing on real-life problems faced by the hospitality industry. We will (1) evaluate projects; (2) analyze financial statements and develop pro-formas; (3) understand how investment and financing decisions impact firm value; (4) develop complex spreadsheet models.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1961, "title": "Analysis of Financial Statements", "code": "HADM 6240", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course is designed to provide a deeper understanding of the financial statements and related disclosures to interpret and assess a company's performance.\u00a0 The course will focus on analyzing companies in the hospitality industry to gain a deeper understanding of the industry from a financial perspective, and to develop the ability to interpret financial data to make informed credit and investment decisions.\u00a0 \u00a0This will include a review of the recognition and measurement concepts, the choices managers make among alternative accounting methods, and the use of estimates in preparing the financial statements.\u00a0 Cases will be the primary focus of class discussion and the work in this course.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1962, "title": "Real Estate Development", "code": "HADM 6255", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides an in-depth analysis of the concepts and paradigms that are most often encountered in real estate development. The course is designed to provide an overview of the real estate development process with an emphasis on analysis, risk management, and decision-making relative to changing economic, environmental, institutional, regulatory, and social contexts. Topics discussed include, but are not limited to, market analysis, site acquisition, due diligence, zoning entitlements, approvals, site planning, building design, construction, financing, leasing, ongoing management, and disposition.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1963, "title": "Real Estate Finance and Investments", "code": "HADM 6280", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course promotes sound real estate investment and finance decision making through\u00a0the use of advanced theory and techniques in financial economics. Real estate investment decisions are made\u00a0from applications of an extended version of the after-tax discounted cash flow model and other valuation models, including option pricing and regression models. Financing decisions are made using the techniques of modern financial analysis. A wide array of equity and debt financing options are considered including partnership agreements and commercial mortgages. Securitization of equity and debt claims to real estate also are covered. All types of income-producing residential and nonresidential real estate are analyzed, including hospitality properties.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1964, "title": "Selection, Procurement and Supply Chain Management", "code": "HADM 6350", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course deals with contemporary management issues related to procurement activities within the hospitality industry. Focus is on both the food distribution industry and the hospitality industry so that students understand the role the distributor plays in the movement of food and supplies from the producer to the hospitality operator and how the creation of distribution partnerships serves to improve efficiency and reduce costs. Topics include distribution channels and intermediaries in the supply chain, food distributor financial statement analysis, evaluation and selection of suppliers, development of buying strategies, influence of economic and environmental factors on supply, purchase timing and inventory management, the emerging role of the Internet, and e-procurement service providers.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1965, "title": "Wine Marketing", "code": "HADM 6430", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Study of wine marketing and sales on a global scale. Strategic issues involving branding, research, positioning for different consumer segments applicable to both large and small scale producers. Development of a marketing case in the wine industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1966, "title": "Advanced Topics in Strategic Management", "code": "HADM 6432", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1967, "title": "Luxury Marketing", "code": "HADM 6435", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Luxury Marketing is a new course designed to help students gain a thorough understanding of luxury service management and the specific challenges of marketing to luxury consumers. Marketing luxury services requires specific principles to enhance and preserve the image of finest quality, exclusiveness, and hedonic value. This course is designed to sharpen student knowledge in marketing by contrasting traditional versus luxury-specific marketing principles within the service sector. This 14-session course is structured around a mix of cases, company projects and guest lectures from industry professionals, and designed to provide real-world learning opportunities and exposure3 to various luxury sectors.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1968, "title": "Consumer Behavior", "code": "HADM 6470", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Helps students become better at understanding, predicting, and influencing consumer behavior. Topics include motivation, perception, learning, decision making, attitudes, persuasion, compliance, geodemographics, and psychographics. The practical implications of psychological principles are emphasized. Specific applications involve such areas as guest frequency programs, menu design, promotional strategy, personal selling, sales and marketing planning, and marketing research. Class time is used for discussions and application exercises as well as for the presentation of relevant information.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1969, "title": "Sustainable Development", "code": "HADM 6500", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "An advanced, experiential learning course in which students are primarily tasked to work directly with hospitality companies to solve real sustainability-related issues in the marketplace. Projects are related to the greening of current operations (operational), the refurbishment of existing assets and properties (brownfield), and the establishment of new businesses (Greenfield). The goal is to help students develop and refine critical analysis and decision-making skills related to hospitality management and sustainability through hands-on learning experiences. Short weekend practicum trip required.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1970, "title": "Hospitality Visioning and Concept Design", "code": "HADM 6515", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course is an interdisciplinary course where one can apply what they have learned in hospitality development & design, marketing, real estate and operations, to envision a hotel concept, or brand story, and fully develop it with a team to understand how this concept informs site selection, program, design, and operational procedures.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1971, "title": "Fundamentals of Database Management and Data Analysis", "code": "HADM 6740", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Prepares students to create and manage information in a knowledge-based organization. Students learn to design and use database tools\u00a0 to perform analyses and to make decisions in today's information-rich business environment. The course provides both theoretical and practical perspectives of database design and administration, with a focus on application. To manage this balance, students first gain a foundation of database concepts from lecture and course readings, and subsequently apply these fundamentals through various projects and assignments. Topics include information and information management in organizations; fundamentals of relational database design and implementation; writing and running SQL queries; working in database design teams and as individual research analysts; database design and management using Microsoft Access; database normalization; data-driven decision making; conversion of data into information and knowledge that can be leveraged to achieve business objectives; the role of data and information management in contemporary society; and data management opportunities in the hospitality industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1972, "title": "Advanced Business Modeling", "code": "HADM 6770", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Focuses on organizational systems, planning, and the decision process and how information is used for decision support in organizations. Students are provided with practical skills in developing spreadsheet computer models using Microsoft Excel. Topics include business planning and forecasting, numerical methods, advanced formulas and functions, user-interface design, data protection and validation, importing external data, and output presentation.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1973, "title": "Law for Entrepreneurs", "code": "HADM 6800", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "An analysis of key legal issues that a startup or growing business must address, including: (i) choosing type of business entity, (ii) proper establishment and utilization of corporate boards of directors, (iii) sources of capital and understanding capitalization structures (common stock, preferred stock, warrants, etc.) (iv) use of stock options as employee incentives, (v) protecting confidential information and inventions, (vi) fundamental employment practices, (vii) negotiating relationships with landlords, distributors, resellers and customers; and (viii) secured transactions and basic debtor-creditor law.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1974, "title": "Real Estate Law", "code": "HADM 6870", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course provides students with an understanding of the legal issues surrounding the ownership, transfer, and use and development of real estate. Students will learn to recognize and evaluate legal issues in order to inform the decision-making process with respect to real estate, whether as a business executive, an entrepreneur, or in personal life.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1975, "title": "Hospitality Industry Practicum", "code": "HADM 6960", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1976, "title": "Graduate Special Studies Project II", "code": "HADM 6980", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Each student must have in mind a project and obtain agreement from an individual faculty member to oversee and direct the study. Written permission is required before course enrollment. Permission forms are available in the Office of Student Services, 180 Statler Hall.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1977, "title": "Graduate Special Studies Project I", "code": "HADM 6990", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Each student must have in mind a project and obtain agreement from an individual faculty member to oversee and direct the study. Written permission is required before course enrollment. Permission forms are available in the Office of Student Services, 180 Statler Hall.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1978, "title": "Managerial Accounting", "code": "HADM 7240", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This introduction to managerial accounting, which is the use of accounting information for decision making and control, covers cost behavior, cost classification, cost-volume-profit analysis, product costing, budgeting, variance analysis, cost estimation, cost allocations, customer-profitability analysis, managerial control systems, and performance measurement.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1979, "title": "Leadership and Ethics I", "code": "HADM 7271", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This two-part course is designed to offer descriptive and prescriptive knowledge about management, leadership, and ethics in organizations.\u00a0 Selected issues, themes, cases, readings, and exercises\u00a0will be relevant and applicable to working in the hospitality industry.\u00a0 Together, both courses will give students\u00a0more insight into the following:", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1980, "title": "Leadership and Ethics II", "code": "HADM 7272", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This two-part course is designed to offer descriptive and prescriptive knowledge about management, leadership, and ethics in organizations.\u00a0 Selected issues, themes, cases, readings, and exercises\u00a0will be relevant and applicable to working in the hospitality industry.\u00a0 Together, both courses will give students\u00a0more insight into the following:", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1981, "title": "Properties Development and Planning", "code": "HADM 7510", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "This course serves as an overview of hospitality project development and planning from the perspective of an owner and manager. Students learn about the role of the development team, feasibility studies, space programming, construction and renovation management, and functional and design criteria for hotels and restaurants. Teams will prepare program documentation for a new lodging property or concept.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1982, "title": "Management Communication", "code": "HADM 7610", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Organizational leaders in the hospitality industry depend on written, visual, and oral messages to solve problems and to accomplish professional goals within the workplace. Students learn to think critically, ethically, and strategically about communication in a variety of contexts and for a variety of purposes, for example, proposing an idea and addressing real ethical challenges that may occur in a crisis situation. Students will practice communication principles, such as developing and supporting an argument and crafting clear, concise messages.\"", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1983, "title": "Seminar in Leadership, Diversity, and Inclusion", "code": "HADM 7960", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Diversity and inclusion is on everyone's mind. We all know that together, we have to do a better job providing tools and resources to leaders to improve their ability create, sustain, and institutionalize diversity and inclusion (D&I) behavior in their organizations. To truly realize the benefits from D&I activities, initiatives and programs, leaders must be prepared to address the challenges we face in the broadly diverse hospitality industry. For our students, this course is designed to build both a theoretical and practical understanding of how to manage the ever-evolving needs for D&I programs in the global hospitality industry.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1984, "title": "M.S. Thesis Research", "code": "HADM 8900", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1985, "title": "Ph.D. Thesis Research", "code": "HADM 9900", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates.", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1986, "title": "Operations of Digital Business Models and Marketplaces", "code": "HADM 9980", "subject": "HADM", "descr": "\"Operating digital marketplaces (aka platforms, intermediaries) is the primary business of most technology companies. Ad-supported tech companies (Facebook, Google) design and operate markets that consumers of digital content with advertisers; digital transportation network companies (Uber, Lyft) operate marketplaces that connect riders with drivers; Labor marketplaces (Upwork) connect freelancers with jobs. This course will cover the latest research on operational issues in these marketplaces, including algorithms and approaches for matching supply with demand, strategies for scaling marketplaces, methods for price discovery, etc.\u00a0 The course will also cover other new digital business models such as those associated with bike-sharing systems, e-commerce and digital retail, social-media enabled selling, etc.\"", "tags": "HADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1987, "title": "People in Perspective: Brain, Mind, and Society", "code": "HD 1120", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Human Behavior and mental processes including the nervous system, consciousness, learning, memory, development, emotion, psychopathology, interpersonal process, society, and culture, bridging historical perspectives with current research.", "tags": "PBS-HD|KCM-HE|SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1988, "title": "Adolescence and Emerging Adulthood", "code": "HD 1170", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Broad overview of theories, research, and issues in the study of human development during adolescence and emerging adulthood. Focuses on the major biological, cognitive, and social changes during adolescence; the psychosocial issues of adolescence, including identity, autonomy, intimacy, sexuality, achievement, and problems; and the contexts in which adolescent development occurs, particularly families, peer groups, schools, work, and popular culture. Discusses empirical research, theories, case studies of the lives of real adolescents, and, to a lesser degree, public policies.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1989, "title": "Narratives of Women's Lives", "code": "HD 2520", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Women's lives are characterized by their personal experiences and histories, the relationships they form, and the communities and cultures in which they live. In this class, we draw on memoir and fiction, psychology, history, cultural studies, and developmental science to explore women's experiences in America in the 20th and 21st centuries. We counterbalance events that are part of all women's lives \u2013 such as coming of age \u2013 with more specific events such as widowhood or violence against women. By integrating autobiographical and fictional narratives with academic scholarship, students will have a comprehensive understanding of the complex realities of women's experiences across the lifespan.", "tags": "CA-HE|D-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1990, "title": "Six Pretty Good Books: Explorations in Social Science", "code": "HD 2580", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course is modeled after \"Great Books\" literature courses in the humanities, but with two important differences: we read non-fiction books in the social sciences rather than the humanities, written by highly prominent contemporary social scientists. The course title refers to the fact that the books are new, hence their potential greatness has yet to be confirmed by the test of time. We choose living authors to give students a unique opportunity: to interact with each of the six authors in Q&A sessions in person or via video conferencing. This fall some of the authors will appear in person for Q&A and the others will Skype with the class.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1991, "title": "Data Science for Social Scientists II", "code": "HD 2940", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This is a course on applications of data science in social science using R. We will cover fundamentals of statistical and causal inference, exploratory data analysis and data reduction, supervised learning, and recent, prominent applications of machine learning in social science.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1992, "title": "Educational Psychology", "code": "HD 3110", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Educational psychology is the application of psychological principles and concepts to cases of teaching and learning. We study behavioral, cognitive, embodied, and social-cultural perspectives on learning and thinking, and we use them in planning and reflecting on weekly fieldwork outside the classroom. In the process, we become more mindful and skilled learners ourselves and better facilitators of others' learning.", "tags": "CA-HE|KCM-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1993, "title": "Developmental Cognitive Neuroscience", "code": "HD 3210", "subject": "HD", "descr": "As it is with much of scientific discovery, a poet, William Wordsworth, best explained development with a simple phrase: The Child is father of the Man (person). In this course, we explore how our adult selves come to be through the lens of Developmental Cognitive Neuroscience. You will learn about current perspectives and controversies, the latest understanding of the development of multiple physiological systems (e.g., vision, perception, language, etc.) as interactions between molecular mechanisms, experience, and neural plasticity. Weekly short reaction papers, class exercises, and midterm and final projects, will all be geared towards developing a personal appreciation for the subject as well as an understanding of the issues in developmental cognitive neuroscience as a field.", "tags": "D-HE|KCM-HE|PBS-HE|SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1994, "title": "Neurochemistry of Human Behavior", "code": "HD 3250", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course will focus on the complex interactions between neurochemicals and their receptors (pharmacodynamics) that drive human behavior. It will provide an overview of the principles of neurotransmission of chemicals as well as how alterations in their normal function can manifest in pathological behavior/mind processes.", "tags": "KCM-HE|PBS-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1995, "title": "Field Practicum II", "code": "HD 3280", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Continues the field practicum experience from PSYCH 3270.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1996, "title": "Self-regulation Across the Life Span", "code": "HD 3290", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Covers the science of self-regulation and its development over the human life span. After providing an overview of historical perspectives, the class will focus on contemporary research including homeostasis in bodily systems, self-control and regulation, goal setting, economic perspectives, as well as the role of emotions and personality.", "tags": "D-HE|SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1997, "title": "Gender and Psychopathology", "code": "HD 3320", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course examines the ways in which sex and gender impact the expression of severe psychopathology. We will study biological, psychological, and cultural factors associated with sex and gender as they influence the epidemiology, phenomenology, etiology, diagnosis, and course of illness in major forms of psychopathology: specifically, schizophrenia, major affective illness, anxiety disorders, eating disorders, and personality disorders. We will also examine the complicated roles of race, class, sexuality, and gender identity as they relate to these conditions. These topics will be examined through the frameworks of psychological science and feminism in an attempt to understand the effects that gender and science have on one another and the ways in which they influence the understanding of mental illness.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1998, "title": "Risk and Opportunity Factors in Childhood and Adolescence", "code": "HD 3530", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This advanced lecture class will focus on theories and empirical findings concerning risky decision making in childhood adolescence, and childhood. The material will be scholarly and intellectually challenging. We will draw on multiple disciplines, such as psychology, economics, and neuroscience.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":1999, "title": "Human Bonding", "code": "HD 3620", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Covers the science of interpersonal relationships. Examines the basic nature of human affectional bonds, including their functions and dynamics. Covers such topics as interpersonal attraction and mate selection, intimacy and commitment, love and sex, jealousy and loneliness, the neurobiology of affiliation and attachment, and the role of relationships in physical and psychological health.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2000, "title": "Adult Psychopathology", "code": "HD 3700", "subject": "HD", "descr": "A theoretical and empirical approach to the biological, psychological, and social (including cultural and historical) aspects of adult psychopathology. Readings range from Freud to topics in psychopharmacology. The major mental illnesses are covered, including schizophrenia as well as mood, anxiety, and personality disorders. Childhood disorders are not covered.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2001, "title": "Directed Readings", "code": "HD 4000", "subject": "HD", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves library research and independent study.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2002, "title": "Teaching Assistantship", "code": "HD 4030", "subject": "HD", "descr": "For study that includes assisting faculty with instruction.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2003, "title": "Social Policy for an Aging Society", "code": "HD 4120", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This seminar introduces students to the dynamic and complex relationships between the lives of older adults and social policies relating to aging and later life. It considers the interaction of policies and politics with experiences of aging over time and across contexts.", "tags": "D-HE|SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2004, "title": "Current Topics in Cognitive Development", "code": "HD 4340", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Discussion of current research in the area of cognitive development.", "tags": "KCM-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2005, "title": "Positive Psychology in Prison", "code": "HD 4390", "subject": "HD", "descr": "\"Positive Psychology: Inside (Prison) and Out\" is a course in collaboration with the Cornell Prison Education Program and Cayuga Correctional Facility. The course is intended to provide Cornell seniors the opportunity to gain insight into the issues facing incarcerated communities, while also giving incarcerated students access to an engaged education in positive psychology.", "tags": "D-HE|KCM-HE|SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2006, "title": "Children's Learning in Social Context", "code": "HD 4490", "subject": "HD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2007, "title": "The Science of Social Behavior", "code": "HD 4580", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This is a capstone seminar for seniors who are interested in graduate or professional study in scientific disciplines that focus on human behavior and social interaction. The intent is to provide seniors with an opportunity to summon, integrate, and apply insights that they have acquired over the course of their undergraduate education, and give prospective graduate students the opportunity to lead discussions in\u00a0a large introductory lecture course, \"Six Pretty Good Books\". Each seminar member is part of a two or three-person team that leads the discussion together, under the supervision of a graduate teaching assistant. Seminar meetings are devoted to building lesson plans for leading an effective discussion of each of the six books. The authors vary from year to year but include Malcolm Gladwell, Michelle\u00a0Alexander, Nate Silver, and Nicholas Christakis. All authors have agreed to participate in a \"Q&A\" session with the students which seminar members are required to attend.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2008, "title": "Quantitative Methods II", "code": "HD 4760", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course builds on the first graduate statistics class for social sciences offered in falls. It will cover the general linear model as a data analytic tool. The focus will be on applied regression models.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2009, "title": "How to Think Like a Scientist", "code": "HD 4765", "subject": "HD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2010, "title": "Psychopathology in Great Works of Literature", "code": "HD 4770", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course will explore psychopathology by pairing literary descriptions of common disorders with psychological research. By examining mental illness through the lens of popular writing, we will explore the shifting cultural understanding and interpretations for disorders. We will also explore how writers' accounts of mental illness adhere (purposely or not) to DSM diagnostic criteria and empirically validated research. Authors include William Shakespeare, Ernest Hemingway, Sylvia Plath, William Styron, Charlotte Perkins Gilman, Eugene O'Neill, and John Updike.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2011, "title": "Contemporary Perspectives on Human Bonding", "code": "HD 4790", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Provides students who have taken and excelled in HD 3620 Human Bonding, an opportunity to explore the topics/theories/issues in greater depth and share their insights and discoveries with students currently enrolled in HD 3620. Specifically, students enrolled in HD 4790 will conduct searches of the latest scientific literatures and popular press writings with the goal of developing a presentation and leading discussions.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2012, "title": "Professional Development in Translational Research", "code": "HD 4850", "subject": "HD", "descr": "As a supplement to their immersive learning experience working on faculty research projects, students in this course will engage with actors and ideas from across the youth development research and practice communities, learn about research methods and dissemination to various audiences, and begin to see the world from a translational research perspective.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2013, "title": "Nearest Neighbor", "code": "HD 4860", "subject": "HD", "descr": "As a supplement to their immersive learning experience working on translational research projects led by CHE faculty, and building on their experience in HD4850 (Professional Development in Translational Research), this course will provide opportunities for students to put their learning into practice by proposing and implementing a translational research project in collaboration with community partners.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2014, "title": "Senior Honors Seminar", "code": "HD 4980", "subject": "HD", "descr": "In this weekly seminar, students are guided through the process of completing an honors thesis in human development. The course focuses on developing students' writing abilities, reviewing statistics and how to present research findings in a manuscript, and receiving feedback on drafts of their thesis, as well as practice presenting the results of their thesis in poster and oral presentations.", "tags": "SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2015, "title": "Senior Honors Thesis", "code": "HD 4990", "subject": "HD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2016, "title": "First-Year Proseminar in Human Development", "code": "HD 6200", "subject": "HD", "descr": "Designed as an orientation to the department and the university. Activities include attendance at research presentations, visits to departmental research laboratories, relevant informational sessions (e.g., Institutional Review Board for Human Participants, proposal writing), and guidance in preparing a public research presentation to be made at the end of spring semester.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2017, "title": "The Nature and Function of Affectional Bonds", "code": "HD 6690", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course will examine human bonding primarily from a psychological perspective, drawing on empirical and theoretical work from the fields of developmental, clinical, evolutionary, cognitive, personality, and social psychology, and secondarily from ethology, anthropology, sociology, and neurobiology. The central goal of the course is to define and explain basic structure, functions, dynamics, and formation of human affectional bonds, especially those of the attachment and mating variety.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2018, "title": "Graduate Seminar in Psychopathology", "code": "HD 6710", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course provides an overview to the etiology, manifestation, diagnosis, course, and treatment of the most commonly presented DSM-V psychological disorders.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2019, "title": "Quantitative Methods II", "code": "HD 6760", "subject": "HD", "descr": "This course builds on the first graduate statistics class for social sciences offered in falls. It will cover the general linear model as a data analytic tool. The focus will be on applied regression models.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2020, "title": "How to Think Like a Scientist", "code": "HD 6765", "subject": "HD", "descr": "What does it mean to think like a scientist? This course will explore the structure of scientific thinking, from its philosophical foundations through current efforts to make science fair and replicable. The thought processes that underlie the methods used in psychology and neuroscience are rarely made explicit in courses on statistics and research methods \u2013 understanding these thought processes can make us better scientists and sharper thinkers.", "tags": "KCM-HE|SBA-HE|HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2021, "title": "Directed Readings", "code": "HD 7000", "subject": "HD", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves library research and independent study.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2022, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "HD 7010", "subject": "HD", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves collection and analysis of research data.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2023, "title": "Teaching Assistantship", "code": "HD 7030", "subject": "HD", "descr": "For students assisting faculty with instruction. Does not apply to work for which students receive financial compensation.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2024, "title": "Master's Thesis and Research", "code": "HD 8990", "subject": "HD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2025, "title": "Doctoral Thesis and Research", "code": "HD 9990", "subject": "HD", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2026, "title": "Critical Reading and Thinking", "code": "HE 1115", "subject": "HE", "descr": "The objective of this course is to examine and strengthen students' self-management and learning strategies and to promote students' critical thinking and awareness of how they learn. Learning outcomes: students will develop greater self-awareness of their tendencies and how they do things, what works and doesn't work for them, and be able to create and implement a time-based study/project plan.", "tags": "HE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2027, "title": "New York State Government Affairs", "code": "HE 3920", "subject": "HE", "descr": "This course is part of the Human Ecology Capital Semester Program. Students live and work in Albany as legislative aids to a NYS Senator or Assembly Member, take a course in NYS Government, and participate in discussion forums with key legislators and policymakers. In addition, students are mentored by on-site Cornell Government Affairs staff that provides opportunities to work on legislative priorities that align with students' interests and their legislative assignments. On-site staff connect interns to state government officials working in their areas of interest, including Cornell alumni and dignitaries, advise students in their office work and internship coursework, and provide background to the policies and politics of Albany and state government, especially as it pertains to higher education and Cornell's role as a NYS Land Grant University. A relocation and living stipend is provided.", "tags": "HE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2028, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "HE 4010", "subject": "HE", "descr": "For study that predominately involves data collection and analysis, or laboratory or studio projects.", "tags": "HE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2029, "title": "Elementary Modern Hebrew II", "code": "HEBRW 1102", "subject": "HEBRW", "descr": "Intended for beginners. Provides a thorough grounding in reading, writing, grammar, oral comprehension, and speaking. Students who complete the course are able to function in basic situations in a Hebrew-speaking environment.", "tags": "HEBRW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2030, "title": "Intermediate Modern Hebrew", "code": "HEBRW 2100", "subject": "HEBRW", "descr": "The course is aimed at training students in exact and idiomatic Hebrew, expanding vocabulary and usage of grammatical knowledge, and acquiring facility of expression in both conversation and writing. Uses written and oral exercises built around the texts. Reading and discussion of selections from Hebrew literature and Israeli culture through the use of texts and audiovisual materials.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HEBRW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2031, "title": "Advanced Modern Hebrew II", "code": "HEBRW 3102", "subject": "HEBRW", "descr": "This is the second course in our third-year Modern Hebrew language sequence. Like its predecessor, it focuses on developing speech proficiency, reading and listening comprehension, and writing. It does this through reading of a variety of fiction and nonfiction texts; viewing of filmic works and television series selected for their social, political, and cultural relevance; class discussions; presentations and writing about everyday issues in Israel and abroad.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HEBRW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2032, "title": "Dynamics and Changes of Israeli Culture Through Language and Literature", "code": "HEBRW 3108", "subject": "HEBRW", "descr": "The course develops advanced Hebrew language proficiency through study of Israeli culture's diachronic development. Like HEBRW 3105, this course prioritizes reading comprehension through close reading of selected works of Modern Hebrew fiction, poetry, and drama grouped around a central theme and read in their cultural and historical contexts. This course also develops oral and written communication, as well as listening comprehension, through a variety of means, including class discussion, oral presentations, viewing of Israeli films and television, and short analytical papers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HEBRW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2033, "title": "Elementary Hindi II", "code": "HINDI 1102", "subject": "HINDI", "descr": "Designed for students who have either completed one semester of Hindi at Cornell or demonstrate same level of competency in Hindi. The main focus of this course is to reinforce and build students language acquisition in the four skills (Listening, Speaking, Reading & Writing)\u00a0 of the Hindi language by utilizing tools of basic grammar, vocabulary, cultural points and other oral and written activities. By the end of this course, students are able to communicate in basic everyday Hindi, and perform all the hands-on tasks and functions necessary to survive in India and/or similar context.", "tags": "HINDI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2034, "title": "Intermediate Hindi II", "code": "HINDI 2202", "subject": "HINDI", "descr": "HINDI 2202 is the continuation of HINDI 2201. The main emphasis in this course is to reinforce\u00a0 the linguistic functions learned in HINDI 2201, and to build comparatively more complex functions suitable for intermediate level in Hindi. Students' competence in all four language skills will be improved in order to perform higher level tasks and function.", "tags": "HINDI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2035, "title": "Intermediate Hindi Reading and Writing for Heritage Students II", "code": "HINDI 2204", "subject": "HINDI", "descr": "Throughout this course sequence all aspects of language learning are practiced; listening, speaking, reading, and writing. Video materials are used and the emphasis is on the conversational aspect of the language.", "tags": "HINDI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2036, "title": "Advanced Hindi II", "code": "HINDI 3302", "subject": "HINDI", "descr": "This is a continuation of HINDI 3301. Selected readings in modern Hindi literature. Continued work on fluency in speaking Hindi on an advanced level. There will be a combination of different reading materials from literature, journals, newspapers, and many social, entertainment, and political magazines in Hindi. Discussions will be based on those readings and articles, hence giving opportunities to express views and opinions in a fluent and effective manner.", "tags": "HINDI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2037, "title": "FWS: Writing History", "code": "HIST 1200", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "How can we learn about the past? How do we tell stories about the past? How do we judge the truth of falsity of evidence? Writing History seminars introduce students to many different ways of interpreting and writing about the past, and to the wide range of sources that historians use: from diaries to tax rolls, from scraps of textile to films and advertisements. Topics and readings vary by section.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2038, "title": "The Making of Modern Europe, from 1500 to the Present", "code": "HIST 1511", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "How do we make sense of the Brexit vote in Great-Britain, the rise of political Islam and the \"veil\" debates in France, the anti-globalization movements in Spain and Greece, the growth of demagogic anti-immigrant parties from the Netherlands to Italy, or the fact that Swedes get more than thirty paid days off per year?\u00a0 This course seeks to answer these questions by exploring the history of modern Europe.\u00a0 Among other themes, we will discuss the Protestant Reformation, the rise of absolutism, the Enlightenment, the French Revolution, industrialism, colonialism, the Russian Revolution, the two world wars, decolonization and immigration, May '68, and the construction of the European Union.\u00a0 In conjunction, we will examine how modern ideologies (liberalism, Marxism, imperialism, conservatism, fascism, totalitarianism) were developed and challenged.\u00a0 Through a wide array of historical documents (fiction, letters, philosophy, treatises, manifestoes, films, and art), we will consider why \"old Europe\" is still relevant for us today.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2039, "title": "History and Popular Culture in Africa", "code": "HIST 1590", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course uses a multidisciplinary approach to explore the complex relationship between history and popular culture in Africa. The course considers two main questions - how can you write history using popular culture? And, how do artists use history to create popular culture? It uses examples from around the continent to explore old and new forms of popular culture; forms of cultural expression used by historians; as well as the ways in which artists use moments of great historical significance or key historical actors in their works. We consider, for example, the work of Leroy Vail who used songs by Mozambican peasants to write a social history of colonialism as well as films about colonialism by African film-makers such as the late Ousman Sembene.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2040, "title": "Histories of the Future", "code": "HIST 1620", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "From Frankenstein to The Matrix, science fiction and film have depicted contemporary science, technology, and medicine for almost two centuries. This course introduces students to historical and social studies of science and technology using science-fiction films and novels, as well as key readings in science and technology studies. What social questions can fictional accounts raise that factual ones can only anticipate? How have \"intelligent machines\" from Babbage's Analytical Engine to Hal raised questions about what it means to be human? What can Marvel Comics teach us about changes in science and technology? When can robots be women and, in general, what roles did gender play in scientific, technological, and medical stories? How was the discovery that one could look inside the human body received? How do dreams and nightmares of the future emerge from the everyday work of scientific and technological research?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2041, "title": "A Global History of Love", "code": "HIST 1930", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "By posing seemingly simple questions such as what is love and who has the right to love, this introductory-level lecture course surveys how love has been experienced and expressed from the pre-modern period to the present. Through case studies of familial and conjugal love in Africa, Asia, the US, Europe, and South and Latin America, the course will examine the debates about and enactment's of what constitutes the appropriate way to show love and affection in different cultures and historical contexts. Among the themes we will explore are questions of sexuality, marriage, kinship, and gender rights. A final unit will examine these themes through modern technologies such as the Internet, scientific advances in medicine, and a growing awareness that who and how we love is anything but simple or universal.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2042, "title": "Modern Latin America", "code": "HIST 1960", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Do you wonder what the historical context is for migrations out of Central America? Or why many Brazilians are so fearful of the recent election of Jair Bolsonaro? Curious as to what the 'pink tide' is? Or why Silicon Valley investors are hanging out in Honduras and Panama? Who the Zapatistas are and why they call themselves by that name? When the very term 'Latin America' came into being? Why Chileans were the vanguard of the California Gold Rush? How Mexican cowboys ended up in Hawaii?\u00a0 If so, this course is for you. It surveys the social, political, cultural and economic history of Latin America from roughly 1800 to the present. The primary aim is to help you develop a mental map of the history of Latin America\u2014of prominent themes issues; of historical eras and trajectories. Given the vastness of Latin America, and its somewhat arbitrary composition as an object of study, the approach of the course is thematic and chronological rather than regional. We will pay attention to a number of more specific and interconnected themes: the development of, and relationship between, capitalist economies and processes of state formation; the complex roles Britain and the U.S. have played in the region, but always with an appreciation for how Latin Americans have shaped their own histories and those of the U.S. and Britain; the ways in which non-elites\u2014slaves, workers, peasants, among others\u2014have shaped history; the politics of the production of history; and Latin America's 'situatedness' in a broader world.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2043, "title": "Pirates, Slaves, and Revolutionaries: A History of the Caribbean from Columbus to Louverture", "code": "HIST 1970", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "What is the Caribbean? How did its native inhabitants fared in the aftermath of the arrival of Europeans? How did the region shift from a Spanish Lake to a heavily contested geopolitical site where all European powers vied for political and commercial superiority? What were the main production systems of the region and how did they result in dramatic environmental change? How did the eighteenth-century revolutions transform the Caribbean? In this introductory survey to Caribbean history we will answer these and many other questions through the study of the political, economic, social, cultural, and environmental transformations of the Caribbean from the arrival of Columbus to the era of the Haitian Revolution. We will follow indigenous people, Spanish conquistadors, English, Dutch, and French pirates and privateers, planters, and merchants, imperial officers, slaves, sailors, and revolutionaries as they adapted to the multiple transformations that shaped this region. Through lectures, discussions, and readings of primary and secondary sources we will navigate the Caribbean in a quest to understand the historical processes that gave shape to this tropical paradise.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2044, "title": "From Subjects to Citizens: The Making and Unmaking of Early America", "code": "HIST 1985", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "On the eve of the American Revolution Britain administered 26 colonies\u2014not just the 13 that would become the United States. British North America's dramatic struggle for independence has led many history textbooks to read the revolution back into colonial history, focusing on those 13 North American colonies that would become the United States, often at the expense of global connections that defined the colonial and revolutionary periods. As this class will explore, key elements of early American history can only be understood through a broader perspective, from the economic growth of New England as a result of the African slave trade and exchange in the Caribbean, to the use of citizenship as a category of exclusion in response to the myriad inhabitants\u2014European, Indigenous, and African\u2014who neighbored or lived within the original 13 colonies. In this course, we will explore the history of early America from the 1490s through the 1800s from a global perspective. Voices usually peripheral to the narrative of American development, from enslaved African mariners to Spanish American nuns, will become central to processes of cultural encounter, labor exploitation, revolutionary upheavals, and state formation that shaped the making and unmaking early America.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2045, "title": "Supervised Reading - Undergraduate", "code": "HIST 2001", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Independent Study based supervised reading with history faculty.\u00a0 Student must complete Independent Study Form with faculty supervisor for determining requirements and for permission to enroll through the online system (https://data.arts/cornell.edu/as-stus/indep_study_intro.cfm).\u00a0 Student then work with their faculty supervisor throughout the semester for successful completion and grading of the agreed upon requirements.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2046, "title": "The First American University", "code": "HIST 2005", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Educational historian Frederick Rudolph called Cornell University \"the first American university,\" referring to its unique role as a coeducational, nonsectarian, land-grant institution with a broad curriculum and diverse student body. In this course, we will explore the history of Cornell, taking as our focus the pledge of Ezra Cornell and Andrew Dickson White to found a university where \"any person can find instruction in any study.\" The course will cover a wide range of topics and perspectives relating to the faculty, student body, evolution of campus, and important events and eras in Cornell history. Stories and vignettes will provide background on the current university and its administrative structure, campus traditions, and the names that adorn buildings and memorials throughout campus. Finally, the course will offer a forum for students to address questions on present-day aspects of the university.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2047, "title": "Jim Crow and Exclusion Era in America", "code": "HIST 2042", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This seminar examines America during the overlapping eras of segregation & immigration exclusion.\u00a0 Beginning with contests over the weaning of freedom during reconstruction and running through the institution of Jim Crow legislation and immigration exclusion, the course ends with an evaluation of mid-20th century movements for civil rights and equality.\u00a0 Themes include the links between racial and economic oppression, legal and defacto restriction, everyday resistance, and struggles for equality.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2048, "title": "U.S. Immigration Narratives", "code": "HIST 2251", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Americans are conflicted about immigration. We honor and celebrate (and commercialize) our immigrant heritage in museums, folklife festivals, parades, pageants, and historical monuments. We also build fences and detention centers, and pass more and more laws to bar access to the United States. Polls tell us that Americans are concerned about the capacity of the United States to absorb so many immigrants from around the world. How often have we heard the laments \"Today's immigrants are too different. They don't want to assimilate\" or \"My grandparents learned English quickly, why can't they?\" The assumption is that older generations 'Americanized' quickly but that today's immigrants do not want to assimilate. Did 19th century immigrants really migrate to the United States to \"become Americans\"? Did they really assimilate quickly? Are today's immigrants really all that different from the immigrants who arrived earlier? Why do these particular narratives have such power and currency? This seminar will explore these issues and help students discern fact from fiction.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2049, "title": "Fascism in the Twentieth Century: History and Theory", "code": "HIST 2285", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course uses history and political theory to understand the fascist experience in the twentieth century. In the first part of the course, we will examine fascist ideology; its relation to democracy and dictatorship; whether fascism is best understood as another form of authoritarianism or as totalitarianism; the role of nationalism, race, religion, culture, gender, the family, and intellectuals in fascist regimes; and the institutional and economic foundations of fascist politics. The second half of the course covers the origins, development and defeat of fascist states in the mid-twentieth century. We will devote the most time to understanding what happened in Mussolini's Italy (1922-1945) and in Hitler's Germany (1933-1945), but will also examine fascist movements and regimes in Austria, Hungary, Romania, Spain and Portugal. We will finish the course by looking at the persistence of fascist movements and ideas beyond WWII and into the present, and ask how these are similar to historical fascism and in what ways they differ from that experience.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SSC-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2050, "title": "Introduction to Military History", "code": "HIST 2321", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "An introduction to basic themes of military history, e.g., battle, strategy, tactics, war and society, as well as classic works, e.g. Sun Tzu, Thucydides, Clausewitz, Jomini.\u00a0 Recent theories in scholarship will also be emphasized.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2051, "title": "Where Fire Meets Ice: Histories of the U.S.-Canada Border Across Four Centuries", "code": "HIST 2392", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "The international boundary between Canada and the United is the longest, straightest border in the world. Although frequently cast as \"boring\" in juxtaposition to its southern counterpart, this viewpoint overlooks the U.S.-Canada border's longstanding history as a site and engine of trans-national tensions and controversies. This course addresses the complex histories of the 3,500 mile boundary separating the United States from Canada from its eighteenth century colonial antecedents to contemporary challenges related to drug smuggling, border fence construction, pandemic-related travel restrictions, immigration, commerce, environmental issues, Indigenous peoples' rights, and national identity construction. The instructor, a dual citizen of Canada and the United States, brings not only life experience of border-crossing, but also a recent background in legal testimony on border-related issues.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2052, "title": "Dress Cloth and Identity", "code": "HIST 2452", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course uses a multi-disciplinary approach to examine the importance of textiles in African social and economic history. It combines art history, anthropology, social and economic history to explore the role of textiles in marking status, gender, political authority and ethnicity. In addition, we examine the production and distribution of indigenous cloth and the consequences of colonial rule on African textile industries. Our analysis also considers the principles of African dress and clothing that shaped the African diaspora in the Americas as well as the more recent popularity and use of African fabrics and dress in the United States.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2053, "title": "England's Age of Revolutions, 1500-1815", "code": "HIST 2521", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Why did a relatively poor, marginal island garner a reputation for rebelliousness and embark on radical (though often failed) experiments in toleration and democracy over the course of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries? This course explores the social, religious and political upheavals that rocked the British Isles, from the Henrician reformation to the Glorious Revolution of 1688. Topics include: the relationship of puritanism to political radicalism; the trial and execution of King Charles I, anti-Catholicism as an ideology; the twinned threats of theocracy and Cromwellian military rule; the role of the press and public opinion in early modern politics, the struggle for and limits of religious toleration, and the relationship of revolutions in England to violence in Scotland and Ireland. Finally, we will look at how the memory of earlier revolutions shaped British responses to the American and French Revolutions.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2054, "title": "War and Peace in Greece and Rome", "code": "HIST 2560", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In ancient Greece and Rome, government did little besides wage war and raise taxes, culture focused on war, warriors gloried in battle, and civilians tried to get out of the way. This course surveys the impact of war and the rarity of peace in the ancient world. Topics include: \"why war?\"; the face of battle; leadership; strategy, operations, and tactics; women and war; intelligence and information-gathering; diplomacy and peacemaking; militarism; war and slavery; the archaeology of warfare. Readings in translation include selections from Homer, Herodotus, Thucydides, Xenophon, Caesar, Livy, Tacitus, Josephus, and Ammianus Marcellinus. (pre-1800/non-US)", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2055, "title": "Environmental History", "code": "HIST 2581", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This lecture course serves as an introduction to the historical study of humanity's interrelationship with the natural world. Environmental history is a quickly evolving field, taking on increasing importance as the environment itself becomes increasingly important in world affairs. During this semester, we'll examine the sometimes unexpected ways in which \"natural\" forces have shaped human history (the role of germs, for instance, in the colonization of North America); the ways in which human beings have shaped the natural world (through agriculture, urbanization, and industrialization, as well as the formation of things like wildlife preserves); and the ways in which cultural, scientific, political, and philosophical attitudes toward the environment have changed over time. This is designed as an intensely interdisciplinary course: we'll view history through the lenses of ecology, literature, art, film, law, anthropology, and geography. Our focus will be on the United States, but, just as environmental pollutants cross borders, so too will this class, especially toward the end, when we attempt to put U.S. environmental history into a geopolitical context. This course is meant to be open to all, including non-majors and first-year students.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2056, "title": "The Crusades", "code": "HIST 2590", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course focuses on the ideas and practices of Crusading, from its birth ca. 1100 to the fall of the Kingdom of Jerusalem in 1292. We explore the roots of Crusading in Christian Europe and in the Islamic Near East; the conquest, settlement, and loss of the Latin Levant; and the impacts and afterlives of Crusading. Central themes include the institutional, intellectual, and political histories of Christianity (Latin, Byzantine, and other) and Islam; military, social, and economic narratives of the period; and social, cultural, and environmental analysis, using both material and textual sources.", "tags": "GLC-AS|HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2057, "title": "Everything You Know About Indians is Wrong: Unlearning Native American History", "code": "HIST 2660", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "One thing many Americans think they know is their Indians: Pocahontas, the First Thanksgiving, fighting cowboys, reservation poverty, and casino riches. Under our very noses, however, Native American history has evolved into one of the most exciting, dynamic, and contentious fields of inquiry into America's past. It is now safer to assume, as Comanche historian Paul Chaat Smith has pointed out, that everything you know about Indians is in fact wrong. Most people have much to \"unlearn\" about Native American history before true learning can take place. This course aims to achieve that end by (re)introducing students to key themes and trends in the history of North America's indigenous nations. Employing an issues-oriented approach, the course stresses the ongoing complexity of Native American societies' engagements with varieties of settler colonialism since 1492 and dedicates itself to a concerted program of myth-busting. As such, the course will provide numerous opportunities for students to develop their critical thinking and reading skills.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2058, "title": "The United States in the 1960s and 1970s", "code": "HIST 2680", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This lecture course explores the dramatic cultural, economic, and social upheavals in U.S. society during the 1960s and 1970s. It will primarily focus on the dynamic interactions between formal politics, the state, the economy, and the era's mass movements on the right and the left. Among other things, we will explore the history and legacy of the Civil Rights and Black Power Movements, the Vietnam War, deindustrialization, \"white flight,\" the War on Poverty, the War on Crime, Watergate, the \"rise of the right,\" and women's changing roles.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2059, "title": "Cleopatra's Egypt: Tradition and Transformation", "code": "HIST 2688", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Following the conquests of Alexander, the ancient civilization of Egypt came under Greek rule. This period is best known for its famous queen Cleopatra, the last independent ruler of ancient Egypt. But even before Cleopatra's life and death, the Egypt that she governed was a fascinating place \u2013 and a rich case study in cultural interactions under ancient imperialism. This course explores life in Egypt under Greek rule, during the three centuries known as the Ptolemaic period (named after Cleopatra's family, the Ptolemaic dynasty). We will examine the history and culture of Ptolemaic Egypt, an empire at the crossroads of Africa, the Near East, and the Mediterranean. We will explore the experiences of both Egyptians and Greeks living in this multi-cultural, multi-ethnic, and multi-linguistic society. Finally, we will investigate the ways that Ptolemaic Egypt can shed light on modern experiences of imperialism, colonialism, and globalization.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2060, "title": "Introduction to the History of Medicine", "code": "HIST 2710", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course offers an introductory survey of the history of medicine (principally in Europe and the United States) from classical antiquity to the early twentieth century. Using a combination of both primary and secondary sources, students will learn about the \"Hippocratic Heritage\" of contemporary western medicine; medicine in late antiquity; faith and healing in the medieval period; medicine and knowledge in the Islamic world; medicine during the Renaissance (particularly the rise of the mechanical philosophy); medicine in the age of Enlightenment; professionalization, women-doctors and midwives, and battles over 'quackery' in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries; the role of medicine in colonialism and empire; and the promises and perils of modern medicine (dramatic decreases in mortality on the one hand, the rise of Eugenics and the importance of Medicine to the National Socialist State on the other). As well as this temporal survey, we will consider a number of ongoing themes: race, bodily difference, and medicine; medicine and the environment; women, gender, and medicine; the history of the body; the history of sexuality; and the close connections between forms of social order and forms of medical knowledge. The course meets three times a week (for two lectures and a section) and is open to all.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2061, "title": "The Ancient Economy", "code": "HIST 2712", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Ancient economies were very different to our modern economy: there were no banks, transport and communication were difficult, and the discipline of economics did not yet exist. Yet there are also striking similarities between the ancient and modern economic worlds: many people liked luxuries, production was increasingly standardized, and buyers and sellers came together on market days. This course introduces the key characteristics of ancient economies, with a focus on ancient Rome but also looking at classical Athens and further afield. It is structured around themes such as trade and exchange, craft, consumption, and money. Its aim is to probe the nature of the ancient economy, both for students interested in the ancient world and for students keen to put the modern economy in historical perspective.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SSC-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2062, "title": "Monuments, Museums, and Memory: An Introduction to Public History", "code": "HIST 2792", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In this course we will examine how we have come to narrate social, cultural, and political history in the United States, investigating the ways scholarly, curatorial, archival, and creative practices shape conceptions of the American past, in particular understandings of racial, gender, sexual, and class oppression and resistance. Students will build skills in historical interpretation and archival research and explore possibilities and challenges in preserving and presenting the past in a variety of public contexts\u2014monuments, memorials, museums, historical sites, movies and television, and community-based history projects. For their final project, students will conduct original research in a digital or material archive, chosen in consultation with the instructor, to produce a draft of an exhibit, providing popularly accessible historical context and interpretation.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2063, "title": "Ten Technologies That Shook the World?", "code": "HIST 2881", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In 1919, journalist John Reed published Ten Days That Shook the World about the 1917 Russian Revolution. Some events are so transformative, Reed argued, they change the course of history. This class examines ten technologies that \"shook\" the world over the past half millennium. Or did they? Can technology drive history? How should we think about the relationship between technology and culture, society, politics, and the environment? This course challenges many popular understandings of technology and technological change, introducing students to major concepts in the history and social studies of technology, including technological determinism, systems, infrastructure, skill, technopolitics, envirotech, users, and maintenance and repair. Technologies addressed will vary, but may include the slave ship, factory, climate control, atomic bomb, and plastic.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2064, "title": "Consumer Culture", "code": "HIST 2885", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course will examine consumerism in the United States, first focusing on the rise of advertising, mass-market goods, shop windows, and department stores at the turn of the 20th century. We will examine the built environment, the experience of shopping, and the consequent disease of \"kleptomania\", looking at inequality and activism as a potential political outlet for consumerism. We will also study consumerism as a system of cultural meaning. How do our objects shape and symbolize our identities? What does our constellation of material goods say about our values, our beliefs, and our lives? What stands outside consumer culture? What does it mean to commodify love or bottle nature? Can art or beauty be beyond value?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2065, "title": "Making of an Empire in China", "code": "HIST 2931", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "The Great Qing (1644-1911), a multi-ethnic empire that conquered China proper from the northeastern borderlands, expanded into central Asia, Mongolia, and Tibet, and consolidated the China-based empire's control over its southwestern frontiers. An heir to both Chinese and Inner Asian traditions, the Qing empire laid the foundation for the modern Chinese nation-state. In this course, students will focus on the political, legal, social, cultural, and intellectual aspects of China's long eighteenth century. Students will also locate the early modern Chinese empire in a regional and global context, examining its power influence in Korea and Southeast Asia, and its encounters and interactions with Western and Japanese imperialist powers. These encounters and interactions contributed to the domestic turmoil and foreign invasions that eventually led to the demise of China's imperial tradition. But they also gave rise to new forces that would shape the fate of modern China in the twentieth and twenty-first centuries. From Spring 2021 onward, this course fulfills the pre-1800 requirement for History Major", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2066, "title": "Empires and Vampires: History of Eastern Europe", "code": "HIST 2958", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In the course we will study the history of the lands, peoples, and states of Eastern Europe during the 19th and 20th centuries as an integral part of modern Europlean and global history. We will ask what the East European experience can teach us about larger questions of cause and effect, agency in history, continuties and ruptures, the interplay between institutions, states and individuals, and the relationship between culture and politics. The course will define the region broadly, to include the lands stretching from today's Ukraine to Poland and the Balkans. But given the constant flux in borders, demographics, and sovereignities of this region, we will have to continually reconsider what and where Eastern Europe was. We will survey key periods in the region's history, looking closely at cases from across Eastern Europe. We will learn about institutions, large-scale processes, personalities, events, cultural artifacts, and ideas using a combination of narrative history and literary essays, primary documents, works of fiction, and films.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2067, "title": "Imperial Russia", "code": "HIST 2970", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course surveys the history of Imperial Russia, from its ninth-century Kievan beginnings to its rapid disintegration under the pressure of the First World War. Lectures will draw special attention to recurrent acts of revolutionary transformation that punctuate Russia's long tradition of \"internal colonization.\" We will look at the creation of Russian culture, politics and society between the ninth century and the nineteenth as an exercise in empire-building \u2014 a project that originated with the enterprising princes of medieval Moscow, collapsed with the end of the Riurikid dynasty at the turn of the seventeenth century, spectacularly revived in eighteenth-century St. Petersburg, under the standard-bearer or the reforming Romanovs, Peter the Great, and eventually taken up by some of the most articulate representatives of a late-imperial intelligentsia whose dreams of Russian greatness were even more extravagant than those of the tsar. Topics for discussion include: the Russian translation of Greek Christianity, Russia's fraught relationship with Western Europe, the paradox of imperial modernization and the continual recourse, in Russian literary, musical, and visual cultures to an image of Russia as a frontier society without a state.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2068, "title": "Transformations in Twentieth Century China", "code": "HIST 2985", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "The twentieth century was a time of unprecedented change in China as the country's ancient imperial system collapsed and a new modern order began to emerge. This course will explore the myriad transformations that occurred during this remarkable century of revolution and renewal. Among the major changes that we will focus on are the fall of the Qing dynasty, the intellectual awakening of May Fourth, the rise of the Nationalist party-state, and key events of the Communist era, such as the Great Leap Forward and Cultural Revolution under Mao Zedong and the capitalist reforms of Deng Xiaoping. The class will encourage historical reflection on China's engagement with the modern world in order to better understand the complex reality of China today.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2069, "title": "Supervised Research - Undergraduate", "code": "HIST 3002", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Independent Study based supervised research with a history faculty member.\u00a0 Student must complete an on-line Independent Study form with a faculty supervisor to determine requirements and for permission.\u00a0 Students then work with their faculty supervisor throughout the semester for successful completion and grading of the agreed upon requirements.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2070, "title": "Living in an Uncertain World: Science, Technology, and Risk", "code": "HIST 3181", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course explores the history, sociology, and ethics of risk. In particular, we will focus on the complex and often ambiguous relationship between science, technology, and risk. A historical perspective shows how science and technology have generated risks while they have also played key roles in managing and solving those very risks. By examining several case studies, including 19th-century mining, the 1911 Triangle fire, nuclear science, the space shuttle disasters, asbestos litigation, Hurricane Katrina, and the contemporary financial crisis, we will consider how risk and ideas about risk have changed over time. By exploring different historical and cultural responses to risk, we will examine the sociopolitical dimensions of the definitions, perceptions, and management of risk both in the past and the present.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2071, "title": "History of the U.S. Civil War and Reconstruction", "code": "HIST 3430", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "A survey of the turning point of US. history: The Civil War (1861-1865) and its aftermath, Reconstruction (1865-1877). We will look at the causes, the coming, and the conduct, of the war, and the way in which it became a war for freedom. We will then follow the cause of freedom through the greatest slave rebellion in American history, and the attempts by formerly enslaved people to make freedom real in Reconstruction. And we will see how Reconstruction's tragic ending left questions open that are still not answered in U.S. society and politics.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2072, "title": "Race and the American Labor Market in Historical Perspective", "code": "HIST 3480", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This class investigates race and class in the American labor market from Colonial America to the present day. We investigate the circumstances and labor institutions that brought labor to the U.S. and how laborers of various classes were received. A primary goal of the class is to understand the degree to which social mobility was historically possible in different time periods in American history. Social mobility is intimately tied to labor market institutions and the ability for workers to get ahead within those institutions. Some of the institutions we study are Indentured Servitude, Slavery, tenant farming, the Great Migration and labor organization in the industrial north. Ultimately we hope to build an understanding of the historical roots of the role of race and class today.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2073, "title": "History of State and Society in Modern Iran: Through Literature and Film", "code": "HIST 3519", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In the conditions of strict censorship and numerous limitations on various forms of political organization and activism, literature and cinema, especially Iran's internationally acclaimed art cinematography, have been the major outlets through which the social and political concerns of the Iranian society have been voiced throughout the modern period. The course explores major themes and periods in Iran's transition from the secular state of the Pahlavi dynasty to the religious state of the Islamic Republic in the 20th and 21st centuries. We will focus on social as well as political themes including the Anglo-Russo-American Occupation of Iran, the 1979 Islamic Revolution, U.S.-Iranian relations, Iraq-Iran War, the Green Movement and the crisis of Islamic government, Images of the West in Iran, Modern Youth Culture, Gender segregation, and the struggle between modernity and traditionalism in contemporary Iran. We will watch selected Iranian documentary and feature films and draw on modern Persian literature but will approach them not as art forms but as reflections of major socio-economic, political, and religious phenomena in Iran's modern history. We will read and watch what the Iranians wrote and produced, read and watched, in order to view and explain Iran and its relations with the West through the Iranian eyes. We will examine how the Iranians perceived themselves and the others, how they viewed their own governments and the West, what issues inspired and shaped their outlook outside the official censorship during the period in question. All readings are in English translation and the films are with English subtitles. The course includes lectures deconstructing political, religious, and social evolution of modern Iran as well as regular class discussions where we will address the issues in question from a variety of perspectives.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2074, "title": "African Economic Development Histories", "code": "HIST 3652", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "What impact did Africa's involvement in the slave trade and its colonization by Europe have on its long-term economic health? What role have post-independence political decisions made within Africa and by multinational economic actors (the World Bank and the IMF, for example) had on altering the trajectory of Africa's economic history? Does China's recent heavy investment in Africa portend a movement away from or a continuation of Africa's economic underdevelopment? These questions and others will be addressed in this course.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2075, "title": "WIM: The Cold War", "code": "HIST 3837", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "During more than four decades following the end of World War II international politics was dominated by a phenomenon known as the Cold War. This class examines the origins, course, and ultimate demise of this conflict that pitted the United States and NATO against the Soviet Union and its allies. It seeks to evaluate the competing explanations that political scientists and historians have put forward to explain the Cold War by drawing on the new evidence that has become available. The course considers political, economic, and strategic aspects of the Cold War, including the nuclear arms race, with particular focus on the link between domestic and foreign policy. The course emphasizes writing, and includes a final research paper for which students will use original archival materials. Please contact the instructor if you are interested in an optional extra-credit Russian-language section.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2076, "title": "The History of Consumption: From Wedgwood to Wal-Mart", "code": "HIST 3870", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Whether buying at a general store, shopping at a department store, or loitering at a mall, consumption has always formed an important part of the American experience. More than just commodities bought and sold, consumption is also about the institutions, social practices, cultural meanings, and economic functions that have surrounded the merchandise. This course will look at the changing meanings consumption has had for life, politics, and economy in the US over the past 300 years.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2077, "title": "Introduction to Historical Research", "code": "HIST 4000", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This seminar is an introduction to the theory, practice, and art of historical research and writing. One key purpose of this course is to prepare students to work on longer research projects\u2014especially an Honors Thesis. We will analyze the relationship between evidence and argument in historical writing; assess the methods and possible biases in various examples of historical writing; identify debates and sources relevant to research problems; think about how to use sources creatively; and discuss the various methodological issues associated with historical inquiry, analysis, and presentation.\u00a0 This course is required for all students wishing to write an Honors Thesis in their senior year.\u00a0 It should be taken in either semester of the junior year, or in spring of the sophomore year if you are planning to be abroad in your junior year.\u00a0 NOTE: you do NOT need to be enrolled in the Honors Program in order to sign up for this course.", "tags": "ALC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2078, "title": "Honors Research", "code": "HIST 4002", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course is designed to facilitate student's successful completion of their History Department Honors theses through regular deadlines and small group writing workshops.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2079, "title": "Atlantic Commodities", "code": "HIST 4041", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Since Columbus's arrival to the Americas, a number of commodities have bound together Europe, Africa, and the Americas, drastically changing the lives of many people on both sides of the Atlantic. Covering nearly five hundred years of history, this seminar invites students to explore the history of the Atlantic World through the \"lives\" of commodities such as gold, silver, sugar, cacao, tobacco, cotton, cochineal, indigo, bananas, and more. Tracing commodities from their production site to the moment of consumption, students will be able to understand the possibilities that the commodity-chain approach offers to historical research. As part of this seminar students will write a research paper (using primary sources) that will explain the commodity chain of a specific commodity.", "tags": "GLC-AS|HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2080, "title": "Contesting Votes: Democracy and Citizenship Throughout U.S. History", "code": "HIST 4203", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This advanced seminar traces transformations in citizenship and the franchise throughout U.S. history. Through readings, frequent short writings, discussion, and a final paper, the class examines the struggles over who can claim full citizenship and legitimate voice in the political community. It examines the divergent, often clashing, visions of legitimate democratic rule, focusing particularly on the debates over who should vote and on what terms.\u00a0 We examine the dynamics that have shaped the boundaries of citizenship and hierarchies within it, paying attention to changes in the civic status of Native Americans, property-less white men, paupers, women, African Americans, various immigrant groups, residents of U.S. colonies, felons, and people with intellectual disabilities. A significant portion of the class focuses on debates about U.S. democracy in the decades after the passage of the 1965 Voting Rights Act.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2081, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "HIST 4237", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2082, "title": "The 1980s: Politics, Culture, and Memory in the United States", "code": "HIST 4337", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This seminar will examine U.S. culture and politics in the 1980s as a pivotal decade in shaping our contemporary cultural, social, and political landscape. We will consider how U.S. culture and politics shifted with the \"Reagan Revolution\" and the end of the Cold War, and their connections to and ramifications for social activism, social welfare, media, foreign policy, and everyday life. At the same time, we will consider the methodological opportunities and challenges in researching, writing, reading, and presenting recent history. Students will complete a research paper, and work together to design and launch a digital exhibition on the 1980s. We will also explore how 1980s culture and politics was shaped by nostalgia for the 1950s, and how the 1980s and remembered and misremembered today. Topics include the rise of neoliberalism, privatization of civil and social services, the emergence of digital technologies, activism in response to HIV/AIDS, transnational feminisms, the consolidation of the Christian right, and the \"Culture Wars.\" Readings will include historical scholarship, as well as creative non-fiction, films, TV, and music from the 1980s.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2083, "title": "Reconstruction and the New South", "code": "HIST 4390", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course focuses on the American South in the nineteenth century as it made the transition from Reconstruction to new forms of social organization and patterns of race relations. Reconstruction will be considered from a sociopolitical perspective, concentrating on the experiences of the freed people. The New South emphasis will include topics on labor relations, economic and political changes, new cultural alliances, the rise of agrarianism, and legalization of Jim Crow.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2084, "title": "Projects of Modernity in Asia", "code": "HIST 4408", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Idea(l)s of modernity across the Global South have been largely rooted in Euro-American projections of \"civilization\", and \"civilizational\" projects. The colonial worldview in which only Western(ized) experiences could be modern is foundational to the multifarious ways in which scholarship and nation-builders have engaged with progress, whether aspiring to it, rejecting it, or appropriating it. In this seminar we explore how imperial authorities, nationalists, and scholars/intellectuals have interfaced with idea(l)s of progress and modernity in Asia, reading works (\"one book a week\") grounded in multiple disciplines and cultural settings. Core themes will include: health and hygiene, consumption, technology, gender, piety and devotion, imperialism and race, and nationalism.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2085, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: The Beginnings of Islam: 600-750", "code": "HIST 4614", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2086, "title": "Mass Media and Identities in the Modern Middle East", "code": "HIST 4666", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This reading seminar will explore the expansion and influence of mass media in the Middle East from the late nineteenth to the turn of the twenty-first century.\u00a0 We will examine how the intersection of popular music, theater, poetry, film, and satellite television shaped culture, ideology, and identities in the modern Middle East.\u00a0 Topics we will consider include contested media representations of \"modernity,\" gender, and evolving cultural, religious, national, and transnational identities.\u00a0 Although this seminar focuses upon the Middle East, it aims to locate the region within a larger global context.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2087, "title": "Europe in Flames: World War II and its Aftermath", "code": "HIST 4672", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In this seminar, we will examine the war's major turning points on the European theater in order to understand not only the nature of this conflict, but also the forces that made it possible. We will look closely at the two superpowers that clashed on the continent, turning Europe into a veritable inferno for the people caught in between. What kinds of societies were Nazi Germany and Stalin's Russia? How did the war affect them and their regimes? We will also survey the spaces in between to discover why these two vast empires competed so ruthlessly over them. We will find out how the populations caught between these two giants made ends meet, both by cooperating and by resisting the great powers. Although some knowledge of what was going on at the front will be helpful, this class is not a course in military history. As a result, it focuses primarily on the social and cultural dimensions of war - which it explores through a variety of sources, including fiction, memoirs, and films. Topics include the occupation and destruction of Poland; the fall of France; Hitler's Europe and the Holocaust; resistance and collaboration with Nazi occupation forces across Europe; the Soviet experience of war; as well as the effect of war on family life, politics, and societies in Europe.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2088, "title": "Law and Empire in Early America", "code": "HIST 4716", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "European empires used the law to justify colonialism and project sovereign authority over distant territories. But the legal regimes imposed by imperial centers on colonial peripheries were jurisdictionally complex, overlapping, and contested by colonial actors on the ground. This course explores the role of law in the context of colonialism and imperialism in the Americas, ca. 1490 to 1800. We will consider the transmission and transformation of legal thought and practice throughout the Atlantic world, with a specific focus on the role of law in shaping racial identities, gender norms, imperial competition, and the ultimate unraveling of empires in the Americas. The course will examine the different legal regimes, from Roman civil law to English common law, that shaped societies in the Americas. And we will pay particular attention to actors in colonial spaces\u2014from self-liberated Africans to European smugglers\u2014who manipulated the complexity of imperial legal regimes to suit their own needs, shaping the trajectory of American history from the bottom-up in the process.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2089, "title": "China Imagined: The Historical and Global Origins of the Chinese Nation", "code": "HIST 4772", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "As China, with its \"China Dream,\" rises in power on the global stage, what \"China\" means to its inhabitants and outsiders has become an issue increasingly relevant to business, international relations, and cultural exchange, and a topic that draws intensive attention from historians and social scientists. This course brings together undergraduate and graduate students who are interested in shifting meanings embedded in the concept of \"China,\" either as part of their research agenda, or as a useful lens for comparative analysis. Focus will be on how China as an Empire/ a Nation was conceptualized by different people in different periods and in different contexts, and on the reality and representation of China as political, cultural, racial, and geographical entities.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2090, "title": "Gender, Power, and Authority in England, 1600 to 1800", "code": "HIST 4950", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "It is a truism that early modern society was a 'patriarchal' one in which men had authority -- but how did that authority operate and what were its limits? How did the exercise of power between men and women intersect with religious, literary, legal and political institutions? We will approach these questions chronologically, examining the impact of the Reformation, the English Revolution, the Enlightenment, the rise of middle class and polite culture. We will also explore them methodologically and generically, with an eye to how different kinds of evidence and sources can produce different kinds of conclusions. Historians' hypotheses will be tested by analysis of primary sources.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2091, "title": "Graduate Research Seminar", "code": "HIST 6000", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This seminar is devoted entirely to the writing of a substantive research paper, the dissertation prospectus, or fellowship proposal. Students will share research proposals, annotated bibliographies, outlines and portions of rough drafts. Class meetings will be devoted to discussing what students have produced, and general issues associated with constructing the dissertation prospectus and research papers.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2092, "title": "History Colloquium Series", "code": "HIST 6006", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2093, "title": "Atlantic Commodities", "code": "HIST 6041", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Since Columbus's arrival to the Americas, a number of commodities have bound together Europe, Africa, and the Americas, drastically changing the lives of many people on both sides of the Atlantic. Covering nearly five hundred years of history, this seminar invites students to explore the history of the Atlantic World through the \"lives\" of commodities such as gold, silver, sugar, cacao, tobacco, cotton, cochineal, indigo, bananas, and more. Tracing commodities from their production site to the moment of consumption, students will be able to understand the possibilities that the commodity-chain approach offers to historical research. As part of this seminar students will write a research paper (using primary sources) that will explain the commodity chain of a specific commodity.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2094, "title": "Seminar in the History of Technology", "code": "HIST 6190", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "A seminar on the global historiography of technology. Typical topics include industrialization; military science and technology; science and engineering in corporate settings; engineering as a profession; technology, colonialism, and development; race, gender, class, and technology; labor and technologies' users; urbanization, \"modernization,\" and technology in rural life; consumers of technology; technology and the nation-state; and environmental technologies.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2095, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "HIST 6237", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2096, "title": "Racialized Policing in United States History", "code": "HIST 6333", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Policing and Resistance in US History: this course will study concepts, questions, analyses, and historiographies of policing in US History from 1607 to the present. It will also consider struggles against policing power as a process of politics, social organization, culture, and ethnogenesis. We will discuss the ways that settler colonialism, slavery, processes of racialization, of gender, capitalism, sexuality, labor struggle, mass incarceration, immigration and other concepts and problematics shape histories of containment and resistance.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2097, "title": "The 1980s: Politics, Culture, and Memory in the United States", "code": "HIST 6337", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This seminar will examine U.S. culture and politics in the 1980s as a pivotal decade in shaping our contemporary cultural, social, and political landscape. We will consider how U.S. culture and politics shifted with the \"Reagan Revolution\" and the end of the Cold War, and their connections to and ramifications for social activism, social welfare, media, foreign policy, and everyday life. At the same time, we will consider the methodological opportunities and challenges in researching, writing, reading, and presenting recent history. Students will complete a research paper, and work together to design and launch a digital exhibition on the 1980s. We will also explore how 1980s culture and politics was shaped by nostalgia for the 1950s, and how the 1980s and remembered and misremembered today. Topics include the rise of neoliberalism, privatization of civil and social services, the emergence of digital technologies, activism in response to HIV/AIDS, transnational feminisms, the consolidation of the Christian right, and the \"Culture Wars.\" Readings will include historical scholarship, as well as creative non-fiction, films, TV, and music from the 1980s.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2098, "title": "Reconstruction and the New South", "code": "HIST 6391", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This course focuses on the American South in the nineteenth century as it made the transition from Reconstruction to new forms of social organization and patterns of race relations. Reconstruction will be considered from a sociopolitical perspective, concentrating on the experiences of the freed people. The New South emphasis will include topics on labor relations, economic and political changes, new cultural alliances, the rise of agrarianism, and legalization of Jim Crow.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2099, "title": "Projects of Modernity in Asia", "code": "HIST 6408", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Idea(l)s of modernity across the Global South have been largely rooted in Euro-American projections of \"civilization\", and \"civilizational\" projects. The colonial worldview in which only Western(ized) experiences could be modern is foundational to the multifarious ways in which scholarship and nation-builders have engaged with progress, whether aspiring to it, rejecting it, or appropriating it. In this seminar we explore how imperial authorities, nationalists, and scholars/intellectuals have interfaced with idea(l)s of progress and modernity in Asia, reading works (\"one book a week\") grounded in multiple disciplines and cultural settings. Core themes will include: health and hygiene, consumption, technology, gender, piety and devotion, imperialism and race, and nationalism.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2100, "title": "History Geography Theory", "code": "HIST 6482", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This seminar is a readings course on works from the past two decades that have wrestled theoretically, empirically, and narratively with the boundary between geography and history. The course is purposefully promiscuous, temporally and spatially, and the readings traverse wide swaths of time and space. Topics to be covered may include mapping, surveying, and exploration; the production of space; histories of property and enclosure; non-state spaces and counter-territorialities; development and 'nature'; and spatial subjectivities.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2101, "title": "Mass Media and Identities in the Modern Middle East", "code": "HIST 6666", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "This reading seminar will explore the expansion and influence of mass media in the Middle East from the late nineteenth to the turn of the twenty-first century.\u00a0 We will examine how the intersection of popular music, theater, poetry, film, and satellite television shaped culture, ideology, and identities in the modern Middle East.\u00a0 Topics we will consider include contested media representations of \"modernity,\" gender, and evolving cultural, religious, national, and transnational identities.\u00a0 Although this seminar focuses upon the Middle East, it aims to locate the region within a larger global context.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2102, "title": "Europe in Flames: World War II and its Aftermath", "code": "HIST 6672", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2103, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: 600-750", "code": "HIST 6710", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2104, "title": "Law and Empire in Early America", "code": "HIST 6716", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "European empires used the law to justify colonialism and project sovereign authority over distant territories. But the legal regimes imposed by imperial centers on colonial peripheries were jurisdictionally complex, overlapping, and contested by colonial actors on the ground. This course explores the role of law in the context of colonialism and imperialism in the Americas, ca. 1490 to 1800. We will consider the transmission and transformation of legal thought and practice throughout the Atlantic world, with a specific focus on the role of law in shaping racial identities, gender norms, imperial competition, and the ultimate unraveling of empires in the Americas. The course will examine the different legal regimes, from Roman civil law to English common law, that shaped societies in the Americas. And we will pay particular attention to actors in colonial spaces\u2014from self-liberated Africans to European smugglers\u2014who manipulated the complexity of imperial legal regimes to suit their own needs, shaping the trajectory of American history from the bottom-up in the process.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2105, "title": "China Imagined: The Historical and Global Origins of the Chinese Nation", "code": "HIST 6772", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "As China, with its \"China Dream,\" rises in power on the global stage, what \"China\" means to its inhabitants and outsiders has become an issue increasingly relevant to business, international relations, and cultural exchange, and a topic that draws intensive attention from historians and social scientists. This course brings together undergraduate and graduate students who are interested in shifting meanings embedded in the concept of \"China,\" either as part of their research agenda, or as a useful lens for comparative analysis. Focus will be on how China as an Empire/ a Nation was conceptualized by different people in different periods and in different contexts, and on the reality and representation of China as political, cultural, racial, and geographical entities.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2106, "title": "Gender, Power, and Authority in England, 1600 to 1800", "code": "HIST 6905", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "It is a truism that early modern society was a 'patriarchal' one in which men had authority -- but how did that authority operate and what were its limits?\u00a0 How did the exercise of power between men and women intersect with religious, literary, legal and political institutions?\u00a0 We will approach these questions chronologically, examining the impact of the Reformation, the English Revolution, the Enlightenment, the rise of middle class and polite culture.\u00a0 We will also explore them methodologically and generically, with an eye to how different kinds of evidence and sources can produce different kinds of conclusions.\u00a0 Historians' hypotheses will be tested by analysis of primary sources.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2107, "title": "Proseminar in Peace Studies", "code": "HIST 7937", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "The Proseminar in Peace Studies offers a multidisciplinary review of issues related to peace and conflict at the graduate level. The course is led by the director of the Judith Reppy Institute for Peace and Conflict Studies and is based on the Institute's weekly seminar series, featuring outside visitors and Cornell faculty.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2108, "title": "Supervised Reading", "code": "HIST 8004", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "Independent Study based supervised reading with a history faculty/field member.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2109, "title": "Independent Study-PIRIP", "code": "HIST 8010", "subject": "HIST", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "HIST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2110, "title": "Elementary Hungarian II", "code": "HUNGR 1132", "subject": "HUNGR", "descr": "Teaches more advanced grammar of the language at an intermediate level. Designed to aid the student in all facets of language acquisition: speaking, listening comprehension, reading, and writing.", "tags": "HUNGR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2111, "title": "Continuing Hungarian II", "code": "HUNGR 1134", "subject": "HUNGR", "descr": "Advanced instruction of the language at an intermediate level. Conversation and reading course designed to aid the student in speaking, listening comprehension, reading, and writing.", "tags": "HUNGR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2112, "title": "Worldly Explorations: Gateway to Engaged International Experiences for Undergraduates", "code": "IARD 2050", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "This discussion-based course introduces opportunities for international study available to juniors and seniors. Grounded in experiential learning through community engagement, public service, and leadership training, guest faculty and students discuss stimulating real-world learning experiences arising from a variety of courses and semesters abroad that include fieldwork in Africa, Asia, and Latin America. Opportunities for academic coursework beyond Cornell and for research and practical internships are also discussed. The course provides an opportunity for students to develop a personalized plan of study that matches their personal and professional aspirations. Such preparation might include combinations of area and language studies; training in community engagement, public service, and/or leadership; international travel workshops, specialized coursework, and/or research methodological development.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2113, "title": "Traditional Agriculture in Developing Nations", "code": "IARD 4030", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "Half the world's arable land is farmed by traditional farmers who have produced food and fiber for millennia with few outside inputs. Many of these practices are forgotten but some are still used by farmers in developing countries. This course examines the pros and cons of some of these traditional systems through the lens of various Cornell faculty who have experiences with traditional agriculture in developing countries.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2114, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "IARD 4721", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2115, "title": "Special Topics in International Agriculture and Rural Development", "code": "IARD 4940", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses, and special topics not covered in other courses, at the undergraduate level, under this number. Offerings vary by semester and will be advertised by the department. Courses offered under the number are approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2116, "title": "Independent Study in IARD", "code": "IARD 4970", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "Allows students the opportunity to investigate special interests that are not treated in regularly scheduled courses. The student develops a plan of study to pursue under the direction of a faculty member.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2117, "title": "Teaching Experience in International Agriculture and Rural Development", "code": "IARD 4980", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "This course enables undergraduate students to get valuable teaching experience in any one of the IARD courses for credit.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2118, "title": "Independent Study in Global Development (MPS Students)", "code": "IARD 5970", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "Allows M.P.S. students the opportunity to investigate special interests that are not treated in regularly scheduled courses. The student develops a plan of study to pursue under the direction of a faculty member.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2119, "title": "Graduate Special Topics in IARD", "code": "IARD 6940", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the semester starts. Courses offered under the number will be approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2120, "title": "Perspectives in International Development", "code": "IARD 6960", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "A variety of speakers present seminars on international development topics relating to sustainable development throughout the world. Students attend each seminar and submit a five-page essay at the end of the semester reflecting on the speakers' presentations and analyzing connections between topics.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2121, "title": "Global Development M.P.S. Seminar", "code": "IARD 6970", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "A seminar for M.P.S. - Global Development students to discuss important issues in their field and to prepare themselves to write M.P.S. project papers. Specific content varies.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2122, "title": "Teaching Experiences for MPS in Global Development", "code": "IARD 6980", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "This course enables MPS students to get valuable teaching experience in any one of the IARD courses for credit.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2123, "title": "Farmer-Centered Research and Extension", "code": "IARD 7830", "subject": "IARD", "descr": "A comparative analysis of extension and research philosophies and educational approaches to sustainable agriculture and natural resource management using case studies from developing countries.", "tags": "IARD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2124, "title": "Human Resource Management", "code": "ILRHR 2600", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Intended to introduce students to the field of human resource management (HRM). Students learn theories and applications involved in effectively managing people in organizations. In addition, this course covers current topics in HRM that have resulted from environmental and organizational challenges (e.g., technology, globalization, legislation, restructuring, work/life balance, changing labor markets). Emphasis is placed on developing relevant problem-solving and critical-thinking skills, as the basic concepts of HRM and the skills developed in this course are applicable to all types of organizations and jobs in which students will eventually work.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2125, "title": "Human Resources: Current Issues and Trends", "code": "ILRHR 2630", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Designed to develop key competencies and skills for researching, writing, and presenting information in a manner that will ensure academic and managerial success.\u00a0 Emphasis is given to hands-on training in techniques and methods for extracting and communicating best practices, competitive intelligence, legal information, statistical data, and academic research on topics of current interest to business.\u00a0 Topics covered will vary by semester and will be based upon current issues and trends in the HR field as submitted by HR executives of primarily Fortune 500 companies.\u00a0 Students will be required to apply best practices to a number of styles of business communication, including emails, memorandums, and executive summaries.\u00a0 In addition, the major assignment consists of an extensive research paper based on academic sources available through the Catherwood Library.\u00a0 Students will have the opportunity to revise their writing based on the feedback provided by the instructor and by their peers.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2126, "title": "Organizational Consulting: Process and Results", "code": "ILRHR 3650", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Provides students with the insights and tools they need to work successfully as human resource management consultants, both as HR managers operating within a firm to improve organizational effectiveness and as external consultants providing project support to an internal HR organization. The consulting process is examined primarily from a systems perspective. This includes the knowledge and skills required to build trust and influence, to contract with clients, and to maintain good working relationships with clients. It also includes developing a clear comprehension of the consulting process from diagnosis, through action planning, to implementation and completion. While attention is given to theory and practice, the focus is on gaining hands-on experience dealing with real-world issues. As a final project, students will work in teams on a live case providing consulting services to an organization with an existing HR issue (i.e., implementing a new HR program, effectuating a new organizational culture, and enhancing project team operations).", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2127, "title": "Executive Compensation and Corporate Governance", "code": "ILRHR 4607", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "This course examines the process by which executive incentives are created and the implications of those decisions on corporate effectiveness. Executive compensation is a very significant investment made by all corporations and how it is designed and delivered will impact the effectiveness of the organization and drive its ability to serve all of its stakeholders including employees, communities, suppliers, and customers in addition to shareholders. We will discuss the relative role, interests, and power of such entities as Institutional Shareholders, the Board, the Executives themselves, Regulators, the Press, Advisors, and rank-and-file employees in shaping the level and design of executive compensation. We will analyze how performance is measured and rewarded and discuss how those choices will impact executive decision making. In this course, you will come to understand the various forms of short and long-term incentives and the process by which they are benchmarked and administered. We will examine how these practices differ between public, private, and ventured owned companies.\u00a0This course will be useful for those who aspire to participate in and/or oversee such programs as well as those who will administer them as a finance, an accounting, or a human resources professional. Each student will learn how to examine and analyze both proxy and financial statements.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2128, "title": "Socially Responsible Business", "code": "ILRHR 4615", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "HR leaders are now being asked to lead the CSR function, to head the company foundation, or to create programs that engage employees in the community. They are also asked to oversee compliance around corporate ethics, whistleblower provisions, and to help safeguard the company's reputation. This course will examine how corporations and non-profits are engaging in socially beneficial activities as well as how some have engaged in harmful activities. The course begins with an overview of key regulatory and voluntary compliance regimens such as the Global Reporting Initiative, Sustainability Accounting Standards Board, and the Sarbanes Oxley Act. The course then examines the CSR reports and practices of such companies as Boeing, JP Morgan Chase, Tata Corporation, Volkswagen, Wells Fargo, and other firms. We will discuss such diverse topics as impact investing by corporations, tying executive compensation to ESG goals, the value of Employee Stock Ownership Plans (ESOP's), the rise of B-Corporations, social stock exchanges, and ESG due-diligence during mergers and acquisitions. We will also see how companies, non-profits, and governments are working together to invest in the future of American cities. Students will be evaluated on class participation, two short papers (5-7 pages), and a final exam.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2129, "title": "Staffing Organizations", "code": "ILRHR 4620", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Provides an overview of the processes by which organizations staff positions with both internal and external applicants. Through a combination of lectures, cases, and projects, the course covers theory, research, and legal foundations that inform organizational staffing actions. Topics include staffing strategy and context, measurement of staffing effectiveness, job/competency analysis, human resource planning, recruitment and job choice, retention, and internal and external selection practices.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2130, "title": "Rewards and Compensation", "code": "ILRHR 4631", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "This course explores theories, evidence, and cases on how organizational rewards and compensation structure affect individuals, groups, and organizations. Students will learn about positive and (unintended) negative consequences of compensation systems, ranging from incentive and sorting effects to the loss of intrinsic motivation and unethicality, and will have discussions on how to reconcile those issues. In addition, students will have a chance to make data-analysis-based compensation decisions themselves via a simulation project.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2131, "title": "Evidence Based Management", "code": "ILRHR 4667", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Contemporary managers are heavily swayed in their thinking and decisions by habit, fads, convention, and unrealistic levels of confidence (March, 2010; Pfeffer & Sutton, 2006). Managers practicing evidence-based management learn how to rethink their approaches to data and knowledge in order to make more effective decisions. Evidence-based management means making decisions based on the best available evidence with special emphasis on relevant scientific findings and unbiased organizational facts. It involves the active use of decision practices that reduce bias and judgment errors and give due consideration to ethical concerns. This course promotes your understanding and use of evidence-based management principles. It also guides you in developing the skills and knowledge needed to identify, access, and use quality evidence from science and practice in making better decisions.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2132, "title": "Honors Program", "code": "ILRHR 4950", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Students are eligible for ILR senior honors program if they (1) earn a minimum 3.700 cumulative gpa at end of junior year; (2) propose an honors project, entailing research leading to completion of a thesis, to an ILR faculty member who agrees to act as thesis supervisor; and (3) submit project, endorsed by proposed faculty sponsor, to the Academic Standards and Scholarships Committee.\u00a0 Accepted students embark on a two-semester sequence. The first semester consists of determining a research design, familiarization with germane scholarly literature, and preliminary data collection. The second semester involves completion of the data collection and preparation of the honors thesis. At the end of the second semester, the candidate is examined orally on the completed thesis by a committee consisting of the thesis supervisor, a second faculty member designated by the appropriate department chair, and a representative of the Academic Standards and Scholarship Committee.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2133, "title": "Executive Compensation", "code": "ILRHR 5607", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "This course will provide students with an overview of the design, structure, purpose, and \"fairness\" of executive compensation as seen from the perspective of all stakeholders including executives, other employees, regulators, board members, institutional shareholders, independent advisors, and the independent press. Students will learn the structure of all components of executive pay (including base pay, annual incentives, performance plans, and equity-based pay), understand how performance and pay levels are determined, and investigate how the various stakeholders interact in the decision-making process. The course will examine each critical decision made in the executive pay determination process to uncover why decisions are made and the leverage applied by each of the constituent parties. The course will also examine the linkages between executive compensation, corporate governance,\u00a0and business strategy as well as the issues surrounding compliance with securities laws, tax regulations, accounting standards, and corporate governance. Lectures will be supplemented with guest speakers representing the stakeholder groups.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2134, "title": "HR Leadership: Views from the Top", "code": "ILRHR 5620", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Hands-on course offering students a unique opportunity to learn and develop key competencies required of HR leaders. The course will focus on developing an understanding of the role and responsibilities of modern HR leaders, and exploration of the key competencies tied to successful performance as an HR leader. The course will be taught in partnership with current or former Chief HR officers and will include the exploration of topics including setting and driving an HR strategy, coaching and influencing line leaders, setting and driving organizational culture, HR's role in mergers and acquisitions, and driving change. Students will apply learnings from lectures and readings to complete an individual project related to how they will make a positive impact as a leader in the organization that they will work for after the semester. The goal of the course is to provide students with a model of HR leadership, learning on key competencies, and a personal development plan to prepare themselves to become HR leaders.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2135, "title": "Organizational Consulting", "code": "ILRHR 5665", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Provides students with the insights and tools they need to work successfully as human resource management consultants, both as HR managers operating within a firm to improve organizational effectiveness and as external consultants providing project support to an internal HR organization. The consulting process is examined primarily from a systems perspective. This includes the knowledge and skills required to build trust and influence, to contract with clients, and to maintain good working relationships with clients. It also includes developing a clear comprehension of the consulting process from diagnosis, through action planning, to implementation and completion.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2136, "title": "Staffing Organizations", "code": "ILRHR 5680", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Provides an overview of the processes by which organizations staff positions with both internal and external applicants. Through a combination of lectures, cases, and projects, the course covers theory, research, and legal foundations that inform organizational staffing actions. Topics include staffing strategy and context, measurement of staffing effectiveness, job/competency analysis, human resource planning, recruitment and job choice, retention, and internal and external selection practices.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2137, "title": "Rewards and Compensation", "code": "ILRHR 5690", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "This course explores theories, evidence, and cases on how organizational rewards and compensation structure affect individuals, groups, and organizations. Students will learn about positive and (unintended) negative consequences of compensation systems, ranging from incentive and sorting effects to the loss of intrinsic motivation and unethicality, and will have discussions on how to reconcile those issues. In addition, students will have a chance to make data-analysis-based compensation decisions themselves via a simulation project.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2138, "title": "Organizational Diversity and Inclusion", "code": "ILRHR 6400", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "The diversity of the U.S. workforce has been steadily increasing over the last 50 years, and is projected to continue increasing significantly.\u00a0 Although Title VII of the Civil Rights Act was passed in 1964 to prohibit employment discrimination based on an individual's race, color, religion, sex, or national origin, and other employment legislation has since been passed to prohibit discrimination based on other group characteristics such as age and disability status, claims of discrimination have been on the rise. This suggests that much work remains to be done in organizations. The purpose of this course is to introduce you to current theory, research, and practice regarding discrimination and inclusion in the workplace.\u00a0 We will begin by defining diversity and the multiple existing justifications for \"managing diversity\" within organizations. We will then examine bias within organizations, including its root cause in stereotyping and power differentials, and its manifestation in the implementation of HR practices, the treatment of employees, and in broader society. We will also explore the impact of demographic diversity on the functioning of work groups/teams, particularly as it relates to commonly made arguments about the \"business case\" for diversity.\u00a0 We will spend some time discussing the role of HR and diversity practices in fostering inclusion, and the important role of an organization's climate and culture. Finally, we will begin to explore the role of leaders and change agents in fostering diversity and inclusion.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2139, "title": "Socially Responsible Business", "code": "ILRHR 6615", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "HR leaders are now being asked to lead the CSR function, to head the company foundation, or to create programs that engage employees in the community. They are also asked to oversee compliance around corporate ethics, whistleblower provisions, and to help safeguard the company reputation. This course will examine how corporations and non-profits are engaging in socially beneficial activities as well as how some have engaged in socially harmful activities. The course begins with an overview of key regulatory and voluntary compliance regimens such as the Sarbanes Oxley Act, Dodd-Frank, Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, FASB regulations, and the conflict of interest and ethics policies of domestic and international corporations and non-profits. We will then review the policies, programs, and cultures of certain corporations and non-profits that have allowed them to create strong and good reputations as well as examples of corporations that have engaged in fraudulent and unethical behavior. We will discuss such diverse topics as impact investing by corporations, the excesses of executive compensation, bribery, product liability and operational debacles, and the role and value of good organizational reputations. Some of the companies and countries we will focus on include: Merck Corporation (US), Tata Corporation (India), Yara (Norway), Coca Cola (Mexico), Environmental Defense Fund (US), Accenture (US), Chiquita (South America).", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2140, "title": "Evidence-Based Management", "code": "ILRHR 6667", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Contemporary managers are heavily swayed in their thinking and decisions by habit, fads, convention, and unrealistic levels of confidence (March, 2010; Pfeffer & Sutton, 2006). Managers practicing evidence-based management learn how to rethink their approaches to data and knowledge in order to make more effective decisions. Evidence-based management means making decisions based on the best available evidence with special emphasis on relevant scientific findings and unbiased organizational facts. It involves the active use of decision practices that reduce bias and judgment errors and give due consideration to ethical concerns. This course promotes your understanding and use of evidence-based management principles. It also guides you in developing the skills and knowledge needed to identify, access, and use quality evidence from science and practice in making better decisions.", "tags": "HA-AS|SCD-AS|ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2141, "title": "Fundamentals of Benefits and the Employee Value Proposition", "code": "ILRHR 6685", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "More than ever before, employee benefits are at the center of the conversation as organizations look for ways to strengthen their Employee Value Proposition and create a \"Great Place to Work\". The purpose of this course is to provide a strategic overview of the role of employee benefits and how organizations leverage what is one of the largest and most variable P&L costs in both a pre/post COVID environment. Gaining access to, attracting, and keeping the highest caliber talent is the ultimate goal.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2142, "title": "Leadership Assessment for Managers", "code": "ILRHR 7451", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to assess the leadership and management skills of students by providing an opportunity to gather feedback on their strengths and developmental needs. \u00a0The first few classes will focus on self-awareness and employs several experiential exercises and self-assessment instruments including: \u00a0Leadership 360 Assessment, the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator (MBTI), Thomas-Kilmann Conflict Mode Instrument (TKI), and the Fundamental Interpersonal Relations Orientation-Behavior (FIRO-B). Class members will be trained in giving and receiving feedback from team members. Activities in the last days of the course will include various leadership and team challenges.\u00a0 Professional feedback providers will observe students in group work on leadership cases and exercises and provide feedback on their observations and the results of individual instruments. The final day of the course students will focus on goal setting for future leadership development.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2143, "title": "Workshop in Human Resource Studies", "code": "ILRHR 9600", "subject": "ILRHR", "descr": "Provides a forum for the presentation and critical discussion of current research being undertaken by graduate students, faculty members, and invited guests in the field of human resource studies. All M.S. and Ph.D. candidates in the Department of Human Resource Studies are urged to enroll; candidates in other departments are cordially invited. Each participant has an opportunity to benefit from the collective wisdom of others in the formulation, design, and execution of his or her research, as well as to become current on the latest developments in the field.", "tags": "ILRHR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2144, "title": "Sociology of Work: Micro Meets Macro", "code": "ILRIC 2310", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course will look at multiple dimensions of work and labor from a sociological perspective. We will consider not only the large-scale processes that influence the structure and shape of work, but also how those processes and structures affect individual workers and the strategies that individuals and groups use to improve labor market outcomes. Crucial to this endeavor is an acknowledgement that outcomes differ drastically depending on the identities and positionality of workers and this will be reflected throughout course content. Major topics of inquiry will include classic and contemporary theories of work and labor markets, race and ethnicity, age, gender, sexuality, immigration, the role of unions and other worker collectives, and entrepreneurship.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2145, "title": "Work, Labor, and Capital in the Global Economy", "code": "ILRIC 2350", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "Provides an introduction to how globalization is changing the nature of work, labor, and capital. It examines both contemporary and historical debates about globalization, but also covers a number of interrelated issues, including the regulation of labor standards, the mobility of capital, the rise of global production systems, international labor, and responses to globalization. Lectures and discussion for the topics mentioned above will be grounded in the experiences of different countries, firms, workplaces, industrial sectors, and individuals.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2146, "title": "Money, Work, and Power", "code": "ILRIC 2385", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course will explore key topics in the critical study of labor and capitalism through the lens of food. Questions of race, gender,and class, but also toxicity, settler colonialism, as well as production and reproduction can all be read in the landscapes of food provision and procurement. Food is the ground for an array of labor processes\u2014planting, harvesting, transporting, serving,and eating, just to name a few. Some of these forms of work are overt (stooped workers toiling in pesticide ridden field, for example). But some of these forms of work are invisible and unpaid. And sometimes, they are incredibly well remunerated but totally shadowy. By studying these different forms of work comparatively, we can understand genealogies and futures of inequality, resource use, and the nature of work itself. As this is a writing seminar, we will think not only about how to write but also about the effects of writing in the world. We will think about genre and representation, particularly as writing on food shapes the lives of the often racialized and sexualized workerswho bring food into being.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2147, "title": "Food and Work", "code": "ILRIC 3325", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course will explore key topics in the critical study of labor and capitalism through the lens of food. Questions of race, gender, and class, but also toxicity, settler colonialism, as well as production and reproduction can all be read in the landscapes of food provision and procurement. Food is the ground for an array of labor processes\u2014planting, harvesting, transporting, serving, and eating, just to name a few. Some of these forms of work are overt (stooped workers toiling in pesticide ridden field, for example). But some of these forms of work are invisible and unpaid. And sometimes, they are incredibly well remunerated but totally shadowy. By studying these different forms of work comparatively, we can understand genealogies and futures of inequality, resource use, and the nature of work itself.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2148, "title": "Labor Practices in Global Supply Chains: Multi-Stakeholder Perspectives", "code": "ILRIC 3375", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course focuses on the evolution, current trajectories, and methods to improve labor practices in global supply chains. We will examine the key issue of why, after 25 years of corporate efforts and intensive consumer activism, there have not been sustainable improvements in labor practices in the global supply chains in the apparel industry.\u00a0 Taking both a Corporate Social Responsibility, and Global Value Chains perspective, we will examine a range of problems and issues that inhibit sustainability, and explore new innovative developments that show promise.\u00a0 Several stakeholders from corporations, NGOS, monitoring firms, and/or suppliers will engage with the class, either in person or through videoconferencing. The course will end with an evaluation of approaches that are both innovative and promising.\u00a0 Students will be expected to write \"position papers\" on current developments, which will be circulated to multiple stakeholders so that the output from the course is relevant. The course also offers opportunities for students to engage more deeply in research projects that are currently underway.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2149, "title": "Migration and Mobility: Theories and Lived Realities", "code": "ILRIC 4367", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course will provide the student with an understanding of both classic and contemporary research and perspectives on migration and mobility, with special attention to how both inform labor market outcomes. Major topics of concern are how migration intersects with issues of law, race and ethnicity, gender and sexuality, education, employment discrimination, health, and social networks. Although course content will primarily focus on issues of migration impacting the United States, we will also consider contemporary migration issues of importance in other areas of the world.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2150, "title": "People Power: Resistance Protest and Revolution", "code": "ILRIC 4390", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2151, "title": "Empire of Migrants", "code": "ILRIC 4395", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "The Chinese diaspora can be found in nearly every corner of the globe today. Although Chinese emigration accelerated under what came to be known as \"globalization\" in the late 20th century, in fact the global movement of Chinese people is not a new phenomenon. This course will use both internal migration and global immigration as a lens for understanding China's development, politics, and society more broadly. In focusing on the period from the\u00a0mid-19th\u00a0century to the present, we will see that the movement of Chinese people has both shaped, and been shaped by, colonialism, the global economy, and international politics.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2152, "title": "ILR Global Scholars Capstone", "code": "ILRIC 4940", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This capstone course is open to ILR Global Scholars (GS) during their last semester of their senior year. The course is designed for GS to incorporate their education and experience abroad with the concepts and theories they have gained while at the ILR School. The overarching goal of this class is to bring GS together to collectively reflect on and identify key aspects of intercultural competency related to their personal and cultural growth, academic and professional development and roles as future global citizens. The structure of the course will be group discussions, peer review, and individual reflection papers. The final capstone reflection paper will fulfill the course requirement and the Global Scholars Program final reflection requirement.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2153, "title": "Field Research", "code": "ILRIC 4970", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "All requests for permission to register for an internship must be approved by the faculty member who will supervise the project and the chairman of the faculty member's academic department before submission for approval by the director of off-campus credit programs. Upon approval of the internship, the Office of Student Services will register each student for 4970, for 4 credits graded A+ to F for individual research, and for ILRIC 4980, for 8 credits graded S-U, for completion of a professionally appropriate learning experience, which is graded by the faculty sponsor.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2154, "title": "Human Resources and Outsourcing in the Networked Firm", "code": "ILRIC 5300", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course examines outsourcing decisions from a human resources perspective, and the human resource implications of managing workers in increasingly networked organizations. Outsourcing, offshoring, spin-offs, and the use of temporary staffing agencies all create challenges for human resource management. Firms face issues of retaining employee knowledge and skills, coordinating HR policies across multiple subcontractors, and motivating workers on different employment contracts \u2013 who in some cases work together within a workplace or virtually. In addition, organizations face increasingly complex decisions concerning the mix of sourcing strategies to use for their own HR functions and processes. The quality and content of these decisions have implications for performance outcomes, as well as for job quality and employee careers. We will analyze these challenges and evaluate strategies to address them from a comparative and international perspective, using industry- and firm-based case studies from North America, Europe, and Asia. The course will end with a discussion of current and future trends, including crowdsourcing, managing the human cloud, and the sharing economy. Some sample company case studies include Boeing, P&G, Toyota, and IKEA.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2155, "title": "Labor Solidarity and Union Campaigns", "code": "ILRIC 5310", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "In this class, we will compare case studies of labor union and other worker-led campaigns based on old and new forms of solidarity, both within countries and transnationally. Each week, we will discuss a different case study through presentations by labor and community organizers and researchers. Students will produce a website with case descriptions, interview transcripts, and other resources.\u202fPast case studies include the Volkswagen and Bank Workers campaigns in the US, international organizing at\u00a0RyanAir\u00a0and Amazon in Europe, migrant worker organizing at the Shelter for Foreign workers initiative in South Korea, and\u202fcollective action\u202fby app-based workers\u202fin Argentina.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2156, "title": "Labor Practices in Global Supply Chains: Multi-Stakeholder Perspectives", "code": "ILRIC 5375", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course focuses on the evolution, current trajectories, and methods to improve labor practices in global supply chains. We will examine the key issue of why, after 25 years of corporate efforts and intensive consumer activism, there have not been sustainable improvements in labor practices in the global supply chains in the apparel industry. Taking both a Corporate Social Responsibility, and Global Value Chains perspective, we will examine a range of problems and issues that inhibit sustainability, and explore new innovative developments that show promise. Several stakeholders from corporations, NGOS, monitoring firms, and/or suppliers will engage with the class, either in person or through videoconferencing. The course will end with an evaluation of approaches that are both innovative and promising. Students will be expected to write \"position papers\" on current developments, which will be circulated to multiple stakeholders so that the output from the course is relevant. The course also offers opportunities for students to engage more deeply in research projects that are currently underway.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2157, "title": "Labor Markets and Income Distribution in Developing Economies", "code": "ILRIC 6350", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "The course covers three major topics: labor markets in the developing world, distribution and development: theory and evidence, and policies to deal with these issues.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2158, "title": "Migration and Mobility: Theories and Lived Realities", "code": "ILRIC 6367", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "This course will provide the student with an understanding of both classic and contemporary research and perspectives on migration and mobility, with special attention to how both inform labor market outcomes. Major topics of concern are how migration intersects with issues of law, race and ethnicity, gender and sexuality, education, employment discrimination, health, and social networks. Although course content will primarily focus on issues of migration impacting the United States, we will also consider contemporary migration issues of importance in other areas of the world.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2159, "title": "Empire of Migrants", "code": "ILRIC 6395", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "The Chinese diaspora can be found in nearly every corner of the globe today. Although Chinese emigration accelerated under what came to be known as \"globalization\" in the late 20th century, in fact the global movement of Chinese people is not a new phenomenon. This course will use both internal migration and global immigration as a lens for understanding China's development, politics, and society more broadly. In focusing on the period from the\u00a0mid-19th\u00a0century to the present, we will see that the movement of Chinese people has both shaped, and been shaped by, colonialism, the global economy, and international politics.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2160, "title": "Economic Democracy and Employee Voice", "code": "ILRIC 7710", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "Employee voice is an important focus of research in a range of fields, spanning Organizational Behavior, Human Resource Studies, and Employment Relations. In this graduate seminar, we will discuss different theoretical and empirical approaches to studying employee voice, with the aim of developing a more integrative understanding of its causes and consequences. Under what conditions are employees more likely to communicate ideas, concerns, or suggestions? What institutional or organizational conditions support expanded employee participation in decision-making \u2013 within work groups, workplaces, organizations, and industries?\u202f How are productivity or efficiency gains from expanded employee voice distributed? And under what conditions do they result in improvements in pay and working conditions? We will give particular attention to comparing Organizational Behavior and Employment Relations perspectives. Some sample topics include: organizational justice and voice; the psychology of silencing interest-group representation; harassment and mobbing; the psychology of negotiation; voice, silence, and diversity; high performance work systems; teams and direct participation; national institutions and democracy at work; unions and voice.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2161, "title": "Workshop in International and Comparative Labor", "code": "ILRIC 9800", "subject": "ILRIC", "descr": "Provides a forum for the presentation of current research being undertaken by faculty members and graduate students in the Department of International and Comparative Labor, and by invited guests. All M.S. and Ph.D. candidates in the department who are at work on their theses are strongly urged to enroll. Students are encouraged to make presentations focusing on the formulation, design, execution, and results of their thesis research.", "tags": "ILRIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2162, "title": "Essential Desktop Applications", "code": "ILRID 2660", "subject": "ILRID", "descr": "Provides skills in the use of personal computers that run the Windows operating system. Covers fundamental technical concepts and time-saving techniques for Windows, and Microsoft Excel, Access, and PowerPoint. Emphasizes hands-on experience and development of PC-based solutions and strategies by using examples that address human resource and other practical real-world issues. Students will take the industry-recognized Microsoft test to gain certification as a Microsoft Office Specialist (MOS) in Excel. The skills developed in this course are useful prerequisites for several elective courses in human resource management and essential in the 21st-century workplace.", "tags": "ILRID", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2163, "title": "Fundraising, Grantmaking, and Lobbying", "code": "ILRID 4431", "subject": "ILRID", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ILRID", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2164, "title": "Inclusive Leadership", "code": "ILRID 4675", "subject": "ILRID", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ILRID", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2165, "title": "Advanced Desktop Applications", "code": "ILRID 4699", "subject": "ILRID", "descr": "This course will incorporate advanced topics in Microsoft Excel and Access. The Excel portion will focus on advanced use of functions, creating form controls, macros, pivot tables, and organization and analysis of large data sets to incorporate into a model. The Access portion will focus on integrated use with Excel and complex relationships and queries.", "tags": "ILRID", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2166, "title": "Fundraising, Grantmaking, and Lobbying", "code": "ILRID 6431", "subject": "ILRID", "descr": "This course is designed for graduate students considering a career in the non-profit sector.\u00a0 It will provide an overview of philanthropy, specific giving vehicles (annual fund, major gifts, capital gifts, deferred gifts, etc.), capital campaigns, grant writing, working with private foundations and community foundations, and crowdfunding techniques.\u00a0 At the completion of the course students will have a strong working knowledge of key principles and techniques of fundraising and a familiarity with gift vehicles and instruments.", "tags": "ILRID", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2167, "title": "Advanced Desktop Applications", "code": "ILRID 6990", "subject": "ILRID", "descr": "This course will incorporate advanced topics in Microsoft Excel and Access. The Excel portion will focus on advanced use of functions, creating form controls, macros, pivot tables, and organization and analysis of large data sets to incorporate into a model. The Access portion will focus on integrated use with Excel and complex relationships and queries.", "tags": "ILRID", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2168, "title": "Economics of Wages and Employment", "code": "ILRLE 2400", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "Applies the theory and elementary tools of economics to the characteristics and problems of the labor market. Considers both the demand (employer) and supply (employee) sides of the market to gain a deeper understanding of the effects of various government programs and private decisions targeted at the labor market. Topics include employment demand, basic compensation determination, education and training, benefits and the structure of compensation, labor-force participation and its relation to household production, occupational choice, migration, labor-market discrimination, and the effects of unions.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2169, "title": "Development of Economic Thought and Institutions", "code": "ILRLE 3440", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "Examines the causes and consequences of sustained economic growth, and the development of economics as a discipline, from pre-industrial mercantilist thought through the economics of John Maynard Keynes. Stresses the relationship between the consequences of 19th-century economic growth and the evolution of economic thought.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2170, "title": "Race and the American Labor Market in Historical Perspective", "code": "ILRLE 3450", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "This class investigates race and class in the American labor market from Colonial America to the present day. We investigate the circumstances and labor institutions that brought labor to the U.S. and how laborers of various classes were received. A primary goal of the class is to understand the degree to which social mobility was historically possible in different time periods in American history. Social mobility is intimately tied to labor market institutions and the ability for workers to get ahead within those institutions. Some of the institutions we study are Indentured Servitude, Slavery, tenant farming, the Great Migration and labor organization in the industrial north. Ultimately we hope to build an understanding of the historical roots of the role of race and class today.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2171, "title": "New Technologies and the Labor Market", "code": "ILRLE 3460", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "This course examines economic approaches to how new technologies impact the labour market. We will study how robots and digital technologies affect the nature of jobs and tasks, how technological developments affect the nature and flexibility of work contracts, as well as how firms and workers search and find each other. We will discuss the emergence of flexible work arrangements (gig economy, teleworking). The goal is to learn how economists approach and analyse these phenomena, both theoretically and empirically.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2172, "title": "Compensation, Incentives, and Productivity", "code": "ILRLE 4430", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "Examines topics in labor economics of particular relevance to individual managers and firms. Representative topics include recruitment, screening, and hiring strategies; compensation (including retirement pensions and other benefits); training, turnover, and the theory of human capital; incentive schemes and promotions; layoffs, downsizing, and buyouts; teamwork; and internal labor markets. Focuses on labor-related business problems using the analytic tools of economic theory and should appeal to students with strong quantitative skills who are contemplating careers in general business, consulting, and human resource management as well as in economics.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2173, "title": "Labor Economics", "code": "ILRLE 5400", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "This is a course in labor market economics for prospective managers in the corporate, union, not-for-profit, and public sectors. The course begins with demand and supply in labor markets, presenting the tools of decision analysis for workers and firms. It then goes on to consider various topics in workplace management including deciding on the optimal mix of capital and labor to employ, attracting and retaining talent, pay and productivity, hiring and training investments, and using strategic budget constraints. The final section of the course covers other important labor market issues including analysis of public policies, unemployment, discrimination, poverty and inequality, and pensions and Social Security.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2174, "title": "Advances in Labor Economics", "code": "ILRLE 7465", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "This course aims to provide an in-depth perspective on three important themes in modern labor economics: (1) Job search, (2) Technological change and new forms of work, (3) Sorting of workers and firms. Both micro and macro perspectives will be considered.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2175, "title": "Workshop in Labor Economics", "code": "ILRLE 9400", "subject": "ILRLE", "descr": "Presentations of completed papers and work in progress by faculty members, advanced graduate students, and speakers from other universities. Focuses on the formulation, design, and execution of dissertations.", "tags": "ILRLE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2176, "title": "Introduction to U.S. Labor History", "code": "ILRLR 1100", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Introductory survey covering the major changes in the nature of work, the workforce, and the institutions involved in industrial relations from the late 19th century to the present.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2177, "title": "Labor and Employment Law", "code": "ILRLR 2010", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Survey and analysis of the law governing labor relations and employee rights in the workplace. Half of the course examines the legal framework in which collective bargaining takes place, including union organizational campaigns, negotiations for and enforcement of collective bargaining agreements, and the use of economic pressure. The other half surveys the laws against discrimination based on race, religion, sex, national origin, age, and disability. Also serves as an introduction to judicial and administrative systems.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2178, "title": "Introduction to Conflict Resolution and Negotiation", "code": "ILRLR 2040", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This will be a large introductory-level course designed to be of value and appealing to the broad Cornell undergraduate student body. It will provide an introduction to the concepts of conflict, negotiations, and conflict resolution. The course will examine negotiations and conflict resolution in a range of different contexts, such as labor and employment, commercial, educational, family, environmental and community conflicts. The course will be taught in a large lecture format, but will also feature extensive student participation in simulation exercises.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2179, "title": "Labor Relations", "code": "ILRLR 2050", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "A comprehensive introduction to the labor relations systems of the United States and other countries. Covers the determinants of bargaining power, the process of labor agreement negotiation and administration, and assessment of the effects that collective representation exerts on economic and social outcomes. Special consideration is given to the increasing importance of new technology and international factors including global supply chains.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2180, "title": "Writing Seminar in Law", "code": "ILRLR 2060", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Topics change depending on semester and instructor. Possible topics include:\u00a0Topic: Socio-Legal Perspectives on Disability.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2181, "title": "Six Pretty Good Books: Explorations in Social Science", "code": "ILRLR 2580", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course is modeled after \"Great Books\" literature courses in the humanities, but with two important differences: we read non-fiction books in the social sciences rather than the humanities, written by highly prominent contemporary social scientists. The course title refers to the fact that the books are new, hence their potential greatness has yet to be confirmed by the test of time. We choose living authors to give students a unique opportunity: to interact with each of the six authors in Q&A sessions in person or via video conferencing. This fall some of the authors will appear in person for Q&A and the others will Skype with the class.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2182, "title": "Migration: Histories, Controversies, and Perspectives", "code": "ILRLR 2810", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This introductory course introduces students to issues and debates related to international migration and will provide an interdisciplinary foundation to understanding the factors that shape migration flows and migrant experiences. \u00a0We will start by reviewing theories of the state and historical examples of immigrant racialization and exclusion in the United States and beyond. \u00a0We will critically examine the notions of borders, citizenship/non-citizenship, and the creation of diasporas. \u00a0Students will also hear a range of perspectives by exposing them to Cornell guest faculty who do research and teach on migration across different disciplines and methodologies and in different world areas. Examples include demographic researchers concerned with immigrant inequality and family formation, geographic perspectives on the changing landscapes of immigrant metropolises, legal scholarship on the rights of immigrant workers, and the study of immigrant culture from a feminist studies lens. \u00a0Offered each fall semester.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2183, "title": "Special Topics in Labor Law", "code": "ILRLR 3045", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Undergraduate seminar whose topic changes depending on semester and instructor.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2184, "title": "Rhetoric of the Labor Movement", "code": "ILRLR 3055", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course equips students to use different modes of rhetorical analysis to examine historical and contemporary artifacts in critical ways.\u00a0 Grading is based on class participation, tests and a final paper.\u00a0 The final paper requires students to identify primary source materials with a connection to either past or present labor movements and apply one or more of these modes of rhetorical criticism as the basis of an unique investigation into a\u00a0particular labor movement's significant symbolic acts.\u00a0 Students will be expected to hone their own teaching and public speaking skills by giving at least one major in class presentation.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2185, "title": "Advocacy and Debate", "code": "ILRLR 3300", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Students learn the principles of argumentation and debate. Topics emphasize Internet database research, synthesis of collected data, policy analysis of evidentiary quality, refutation of counter claims, identification of logical fallacies, risk evaluation, framing of issues, and coherent storytelling. Prepares students to work with a great range of opinion and evidence. Emphasizes different viewpoints, including those of different cultures. Assumptions are interrogated.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2186, "title": "Southern West Virginia's Coal Fields - Ancient Struggles Amidst Hopeful Dreams", "code": "ILRLR 3825", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course will critically analyze the labor, political, racial and environmental struggles that have characterized the shaping of the coalfields of Southern West Virginia and to some extent, other Appalachian coalfields. Why for 130 years have so many families embraced and fought against King Coal?What has been the role of the Mine Workers union (UMWA) in shaping hope in the region? How big of a deal is religion? Race? Geography? What comprises Life in these regions of America? Attendance and participation mandatory.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2187, "title": "Workers' Rights as Human Rights", "code": "ILRLR 3830", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course, a distance learning endeavor with the International Labor Organization in Geneva, examines U.S. domestic labor law and policy using internationally accepted human rights principles as standards for judgment. Considers the idea of human rights, its philosophical and moral origins, and introduces the legal and social obligations of both governments and nonstate actors to respect the human rights of workers. Topics include the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, ILO International Labor Standards, the Declaration on Fundamental Principles and Rights at Work, workers' freedom of association and the right to organize and collectively bargain, occupational health and safety, discrimination, forced labor, child labor, migrant labor, labor rights defined in international trade agreements, the value judgments underlying labor policy choices, and the struggle for enforcement of human rights standards nationally and international. The course examines these topics in an internationally comparative context and includes presentations and discussions from international experts on various human rights issues.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2188, "title": "The History of Consumption: From Wedgwood to Wal-Mart", "code": "ILRLR 3870", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Whether buying at a general store, shopping at a department store, or loitering at a mall, consumption has always formed an important part of the American experience. More than just commodities bought and sold, consumption is also about the institutions, social practices, cultural meanings, and economic functions that have surrounded the merchandise. This course will look at the changing meanings consumption has had for life, politics, and economy in the US over the past 300 years.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2189, "title": "Unfree Labor: Servants, Slaves, and Wives", "code": "ILRLR 3880", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Examines various forms of unfree labor, mostly in the antebellum (pre-Civil War) era in the United States. Will look at the situation of indentured servants and apprentices, African slaves, and wives of all social classes. Reading includes both autobiographical and historical studies. Will also discuss the contrasts and interrelationships among these different groups of early American workers.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2190, "title": "Dispute Resolution Practicum", "code": "ILRLR 4019", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "The course is designed to be a practice-based seminar for students who have interest in arbitration, mediation and third party procedures.\u00a0 Classroom discussion and reading will focus on labor and employment arbitration and mediation cases.\u00a0 Significant class time will be spent with students preparing and participating in arbitration and mediation scrimmages with their classmates to foster a deep understanding of how advocates prepare and present cases and how arbitrators decide them. The effectiveness of arbitration and mediation as a technique for resolving conflict will be assessed and lessons will be drawn about the practices used by advocates, neutrals and parties.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2191, "title": "Disability and Employment Policy", "code": "ILRLR 4023", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Provides an overview of a range of public policies regarding the employment of people with disabilities. Students are introduced to the historical development of disability public policy and to contemporary practices in implementing these policies at the state and organizational levels. Students explore the multiple areas of public policy relevant to persons with disabilities, including veterans legislation, worker's compensation, vocational rehabilitation, workforce development, social insurance, and civil rights legislation such as the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA). Throughout the class, students will consider the relationship between disability employment policy and larger social and political developments. Students also will analyze how public policies have developed in practice, bridging the divides between policy as written, policy as implemented, and policy as practiced.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2192, "title": "Campus Mediation Practicum", "code": "ILRLR 4027", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course is offered to students interested in acquiring the knowledge, skills and techniques necessary to mediate interpersonal disputes. In the first segment of the course, students will be introduced to the guiding principles of interpersonal mediation. A review of the theories of conflict, its roots and its resolution, set the stage for the role mediation can effectively play in resolving conflict. Students are introduced to the models of mediation and the benefits and challenges of each, including a comparative analysis of evaluative, facilitative and transformative styles of mediation. In the second segment, students will be assigned to mediate cases referred to the Scheinman Institute from the Office of the Judicial Administrator. The role of gender, race, culture, ethics and impasse in mediation will all be examined and incorporated into workshops and case studies. Students will have several opportunities to apply their knowledge of mediation and acquire the skills necessary to become effective mediators. Following each case assignment, students will be required to write a paper analyzing the nature of the complaint, the approach and techniques employed during the case and the student's evaluation of what worked and did not work in their attempt to resolve the conflict. Oversight will be provided by the course instructors.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2193, "title": "Campus Mediation Practicum II: Advanced Issues in Restorative Justice", "code": "ILRLR 4029", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course is offered to students interested in furthering their knowledge of the principles and practices of restorative justice. Students will also acquire the knowledge, skills and techniques necessary to mediate complex campus disputes.\u00a0The course considers the needs and roles of key stakeholders (victims, offenders, communities, justice systems) and explores in depth the principles and values of restorative justice. It also identifies challenges to restorative justice - the dangers, the pitfalls \u2013 as well as possible strategies to help prevent restorative justice from failing to live up to its promise. Much of the course is organized around the issue of harm and crime within our legal system. However, students will also be exposed to restorative justice in multiple contexts, including issues in higher education.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2194, "title": "Disability Law", "code": "ILRLR 4033", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course reviews United States law as it relates to people with disabilities.\u00a0 The self-advocacy and empowerment movement in America contributes substantially to the broad and significant development in disability rights law.\u00a0 Students in this course will learn about the nuances of disability law, including gaining an understanding of the types of barriers to access and the nondiscrimination laws that impact the lives of persons with disabilities across the lifespan.\u00a0 Topics will include K-12 and higher education, transition to work, employment discrimination, public accommodations and programmatic access.\u00a0 This course will explore current case law and legislation including application of legal principles to disability law.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2195, "title": "Intersectionality in Disability Studies", "code": "ILRLR 4035", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "A recognition of the importance of intersectionality has become increasingly key to not only understand the complexity of social identity and lived experience, but to combat discrimination and oppression. While the course has a centering focus on the disability experience-in part because of the way in which disability is often left out of intersectional considerations-it will reveal how the economic, legal, and political structures of power and privilege that disadvantage people with disabilities cannot be looked at on a disability-specific basis alone. Thus we will give necessary attention to the disability experience as it overlaps and connects with lived experiences of race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, socioeconomic status, and citizenship, among others. In looking particularly at the realms of employment, education, the law, and health care, we will explore the efficacy of legal and policy initiatives that are already in place, and in doing so, strongly consider the growing need for, and value of, intersectional approaches to discrimination and oppression.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2196, "title": "Technological Change at Work", "code": "ILRLR 4066", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Computers and digital technologies including robotics, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), internet-enabled platforms, and other \"high-tech\" drivers of automation have revolutionized the nature and organization of work in the U.S., with material implications for workers and their families, among others. This upper-level seminar begins with a rhetorical inquiry into whether and when the technological change engendered by digitization and the so-called \"Information Technology (IT) Revolution\" benefits workers. We then consider the broader impact of recent technological advances on manufacturing and fabrication, low- and semi-skilled service work, i.e., restaurant servers and bus drivers, and even on expert and professional work like that to which most of you presumably aspire. Among the central themes is the notion that technology does not unilaterally act upon workers, their employers, or society-at-large. Rather, workers, managers, customers, institutions, and policymakers shape which advances take hold and which do not, the ways that these technologies are deployed in the workplace, and the ways that society can actively mitigate the costs to technological advancement while harnessing its benefits.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2197, "title": "Values, Rights, and Justice at Work", "code": "ILRLR 4075", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Examination of the often hidden values and assumptions that underlie the contemporary U.S. systems of employment law, work and business, and industrial relations. Classroom discussions and student research projects use short stories, plays, poems and related materials to focus on issues such as discrimination; law, economics, and the state; work and business; power, conflict, and protest; and rights and justice.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2198, "title": "The Science of Social Behavior", "code": "ILRLR 4580", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This is a capstone seminar for seniors who are interested in graduate or professional study in scientific disciplines that focus on human behavior and social interaction. The intent is to provide seniors with an opportunity to summon, integrate, and apply insights that they have acquired over the course of their undergraduate education, and give prospective graduate students the opportunity to lead discussions in\u00a0a large introductory lecture course, \"Six Pretty Good Books\". Each seminar member is part of a two or three-person team that leads the discussion together, under the supervision of a graduate teaching assistant. Seminar meetings are devoted to building lesson plans for leading an effective discussion of each of the six books. The authors vary from year to year but include Malcolm Gladwell, Michelle\u00a0Alexander, Nate Silver, and Nicholas Christakis. All authors have agreed to participate in a \"Q&A\" session with the students which seminar members are required to attend.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2199, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "ILRLR 4691", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2200, "title": "Ethics at Work", "code": "ILRLR 4820", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Examines major theories of ethics, then applies them to issues in the employment relationship such as genetic screening of job applicants, random drug testing of employees, affirmative action, discipline for off-duty conduct, whistle-blowing, worker safety and cost/benefit analysis, comparable worth, strikes by employees providing crucial services, and crossing a picket line.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2201, "title": "The Art of Negotiation in Business and Sports", "code": "ILRLR 4825", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "In this course, we will study negotiation techniques and develop strategies to be effectively executed in business, sports, and everyday endeavors. We will break down some of the most controversial issues in the sports industry, predominately with the NCAA and the NFL. We will use these controversial topics as the subjects to practice and execute learned negotiation strategies. Students will participate in live simulated negotiation settings conducted in the campus broadcast/media studio rooms. Students are able to understand and improve their skills through practical training with constant guidance, feedback, and extensive self-evaluation assessments. Through in-depth simulation and experiential learning exercises, students are also able to implement collaborative problem-solving techniques. Lastly, this course implements both formative and summative assessment methods in its curriculum to measure and improve student learning and provide meaningful feedback to students.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2202, "title": "Labor, Race, and Gender", "code": "ILRLR 4845", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "The majority of existing union members are women and workers of color, and, since the mid-1980s, the majority of newly organized workers have been women of color, particularly black women and recent immigrants from Latin America. Yet, with the exception of just a handful of unions, the labor movement still has been slow to build on this support and enthusiasm. This course will focus on the challenges and possibilities created by the changing demographics of race and gender in the contemporary labor movement. Through a combination of readings, small group discussions, guest speakers, and library and on line research, short essays and one longer research paper; the course will examine these issues from an historical, demographic, labor relations, and sociological perspective.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2203, "title": "Field Research, Internship", "code": "ILRLR 4970", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "All requests for permission to register for an internship must be approved by the faculty member who will supervise the project and the chairman of the faculty member's academic department before submission for approval by the director of off-campus credit programs. Upon approval of the internship, the Office of Student Services will register each student for 4970, for 4 credits graded A+ to F for individual research, and for ILRLR 4980, for 8 credits graded S-U, for completion of a professionally appropriate learning experience, which is graded by the faculty sponsor.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2204, "title": "Labor and Employment Law", "code": "ILRLR 5010", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Survey and analysis of the law governing labor relations and employee rights in the workplace. The first half of the course is devoted to labor law and labor-management relations. It examines the legal framework for workers' trade union organizing efforts, collective bargaining, and strikes and lockouts. The second half of the course turns to employment law outside the collective bargaining context.\u00a0 It covers such topics as occupational health and safety, workers' compensation, employment discrimination, \"at-will\" versus \"just cause\" rules for dismissing employees, non-competition and mandatory arbitration agreements, and other aspects of the individual employer-employee relationship. Also serves as an introduction to judicial and administrative systems.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2205, "title": "Dispute Resolution Practicum", "code": "ILRLR 6019", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course has the purpose of linking classroom discussion and analysis of arbitration,\u00a0 and related dispute resolution techniques with opportunities for students to participate and observe arbitration cases conducted under the auspices of the Scheinman Institute on Conflict Resolution. The course is designed to be an advanced seminar for ILR graduate and undergraduate and Cornell law students who have a serious interest in working in arbitration, mediation, or other third-party procedures.\u00a0 Classroom discussions and readings will focus on labor arbitration (i.e., the use of arbitration in unionized settings) and employment arbitration (i.e., the use of arbitration in cases involving nonunion employees).\u00a0 Several sessions of the course will be devoted to the use of dispute resolution in other arenas, including commercial and securities disputes.\u00a0 The effectiveness of arbitration as techniques for resolving conflict will be assessed and lessons will be drawn about the best practices used by neutrals, advocates and parties.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2206, "title": "The Practice of Labor Arbitration", "code": "ILRLR 6020", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course is designed to be an advanced seminar for graduate and undergraduate students who have a serious interest in the practice and profession of labor arbitration. Classroom discussions, group exercise and readings will focus on the role of the labor arbitrator in the public and private sectors.\nDuring the first part of the course, topics will include the backgrounds, training, and certifications needed to establish a labor arbitration practice. In addition to focusing on how arbitrators manage hearings, the course will also cover the institutional and administrative arrangements that support the use of labor arbitration. How arbitrators are admitted to rosters and receive appointments from such \"providers\" as the American Arbitration Association, the Federal Mediation & Conciliation Service, the New York State Public Employment Relations Board, the Cornell's ADR Services, etc.) will be examined.\u00a0 Detailed coverage of the standards of contract interpretation, discipline and the role of evidence will be provided.\u00a0 All case examples will be drawn from actual disputes successfully arbitrated by the course's instructor.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2207, "title": "Campus Mediation Practicum", "code": "ILRLR 6027", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course is offered to students interested in acquiring the knowledge, skills and techniques necessary to mediate interpersonal disputes. In the first segment of the course, students will be introduced to the guiding principles of interpersonal mediation. A review of the theories of conflict, its roots and its resolution, set the stage for the role mediation can effectively play in resolving conflict. Students are introduced to the models of mediation and the benefits and challenges of each, including a comparative analysis of evaluative, facilitative and transformative styles of mediation. In the second segment, students will be assigned to mediate cases referred to the Scheinman Institute from the Office of the Judicial Administrator. The role of gender, race, culture, ethics and impasse in mediation will all be examined and incorporated into workshops and case studies. Students will have several opportunities to apply their knowledge of mediation and acquire the skills necessary to become effective mediators. Following each case assignment, students will be required to write a paper analyzing the nature of the complaint, the approach and techniques employed during the case and the student's evaluation of what worked and did not work in their attempt to resolve the conflict. Oversight will be provided by the course instructors.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2208, "title": "Mediating Organizational Conflicts", "code": "ILRLR 6028", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Conflict is an inherent part of organizational life. Nevertheless, organizational members often lack the adequate skills necessary to manage and resolve the host of tensions and disagreements that arise at work. This course is designed to develop and strengthen students' conflict resolution sills with a focus on the mediation of organizational conflicts. As such, the course will provide students with a theoretical and practical understanding of the mediation process. This foundation will then be used to apply mediation concepts and principles to everyday workplace conflict. Given the emphasis on skill building, the course will make extensive use of mediation simulations alongside classroom lectures and discussions.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2209, "title": "Campus Mediation Practicum II: Advanced Issues in Restorative Justice", "code": "ILRLR 6029", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This course is offered to students interested in furthering their knowledge of the principles and practices of restorative justice. Students will also acquire the knowledge, skills and techniques necessary to mediate complex campus disputes.\u00a0The course considers the needs and roles of key stakeholders (victims, offenders, communities, justice systems) and explores in depth the principles and values of restorative justice. It also identifies challenges to restorative justice - the dangers, the pitfalls \u2013 as well as possible strategies to help prevent restorative justice from failing to live up to its promise. Much of the course is organized around the issue of harm and crime within our legal system. \u00a0However, students will also be exposed to restorative justice in multiple contexts, including issues in higher education.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2210, "title": "Special Topics in Labor Law", "code": "ILRLR 6045", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Graduate seminar whose topic changes depending on semester and instructor.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2211, "title": "Technological Change at Work", "code": "ILRLR 6066", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Computers and digital technologies including robotics, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), internet-enabled platforms, and other \"high-tech\" drivers of automation have revolutionized the nature and organization of work in the U.S., with material implications for workers and their families, among others. This upper-level seminar begins with a rhetorical inquiry into whether and when the technological change engendered by digitization and the so-called \"Information Technology (IT) Revolution\" benefits workers. We then consider the broader impact of recent technological advances on manufacturing and fabrication, low- and semi-skilled service work, i.e., restaurant servers and bus drivers, and even on expert and professional work like that to which most of you presumably aspire. Among the central themes is the notion that technology does not unilaterally act upon workers, their employers, or society-at-large. Rather, workers, managers, customers, institutions, and policymakers shape which advances take hold and which do not, the ways that these technologies are deployed in the workplace, and the ways that society can actively mitigate the costs to technological advancement while harnessing its benefits.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2212, "title": "Values, Rights, and Justice at Work", "code": "ILRLR 6070", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Examination of the often hidden values and assumptions that underlie the contemporary U.S. systems of employment law, work and business, and industrial relations. Classroom discussions and student research projects use short stories, plays, poems and related materials to focus on issues such as discrimination; law, economics, and the state; work and business; power, conflict, and protest; and rights and justice.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2213, "title": "Current Issues in Collective Bargaining", "code": "ILRLR 6189", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "This advanced level mini-course examines several key issues in today's collective bargaining between US private sector employers and unions. Through extensive pre-class readings and podcasts, and during four 3 hour classes, we will trace key developments that have set the table for today's bargaining environment, eg., the deindustrialization of the American economy, the decline of union workforce density, and the rise of defensive collective bargaining; examine resultant wage stagnation and troubled health care and defined benefit pension plans; investigate the effects and intersection of employment law and legislation on collective bargaining and dispute resolution; and consider the emerging arena of unionization in higher education.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2214, "title": "Advocacy and Debate", "code": "ILRLR 6300", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Students learn the principles of argumentation and debate. Topics emphasize Internet database research, synthesis of collected data, policy analysis of evidentiary quality, refutation of counter claims, identification of logical fallacies, risk evaluation, framing of issues, and coherent storytelling.\u00a0 Prepares students to work with a great range of opinion and evidence.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2215, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "ILRLR 6691", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2216, "title": "The Art of Negotiation in Business and Sports", "code": "ILRLR 6825", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "In this course, we will study negotiation techniques and develop strategies to be effectively executed in business, sports, and everyday endeavors. We will break down some of the most controversial issues in the sports industry, predominately with the NCAA and the NFL. We will use these controversial topics as the subjects to practice and execute learned negotiation strategies. Students will participate in live simulated negotiation settings conducted in the campus broadcast/media studio rooms. Students are able to understand and improve their skills through practical training with constant guidance, feedback, and extensive self-evaluation assessments. Through in-depth simulation and experiential learning exercises, students are also able to implement collaborative problem-solving techniques. Lastly, this course implements both formative and summative assessment methods in its curriculum to measure and improve student learning and provide meaningful feedback to students.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2217, "title": "Labor, Race, and Gender", "code": "ILRLR 6845", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "The majority of existing union members are women and workers of color, and, since the mid-1980s, the majority of newly organized workers have been women of color, particularly black women and recent immigrants from Latin America. Yet, with the exception of just a handful of unions, the labor movement still has been slow to build on this support and enthusiasm. This course will focus on the challenges and possibilities created by the changing demographics of race and gender in the contemporary labor movement. Through a combination of readings, small group discussions, guest speakers, and library and on line research, short essays and one longer research paper; the course will examine these issues from an historical, demographic, labor relations, and sociological perspective.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2218, "title": "Southern West Virginia's Coal Fields - Ancient Struggles Amidst Hopeful Dreams", "code": "ILRLR 6855", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2219, "title": "Seminar on Conflict and Dispute Resolution", "code": "ILRLR 7070", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Conflict and its management in organizations has received a great deal of scholarly attention within a number of disciplinary domains including industrial relations, law, organizational behavior, sociology and economics. Interestingly, insights from this research are rarely integrated across disciplinary boundaries. In an effort to synthesize and integrate scholarly insights and findings this course will examine the interdisciplinary research on conflict and conflict management. As such readings for the course will be drawn from a range of fields and perspectives, including industrial relations, human resources, organizational behavior, psychology and sociology, reflecting the diverse approaches taken to the study of conflict and its management in organizations.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2220, "title": "Graduate Writing Seminar", "code": "ILRLR 7085", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to provide students with space to prepare an academic article of publishable or fundable quality. Each student will work on a project related to her/his research, and you must begin the semester with an outline or draft of a qualifying paper, dissertation chapter, manuscript or funding proposal that you want to develop. Each week will discuss a group of readings focused on the craft of social science writing and go over assigned writing exercises. Key issues we will discuss include: refining research questions, constructing relevant literature reviews, how to leverage empirical evidence to advance your argument effectively, journal selection, responding to reviewers concerns, seeking external funding, and practical tips for writing productivity. You will also be responsible for doing a close reading of a peer's draft, and facilitating a workshop discussion. Everyone will get a chance to put their writing under the microscope at least once. While the course is geared towards PhD students engaged in academic research and publication, Masters-levels students are also invited to join.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2221, "title": "Workshop in Labor Relations, Law and History", "code": "ILRLR 9800", "subject": "ILRLR", "descr": "Provides a forum for the presentation of current research being undertaken by faculty members and graduate students in the Department of Labor Relations, History, and Law, and by invited guests. All M.S. and Ph.D. candidates in the department who are at work on their theses are strongly urged to enroll. Students are encouraged\u00a0 to make presentations focusing on the formulation, design, execution, and results of their thesis research.", "tags": "ILRLR", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2222, "title": "Introduction to Organizational Behavior", "code": "ILROB 1220", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "Introductory survey course of theory and research on individual and group processes (including personality, motivation, communication, and leadership), as well as structural and economic forces (including organizational design, power relations, interorganizational ties, social norms, and laws) that shape the contemporary workplace.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2223, "title": "Advancing Racial Equity in Organizations", "code": "ILROB 3230", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "We are witnessing a drastic shift in organizations 'actions, statements, and approaches to the topic of race and racism in the U.S. Protests against racial injustice across the nation have spurred business leaders to pledge support for antiracism efforts, Black-owned businesses, and historically Black colleges and universities. At the same time, the federal government has issued an executive order to end diversity and inclusion training that \"perpetuates racial stereotyping or division\" for federal employees and their contractors. The purpose of this course is to identify and understand the role of workplaces in advancing racial equity. Students will develop knowledge on diversity and inclusion in organizations through a racial equity lens. By centering the experiences Black people and other people of color in the U.S. workplace, we will nuance how intersecting systems of inequality affect multiple groups (e.g., women of color, queer people of color, etc.). We will first deepen our understanding of concepts related to racial equity (i.e., antiracism, systemic racism). We will also assess how legal precedents and labor moments in history fortified systemic racism in the workplace. Then, we will examine barriers and potential solutions to advancing racial diversity, equity, and inclusion in contemporary and future workplaces. Students will demonstrate their learning through writing personal reflections, analyzing case studies, and participating in virtual simulations and experiential activities.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2224, "title": "Understanding and Improving Decision Making", "code": "ILROB 3240", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "Our lives are built upon countless decisions, some small (What am I going to wear to class?) and some very consequential (Should I accept this job offer?). This course will cover the basics in the science of decision making, exploring the ways in which people tend to make decisions, the ways people ought to make decisions, and common discrepancies between the two. Students will learn about rational models of decision making and the reasons why people's decisions often stray from these models. Students will explore different modes of decision making, such as intuition vs. deliberation, and will discuss various pitfalls (i.e., predictable biases) associated with the use of common decision making strategies or rules of thumb. Many of these topics will bediscussed in terms of their organizational consequences, such as the effects of different decision making strategies and heuristics on the fairness and objectivity of hiring decisions. Most importantly, students will leave the class with a toolkit to avoid errors and biases in their own decisions.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2225, "title": "Sport Psychology", "code": "ILROB 3760", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "In this course, we will discuss research by sport psychologists and other social scientists on behavior in sport settings at the individual, team, and organizational level, with an emphasis on factors that lead to high performance. Topics include psychological characteristics of top performers, methods of performance enhancement, group dynamics and processes, effective leadership practices, and the effects of stereotyping on sport participation and performance. We will examine why, in light of this research, certain athletes, teams, and organizations are successful or unsuccessful.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2226, "title": "Leadership in Organizations", "code": "ILROB 4230", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "We will cover basic leadership theories with an emphasis on how they are used, analyze leadership cases, and examine current leadership surveys and training material.\u00a0\u00a0 At the end of the course students should know the major leadership theories and models and how to apply them to their own leadership experiences;\u00a0 know where to find the latest research on leadership and management;\u00a0 be familiar with ways to assess leadership effectiveness and the problems involved in interpreting data from leadership measures;\u00a0 know how to evaluate popular leadership and management books and articles (\"guru-books\"); and be familiar with current knowledge about global or international leadership and management.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2227, "title": "Managerial Negotiations", "code": "ILROB 4795", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "This course aims to help students improve their skills in two fundamental ways. One is knowledge-oriented: students learn frameworks and concepts for analyzing conflict. Students acquire terms and models for identifying the type of conflict that exists in a situation and the potential costs and benefits of different strategies and tactics. Based on this, students should be able to interpret situations, plan tactics, and recognize and react to their counterpart's behavior. A second and complementary route to improving as a negotiator is practice-oriented: students complement their analytical tools with behavioral skills. Negotiation and conflict ultimately come down to behaviors\u2014how a manager opens a potentially volatile conversation, how a mediator uncovers information, how a negotiator frames an offer or a concession. Practicing these behaviors, and understanding how other parties perceive and react to them, is essential to improving as a negotiator. The course provides continuing opportunities for hands-on practice and also provides feedback, discussion, and occasions for reflection.\u00a0\n\u00a0 \u00a0 \u00a0 \u00a0 \u00a0 \u00a0 \u00a0 \u00a0\u00a0\nThrough role-play exercises, lecture, reading, and discussion, the course begins with basic dynamics in negotiation and adds complexity in stages, including multiple issues, multiple parties, mediation, agents, and coalitions. Some exercises involve numerical analyses, others revolve around qualitative conflicts. By the end of the course, students should be able to comfortably and confidently approach most any conflict or negotiation: analyzing its nature, understanding their own objectives, and plotting an approach that will give them the best shot at achieving their goals.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2228, "title": "Advancing Racial Equity in Organizations", "code": "ILROB 5235", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "We are witnessing a drastic shift in organizations 'actions, statements, and approaches to the topic of race and racism in the U.S. Protests against racial injustice across the nation have spurred business leaders to pledge support for antiracism efforts, Black-owned businesses, and historically Black colleges and universities. At the same time, the federal government has issued an executive order to end diversity and inclusion training that \"perpetuates racial stereotyping or division\" for federal employees and their contractors. The purpose of this course is to identify and understand the role of workplaces in advancing racial equity. Students will develop knowledge on diversity and inclusion in organizations through a racial equity lens. By centering the experiences Black people and other people of color in the U.S. workplace, we will nuance how intersecting systems of inequality affect multiple groups (e.g., women of color, queer people of color, etc.). We will first deepen our understanding of concepts related to racial equity (i.e., antiracism, systemic racism). We will also assess how legal precedents and labor moments in history fortified systemic racism in the workplace. Then, we will examine barriers and potential solutions to advancing racial diversity, equity, and inclusion in contemporary and future workplaces. Students will demonstrate their learning through writing personal reflections, analyzing case studies, and participating in virtual simulations and experiential activities.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2229, "title": "Managerial Negotiations", "code": "ILROB 5790", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "This course aims to help students improve their skills in two fundamental ways. One is knowledge-oriented: students learn frameworks and concepts for analyzing conflict. Students acquire terms and models for identifying the type of conflict that exists in a situation and the potential costs and benefits of different strategies and tactics. Based on this, students should be able to interpret situations, plan tactics, and recognize and react to their counterpart's behavior. A second and complementary route to improving as a negotiator is practice-oriented: students complement their analytical tools with behavioral skills. Negotiation and conflict ultimately come down to behaviors\u2014how a manager opens a potentially volatile conversation, how a mediator uncovers information, how a negotiator frames an offer or a concession. Practicing these behaviors, and understanding how other parties perceive and react to them, is essential to improving as a negotiator. The course provides continuing opportunities for hands-on practice and also provides feedback, discussion, and occasions for reflection. Through role-play exercises, lecture, reading, and discussion, the course begins with basic dynamics in negotiation and adds complexity in stages, including multiple issues, multiple parties, mediation, agents, and coalitions. Some exercises involve numerical analyses, others revolve around qualitative conflicts. By the end of the course, students should be able to comfortably and confidently approach most any conflict or negotiation: analyzing its nature, understanding their own objectives, and plotting an approach that will give them the best shot at achieving their goals.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2230, "title": "Judgement and Decision Making", "code": "ILROB 7245", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "The focus of this course will be reading and discussing research related to judgment and decision making (JDM). Students will build a knowledge base covering multiple areas of research in JDM, such as systems of reasoning, task and context effects, heuristics, biases, and de-biasing strategies. Students will also build on broader skills related to discussing experimental research, proposing, and analyzing new research ideas.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2231, "title": "Economic Democracy and Employee Voice", "code": "ILROB 7710", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "Employee voice is an important focus of research in a range of fields, spanning Organizational Behavior, Human Resource Studies, and Employment Relations. In this graduate seminar, we will discuss different theoretical and empirical approaches to studying employee voice, with the aim of developing a more integrative understanding of its causes and consequences. Under what conditions are employees more likely to communicate ideas, concerns, or suggestions? What institutional or organizational conditions support expanded employee participation in decision-making \u2013 within work groups, workplaces, organizations, and industries?\u202f How are productivity or efficiency gains from expanded employee voice distributed? And under what conditions do they result in improvements in pay and working conditions? We will give particular attention to comparing Organizational Behavior and Employment Relations perspectives. Some sample topics include: organizational justice and voice; the psychology of silencing interest-group representation; harassment and mobbing; the psychology of negotiation; voice, silence, and diversity; high performance work systems; teams and direct participation; national institutions and democracy at work; unions and voice.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2232, "title": "Organizational Behavior Workshop", "code": "ILROB 9200", "subject": "ILROB", "descr": "This workshop is designed to provide a forum for the presentation of current research undertaken by faculty members and graduate students in the Department of Organizational Behavior and by invited guests. Each student is expected to make at least one presentation during the year, focusing on the formulation, design, execution, and results of his or her thesis research.", "tags": "ILROB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2233, "title": "Introductory Statistics", "code": "ILRST 2100", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "Statistics is about understanding the world through data. We are surrounded by data, so there is a lot to understand. Covers data exploration and display, data gathering methods, probability, and statistical inference methods through contingency tables and linear regression. The emphasis is on thinking scientifically, understanding what is commonly done with data (and doing some of it for yourself), and laying a foundation for further study. Students learn to use statistical software and simulation tools to discover fundamental results. They use computers regularly; the test includes both multimedia materials and a software package. This course does not focus on data from any particular discipline, but will use real-world examples from a wide variety of disciplines and current events.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2234, "title": "Statistical Methods for the Social Sciences II", "code": "ILRST 2110", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "A second course in statistics that emphasizes applications to the social sciences. Topics include simple linear regression, multiple linear regression (theory, model building, and model diagnostics), and the analysis of variance. Computer packages are used extensively.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2235, "title": "Applied Regression Analysis", "code": "ILRST 2130", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "This seven week, two-credit class will cover the regression requirements, hypothesis tests, and interpretation of results. Students will learn to identify the data necessary to perform a regression analysis, evaluate the conditions, and apply the statistical tests. Interpretation of overall results and specific predictions will be made. Independent projects by each student will be done. These will consist of identifying an issue of interest, a relevant data set, and analysis using the regression methods. These projects have ranged from movie budgets and revenues to air pollution data and traffic. Presentation of the results in verbal and written form will be required. Recommended for students who want to develop applied analysis skills.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2236, "title": "Probability Models and Inference", "code": "ILRST 3080", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to probability and parametric inference. Topics include: random variables, standard distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, likelihood-based estimation, sampling distributions and hypothesis testing, as well as an introduction to Bayesian methods. Some assignments may involve computation using the R programming language.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2237, "title": "Probability Models and Inference for the Social Sciences", "code": "ILRST 3110", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to probability and parametric inference. Topics include: random variables, standard distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, likelihood-based estimation, sampling distributions and hypothesis testing.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2238, "title": "Applied Design", "code": "ILRST 4140", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "This course begins with a discussion of some general principles of experimental design. Classical designs are covered in detail, motivated by real data applications. These include completely randomized, randomized block, balanced incomplete block, split-plot, repeated measures and fractional factorial designs. If time permits rank-based nonparametric versions of the classical designs will also be covered.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2239, "title": "Applied Time Series Analysis", "code": "ILRST 4550", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "Introduces statistical tools for the analysis of time-dependent data. Data analysis and application will be an integral part of this course. Topics include linear, nonlinear, seasonal, multivariate modeling, and financial time series.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2240, "title": "Statistical Methods for the Social Sciences II", "code": "ILRST 5110", "subject": "ILRST", "descr": "Second course in statistics that emphasizes applications to the social sciences. Topics include simple linear regression, multiple linear regression (theory, model building, and model diagnostics), and the analysis of variance. Computer packages are used extensively.", "tags": "ILRST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2241, "title": "Honors Research I", "code": "IM 4990", "subject": "IM", "descr": "Each participant must submit brief proposal approved by Honors Committee.", "tags": "IM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2242, "title": "Honors Research II", "code": "IM 4991", "subject": "IM", "descr": "Continuation of \u00a0IM 4990.", "tags": "IM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2243, "title": "Elementary Indonesian II", "code": "INDO 1122", "subject": "INDO", "descr": "Gives a thorough grounding in basic speaking, listening, reading and writing skills.", "tags": "INDO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2244, "title": "Intermediate Indonesian II", "code": "INDO 2202", "subject": "INDO", "descr": "Develops all four skills: reading, writing, speaking, and listening comprehension.", "tags": "INDO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2245, "title": "Advanced Indonesian II", "code": "INDO 3302", "subject": "INDO", "descr": "Practical language course on an advanced level in which students read and discuss selected materials on issues of their academic interests, write essays, and make oral presentations.", "tags": "INDO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2246, "title": "Choices and Consequences in Computing", "code": "INFO 1260", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Computing requires difficult choices that can have serious implications for real people. This course covers a range of ethical, societal, and policy implications of computing and information. It draws on recent developments in digital technology and their impact on society, situating these in the context of fundamental principles from computing, policy, ethics, and the social sciences. A particular emphasis will be placed on large areas in which advances in computing have consistently raised societal challenges: privacy of individual data; fairness in algorithmic decision-making; dissemination of online content; and accountability in the design of computing systems. As this is an area in which the pace of technological development raises new challenges on a regular basis, the broader goal of the course is to enable students to develop their own analyses of new situations as they emerge at the interface of computing and societal interests.", "tags": "ETM-AS|KCM-AS|SDS-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2247, "title": "Introductory Design and Programming for the Web", "code": "INFO 1300", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "The World Wide Web is both a technology and a pervasive and powerful resource in our society and culture. To build functional and effective web sites, students need technical and design skills as well as analytical skills for understanding who is using the web, in what ways they are using it, and for what purposes. In this course, students develop skills in all three of these areas through the use of technologies such as XHTML, Cascading Stylesheets, and PHP. Students study how web sites are deployed and used, usability issues on the web, user-centered design, and methods for visual layout and information architecture. Through the web, this course provides an introduction to the interdisciplinary field of information science.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2248, "title": "Introduction to Cultural Analytics: Data, Computation, and Culture", "code": "INFO 1350", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course will prepare students in the humanities to analyze, interpret, and visualize cultural data with computational methods. After a basic introduction to the programming language Python, we will cover topics such as data collection and curation through web scraping and data retrieval, text mining, image analysis, network analysis, and data visualization. We will survey and discuss how these computational tools are applied in humanistic research. We will also reflect on the specific problems, challenges, and ethical dilemmas posed by the computational study of culture.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2249, "title": "Freshmen Team Projects", "code": "INFO 1998", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Independent work in information science as part of a student-led team project. Intended for freshmen on project teams, project team members in training, and for project team members performing tasks that are not core to information science.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2250, "title": "Intermediate Design and Programming for the Web", "code": "INFO 2300", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Web programming requires the cooperation of two machines: the one in front of the viewer (client) and the one delivering the content (server).\u00a0INFO 1300\u00a0concentrates almost exclusively on the client side. The main emphasis in INFO 2300 is learning about server side processing. Students begin with a short overview of the PHP server-side scripting language, then look at interactions with databases, learning about querying via the database language SQL. Through a succession of projects, students learn how to apply this understanding to the creation of an interactive, data-driven site via PHP and the MYSQL database. Also considered are technologies such as Javascript and Ajax and techniques to enhance security and privacy. Design and usability issues are emphasized. A major component of the course is the creation of a substantial web site.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2251, "title": "Excursions in Computational Sustainability", "code": "INFO 2770", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Balancing environmental, economic, and societal needs for a sustainable future encompasses problems of unprecedented size and complexity. Computing and information science can play an important role in addressing critical sustainability challenges faced by present and future generations. The goal of the course is to introduce students to a range of sustainability challenges and to computational methods that can help address such challenges. Sustainability topics include sustainable development, biodiversity and wildlife conservation, poverty mitigation, food security, renewable resources, energy, transportation, and climate change. In the context of these sustainability topics, the course will introduce students to mathematical and computational modeling techniques, algorithms, and statistical methods. The course is at the introductory undergraduate level. Students are expected to have basic knowledge of probability theory and calculus.", "tags": "SBA-AG|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2252, "title": "Introduction to Data Science", "code": "INFO 2950", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Teaches basic mathematical methods for information science, with applications to data science. Topics include discrete probability, Bayesian methods, graph theory, power law distributions, Markov models, and hidden Markov models. Uses examples and applications from various areas of information science such as the structure of the web, genomics, social networks, natural language processing, and signal processing. Assignments require python programming.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2253, "title": "Computational Psychology", "code": "INFO 3140", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course states and motivates the observation that cognition is fundamentally a computational process and explores the implications of this idea. Students are introduced to a variety of conceptual tools for thinking about cognitive information processing, including statistical learning from experience and the use of patterns distilled from past experience in guiding future actions. They learn to apply these tools to gain understanding of perception, memory, motor control, language, action planning, problem solving, decision making, reasoning, intelligence, and creativity.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2254, "title": "Introduction to Computer Game Design", "code": "INFO 3152", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "A project-based course in which programmers and designers collaborate to make a computer game. This course investigates the theory and practice of developing computer games from a blend of technical, aesthetic, and cultural perspectives. Technical aspects of game architecture include software engineering, artificial intelligence, game physics, computer graphics, and networking. Aesthetic and cultural aspects include art and modeling, sound and music, game balance, and player experience.", "tags": "SMR-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2255, "title": "New Media and Society", "code": "INFO 3200", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Media and culture are undergoing a series of transformations as new technologies, new forms of entertainment, new venues for political debate, and new models of public discourse emerge online. This course looks at how the social, political, and cultural landscape is changing in relation to digital media and information technologies. We develop critical resources to better understand the history of these new technologies and communicative forms, the economics behind them, the policies developing around them, and the sociocultural shifts from which they have emerged, and that they have helped provoke. We will aim to discard commonplace assumptions about these tools and phenomena, to ask deeper questions about their impact on society.", "tags": "CA-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2256, "title": "Data-Driven Web Applications", "code": "INFO 3300", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course will introduce students to working with data in the context of modern web applications. These include data representation with relational and non-relational databases, data mining to find patterns and make predictions, and graphical presentation for visualization.", "tags": "SDS-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2257, "title": "Social Behavior and Technology", "code": "INFO 3400", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course explores personal connections in the digital age, and how information and communication technologies impact our lives and relationships. It focuses on how people manage interactions and identities, develop and maintain relationships, accomplish social goals, create shared meanings, and engage in collaboration and conflict in social media. Emphasis will be placed on how current thinking in relational communication can explain and anticipate interpersonal dynamics on the Internet, but also on how online behaviors may challenge traditional principles of human communication. A major part of the course is a semester-long research project in which students working in small groups design, run, and present their own empirical study of personal relationships and technology.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2258, "title": "Human-Computer Interaction Design", "code": "INFO 3450", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course focuses on user experience design (UX) and the life cycle of interface design from the user perspective. We will discuss key aspects of the human-centered design process: understanding, analyzing, and formalizing user needs, exploring possible design solutions to address user needs, creating prototypes to externalize design ideas, and evaluating the usability of these prototypes.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2259, "title": "Computing Cultures", "code": "INFO 3561", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Computers are powerful tools for working, playing, thinking, and living. Laptops, PDAs, webcams, cell phones, and iPods are not just devices, they also provide narratives, metaphors, and ways of seeing the world. This course critically examines how computing technology and society shape each other and how this plays out in our everyday lives. Identifies how computers, networks, and information technologies reproduce, reinforce, and rework existing cultural trends, norms, and values. Looks at the values embodied in the cultures of computing and considers alternative ways to imagine, build, and work with information technologies.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2260, "title": "Data Analytics for Information Science", "code": "INFO 3950", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course will cover intermediate-level applications of data science, with focus on discovery, interpretation, and communication of meaningful patterns in data. Topics will include regression, classification, clustering, and forecasting, with an overview of machine learning algorithms and statistical inference.", "tags": "MQR-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2261, "title": "Advanced Topics in Computer Game Design", "code": "INFO 4152", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Project-based follow-up course to INFO 3152. Students work in a multidisciplinary team to develop a game that incorporates innovative game mechanics. Advanced topics include nontraditional input schemes, advanced storytelling, social gameplay, and \"serious\" games.\u00a0 There is a special emphasis on developing games that can be submitted to festivals and competitions, or that can be commercialized. Students may take this course as either a programmer or a designer; the prerequisites differ depending upon the selected track. Contact the instructor for more information.", "tags": "SMR-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2262, "title": "Information Policy: Applied Research and Analysis", "code": "INFO 4200", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course will address a wide range of information policy issues such as privacy, security, antitrust, intellectual property, algorithmic fairness, net neutrality, risk mitigation strategies, and other legal and policy compliance concerns in a simulated project management environment. Patterned on life cycle project management for products and services in contemporary large-scale technology companies, students will adopt specific topic areas for applied research and analysis working dynamically with other team members.\u00a0 Course outcomes include conducting upper-level research in specific information policy domains, experiential group dynamics, persuasive analytic presentations, fundamentals of project management in the technology sector, and insights into corporate hierarchies, organization, and functionalities.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2263, "title": "Networks II: Market Design", "code": "INFO 4220", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Networks II builds on its prerequisite course and continues to examine how each of the computing, economic, sociological and natural worlds are connected and how the structure of these connections affects these worlds. In this course, we will construct mathematical models for and analyze networked settings, allowing us to both make predictions about behavior in such systems, as well as reason about how to design such systems to exhibit some desirable behavior. Throughout, we will draw on real-world examples such as social networks, peer-to-peer filesharing, Internet markets, and crowdsourcing, that illustrate these phenomena.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2264, "title": "Designing Technology for Social Impact", "code": "INFO 4240", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "The social impact of technologies is typically thought about fairly late, if ever, in the design process. Indeed, it can be difficult at design time to predict what effects technologies will have. Nevertheless, design decisions can inadvertently \"lock in\" particular values early on. In this course, we will draw on science & technology studies, technology design, and the arts to analyze the values embodied in technology design and to design technologies to promote positive social impact. What social and cultural values do technology designs consciously or unconsciously promote? To what degree can social impact be \"built into\" a technology? How can we take social and cultural values into account in design?", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2265, "title": "Language and Information", "code": "INFO 4300", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "How to make sense of the vast amounts of information available online, and how to relate it and to the social context in which it appears? This course introduces basic tools for retrieving and analyzing unstructured textual information from the web and social media. Applications include information retrieval (with human feedback),\u00a0sentiment analysis, and social analysis of text. The coursework will include\u00a0programming projects that play on the interaction between knowledge and social factors.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2266, "title": "Introduction to Rapid Prototyping and Physical Computing", "code": "INFO 4320", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This class provides an introduction to modern rapid prototyping techniques such as laser cutting, 3D printing and microcontroller programming (such as the Arduino system). Using these tools, small multidisciplinary groups conduct the hardware project of their choice exploring topics as varied as: Universal Access, tangible interfaces, toys, personal or medical assistants and new musical instruments.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2267, "title": "App Design and Prototyping", "code": "INFO 4340", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "In this studio course, students will work in teams to complete a semester long project. Students will gain practical experience and confidence applying the user-centered design process to design, evaluate, and code a high-fidelity prototype app. Through the project, students will learn how design effective graphical user interfaces using affordances, user feedback, and common interface widgets. This course has a significant software development focus, exposing students to software development methods and tools necessary for developing high-fidelity interactive software prototypes. This includes employing widget libraries, event-based programming, data stubs, Git work-flows, basic command line usage, and debugging.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2268, "title": "Communication Networks and Social Capital", "code": "INFO 4360", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Course covers the relationship between communication networks and social capital and explores the tension between individual and group capital.", "tags": "CA-AG|CA-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2269, "title": "Qualitative User Research and Design Methods", "code": "INFO 4400", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This upper-level course provides an in-depth understanding of and experience with advanced concepts and techniques for researching, ideating, critiquing, designing, prototyping, and evaluating interactive technologies intended for people to use and incorporate in their lives. The course focuses on advanced user research and design methods.", "tags": "SBA-AS|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2270, "title": "Computer-Mediated Communication", "code": "INFO 4450", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "For description, see COMM 4450.", "tags": "SBA-AG|INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2271, "title": "Independent Reading and Research", "code": "INFO 4900", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Independent reading and research for undergraduates.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2272, "title": "Teaching in Information Science", "code": "INFO 4910", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Involves working as a teaching assistant in a course in the information science or information science, systems, and technology major.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2273, "title": "Special Topics in Information Science", "code": "INFO 4940", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course is designed for students to think critically about the need for diversity and inclusion in Information Science teams, and Computing organizations. It examines underlying reasons behind the perpetual underrepresentation of people of color in computing and the broader STEM fields. Race, gender, and neurodiversity are the primary investigative pillars. The course examines existing structures such as recruitment and retention practices, eligibility requirements, and philanthropic efforts to determine how structural operations and practices work to sustain the status quo of unequal STEM participation. This course investigates pedagogy, research, cultural underpinnings, policies, and concealed norms around potential exclusion and inclusion in STEM at key levels of entry, namely post-secondary education, and computing industry organizations. Students will analyze current issues and lived experiences pertaining to STEM computing participation for underrepresented populations and identify measures that lessen the perpetuation of unequal STEM participation. As a part of the course engagement, students will analyze current research on the intersections between diversity and team and/or organizational performance. The course will be of interest to students seeking to further social justice and equality in education and industry, students thriving to create increasingly diverse workforces for the future, and future STEM leaders seeking to enhance the productivity of their teams by taking advantage of diverse perspectives.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2274, "title": "Practical Training in Information Science", "code": "INFO 4997", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This independent study course offers IS majors (i.e., undergraduates whose applications to affiliate with the IS major have been approved) an opportunity to reflect on concepts from information science as they were encountered and applied in a recent internship. Students write a short paper describing their work experience and how it connects to the educational objectives of the information science major.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2275, "title": "Team Projects", "code": "INFO 4998", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Advanced independent work in information science as part of a student-led team project. Students must make individual arrangements with a faculty sponsor. Students are expected to spend 3-4 hours per week per credit hour working on the project.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2276, "title": "Visual Data Analytics for the Web", "code": "INFO 5100", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course will introduce students to working with data in the context of modern web applications. These include data representation with relational and non-relational databases, data mining to find patterns and make predictions, and graphical presentation for visualization.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2277, "title": "Privacy in the Digital Age", "code": "INFO 5303", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course introduces students to privacy technologies and surveys the current state of digital privacy from multiple perspectives, including technology, law, policy, ethics, economics, and surveillance.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2278, "title": "User Experience and User Research", "code": "INFO 5305", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course takes a deep dive into the user experience (UX) lifecycle--from conceiving an idea for a product to evaluating a prototype--and user research methods. We will cover techniques for understanding your target users (e.g., observations and interviews) and designing and evaluating your prototypes (e.g., lab studies and walkthroughs). If you have taken a human computer interaction class before, many of these techniques will be familiar. Our goal in this course is to go deeper, help you gain more practice and expertise so that you will be ready to apply what you learn when you graduate. The course lectures will cover the theory, history, and practical aspects of UX and user research methods. Student deliverables include many short in-class exercises and weekly homework assignments.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2279, "title": "Technology, Media, and Democracy", "code": "INFO 5330", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course evaluates the role of the information ecosystem in contributing to the health of representative democracies such as the United States, with the goal of developing ideas and tools that can help citizens be equipped with the knowledge and information required to address the challenges that face our society. Specifically, the course examines the socio-technical aspects of our information ecosystem and how they may hinder, or challenge, our democracy, with a specific emphasis on the role of journalism and media in (1) monitoring the platforms (2) providing high-quality, trustworthy information and (3) enabling a healthy public sphere. Key topics include (a) how the design of platforms, algorithms, monetary models, and online communities impacts our information ecosystem (b) Credibility, Trust, and Misinformation - what are some of the challenges for credible and trustworthy information and how can they be addressed; (c) Adversary Online - who are some of the adversarial actors online, what are they goals, methods, and how can they be countered.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2280, "title": "Developing and Designing Interactive Devices", "code": "INFO 5345", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the human-centered and technical workings behind interactive devices ranging from cell phones and video controllers to household appliances and smart cars. This is a hands-on, lab-based course. For the final project, students will build a functional IoT prototype of their own design, using Javascript, single-board Linux computer, embedded microcontrollers, and other electronic components. Topics include electronics prototyping, interface prototyping, sensors and actuators, microcontroller development, physical prototyping, and user testing.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2281, "title": "Behavioral Economics for Tech", "code": "INFO 5350", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Behavioral economics studies the effect of psychological, social, cognitive and emotional factors on humans decisions and behavior. This course will help students learn key concepts from behavioral economics and apply them in their daily lives, in the design of products, and in the research of human behavior. This course will explore the opportunities and challenges faced by researchers and practitioners when exploring the interplay between behavioral economics and technology.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2282, "title": "Human Computer Interaction Design", "code": "INFO 5355", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course focuses on user experience design (UX) and the life cycle of interface design from the user perspective. We will discuss key aspects of the human-centered design process: understanding, analyzing, and formalizing user needs, exploring possible design solutions to address user needs, creating prototypes to externalize design ideas, and evaluating the usability of these prototypes.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2283, "title": "Urban Design Strategies and Case Studies", "code": "INFO 5420", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "The course will ground students in the basics of urban and spatial design practices as well as the surrounding environmental, sociological, political, and economic dimensions. This course will use primary and secondary source material and theoretical and empirical works to understand cities as complex interrelated environments.\u00a0 Students will learn about the multidimensional drivers that shape the urban systems and built environment that form our cities.\u00a0 The course will teach students how to analyze and transform urban environments to create livable and sustainable cities for future generations. The course will also contribute a design perspective for the program: project based, empirical, iterative, situated, and integrative. The course uses New York City as a real-world laboratory and augments foundational and theoretical examples with case studies of successful and unsuccessful initiatives. Students will develop projects that address urgent urban challenges such as sustainability, infrastructure, resiliency, mobility, affordability, access, and equity and will propose forward-thinking and technologically driven design approaches to urban challenges.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2284, "title": "Computer-Mediated Communication", "code": "INFO 5450", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "For description, see\u00a0COMM 4450.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2285, "title": "Health Tech Clinical Practicum", "code": "INFO 5500", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course is designed to give students hands on experience applying health tech tools and methods to real world clinical challenges. Students will work (individually or in pairs) with a clinical advisor to assess a particular clinical need for application of digital technology and based on that assessment students will develop a feasibility prototype. Through the implementation process, students will have the opportunity to shadow their clinical advisor in a clinical or research setting.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2286, "title": "MPS Project", "code": "INFO 5900", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Independent research for Master of Professional Studies students.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2287, "title": "Professional Career Development", "code": "INFO 5905", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This online, synchronous learning course will focus on career development topics specifically for MPS Information Science students. Through a series of discussions, activities, and guest speaker lectures, students will further develop career success strategies with an emphasis on personal strengths, networking, communication, and professional branding. By the end of the course, students will be able to identify and articulate to prospective employers, their unique interface between computing and the world.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2288, "title": "Remaking the City", "code": "INFO 5915", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This workshop-based service learning course will engage students in participatory design projects that use technology to support community-based organizations in urban contexts. The engagement will be structured as team-based internships, where students will be required to commit up to 5 hours per week to support the organization in its technology needs. We will reflect on these experiences, and connect them to broader themes impacting cities and the civic organizations within them \u2013 including migration, race, gender and disability. Students will learn and apply user-centered and participatory design methodologies; theoretical frameworks that help us understand the modern city; the unique technology challenges facing small community-based and civic organizations.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2289, "title": "Ubiquitous Computing", "code": "INFO 6120", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course will introduce students to the field of Ubiquitous Computing -- a multidisciplinary research area that draws from Machine Learning, Machine Perception, Signal Processing, Human Computer Interaction, as well as psychology and sociology. Class discussions and hands on exercises will be the focus of this class with a few formal lectures. Discussions will highlight the various challenges in data collection, representation and tractability of models, and evaluation. We will brain-storm ideas on how future research can go about tackling some of these challenges. Students will be required to lead and critique papers. Everyone will take turns presenting papers and in leading discussions. Participation in discussions will be evaluated as well as mini projects assignments during the term and an end of term final project.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2290, "title": "Advanced Topic Modeling", "code": "INFO 6150", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Statistical topic models such as LDA provide a powerful tool for discovering themes in large unlabeled text corpora. They are increasingly popular in a wide range of fields, both as a data-driven alternative to manual document coding methods, and also as an example of a difficult but tractable problem in statistical inference. This course will cover Bayesian model construction, inference techniques, evaluation, and applications beyond text such as community detection in networks and population admixture in genetics.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2291, "title": "Networks II: Market Design", "code": "INFO 6220", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Networks II builds on its prerequisite course and continues to examine how each of the computing, economic, sociological and natural worlds are connected and how the structure of these connections affects these worlds. In this course, we will construct mathematical models for and analyze networked settings, allowing us to both make predictions about behavior in such systems, as well as reason about how to design such systems to exhibit some desirable behavior. Throughout, we will draw on real-world examples such as social networks, peer-to-peer filesharing, Internet markets, and crowdsourcing, that illustrate these phenomena.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2292, "title": "Advanced Language Technologies", "code": "INFO 6300", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Graduate-level introduction to technologies for the computational treatment of information in human-language form, covering modern natural-language processing (NLP) and/or information retrieval (IR). Possible topics include language modeling, word embeddings,\u00a0text categorization and clustering, information extraction, computational syntactic and semantic formalisms, grammar induction, machine translation,\u00a0latent semantic analysis (LSI), and\u00a0clickthrough data for web search.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2293, "title": "Design Research", "code": "INFO 6309", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course is designed to provide PhD students with an understanding of research \"into\", \"through\", and \"for\" design. The course will cover readings across literature in human-computer interaction, engineering, education, and architecture. Topics include design theory, design as a research method, empirical studies of designing, theory building in design, and history and philosophy of design.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2294, "title": "Computer-Mediated Communication", "code": "INFO 6450", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "For description, see COMM 6450.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2295, "title": "Digital Technology Practicum", "code": "INFO 6480", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2296, "title": "Technology for Underserved Communities", "code": "INFO 6600", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This course examines the design, deployment, and adoption of computing technologies that aim to improve the lives of underserved populations in low-resource environments. Through discussions of case studies from the US and across the world, we will study how computing technologies are used in different global development domains, such as agriculture, finance, health, education, civic engagement. We will also explore many of the big debates in the field of ICTD through reading and discussing seminal papers, including how to approach and measure success, how to consider failure, what constitutes 'good' research, how to broach the 'digital divide'. The course will enrich students' foundational knowledge and information about current research in ICTD, and will better equip them to create and evaluate computing technologies for people in low-resource environments.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2297, "title": "Revolutions of the Mind: Media, Technology and Epistemological Change", "code": "INFO 6710", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Revolution: a change in organizational structure or power balance; turn-around; modification of an existing constitution. Current technologies and media are revolutionizing the way we think, what we know, and what we do. This course examines what it means to \"think about knowledge differently\" and \"change your mind\" by looking at the dynamic interaction between how people and society transform and are transformed by various forms of information and new media technologies. Examples from education (e.g., MOOCs), entertainment, virtual reality, and connective media contextualize this investigation into epistemological development, thought and action, and ethics of change. (graduate students; advanced undergraduates with permission)", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2298, "title": "Special Topics in Information Science", "code": "INFO 6940", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Study of topics not currently covered in INFO offerings, as determined by faculty and student interest.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2299, "title": "Digital Life Research Seminar", "code": "INFO 7060", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "This seminar focuses on the societal perspectives on digital technology. Speakers will come from a range of disciplines including computer science, data science, engineering, OR, humanities, social sciences, law, and policy and will present work in progress that considers ethical and political questions related to the design, development, and deployment of digital, computational, and information systems and devices. Topics include accountable algorithms, bias in machine learning, AI and the workplace, privacy, and cybersecurity.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2300, "title": "IS Colloquium", "code": "INFO 7090", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "For staff, visitors, and graduate students interested in information science.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2301, "title": "Independent Research", "code": "INFO 7900", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Independent research for MPS\u00a0students and pre-A exam Ph.D. Students.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2302, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "INFO 9900", "subject": "INFO", "descr": "Thesis research for post-A exam Ph.D. Students.", "tags": "INFO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2303, "title": "Italian II", "code": "ITAL 1202", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This is a fast-paced, introductory course designed for students with some basic knowledge of the language.\u00a0 This introductory course provides a thorough grounding in all language skills: listening, speaking, reading, and writing, with practice in small and large groups.\u00a0 Interactive lectures cover grammar and cultural information.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2304, "title": "Italian for Art, Architecture and Fashion Design", "code": "ITAL 1213", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "The learning objectives of this course are, first, to introduce students to some of the crucial moments in the history of Italian figurative arts, architecture and fashion design, but also to a range of social issues relevant for understanding the more recent tendencies in art and design in modern Italy; second, to help students refine the way they speak and write about art, architecture and design through a review of the grammatical and lexical structures of Italian and a reinforcement of idiomatic expressions that will increase their ability to discuss, evaluate, analyze and compare issues of relevance to the field of art, architecture and desgn.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2305, "title": "Intensive Elementary Italian", "code": "ITAL 1401", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "An intensive elementary Italian language course. This 6-credit course covers material presented in ITAL 1201\u00a0and ITAL 1202\u00a0in just one semester. It's offered to students who cannot study Italian in the Fall, but can only do it in the Spring semester.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2306, "title": "Italian IV", "code": "ITAL 2202", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "An intermediate-level course that aims to further develop intercultural, reading, listening, speaking, and writing abilities in ITAL 2201. Students will be guided in perfecting their communication skills, improving their cultural proficiency, and developing a critical eye toward printed and visual material drawn from literature, history, politics, science, and arts in the Italophone world. Conversation skills will be practiced in daily discussions and in individual or group projects and presentations. A variety of written assignments will help students increase the range, accuracy, and stylistic appropriateness of their writing. Review of select grammar topics is part of this course, as is reading a short contemporary novel.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2307, "title": "The Cinematic Eye of Italy", "code": "ITAL 2204", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This course, which is at the core of the major and minor in Italian, is designed to give students a basic grounding in some of the most important facets of Italian culture, including cinema, literature, art, and food.\u00a0 Students will trace the development of Italian national identity in literary and cinematic texts as well as across Italian photography and cuisine.\u00a0 Readings will include selections from the works of Primo Levi, Roberto Saviano, and Leonardo Sciascia.\u00a0 Students will also view films by directors such as Rossellini, de Sica, Antonioni, Bertolucci, and Sergio Leone, becoming familiar along the way with genres in Italian national cinema.\u00a0 By the end of the semester, students will have a working knowledge of the effects of geographic and national fragmentation on political life in post-Risorgimento Italy, understand the so-called Southern Question and the fraught relationship between the Italian South and wealthier Northern regions, and gain different perspectives on political life today in Italy.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2308, "title": "One Italian Masterpiece I", "code": "ITAL 2240", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This course will introduce students to sustained study of one Italian masterpiece (a literary, philosophical, historical, or scientific work, or a major achievement in the visual, performance, or media arts). Topic for Spring 2021: Machiavelli's Mandragola.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2309, "title": "Perspectives in Italian Culture", "code": "ITAL 2900", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This course serves as an introduction to the close reading of, and critical engagement with, a range of sources from various periods of Italian literary and cultural history.\u00a0 In fact, since Italy doesn't really cohere as a political entity until late in the nineteenth century, this course could just as easily be called Perspectives in Pre-Italian Culture.\u00a0 The questions of perspective-of who's looking, what's being looked at, and what we're\u00a0 looking through-will haunt our readings from sources as varied as Dante's Commedia, the reception history of St. Francis of Assisi, medieval visionary women, Michelangelo's love lyrics, the novel (e.g. Moravia), the short story (e.g. Celati), film, and political philosophy.\u00a0 We'll pay special attention to the way in which desire, pleasure, excess, and resistance structure the articulation of Italian-or more local, frequently urban-identities, and we'll attempt too grapple with how, even as we get a kind of perspective on Italy, Italy always looks back at us with questions, desires, and a gaze of its own.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2310, "title": "Screening Cosa Nostra: The Mafia and the Movies from Scarface to The Sopranos", "code": "ITAL 3010", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "From Al Capone to Tony Soprano, the mafia has been the subject of numerous films over the course of 70 years, so many in fact that one might well speak of a \"mafia obsession\" in American popular culture. Drawing upon a large number of American and Italian films, this course examines the cultural history of the mafia through film. We will explore issues related to the figure of the gangster, the gender and class assumptions that underpin it, and the portrayal-almost always stereotypical-of Italian-American immigrant experience that emerges from our viewings. The aim will be to enhance our understanding of the role of mafia plays in American and Italian culture in the 20th and 21st centuries. Film screenings will include Little Caesar, Scarface, Shame of the Nation, The Godfather Parts I and II, Goodfellas, The Funeral, Donnie Brasco, episodes from The Sopranos, and Gomorrah.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2311, "title": "One Italian Masterpiece II", "code": "ITAL 3240", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "Topic for SP21: Dante's Inferno. This 2-credit course will introduce students to sustained study of one Italian masterpiece (a literary, philosophical, historical, or scientific work, or a major achievement in the visual, performance, or media arts).", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2312, "title": "Special Topics in Italian Literature", "code": "ITAL 4200", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "Guided independent study of special topics.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2313, "title": "Honors in Italian Literature", "code": "ITAL 4290", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "Consult director of undergraduate studies for more information.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2314, "title": "Honors in Italian Literature", "code": "ITAL 4300", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "Consult director of undergraduate studies for more information.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2315, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "ITAL 4710", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relations of politics to art in general and the cultural politic of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers, and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape culture and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rule) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others; with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of the situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say post autonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2316, "title": "Special Topics in Italian Literature", "code": "ITAL 6400", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "Guided independent study for graduate students.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2317, "title": "Decameron", "code": "ITAL 6450", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This seminar will be dedicated to reading and analysis of Giovanni Boccaccio's Decameron\u00a0(1349-51), a masterpiece of Italian literature whose popularity has been renewed as it has been proclaimed \"the 14th-century Italian book that shows us how to survive coronavirus\" and the \"medieval book to read while under quarantine.\"\u00a0 Particular attention will be dedicated to: gender, social class,\u00a0the ethical dimension of literature,\u00a0and Boccaccio's refashioning of Italian, Latin, French, and Provencal source material.\u00a0 Students can read the Decameron\u00a0in the original Italian or in English translation.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2318, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "ITAL 6710", "subject": "ITAL", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relation of politics to art in general and the cultural politics of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape cultural and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rude) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others: with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say postautonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "ITAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2319, "title": "Elementary Japanese II", "code": "JAPAN 1102", "subject": "JAPAN", "descr": "Gives a thorough grounding in all four language skills-speaking, listening, reading, and writing-at the beginning level. The lecture provides explanation, analysis, and cultural background. Sections are conducted entirely in Japanese.", "tags": "JAPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2320, "title": "Intermediate Japanese II", "code": "JAPAN 2202", "subject": "JAPAN", "descr": "This course provides widely applicable language proficiency as an integrated Japanese course, which develops all four language skills (speaking, listening, reading, and writing) at the post-elementary level.", "tags": "JAPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2321, "title": "High Intermediate Japanese II", "code": "JAPAN 3302", "subject": "JAPAN", "descr": "For students who have learned basic Japanese skills and would like to develop higher skills in reading, writing, speaking, and listening.", "tags": "JAPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2322, "title": "Advanced Japanese II", "code": "JAPAN 4402", "subject": "JAPAN", "descr": "Develops reading, writing and oral communication skills at the advanced level.", "tags": "JAPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2323, "title": "Directed Readings", "code": "JPLIT 6625", "subject": "JPLIT", "descr": "Students choose a faculty member to oversee this independent study. The student and the faculty member work together to develop class readings.", "tags": "JPLIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2324, "title": "Advanced Directed Readings", "code": "JPLIT 6628", "subject": "JPLIT", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "JPLIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2325, "title": "Elementary Modern Hebrew II", "code": "JWST 1102", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "Intended for beginners. Provides a thorough grounding in reading, writing, grammar, oral comprehension, and speaking. Students who complete the course are able to function in basic situations in a Hebrew-speaking environment.", "tags": "JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2326, "title": "Elementary Yiddish II", "code": "JWST 1777", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "Intended for advanced beginners. Builds further competence in reading, writing, oral comprehension, speaking and grammar. Course material is presented and discussed in the context of Ashkenazi Jewish culture.", "tags": "JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2327, "title": "Intermediate Modern Hebrew", "code": "JWST 2100", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "The course is aimed at training students in exact and idiomatic Hebrew, expanding vocabulary and usage of grammatical knowledge, and acquiring facility of expression in both conversation and writing. Uses written and oral exercises built around the texts. Reading and discussion of selections from Hebrew literature and Israeli culture through the use of texts and audiovisual materials.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2328, "title": "Israeli Masculinity", "code": "JWST 2167", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "Representations of masculinity play important roles in modern Hebrew texts. Through introduction to scholarship on gender and sexuality, students learn to critically analyze Hebrew texts featuring such representations and to synthesize how diverse textual representations of masculinity reflect and seek to influence the changing ways that Jewish and Israeli identities are conceived and performed. The course's tripartite structure aids student perception of masculine representations' diachronic development. In the first section, students analyze traditional depictions of Jewish masculinity and observe how Zionism's emergence brought about Jewish masculinity's reconceptualization; in the second section, students dissect diverse texts depicting and participating in efforts to redefine Jewish masculinity in Palestine; in the third section,\u00a0 students probe texts written and produced after 1948 that challenge the form of masculine identity dominant at the Israeli state's inception and push for greater diversity in how masculinity and femininity, heterosexuality and homosexuality, are conceived and performed.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2329, "title": "Drinking through the Ages: Intoxicating Beverages in Near Eastern and World History", "code": "JWST 2522", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course examines the production and exchange of wine, beer, coffee and tea, and the social and ideological dynamics involved in their consumption. We start in ancient Egypt and Mesopotamia, and end with tea and coffee in the Arab and Ottoman worlds. Archaeological and textual evidence will be used throughout to show the centrality of drinking in daily, ritual and political life.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2330, "title": "Imagining the Holocaust", "code": "JWST 2580", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "How is the memory of the Holocaust kept alive by means of the literary and visual imagination? Within the historical context of the Holocaust and how and why it occurred, we shall examine major and widely read Holocaust narratives that have shaped the way we understand and respond to the Holocaust. We also study ethical and psychological issues about how and why people behave in dire circumstances. We shall begin with first-person reminiscences\u2014Wiesel's Night, Levi's Survival at Auschwitz, and The Diary of Anne Frank\u2014before turning to realistic fictions such as Kineally's Schindler's List (and Spielberg's film), Kertesz's Fateless, Kosinski's The Painted Bird, and Ozick's \"The Shawl.\" We shall also read the mythopoeic vision of Schwarz-Bart's The Last of the Just, the illuminating distortions of Epstein's King of the Jews, the Kafkaesque parable of Appelfeld's Badenheim 1939, and the fantastic cartoons of Spiegelman's Maus books.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2331, "title": "Millennial Jewish Stars: Race, Gender and Sexuality", "code": "JWST 2585", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "The rap superstar Drake, comedian Ilana Glazer, and muscleman Zac Efron are just three of the millennial Jewish stars examined in this course. We will ask how millennial Jewish stars depict Jewishness in terms of race, gender, sexuality. For instance, why has the rapper Lil Dicky chosen such an emasculating stage name, and why does Ilana Glazer embrace the outdated racial term \"Jewess?\" How do these names use historical Jewish stereotypes to fuel present-day comedy? We will trace racial, gendered, and sexual tropes about Jews from 19th-century theater to the newest YouTube sketches. We'll cluster these media around themes like women's pleasure, Jewish identity, cultural appropriation, anti-Semitism, and millennial financial struggles. We'll laugh hard, learn a lot, and see today's media through new eyes.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2332, "title": "Medicine, Magic and Science in the Ancient Near East", "code": "JWST 2599", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course explores the history of medicine and other sciences in the ancient Near East, broadly defined. In addition to medicine, the other scientific disciplines covered in this course include mathematics, astrology, astronomy, alchemy, zoology, among others. Geographically, the course traces the transmission of scientific knowledge in ancient Babylonia, Iran, Egypt, Israel, Turkey, and beyond. As such, the course offers students a tour of different ancient civilizations and corpora. Students read selections from cuneiform Akkadian tablets, Egyptian Christian Coptic spellbooks, rabbinic sources such as the Talmud, among many other works. At the same time, students will be required to critically engage recent scholarship in the history of science and medicine as a way to help frame their analyses of the ancient materials. The course interrogates how ancient civilizations transmitted and received scientific knowledge, as well as the relationship between what we today tend to call science, medicine, magic, and religion. This course is intended not only for students in the Humanities and Social Sciences, but also for those majoring in science or medicine.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2333, "title": "Introduction to the Ancient Near East", "code": "JWST 2601", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "The pyramids and mummies of Egypt, the ziggurats of Babylonia, and the armies of Assyria are all part of the legacy of the ancient Near East. This course serves as a basic introduction to the history, societies, and cultures of the major civilizations of the ancient world from c. 3300-300 B.C., focusing on Egypt and Mesopotamia but including lesser-known groups such as the Hittites in Anatolia and the Elamites in Iran. Students will learn how these states were organized, how each culture related to their gods, and how they chose to be remembered, as well as many other mysteries of the ancient world.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2334, "title": "Introduction to Judaism", "code": "JWST 2644", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Jewish identities, values, and practices from the ancient to modern era. Organized thematically, it examines Judaism as a religious phenomenon, with a particular emphasis on its cultural and textual diversity across three millennia. Themes covered include creation, Sabbath, prayer, Jerusalem, pious customs, magic, reincarnation, revelation, among others. Throughout the semester students perform close readings of a wide selection of Jewish texts from the Bible, Talmud, kabbalah (mysticism), philosophy, liturgy, and modern Jewish thought. In what ways are these various traditions of Judaism interrelated and/or in tension with one another? In the face of the Jewish history's tremendous diversity, what is it that has unified Judaism and the Jewish people over the centuries? By exploring these types of questions, this course examines the appropriateness of defining Judaism as a religion, an ethnicity, a civilization, and/or a culture. Readings include introductory-level textbooks and essays, as well as a range of primary source materials in translation.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2335, "title": "Jewish Films and Filmmakers: Hollywood and Beyond", "code": "JWST 2790", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "What does it mean to call a film is \"Jewish\"? Does it have to represent Jewish life? Does it have to feature characters identifiable as Jews? If artists who identify as Jews\u2014actors, directors, screenwriters, composers\u2014play significant roles in a film's production does that make it Jewish? Our primary point of entry into these questions will be Hollywood, from the industry's early silent films, through the period generally considered classical, down to the present day. We will also study films produced overseas, in countries that may include Israel, Egypt, France, Italy, and Germany. Our discussions will be enriched by contextual material drawn from film studies, cultural studies, Jewish studies, American studies, and other related fields. Students will be expected to view a significant number of films outside of class\u2014an average of one per week\u2014and engage with them through writing and in-class discussion. The directors, screenwriters, composers, and actors whose work we will study may include: Charlie Chaplin, Irving Berlin, Al Jolson, Fanny Brice, Billy Wilder, Barbra Streisand, Woody Allen, Mel Brooks, Aviva Kempner, Joan Micklin Silver, the Marx Brothers, and the Coen Brothers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2336, "title": "Advanced Modern Hebrew II", "code": "JWST 3102", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This is the second course in our third-year Modern Hebrew language sequence. Like its predecessor, it focuses on developing speech proficiency, reading and listening comprehension, and writing. It does this through reading of a variety of fiction and nonfiction texts; viewing of filmic works and television series selected for their social, political, and cultural relevance; class discussions; presentations and writing about everyday issues in Israel and abroad.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2337, "title": "Dynamics and Changes of Israeli Culture Through Language and Literature", "code": "JWST 3108", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "The course develops advanced Hebrew language proficiency through study of Israeli culture's diachronic development. Like HEBRW 3105, this course prioritizes reading comprehension through close reading of selected works of Modern Hebrew fiction, poetry, and drama grouped around a central theme and read in their cultural and historical contexts. This course also develops oral and written communication, as well as listening comprehension, through a variety of means, including class discussion, oral presentations, viewing of Israeli films and television, and short analytical papers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2338, "title": "Moses to Modernity", "code": "JWST 3535", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Jewish philosophy \u2013 from Biblical texts to 20th century work. Our inquiries will span metaphysics, epistemology, ethics, philosophy of religion, and political philosophy. We will reflect on questions such as the relation between philosophy or reason on the one hand, and religion and ethics on the other, on the possibility of knowledge of God, the ethics of human relations, the nature of suffering, and finally the nature of a tolerant and just society. We will read works by Maimonides, Spinoza, Mendelssohn, Marx, Buber, Rosenzweig, Cohen, Arendt, Levinas, and Butler, among others.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2339, "title": "Minorities of the Middle East", "code": "JWST 3655", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course examines the historic diversity of the modern Middle East, exploring histories of inter-communal contact and conflict. We begin by investigating the legacy of the Ottoman Empire and the impact of its dissolution. We will focus our attention on commercial centers that fostered inter-communal relations, as well as investigating sites of strife and cases of minority repression. We will read histories, memoirs, and fiction, and view films that help us better understand inter-communal relations, tensions, and conflict. We will also interrogate the terms for exploring a range distinctions among majority and minority populations including: religious difference (Muslims, Christians, and Jews); divisions of religious rite (Sunni and Shi'a); entho-linguistic minorities (Armenians and Kurds); national identities (Israelis and Palestinians); cultures of origin (Mizrahi, Sephardi, and Ashkenazi Jews). We will explore how these divisions inform urgent current conflicts: the civil war in Syria and the refugee crisis; the civil war in Iraq and the campaign by ISIS against minorities; as well as tensions between Saudi Arabia and Iran.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2340, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "JWST 4310", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2341, "title": "Gnosticism and Early Christianity", "code": "JWST 4628", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "What is \"Gnosticism\" and why has it come to be so hotly debated among scholars and in our contemporary media? What is the Gospel of Judas and are its ideas \"heretical\"? Who wrote the Gospel of Thomas and the Gospel of Mary and why were these Gospels not included in the New Testament canon? To what extent did Dan Brown's The Da Vinci Code draw from ancient Christian gnostic sources? This seminar will explore answers to these questions and many others by focusing on the complex array of literary sources from late antiquity-primarily from a cache of manuscripts found at Nag Hammadi, Egypt, in 1945-that have long been associated with a so-called \"Christian Gnosticism\". Church Fathers condemned the \"movement\" on a variety of grounds, but in this course we will not simply read the condemnations written by the opponents of gnostic thought; rather, we will focus our attention on reading (in English translation) substantial portions of the \"gnostic\" texts written by the adherents themselves. We will give special attention to the ways in which conflicts about Gnosticism connected with conflicts about gender, heresy, power, and authority. To set these texts within a socio-historical context, we will discuss the possible Jewish and hellenistic roots of early Christian Gnosticism and ties to Stoic and other ancient philosophical movements.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2342, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "JWST 4659", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2343, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "JWST 4721", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2344, "title": "Independent Study - Undergraduate", "code": "JWST 4992", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "For undergraduates who wish to obtain research experience or do extensive reading on a special topic.\u00a0 Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course.", "tags": "JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2345, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "JWST 6310", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2346, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "JWST 6370", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2347, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "JWST 6659", "subject": "JWST", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the\u00a0Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "JWST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2348, "title": "Elements of Kannada Language and Culture", "code": "KANAD 1100", "subject": "KANAD", "descr": "This course is designed for students with no previous knowledge of Kannada language who are participating in the university programs in Kannada-speaking areas of Karnataka. Students will learn how to make simple phrases and sentences to interact with the locals. Emphasis will be on appropriate behavior and how respect the local culture and habits.", "tags": "KANAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2349, "title": "Elementary Khmer II", "code": "KHMER 1122", "subject": "KHMER", "descr": "Gives a thorough grounding in speaking and reading.", "tags": "KHMER", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2350, "title": "Intermediate Khmer II", "code": "KHMER 2202", "subject": "KHMER", "descr": "Continuing instruction in spoken and written Khmer. Intermediate level of reading Khmer.", "tags": "KHMER", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2351, "title": "Advanced Khmer II", "code": "KHMER 3302", "subject": "KHMER", "descr": "Continuing instruction in spoken and written Khmer; emphasis on enlarging vocabulary, increasing reading speed, and reading various genres and styles of prose.", "tags": "KHMER", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2352, "title": "Elementary Korean II", "code": "KOREA 1102", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "Continuation of KOREA 1101\u00a0.\u00a0 Designed to help students acquire the 4 skills (listening, speaking, reading and writing) of the Korean language and to become familiar with its culture. Basic knowledge of Korean grammar, vocabulary, expressions and cultural points will be given during the lecture. The students will then have an opportunity to practice the learned knowledge in sections. The goal of this course is to refine their survival skills in Korean. By the end of the semester, students will be able to exchange in simple conversations with native Koreans about the subjects that are familiar to them: school life, family and friends, traffic and transportation, vacation plans, food and restaurant, hobbies, etc.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2353, "title": "Elementary Korean Reading and Writing II", "code": "KOREA 1110", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "Continuation of KOREA 1109. Focuses on communicative skills in speaking, listening, reading and writing by introducing a wide range of linguistic resources. Students will command daily conversation in different cultural contexts and develop an ability to summarize and reflect on literary texts and films both in oral and written modes. Students will be able to create a discourse regarding topics such as birthday, campus life, family, shopping and hobbies. Also, students will write and revise their own work regularly to improve linguistic accuracy and reduce error production.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2354, "title": "Intermediate Korean II", "code": "KOREA 2202", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "Continuation of KOREA 2201\u00a0.\u00a0 The course helps students develop further communicative competence by understanding and producing complex linguistic structures and pragmatically appropriate expressions in cultural contexts. Students will use linguistic tools to describe and express their stance, justification, attitudes, evaluation and complex clausal relations. Students will command a lengthy discourse regarding various topics such as holidays, marriage, birthday, cultural differences, doctor-patient talk and job interview.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2355, "title": "Intermediate Korean Reading and Writing II", "code": "KOREA 2210", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "Continuation of KOREA 2209.\u00a0 Designed for Korean heritage students who can understand and speak Korean, but especially need to refine their reading and writing skills. Students will acquire concrete knowledge of grammar to use in everyday conversation, and will minimize their spelling errors in writing, through frequent discussion and composition about Korean culture, society and history. They will become confident in reading paragraph-length readings in Korean, be able to write their reflections on the passages that they have read, and speak with ease when participating in the classroom discussions. Various projects will enhance students' overall linguistic and cultural competence.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2356, "title": "High Intermediate Korean II", "code": "KOREA 3302", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "Continuation of KOREA 3301. Students will continue to refine their high-intermediate language skills. Authentic published materials and documentary video-clips will be introduced in order for students to be exposed to an advanced level of Korean. Students will discuss and write an essay on topics regarding Seoul, South Korea and North Korea, housing in Korea, customs and superstition of Korea, Korean folk tales and proverbs, Korean culture of community, and Korea during the Japanese colonial period. Students are given the opportunity to do research on Korean culture and society following an academic research format and give an oral presentation in class.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2357, "title": "Korean Foreign Language Across the Curriculum (FLAC)", "code": "KOREA 3316", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2358, "title": "Advanced Korean II", "code": "KOREA 4402", "subject": "KOREA", "descr": "Continuation of KOREA 4401. Designed for students to acquire advanced language skills (speaking, listening, reading and writing) through Content-Based Instruction and Project-Based Language Learning. Students will gain profound knowledge in various fields on Korea through discussion and composition: Current issues in Korean society, Korean people's thoughts and mind, tradition, history and culture. In the first half of the semester, students will learn professional vocabulary and expressions from the textbook to be able to discuss various topics on Korean society. In the second half of the semester, students will watch various Korean TV documentary programs to discuss about and read the contemporary novel chapter by chapter to analyze. Students will gain confidence in the academic level of discussions and compositions.", "tags": "KOREA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2359, "title": "Grounding in Landscape Architecture II", "code": "LA 1420", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This course applies fundamentals of landscape design to small-scale site-planning projects. Work in the studio introduces students to the design process, design principles, construction materials, and a wide array of graphic representation. Projects are selected at a variety of scales to expose students to a broad overview of landscape architecture.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2360, "title": "Medium of the Landscape II", "code": "LA 2020", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Focuses on the role of materials and natural systems in design at multiple scales. Design strategies, theory and vocabulary in landscape architecture and allied disciplines are explored within the projects.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2361, "title": "Integrating Theory and Practice II", "code": "LA 3020", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This studio builds upon prior course work with an expectation that participants can creatively manipulate the program and conditions of a site or area, with increased emphasis on contemporary technology. The course focuses on the expression of design solutions that grow from and affirm an explicit sense of site and place. Social, cultural, physical, and historical factors and their relationship to site design and planning are critically explored through theory and practice.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2362, "title": "Site Assembly", "code": "LA 3180", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Emphasizes detail design and use of landscape materials in project implementation. It explores construction materials, including specifications, cost estimates, and methods used by landscape architects in project facilitation. It includes lectures, studio problems, and development of drawings leading to construction documentation of one comprehensive project.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2363, "title": "Capstone Community Design Studio", "code": "LA 4020", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Community and ecological infrastructure design studio.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2364, "title": "Directed Study: The Concentration", "code": "LA 4030", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Working with their advisor, students create a written and visual document that describes the concentration intent.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2365, "title": "Computer Applications in Landscape Architecture", "code": "LA 4100", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Designed to develop a working knowledge of AutoCAD as a tool for design and construction documentation.\u00a0 Explores the link between AutoCAD, Adobe Create Suite and Microsoft Office softwares.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2366, "title": "Professional Practice", "code": "LA 4120", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This course presents the student with an understanding of the emerging role of the professional landscape architect. The course helps students choose a type of practice and introduces the problems and opportunities one may encounter in an office or in other professional situations. Topics include the diversity of types of professional practice, marketing professional services, office and project management, construction administration, and ethics.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2367, "title": "Seminar in Landscape Studies", "code": "LA 4830", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Topical lecture series and seminars with a different subject and method each time it is offered.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2368, "title": "Creating the Urban Eden: Woody Plant Selection, Design, and Landscape Establishment", "code": "LA 4920", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This is the second half of course focusing on the winter identification, uses, and establishment of woody plants in urban and garden settings. Issues of site assessment and soil remediation are emphasized in addition to soil volume calculations, drainage and surface detailing, and planting techniques. Students critically assess potential planting sites and select appropriate trees, shrubs, vines, and ground covers for a given site. Design for specific sites followed by written specifications and graphic details are produced to implement these proposals. Students implement, in a hands-on manner, site remediation and planting techniques they have learned by creating new landscapes that serve to integrate theory, principles, and practices. Together, PLHRT 4910\u00a0and PLHRT 4920 constitute an integrated course.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2369, "title": "Individual Study in Landscape Architecture", "code": "LA 4970", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Work on special topics by individuals or small groups.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2370, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching", "code": "LA 4980", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduates experience through actual involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of department faculty members.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2371, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "LA 4990", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Permits outstanding undergraduates to carry out independent research in landscape architecture under academically appropriate faculty supervision. Research goals should include description, prediction, and explanation, and should generate new knowledge in the field of landscape architecture.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2372, "title": "Composition and Theory II", "code": "LA 5020", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Studio course emphasizing the design process and principles ingenerating design ideas, concepts and plans. The course focuses on the aestheties and functionality of site-specific design.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2373, "title": "Graphic Communication II", "code": "LA 5060", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Intermediate-level course focusing on modes of landscape representation from ideation to presentation. Representation modes may include freehand, process drawing, and analysis and orthographic drawing; concept modeling; composite drawings; and visual books.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2374, "title": "Master of Professional Studies Project", "code": "LA 5090", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Problem-solving project entailing either fieldwork and/or library work. The aim of the project is to give students supervised experience in dealing intellectually and analytically with a professional problem related to a substantive area of international development.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2375, "title": "Theoretical Foundations", "code": "LA 5900", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This seminar is intended to provide Landscape Architecture Students (as well as Architecture, Planning students) with knowledge of the most relevant histories, theories and critical discourses related to the field from the scope of Landscape Design.\u00a0 We tend to think that theories provide the insight to embitter practice.\u00a0 However, there has been practice that provoked and enhanced disciplinary debate and actually generated a \"paradigm shift\".\u00a0 The course launches a research question: it is only through the examination of influential design works that we can build the multiple dialogues between theory and practice: explore how theory is embedded into disciplinary production and study how pioneer works create specific and innovative disciplinary literature.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2376, "title": "Graduate Individual Study in Landscape Architecture", "code": "LA 5970", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Work on special topics by individuals or small groups.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2377, "title": "Graduate Teaching", "code": "LA 5980", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Designed to give qualified students experience through involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of faculty members. The experience may include leading discussion sections, preparing, assisting in desk critiques, and presenting lectures. There are assigned readings and discussion sessions on education theory and practice throughout the semester.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2378, "title": "Integrating Theory and Practice II", "code": "LA 6020", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This studio builds on prior course work with an expectation that participants can creatively manipulate the program and conditions of a site, with increased emphasis on contemporary technology and 'best' green practices. Projects focus upon the expression of design solutions that grow from and affirm an explicit sense of site and place. Social, cultural, physical, and historic factors and their relationship to site design and planning are critically explored through theory and practice.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2379, "title": "Directed Study: The Concentration", "code": "LA 6030", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Working with their advisor, students create a written and visual paper that documents the concentration intent.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2380, "title": "Site Assembly", "code": "LA 6180", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Emphasizes detail design and use of landscape materials in project implementation. It explores materials, including specifications, cost estimates, and methods used by landscape architects in project facilitation. It includes lectures, short studio problems, and the development of drawings leading to construction documentation for one comprehensive project.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2381, "title": "Design of Landscapes", "code": "LA 6910", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Introductory survey of the history and theory of planned human intervention in the material environment.\u00a0 Critical themes, sites, and conditions across time, space, and scale, from the paradise garden to the contemporary megacity, are explored through weekly topical lectures, creative exercises, discussions, readings, and essays. Course culminates in an individual research project.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2382, "title": "Special Topics in Landscape Architecture", "code": "LA 6940", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Topical subjects in landscape architectural design, theory, history, or technology. Includes group study of topics not considered in other courses.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2383, "title": "Advanced Design Studio", "code": "LA 7020", "subject": "LA", "descr": "This advanced design studio provides students in the final year of the graduate program in Landscape Architecture with the opportunity to work on complex, real-time projects. The overarching goal of this course is to test the student's theoretical, methodological, technical, and representational competency and ability to engage with a range of scales and issues. Through intensive studio work, seminar sessions, independent research, and site visits, students gain the knowledge and skills necessary to develop sound and creative solutions to environmental design problems.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2384, "title": "Master's Thesis in Landscape Architecture", "code": "LA 8900", "subject": "LA", "descr": "Independent research, under faculty guidance leading to the development of a comprehensive and defensible design or study related to the field of landscape architecture. Work is expected to be completed in final semester of enrollment.", "tags": "LA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2385, "title": "Modern Latin America", "code": "LATA 1960", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "Do you wonder what the historical context is for migrations out of Central America? Or why many Brazilians are so fearful of the recent election of Jair Bolsonaro? Curious as to what the 'pink tide' is? Or why Silicon Valley investors are hanging out in Honduras and Panama? Who the Zapatistas are and why they call themselves by that name? When the very term 'Latin America' came into being? Why Chileans were the vanguard of the California Gold Rush? How Mexican cowboys ended up in Hawaii?\u00a0 If so, this course is for you. It surveys the social, political, cultural and economic history of Latin America from roughly 1800 to the present. The primary aim is to help you develop a mental map of the history of Latin America\u2014of prominent themes issues; of historical eras and trajectories. Given the vastness of Latin America, and its somewhat arbitrary composition as an object of study, the approach of the course is thematic and chronological rather than regional. We will pay attention to a number of more specific and interconnected themes: the development of, and relationship between, capitalist economies and processes of state formation; the complex roles Britain and the U.S. have played in the region, but always with an appreciation for how Latin Americans have shaped their own histories and those of the U.S. and Britain; the ways in which non-elites\u2014slaves, workers, peasants, among others\u2014have shaped history; the politics of the production of history; and Latin America's 'situatedness' in a broader world.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2386, "title": "Pirates, Slaves, and Revolutionaries: A History of the Caribbean from Columbus to Louverture", "code": "LATA 1970", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "What is the Caribbean? How did its native inhabitants fared in the aftermath of the arrival of Europeans? How did the region shift from a Spanish Lake to a heavily contested geopolitical site where all European powers vied for political and commercial superiority? What were the main production systems of the region and how did they result in dramatic environmental change? How did the eighteenth-century revolutions transform the Caribbean? In this introductory survey to Caribbean history we will answer these and many other questions through the study of the political, economic, social, cultural, and environmental transformations of the Caribbean from the arrival of Columbus to the era of the Haitian Revolution. We will follow indigenous people, Spanish conquistadors, English, Dutch, and French pirates and privateers, planters, and merchants, imperial officers, slaves, sailors, and revolutionaries as they adapted to the multiple transformations that shaped this region. Through lectures, discussions, and readings of primary and secondary sources we will navigate the Caribbean in a quest to understand the historical processes that gave shape to this tropical paradise.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2387, "title": "Introduction to Latin American Art", "code": "LATA 2050", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to Latin American art from the pre-Columbian period to the present.\u00a0 It will cover the arts of ancient civilizations including the Olmec, Maya, Aztec, Moche, and Inca, as well as the colonial, modern, and contemporary arts of Latin America and the Latino/a diaspora.\u00a0 Major themes include the relationship between art and religion, innovations and transformations in Latin American art across time, art and identity, as well as Indigenous and Afro-Latin American contributions to the visual arts.\u00a0 This course examines the societal relevance of images across Latin American cultures by paying close attention to the historical and political contexts in which they were created.\u00a0 Course readings are drawn from the disciplines of art history, anthropology, and history, along with theoretical perspectives on colonialism, postcolonialism, identity, race, and ethnicity.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2388, "title": "Early Modern Iberian Survey", "code": "LATA 2170", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course explores major texts and themes of the Hispanic tradition from the 11th to the 17th centuries. We will examine general questions on literary analysis and the relationship between literature and history around certain events, such as medieval multicultural Iberia, the creation of the Spanish Inquisition in the 15th century and the expulsion of the Jews in 1492; the encounter between the Old and the New Worlds; the 'opposition' of high and low in popular culture, and of the secular and the sacred in poetry and prose. Readings may be drawn from medieval short stories and miracle collections; chivalric romances, Columbus, Lazarillo de Tormes, Cervantes, Lope de Vega, Calder\u00f3n, and Sor Juana In\u00e9s de la Cruz, among others.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2389, "title": "Perspectives on Latin America", "code": "LATA 2200", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "Interdisciplinary course offered every spring. Topics vary by semester, but readings always focus on current research in various disciplines and regions of Latin America. The range of issues addressed include the economic, social, cultural, and political trends and transitions in the area. In the weekly meetings, instructors and guest lecturers facilitate student discussions. Students taking the course are required to participate in all class discussions and write a research paper in their chosen focus area.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2390, "title": "Perspectives on Brazil", "code": "LATA 2800", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course provides an introduction and overview of Brazilian culture. It will study different periods of Brazilian history, through the analysis of films, literature, essays, visual arts, and music. Students will explore different definitions of Brazilian identity and \"Brazilianness\" focusing on key topics including the formation of the colonial Brazil\u00a0 and the emergence of the nation of Brazil as a tropical paradise; slavery and abolition; the particularities century; and the contradictions of the modernization process throughout the 20th century. We will consider elements of Brazilian popular culture such as Carnival, Samba, and \"telenovels,\" and some of the most important cultural movements of the 20th century, such as \"Modernismo,\" \"Cinema Novo,\" and \"Tropicalia.\" The primary objective of the course is to provide students with the relevant background to understand Brazilian cultural history.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2391, "title": "Advanced Portuguese I", "code": "LATA 3100", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course provides intermediate level students with the opportunity to advance their oral and written fluency, proficiency, and understanding of the grammar of Portuguese. In addition, students will be introduced to several cultural aspects of the Lusophone world, including regionalisms of Portuguese language. This goal will be achieved with the aid of literary and journalistic texts. Students will be expected to give individual and group presentations, as well as to write short pieces in the target language. The course is tailored to bridge language learning and content-based courses and research in Portuguese.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2392, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "LATA 3336", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2393, "title": "Brazilian Ensemble - Deixa Sambar", "code": "LATA 3609", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "Deixa Sambar performs several styles of samba, Brazil's national music. Members need not have prior background in music-making, but a good sense of rhythm is desirable. Members include students as well as Ithaca community members, brasileiros as well as newcomers to Brazilian culture. Rehearsals develop playing skills, with a deep emphasis on cultural understanding of this vital, community-based music.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2394, "title": "Cornell Steel Band", "code": "LATA 3613", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "The Cornell Steel Band explores the wide variety of music for an orchestra of instruments fashioned from 55-gallon oil drums, and an \"engine room\" of non-pitched percussion. Interwoven into the focus on hands-on practice is reflection on the meanings of steel band, historically and in the present, in its native Trinidad and Tobago and here in the United States. Formal musical training is not necessary, though a sense of rhythm and a good ear are helpful.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2395, "title": "Poetry and Poetics of the Americas", "code": "LATA 3800", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "As globalization draws the Americas ever closer together, reshaping our sense of a common and uncommon American culture, what claims might be made for a distinctive, diverse poetry and poetics of the America? How might we characterize its dominant forms and alternative practices? What shared influences, affiliations, concerns and approaches might we find and what differences emerge? Ranging across North and South America, Central America and the Caribbean, this course will place in conversation such figures as Poe, Stein, Eliot, Pound, Williams, Neruda, Vallejo, Borges, Parra, C\u00e9saire, Walcott, Bola\u00f1o, Espada, Waldrop, Vicu\u00f1a, Hong, and Rankine.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2396, "title": "Contemporary Issues in Latin - Latino America", "code": "LATA 4000", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "Interested in Latino Studies and Latin American Studies? This course will explore topics in Anthropology, Art, Economics, History, Literature, Government, Sociology, etc., of US Latino and Latin American contexts. Course features guest speakers from Cornell and other institutions.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2397, "title": "Topics in Colonial Encounters", "code": "LATA 4160", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "The colonial period in Latin America (circa 1521-1820s) witnessed the formation of one of the most diverse societies in the world.\u00a0 Labor regimes, religious activities, marriage alliances, and commercial contacts engendered by the Spanish colonial enterprise brought Spaniards, Africans, and Indigenous peoples into dynamic contact.\u00a0 This cross-fertilization of cultures resulted in the construction of new cultural categories and colonial identities whose reverberations continue to be felt into the present day.\u00a0 This seminar explores the role that visual culture played in the articulation of identity in Latin America.\u00a0 For the purposes of this seminar, \"identity\" can be loosely defined as the overlapping allegiances to which one ascribes, whether racial, cultural, gendered, religious, or community-based.\u00a0 The visual culture of colonial Latin America can reveal multitudes on the construction of self and community across temporal and geographical contexts.\u00a0 We will explore a variety of colonial Latin American objects and images, including paintings, textiles, and material culture.\u00a0 Our discussions of images will be guided by readings on hybridity, coloniality, cross-cultural exchange, and the early modern Atlantic world.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2398, "title": "Latin American Literature and Mass Media", "code": "LATA 4910", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course examines Latin American literature in the context of the visual and auditory of the twentieth century and early twenty-first century, in which mass media such as photography, film, and the Internet have threatened writing's \"representational privilege\" as a technology of information processing and storage.\u00a0 We will analyze how literature has been able to sustain its visibilty in the competitive media ecology: the power of mass media fantasies to mold the individual's subjectivity, and of the visual image to manipulate reality; the relationship between literature and popular culture and the market place: and the young writers' engagement with the new technologies of the information age.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2399, "title": "Independent Study in Latin American Studies", "code": "LATA 4970", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "Guided independent study with a faculty member.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2400, "title": "Contemporary Issues in Latin-Latino America", "code": "LATA 6000", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "Interested in Latino Studies and Latin American Studies? This course will explore topics in Anthropology, Art, Economics, History, Literature, Government, Sociology, etc., of US Latino and Latin American contexts. Course features guest speakers from Cornell and other institutions.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2401, "title": "Topics in Colonial Encounters", "code": "LATA 6160", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "The colonial period in Latin America (circa 1521-1820s) witnessed the formation of one of the most diverse societies in the world.\u00a0 Labor regimes, religious activities, marriage alliances, and commercial contacts engendered by the Spanish colonial enterprise brought Spaniards, Africans, and Indigenous peoples into dynamic contact.\u00a0 This cross-fertilization of cultures resulted in the construction of new cultural categories and colonial identities whose reverberations continue to be felt into the present day.\u00a0 This seminar explores the role that visual culture played in the articulation of identity in Latin America.\u00a0 For the purposes of this seminar, \"identity\" can be loosely defined as the overlapping allegiances to which one ascribes, whether racial, cultural, gendered, religious, or community-based.\u00a0 The visual culture of colonial Latin America can reveal multitudes on the construction of self and community across temporal and geographical contexts.\u00a0 We will explore a variety of colonial Latin American objects and images, including paintings, textiles, and material culture.\u00a0 Our discussions of images will be guided by readings on hybridity, coloniality, cross-cultural exchange, and the early modern Atlantic world.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2402, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "LATA 6336", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2403, "title": "History Geography Theory", "code": "LATA 6482", "subject": "LATA", "descr": "This seminar is a readings course on works from the past two decades that have wrestled theoretically, empirically, and narratively with the boundary between geography and history. The course is purposefully promiscuous, temporally and spatially, and the readings traverse wide swaths of time and space. Topics to be covered may include mapping, surveying, and exploration; the production of space; histories of property and enclosure; non-state spaces and counter-territorialities; development and 'nature'; and spatial subjectivities.", "tags": "LATA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2404, "title": "Elementary Latin II", "code": "LATIN 1202", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "Continuation of LATIN 1201, using readings from various authors; prepares students for LATIN 1205.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2405, "title": "Intermediate Latin I", "code": "LATIN 1205", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "Introduces students to reading original Latin text (fall, Livy's Rome; spring, Cicero's Letters ). Covers complex syntax and reviews the grammar presented in LATIN 1202, LATIN 1204.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2406, "title": "Catullus", "code": "LATIN 2203", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "The aim of the course is to present the poems of Catullus within their cultural and poetical context. The poems will be read and translated, and their significance both individually and in relation to the poetic context will be discussed in class. Some selections from the works of Catullus' contemporaries will be assigned in translation.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2407, "title": "Conversational Latin II", "code": "LATIN 2210", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "This course allows students to practice and perfect the active skills learned in Conversational Latin I (although sufficiently advanced students may enroll without having taken that course) in order to increase reading, speaking, and writing fluency.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2408, "title": "Roman Poetry", "code": "LATIN 3203", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "Undergraduate seminar. Topic:\u00a0Lucretius. Reading in Latin of selections from Lucretius's De Rerum Natura, his poetic exploration of Epicurean philosophy via atomic physics. We will approach this multifaceted work from many different perspectives, reading it as a philosophical text, a poetic experiment, and a guide to achieving tranquility of mind. We will read as much of the text as possible in Latin, and the remainder in Stallings' recent English translation, alongside secondary readings which will help us put this work in its literary and philosophical context.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2409, "title": "Independent Study in Latin, Undergraduate Level", "code": "LATIN 3286", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "May be taken upon completion of one semester of work at the 3000-level. To be taken only in exceptional circumstances. Must be arranged by the student with his or her advisor and the faculty member who has agreed to direct the study. To be approved by the DUS.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2410, "title": "Advanced Readings in Latin and Greek", "code": "LATIN 6212", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "The course will prepare students to read the texts that are on the Classics Reading List (https://classics.cornell.edu/phd#reading-lists).", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2411, "title": "Advanced Latin Prose Composition", "code": "LATIN 6216", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "This advanced Latin prose composition course is for graduate students.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2412, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "LATIN 7262", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2413, "title": "Independent Study in Latin", "code": "LATIN 7920", "subject": "LATIN", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LATIN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2414, "title": "Death Penalty in America", "code": "LAW 4051", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The death penalty has gotten increased media attention due to high profile death row exonerations, and has long been under siege for other reasons, such as racial disparities in its imposition and the prevalence of very poor representation by defense counsel. This course surveys the legal and social issues that arise in the administration of the death penalty. The reading will be largely comprised of reported death penalty cases, but will be augmented by a variety of other sources, including empirical studies of the death penalty and the litigation experience of the professors. Although the focus will be on capital punishment as practiced in the United States, we will also consider international and comparative perspectives. Guest speakers will provide a range of views, and law students with experience working on capital cases will lead discussion sections.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2415, "title": "The Nature, Functions, and Limits of Law", "code": "LAW 4131", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "A general-education course to acquaint students with how our legal system pursues the goals of society. The course introduces students to various perspectives on the nature of law, what functions it ought to serve in society, and what it can and cannot accomplish. The course proceeds in the belief that such matters constitute a valuable and necessary part of a general education, not only for pre-law students but especially for students in other fields. Assigned readings comprise legal materials and also secondary sources on the legal process and the role of law in society. The classes include discussion and debate about current legal and social issues, including equality, safety, the environment, punishment, and autonomy.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2416, "title": "Civil Procedure", "code": "LAW 5001", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "An introduction to civil litigation, from commencement of an action through disposition on appeal, studied in the context of the federal procedural system. Also, a detailed consideration of federalism and ascertainment of applicable law; jurisdiction, process, and venue; and former adjudication.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2417, "title": "Criminal Law", "code": "LAW 5061", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "An introductory study of the criminal law, including theories of punishment, analysis of the elements of criminal liability and available defenses, and consideration of specific crimes as defined by statute and the common law.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2418, "title": "Lawyering", "code": "LAW 5081", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Lawyering is a full-year course designed to introduce first-year students to lawyering skills, with primary emphasis on legal writing, analysis, research, and oral presentations. Assignments are usually set in the context of a simulated law office (or judge's chambers). In the fall semester, students write predictive memoranda that point out the strengths and weaknesses of their client's case. To prepare the memoranda, students may need to determine the facts of the case by conducting interviews or depositions. Acting as junior attorneys, students will also make an oral presentation to a supervising attorney. The spring semester focuses on persuasive advocacy. Students prepare a memorandum, motion, or brief for submission to a court and, later, orally argue for their positions in a simulated court session. Throughout the year, students also learn the fundamentals of legal research. Instruction occurs not only in full-class sessions but also in individual conferences. Students receive extensive feedback on each major assignment.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2419, "title": "Advanced Financial Statement Analysis", "code": "LAW 5090", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course builds on the material of NBA 5060\u00a0and focuses on more advanced financial statement topics and specialized industries.\u00a0Topics may include investment research, accounting analysis, accounting quality, credit analysis, and advanced valuation issues.\u00a0\u00a0 Instruction focuses on a combination of lecture and case-based discussion.\u00a0 Students are expected to have taken NBA 5060\u00a0or possess a good understanding of basic financial statement analysis.\u00a0 The material is designed to broaden student's understanding of financial statement analysis and complement the tools developed in NBA 5060. The course deliverables include case write-ups, an equity research project, and a final exam.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2420, "title": "Property", "code": "LAW 5121", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This is a course in basic property law. It covers acquisitions of rights in property, estates in land, concurrent ownership, landlord/tenant relations, and regulation of land use.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2421, "title": "Law In-Absentia Study", "code": "LAW 6000", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is for Law students who have been approved for one semester of in-absentia study at an ABA accredited law school.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2422, "title": "Accounting for Lawyers", "code": "LAW 6001", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to the basic concepts and fundamentals of financial accounting. It will focus on (1) accrual accounting concepts, principles and conventions, (2) the presentation of financial statements (balance sheets, income statements, statements of cash flow), (3) the interpretation and analysis of financial statements, and (4) the use and misuse of accounting information. The goal of the course is to enable students to critically review a company's financial statements. The course is intended for students with no prior background in accounting and is limited to students who have had no college accounting courses (or equivalent). Students with one or two college level accounting courses or other modest accounting background may take this course for a JD letter grade only with permission of the instructor.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2423, "title": "Administrative Law: The Law of the Regulatory State", "code": "LAW 6011", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "An introduction to the constitutional and other legal issues posed by the modern administrative state. Topics include: procedural due process, separation of powers, procedural modes of administrative policymaking; judicial review of agency action; and the oversight and control relationships between agencies and Congress or the President. The course provides a working familiarity with the fundamentals of administrative procedure, as well as a larger inquiry into the role of agencies in our constitutional system - and the effect of legal doctrine on shaping that role.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2424, "title": "Private Funds", "code": "LAW 6025", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2425, "title": "Campus Mediation Practicum", "code": "LAW 6027", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is offered to students interested in acquiring the knowledge, skills and techniques necessary to mediate interpersonal disputes. In the first segment of the course, students will be introduced to the guiding principles of interpersonal mediation. A review of the theories of conflict, its roots and its resolution, set the stage for the role mediation can effectively play in resolving conflict. Students are introduced to the models of mediation and the benefits and challenges of each, including a comparative analysis of evaluative, facilitative and transformative styles of mediation. In the second segment, students will be assigned to mediate cases referred to the Scheinman Institute from the Office of the Judicial Administrator. The role of gender, race, culture, ethics and impasse in mediation will all be examined and incorporated into workshops and case studies. Students will have several opportunities to apply their knowledge of mediation and acquire the skills necessary to become effective mediators. Following each case assignment, students will be required to write a paper analyzing the nature of the complaint, the approach and techniques employed during the case and the student's evaluation of what worked and did not work in their attempt to resolve the conflict. Oversight will be provided by the course instructors.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2426, "title": "Campus Mediation Practicum II: Advanced Issues in Restorative Justice", "code": "LAW 6029", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is offered to students interested in furthering their knowledge of the principles and practices of restorative justice. Students will also acquire the knowledge, skills and techniques necessary to mediate complex campus disputes.\u00a0The course considers the needs and roles of key stakeholders (victims, offenders, communities, justice systems) and explores in depth the principles and values of restorative justice. It also identifies challenges to restorative justice - the dangers, the pitfalls \u2013 as well as possible strategies to help prevent restorative justice from failing to live up to its promise. Much of the course is organized around the issue of harm and crime within our legal system. \u00a0However, students will also be exposed to restorative justice in multiple contexts, including issues in higher education.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2427, "title": "Advanced Legal Research in Business Law", "code": "LAW 6051", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Business issues, particularly those relating to corporations, are a given in most areas of practice. This course will introduce students to online resources providing company information and will enable them to evaluate the information in order to determine whether the resource is the most appropriate for their research. Students will learn how to find what the company says about itself (required filings, annual statements, web pages, press releases), what third parties have to say (analysts, ratings services, directories, news and journal articles), insider information, and the regulatory background of company information. Classes are lectures in concert with outside assignments. There are assigned readings in lieu of a required textbook. \u00a0Students complete three assignments, and a due diligence report on a company of the student's choice. There is no final exam.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2428, "title": "In-House Lawyers: Day-to-Day, Deals and Managing a Crisis", "code": "LAW 6055", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will cover the day-to-day function of in-house counsel as well as the role played by in-house counsel in extraordinary situations such as financings, significant litigation, government investigations and transformative transactions. Topics will include relations with the CEO, board of directors and significant shareholders, intellectual property strategy and defense, transformative transactions and financings, developing high quality compliance and risk management policies and procedures, significant litigation and government investigations, business conduct and crisis management. \u00a0These topics cover many substantive areas as well as ethical, business, policy and reputational concerns. \u00a0This course will address the skills necessary to navigate these issues.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2429, "title": "Financial Statement Analysis", "code": "LAW 6060", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to give students a broad understanding of financial statement analysis and valuation issues. The emphasis is on helping students understand the basic equity research process for use in investment and business decision applications. The course format is a combination of examples, case studies, and lectures. We cover information sources, strategic ratio analysis, cash flow analysis, forecasting financial statements, and firm valuation using discounted cash flow and residual income techniques. The course deliverables include an equity research project and a final exam.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2430, "title": "Compliance Systems", "code": "LAW 6067", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to the basic concepts and fundamentals of the compliance function within a company or organization. It will focus on (1) the drivers behind the development of rules (2) practical issues involved in rule creation (3) the process of training, or \"selling,\" rule systems to the appropriate people (4) policing compliance, including investigations and enforcement of rules, and (5) the consequences of failing to operate a compliance program or doing it wrong. The course relies upon case studies from businesses and organizations, with an emphasis on real life situations and problem solving techniques. A primary argument of the course is that appropriate and efficient internal compliance will support the central mission of the business and control costs.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2431, "title": "Federal Policy Making in Action", "code": "LAW 6070", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The purpose of this one-credit course is to provide a behind-the-scenes examination of the U.S. federal policy making process with examples primarily relating to labor policy.\u00a0 We will begin with a discussion of the statutory framework that shapes this process and defines the roles of the many entities involved.\u00a0 Understanding how policy is developed in law and regulation will be a major emphasis of the course.\u00a0 Policy implementation, administration, and oversight will also be addressed.\u00a0 We will focus on a variety of related topics, including the President's Budget, congressional appropriations, inter-agency collaboration, and the effect of good government initiatives on substantive policy making. Early efforts to respond to the economic effects of the COVID-19 crisis will also be discussed.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2432, "title": "Animal Law", "code": "LAW 6081", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will examine a cutting-edge and constantly evolving field of law, exploring the statutory and case law in which the legal, social, or biological nature of nonhuman animals is an important factor. The course encompasses companion animals, wildlife, and animals raised for food, entertainment, and research, and will survey traditional law topics like torts, contracts, criminal law, constitutional law and federal laws as they intersect with animals. It will also explore the normative and legal ramifications of new food technologies including plant-based and cell-based meat. Grade will be based on participation in open-minded discussions, submission of short (1\u20132 page) weekly reflection papers that account for 15% of the final grade, and a take-home examination.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2433, "title": "Law Practice Technology", "code": "LAW 6085", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Rapidly evolving technologies are undoubtedly transforming the traditional law practice. The purpose of this course is to explore and investigate the use and impact of current technologies in the practice of law. The focus will be on large practice groups with discussions on smaller to mid-sized law firms. \u00a0Tools for client management, electronic discovery, competitive intelligence, document and knowledge management will be analyzed. Ethical issues relating to proper use of technology and data management will be discussed. Electronic communications, social networking tools and emerging technologies including artificial intelligence, wearable technologies and autonomous vehicles, will also be explored.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2434, "title": "Antitrust Law", "code": "LAW 6101", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The antitrust laws of the U.S. protect competitive markets and limit the exercise of monopoly power. Topics include: price fixing, boycotts, and market allocation agreements among competitors; agreements between suppliers and customers; joint ventures; monopolization; and mergers.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2435, "title": "Deciphering DeFi: Legal, Governance and Economic Issues Facing Decentralized Finance Platforms", "code": "LAW 6105", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2436, "title": "Business Organizations", "code": "LAW 6131", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "An introduction to the legal rules, principles, and economic factors that influence the governance of business enterprises in the United States. While the principal focus of the course will be the governance of large, publicly-traded corporations, we will also devote some attention to agency relationships, partnerships, and closely-held corporations. Legal topics will include business formation and capitalization, fiduciary obligations, shareholder voting, derivative suits, corporate control transactions, and the purpose of the firm.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2437, "title": "Client Counseling", "code": "LAW 6158", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Clients come to lawyers seeking problem-solving advice. This course follows a \"client-centered\" approach to counseling that will examine techniques lawyers can use to help clients make good decisions. Class sessions will incorporate role plays that cover different stages of the counseling process, including clarifying clients' objectives and identifying alternatives and consequences, in litigation and transactional contexts.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2438, "title": "Conflict of Laws Seminar", "code": "LAW 6192", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2439, "title": "The Practice of International Arbitration", "code": "LAW 6193", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2440, "title": "First Amendment Law", "code": "LAW 6201", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will survey interpretations of the First Amendment, including both court doctrines and theoretical understandings. Treatment of the Speech Clause, the Free Exercise Clause, and the Establishment Clause will vary from year to year. Current developments will be emphasized.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2441, "title": "Comparative Copyright and Knowledge Protection", "code": "LAW 6231", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2442, "title": "Financial Distress, Bankruptcy and Restructuring", "code": "LAW 6235", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course develops the framework for evaluating the gains, costs, and risks of managing firms' assets and liabilities in financial distress, including periods of formal bankruptcy and restructuring. It takes the perspective of managers as well as that of capital market participants \u2015 e.g., distress investors, analysts, legal professionals, regulators \u2015 that monitor and evaluate corporate policies in distress situations. The course will do so going beyond standard textbook coverage, making sense of practice and available research on financial distress, bankruptcy and reorganizations, looking at what professionals think and act via surveys, as well as in-depth study of real-world situations. All of these elements are integrated and analyzed with rigorous method. Our ultimate goal is to understand the objectives different economic agents mean to achieve given the institutional constraints they face in distress situations.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2443, "title": "Criminal Procedures: Investigations", "code": "LAW 6264", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Criminal Procedure: Investigations examines the constitutional law that governs police attempts to solve crime and bring perpetrators to justice. The course considers the role of the Fourth Amendment prohibition against unreasonable searches and seizures as well as the Fifth Amendment ban on compelled self-incrimination, in guiding police behavior and in structuring the trials that follow constitutional violations. Students will evaluate the wisdom and constitutional validity of the Fourth Amendment exclusionary rule, which prohibits the introduction of evidence obtained as a result of an unreasonable search, and the well-known Miranda v. Arizona decision as it has evolved over time.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2444, "title": "Consumer Data Privacy", "code": "LAW 6273", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2445, "title": "Advanced Legal App Building", "code": "LAW 6274", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2446, "title": "Cybersecurity Law and Policy", "code": "LAW 6283", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2447, "title": "Directed Reading", "code": "LAW 6301", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "An examination of a topic through readings selected by arrangement between the instructor and an individual student or group of students (not exceeding eight).", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2448, "title": "Education Law", "code": "LAW 6311", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course focuses on selected legal issues that arise in the public and private education context, with emphasis on the elementary and secondary school setting. Topics considered include the legal and policy dimensions of the rights of students, parents, educators, and the state with respect to such issues as access to, control over, and regulation of the education setting and institutions. Issues germane to equal education opportunity, school finance, and school governance and regulation receive particular attention.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2449, "title": "Employment Law", "code": "LAW 6331", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Survey of major statutory schemes and common law doctrines that regulate the employer-employee relationship, other than laws regulating union formation and collective bargaining, which are covered in Labor Law. Topics covered include the common law of unjust dismissal, trade secrets, restrictive covenants, drug testing, free speech, and privacy. Major statutory schemes covered include Title VII and other antidiscrimination laws, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Family and Medical Leave Act, and ERISA.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2450, "title": "Environmental Law", "code": "LAW 6361", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The course surveys the major environmental laws, with a primary focus on federal statutes. Emphasis will be placed on the various sources of liability to both individuals and corporations from common law, statutory provisions, administrative regulation and enforcement policy.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2451, "title": "Evidence", "code": "LAW 6401", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The rules of evidence in civil and criminal cases with emphasis on relevance, hearsay, authentication, witnesses, experts, and confrontation. The course focuses on the Federal Rules of Evidence, with some attention to how they diverge from the common law.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2452, "title": "Federal Courts", "code": "LAW 6431", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course examines the various constitutional, statutory, and judge-made doctrines that control access to the federal courts to vindicate federal rights. It is particularly valuable for those planning a career in public interest or the public sector, anyone else expecting to litigate extensively in federal court, and students who have or hope to obtain a judicial clerkship. Topics covered include: case or controversy limitations, including standing; constitutional and statutory limits on jurisdiction; causes of action for constitutional and statutory rights, including 42 U.S.C. \u00a71983 and Bivens actions; bars to such actions, including sovereign immunity and abstention doctrines; and habeas corpus.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2453, "title": "Practicing Criminal Defense in Federal Court", "code": "LAW 6436", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2454, "title": "Federal Income Taxation", "code": "LAW 6441", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "A basic course designed to develop understanding of tax concepts and ability to work effectively with the Internal Revenue Code, regulations, cases, and other tax materials.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2455, "title": "The Law and Colonization in Indian Country", "code": "LAW 6452", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2456, "title": "Comparative Constitutional Law: Individual Rights in India and the United States", "code": "LAW 6453", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2457, "title": "Financial Institutions", "code": "LAW 6461", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course explores the economic functions, institutional design, and regulation of financial institutions. Beginning with conventional deposit-taking banks, the course examines the risks embedded within the business of banking, along with how regulation seeks to manage these risks. It then expands this framework to examine several other forms of 'non-bank' financial intermediation including investment banks, insurance companies, wholesale funding markets, structured finance markets, money market and other investment funds, and financial market infrastructure. The course also examines some of the related consumer/investor protection problems and how financial regulation seeks to address them.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2458, "title": "Global M and A Practice", "code": "LAW 6465", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "It will provide a guidance on M&A practices in various jurisdictions, including the US, Europe, Japan and other emerging countries.\u00a0 The course will address global M&A trends, various transaction structures, terms of acquisition agreements and a comparison of different M&A practices (e.g., US-style and UK-style), as well as other legal issues such as merger filings and anti-corruption.\u00a0 The course will also introduce various aspects of Japanese corporates, including corporate governance, business cultures and commercial trends.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2459, "title": "High Growth Corporate Transactions II", "code": "LAW 6474", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2460, "title": "Insurance Law", "code": "LAW 6501", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Insurance is an increasingly important tool for the management of risk by both private and public enterprises. This course provides a working knowledge of basic insurance law governing insurance contract formation, insurance regulation, property, life, health, disability, and liability insurance and claims processes. The emphasis throughout the course is on the links between insurance theory, doctrine, and modern ideas about the functions of private law.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2461, "title": "Foreign, Comparative, and International Legal Research", "code": "LAW 6514", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The practice of law continues to become ever more dependent upon a clear understanding of the global context in which it occurs. This course provides an overview of sources, methods, and strategies for researching international and foreign law. Topics to be covered include the various legal systems of the world, public and private international law, the European Union, and the United Nations. The course will be delivered through lectures and hands-on exercises. Selected readings will be available online and on reserve; there is no required textbook. There will be a series of assignments and a final research project in lieu of a final exam. Foreign language ability is not required.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2462, "title": "Intermediate Accounting", "code": "LAW 6560", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is relevant to a general business career, but is particularly relevant to careers that involve the use of financial statements.\u00a0 The specific accounting topics covered includes: Statement of Cash Flows; Income Taxes; Divestitures; Revenue Recognition; Financial Investments; Leases; Pensions; Equity-based Compensation; EPS; Goodwill. \u00a0My objective is to enable you to become more knowledgeable, skeptical consumers of financial information.\u00a0 This objective will be achieved by a combination of lectures and analyzing and discussing articles from the financial press and cases that are based on actual financial statements.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2463, "title": "Intensive Depositions", "code": "LAW 6566", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will \u00a0provide an intensive insight into practitioners' goals in taking depositions and in representing deponents and will provide a study into methods for achieving those goals. \u00a0It will include classroom discussion and demonstration and a practical opportunity for each student to take and to defend mock depositions. \u00a0We will explore the use of depositions at trial, which is a predicate to understanding depositions' goals; the central role of admissions from documentary and deposition discovery in the development of civil cases; and techniques for eliciting admissions (or, when representing a deponent, avoiding such admissions). \u00a0Techniques will also be explored for pure discovery, for trial preservation testimony, and for the avoidance of the development of evidence harmful to one's case.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2464, "title": "Internet Law, Privacy and Security", "code": "LAW 6568", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This is a survey course in Internet law, with particular emphasis on privacy and security. \u00a0It is designed to teach lawyers what they need to know to work effectively with computer technologists, and vice versa. \u00a0Topics covered may vary based on recent events, but will typically include jurisdiction, free speech, privacy, cybersecurity, e-commerce, digital property, intermediary liability, and network neutrality. What unites these disparate areas of law is that, in each of them, computer and network technologies are challenging settled legal understandings in similar ways. \u00a0We will explore these recurring patterns of legal disruption and predict how they will play out online and offline.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2465, "title": "Introduction to Depositions", "code": "LAW 6569", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Depositions are a critical component of pretrial discovery. Indeed, many cases are lost, won, or settled because of information gleaned at a deposition. Attorneys also often modify trial strategies because of a witness's performance at a deposition. Because depositions play such an important role in litigation, the majority of junior litigation attorneys can expect to deal with depositions in some manner from the very start of their careers. This introductory course will expose students to several facets of a deposition: preparing for deposition, asking questions at a deposition, defending the witness at a deposition, using documents at a deposition, and reviewing the transcript of a deposition. Students can expect to take and defend mock depositions and to observe and critique their fellow students' deposition skills. The course will culminate in a three-hour deposition in which students will team up to depose and defend two witnesses. Students must set aside one Saturday morning at the end of the semester for this deposition.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2466, "title": "Labor Law, Practice and Policy", "code": "LAW 6592", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2467, "title": "Law Team", "code": "LAW 6614", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "One or more students will be paired with a lawyer and/or law firm with substantial experience in technology and high-growth corporate transactions. Students will work under the supervision of the lawyer and/or law firm in providing legal support to student and other project teams, including studio teams, that are assigned to it. Through the law team process, students will have an opportunity to practice what they learn in the classroom, as well as become familiar with a range of legal and regulatory issues (and solutions) relating to technology and high-growth corporate transactions.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2468, "title": "Law and Society in North Korea", "code": "LAW 6625", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2469, "title": "Professional Responsibility", "code": "LAW 6641", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is intended to provide a comprehensive overview of the law governing lawyers in a variety of practice settings, including transactional, counseling, and civil and criminal litigation. The course is not focused merely on the ABA's Model Rules, but draws extensively from judicial decisions in malpractice and disqualification cases, the new Restatement of the Law Governing Lawyers, and other sources of law. A major theme is the relationship between state bar disciplinary rules and the generally applicable law of tort, contracts, agency, procedure, and crimes. Another significant theme is the prevention of attorney discipline and malpractice liability through advance planning.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2470, "title": "Law of Autonomous Vehicles", "code": "LAW 6643", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Robots, artificial intelligence, and autonomous systems have long been the realm of science fiction, but they are increasingly a part of contemporary life as well. Autonomous vehicles, robots and artificial intelligence create special problems for law, and often force policymakers to re-evaluate existing policy, especially as machines make decisions and take actions that were previously the domain of people only. This class will examine how smart machines challenge law and policy, notions of responsibility, rights, and what it means to be human.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2471, "title": "Constitutional Law of the European Union", "code": "LAW 6661", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course introduces students to the law and institutions of the European Union. It examines the composition, organization, functions and powers of the Union's governing bodies; analyzes the Union's governing treaties and constitutional law; and studies the Union's decision-making processes. The course also explores broader questions of political, economic and legal integration, such as the proper relation between the Union's law and the domestic law of the Union's Member states, and the desirability and feasibility of using the E.U. as a model on which to pattern other transnational agreements.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2472, "title": "International Law and Foreign Direct Investment", "code": "LAW 6681", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course studies legal aspects of direct foreign investments. It seeks to identify legal problems that are likely to affect a commercial investment in a foreign country. Inter alia, it deals with the public international law principles and rules governing the establishment by foreign businesses of various factors of production (persons and capital) on the territory of other states and the protection of such investments. Thus, the course includes a discussion of the following topics: economic development and foreign capital; obstacles to the flow of investments to developing countries; guarantees to investors and investment codes; bilateral treaties; nationalization; joint ventures; project financing; transfer of technology; arbitration; investment insurance; unification of trade law; and the settlement of investment disputes.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2473, "title": "Multicultural Work Environment I and II", "code": "LAW 6730", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The goal of this course is to promote an understanding of the challenges encountered in the work environment as a result of cultural differences. Students are required to complete a ten-page paper by September 15 following their summer internship.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2474, "title": "Music Law", "code": "LAW 6734", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Music Law will be practical look at representing performers, bands, song writers, and others in the music industry. We will look at both the law and the industry, exploring the agreements that transfer rights between the various players and case law affecting those rights, as well as examining the industry itself and who those players are. Taught by Howard Leib, who has over thirty years experience in the music industry, having worked with artists such as Whitney Houston, B.B. King, Kiss, BeBe & CeCe Winans, Bobby McFerrin, and more.. Corporate clients have included MCA, BMG, Atlantic Records, Arista Records, Rhino Entertainment, Shout Factory Entertainment and 20th Century Fox. Students will also benefit from the insight of guest speakers from various areas of the industry. Topics are expected to include recording agreements, band agreements, touring, merchandising, licensing, songwriting, music publishing, management and others.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2475, "title": "Conflicts in Patent Law and Practice", "code": "LAW 6743", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will consider important assumptions that underlie much current day patent law and practice but are seldom articulated or critically analyzed. Students will consider the legal effect(s) of \"public domain\" status; the meaning of \"invention\" (which now includes at least some \"business method\" conceptions); the relationship between patent \"claims\" and patented \"inventions;\" conflicting standards for determining if a patent is valid or infringed; procedural devices that operate to limit or allocate adjudicatory authority in the patent system (e.g., judge versus jury; court versus agency); and intersections between patent law and principles of administrative, antitrust, federal court jurisdiction, personal property, tort, and unfair competition laws. Special attention will be paid to conflicts between precedent of the Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit, a specialized court formed in 1982, and applicable Supreme Court patent precedent. The grade for the course will be based on a combination of class participation (20%) and five reaction papers (80%) of 600 to 800 words each (approximately 2 \u00bd to 4 pages of typed, double-spaced text). A student may write up to six reaction papers, and in that case, the grade will be based on the student's five best papers.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2476, "title": "Partnership Tax", "code": "LAW 6751", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2477, "title": "Oral-Presentation Skills", "code": "LAW 6752", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course examines effective ways to organize, summarize, and present information orally. \u00a0With particular attention to the concepts of clarity, brevity, and audience, students will make in-class presentations (including a moot-court argument) designed to inform and persuade the listener. \u00a0Critiquing and listening skills will also be addressed.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2478, "title": "Principles of American Legal Writing", "code": "LAW 6761", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course provides foreign-trained lawyers with an introduction to the American legal system and essential principles of legal writing, analysis and legal research skills in the United States. Students are afforded an opportunity to practice some of the forms of writing common to American legal practice by drafting documents such as memoranda and briefs in the context of representing hypothetical clients. Students are given the opportunity to conference individually with the instructor and to re-write assignments after receiving the instructor's comments.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2479, "title": "Regulation of Food and Drugs", "code": "LAW 6766", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The Course will strive provide (1) an understanding both the black letter of food and drug law and the underlying policies and themes of our system of food and drug regulation, (2) the opportunity to ponder on the material at a deeper level, thinking about food and drug law's role in our society and your views on the key public policy issues, and (3) a few practical skills relating to an administrative practice in food and drug law. Topics that will be discussed include an overview of the FDA and its Organization, FDA's History, Politics and the FDA: \u00a0Contraception, Regen, Zohydro, and User Fees, Statutory Overview and Definitions, Enforcement Actions/Prohibited Acts, Medical Product Development including\no\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0Preclinical Issues: \u00a0Animal Use, GLP\u00a0\no\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0INDs and IDEs\no\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0Legal and Ethical Issues in Human Trials - IRBs and informed consent\no\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0Special Issues in First Use in Humans\no\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0Harmonization and International Trials\n\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 \u00a0\nPharmaceutical and Biotech Industry, Drug Approval Process: NDA, Vioxx and FDAAA, Post-Approval Surveillance, Postmarket Safety Authorities (REMS, Safety Labeling Changes, Post-Market Requirements), Market Exclusivity Schemes: Orphan Drug Act, GAIN, and Others\nHatch-Waxman and Generics, Patents versus Regulatory Exclusivity, Labeling, Product Liability and Preemption, Prescription Drug Promotion and the First Amendment, Access to Unapproved Products, FDA's regulations and statutory authority, Access Litigation - Rutherford & Abigail Alliance, Right-to-Try statutes, GMPs & Drug Shortages, OTC Drugs, Biologics, in general, Case study - the early 2000's policy fight over embryonic stem cells and cloning, The Med Tech Industry/Introduction to Devices, Device Classifications and Marketing Authorizations, Frontier Issues: Mobile Apps & Preview of Genetic Testing (DTC and LDTs), Pharmaceutical pricing and The Future of the FDA, Drugs, Biologics, and Devices.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2480, "title": "Professional Responsibility for LLMs", "code": "LAW 6784", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course explores ethical issues relating to the legal profession. It has two aims\u2014one immediate, the other more lofty. The immediate aim is to help prepare students for the MPRE. The loftier aim, by contrast, is to investigate the ways in which one's professional responsibilities might conflict with one's personal obligations or self-interest, and to consider the societal implications of the regulatory regime governing lawyers. What should a lawyer do when her professional duties conflict with her financial interests or obligations to friends or family? How does the legal profession's monopoly on the right to give legal advice shape the justice system? We will investigate such questions by reading relevant legal materials as well as work by legal academics. Students will take several smaller exams to test their mastery of central ethical rules governing the conduct of lawyers, and complete short writing assignments on topics discussed in class.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2481, "title": "Public International Law", "code": "LAW 6791", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "An introduction to the legal rules governing the conduct of states vis-\u00e0-vis other states, individuals, and international organizations, with reference to major current events and issues. Topics include the nature, sources, and effectiveness of international law; the establishment and recognition of states; principles concerning state sovereignty, territory, and jurisdiction; the law of treaties; state responsibility; international criminal and humanitarian law; terrorism; and human rights. Special attention is given to the law governing the use of force.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2482, "title": "Securities Regulation", "code": "LAW 6821", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course analyzes key issues under the U.S. federal securities laws, principally the Securities Act of 1933 and the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, with respect to the domestic and international offer and sale of securities. It includes a study of what constitutes a security, the public offering process, mandatory disclosure requirements for public companies, exemptions from registration (including exempt global offerings), and potential liabilities and sanctions.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2483, "title": "Comparative Military Justice: Theory and Practice", "code": "LAW 6843", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2484, "title": "Constitutional Law and the Value of Dissent", "code": "LAW 6845", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2485, "title": "Supervised Experiential Learning", "code": "LAW 6862", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2486, "title": "Supervised Writing", "code": "LAW 6871", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2487, "title": "Supervised Teaching and Supervised Writing - Lawyering Program Honors Fellows", "code": "LAW 6881", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Lawyering Program Honors Fellows serve for the full academic year as teaching assistants in the Lawyering course. With training and guidance from the Lawyering faculty, Honors Fellows work on myriad course-related tasks and some program-wide initiatives. In addition to meeting regularly with first-year students and critiquing papers, Honors Fellows may help design course assignments and documents, participate in simulations, and assist the research attorneys with the teaching of legal research. Honors Fellows also teach classes on the Bluebook. Additionally, Honors Fellows serve as educational mentors to first-year students and may participate in workshops on basic law-school skills.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2488, "title": "Corporate Finance for Lawyers: Bootcamp", "code": "LAW 6883", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2489, "title": "Tax Treaties", "code": "LAW 6890", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2490, "title": "Taxation of Corporations and Shareholders", "code": "LAW 6891", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course examines the federal income taxation of corporate transactions, including incorporations, dividends, redemptions, liquidations, and reorganizations.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2491, "title": "Technology Transactions II", "code": "LAW 6896", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2492, "title": "The Art of Negotiation in Business and Sports", "code": "LAW 6898", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "In this course, we will be analyzing and incorporating negotiation techniques and strategies, along with problem solving solutions, through in-depth simulations and experiential learning exercises taught by top executives who have successfully negotiated in business and sports. Students will get the opportunity to improve their skills through practical training and guidance from one of the most experienced negotiators in professional sports, Michael Huyghue. This course involves direct supervision of the student's performance; numerous opportunities for performance, feedback, and self-evaluation; and an in-depth classroom instructional component. The classroom component includes negotiation simulations with collaborative problem solving for actual business problems of sports organizations. Lastly, this course implements both formative and summative assessment methods in its curriculum to measure and improve student learning and provide meaningful feedback to students.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2493, "title": "Advanced Topics in Property Theory", "code": "LAW 7022", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This seminar will explore what the idea of property means, and its usefulness in resolving issues of intense social conflict.\u00a0 Seminar sessions will encourage student participation, with the instructor guiding that discussion.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2494, "title": "Comparative Property Law", "code": "LAW 7032", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2495, "title": "Criminal Justice Reform", "code": "LAW 7033", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2496, "title": "First Amendment Law Clinic 3", "code": "LAW 7034", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2497, "title": "Animal Rights", "code": "LAW 7072", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This seminar examines the moral assumptions underlying the legal status of human use of non-human animals. \u00a0State and federal law treat animals primarily as property, sometimes modified to take account of animals' subjective experience. \u00a0We will study a variety of legal and philosophical writings that address the legal and moral status of animals, including the debate between supporters of an \"animal welfare\" approach that aspires to a reduction in animal suffering, and supporters of an \"animal rights\" approach that aims to abolish the use of animals. \u00a0Among the questions the seminar poses are: \u00a0What capacities, if any, warrant shielding animals from various forms of exploitation? \u00a0Do animals have interests in continued existence or merely in avoiding suffering? \u00a0Might some but not other human uses of animals be justified, and if so, which ones? \u00a0The use of animal products (such as milk and eggs) for food? \u00a0The use of animals for clothing?", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2498, "title": "Chinese Law: Tradition and Modernization", "code": "LAW 7123", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This seminar offers an examination of how tradition and embedded cultural values have influenced the legal modernization in contemporary China. The focus of the seminar will be on the issues and dilemmas confronting China's ideal of empowering its state and people through the use of law. Topics will include the rule of law vs. the rule of Li (rituals and gifts), individual rights vs. collective interests, preference of informal justice over formal justice, cultivation of citizenship, growth of civil society, and the role of law in promoting the rights and interests of women, ethnic minority groups and disabled persons, and facilitating economic development. Interdisciplinary approaches will be employed in this seminar to facilitate understanding of Chinese legal tradition and its modern transformations, which include the efforts since the late 19th century of borrowing Western law and institutions and implementing current law reforms in the People's Republic of China (PRC). Readings are drawn from English translations of Chinese codes, cases and literary works, and academic writings by Western and Chinese scholars.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2499, "title": "Comparative Legal Philosophy", "code": "LAW 7146", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2500, "title": "Deals Seminar: Capital Markets Transactions", "code": "LAW 7166", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This seminar examines selected legal issues and documents in connection with capital raising transactions by companies and investment banks in the United States securities markets. Initial public offerings and offerings of investment grade and high yield debt securities will receive special focus. The seminar will review the essential aspects of equity and debt securities offerings such as the preparation of the prospectus, investor protection covenants in debt offerings, the indemnification and other key provisions of underwriting agreements, and the due diligence process. The seminar will include negotiation and problem-solving exercises, basic drafting, and student analyses of deal-related issues.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2501, "title": "Deals Seminar: Drafting and Analyzing Corporate Agreements", "code": "LAW 7175", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is intended to familiarize students interested in a transactional practice with key provisions of significant contracts they may encounter. Its focus will be on clauses that are found in a variety of agreements, as well as what a corporate lawyer typically faces in addressing issues that arise in structuring and negotiating deals. The course does not address specialized areas (such as tax, intellectual property, environmental, labor, and employee benefits matters), but it will provide students interested in such a specialization with the context in which to better understand where their work fits into the bigger whole. Students will be expected to have read and thought about sample documents that will be discussed in class. Grading will be based on class participation and attendance, two drafting exercises, and a final examination. Professor Jacobs will teach a substantial portion of the course over videoconference.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2502, "title": "Deals Seminar: Hedge Funds, PE Funds, and Other Investment Vehicles", "code": "LAW 7176", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will explore the regulatory and transactional side of funds/investment vehicles, including venture capital, hedge and private equity funds and public mutual funds. \u00a0The course will explore how regulation interacts with the investment management industry.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2503, "title": "Digital Life Research Seminar", "code": "LAW 7179", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This seminar focuses on the societal perspectives on digital technology. Speakers will come from a range of disciplines including computer science, data science, engineering, OR, humanities, social sciences, law, and policy and will present work in progress that considers ethical and political questions related to the design, development, and deployment of digital, computational, and information systems and devices. Topics include accountable algorithms, bias in machine learning, AI and the workplace, privacy, and cybersecurity.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2504, "title": "Disasters and Human Rights - Selected Issues", "code": "LAW 7187", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course examines domestic and international disaster law, with a focus on human rights interventions. Examples from across the globe show how the \"arc of disaster\" makes human rights violations both predictable and preventable. Key elements of the US domestic emergency response framework are covered in depth, with attention to areas that conflict with international human rights norms and obligations. The international disaster response framework is also examined. We also examine the US response to international disasters, including policy towards foreign nationals in the US when disaster strikes abroad. Finally, we consider questions of accountability for government actors and international organizations for human rights harms following a disaster. What the course does not do: This is not a survey course in international human rights. We will not cover the entire range of international instruments and mechanisms that potentially come into play within the context of disaster. They are endless. Rather, I include cases that I have personally worked on (Hurricane Katrina, the 2010 earthquake in Haiti), those that stand as turning points in the development of disaster law and policy (Typhoon Haiyan), and others that reflect common themes. The goal is to impart a deeper understanding of pivotal issues and practical insights that can be applied across disaster contexts.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2505, "title": "Current Issues in Collective Bargaining", "code": "LAW 7189", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This advanced level mini-course examines several key issues in today's collective bargaining between US private sector employers and unions. Through extensive pre-class readings and podcasts, and during four 3 hour classes, we will trace key developments that have set the table for today's bargaining environment, eg., the deindustrialization of the American economy, the decline of union workforce density, and the rise of defensive collective bargaining; examine resultant wage stagnation and troubled health care and defined benefit pension plans; investigate the effects and intersection of employment law and legislation on collective bargaining and dispute resolution; and consider the emerging arena of unionization in higher education.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2506, "title": "Faculty At Home Seminar: Challenging the Deep State", "code": "LAW 7268", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2507, "title": "FAHS: Critical Perspectives: Racism, Xenophobia and Im/migration", "code": "LAW 7269", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2508, "title": "Insanity", "code": "LAW 7288", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2509, "title": "Global Labor and Employment Law", "code": "LAW 7295", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The legal framework governing the employment relationship in most of the world is dramatically different from that of the US, reflecting differences between the civil law and common law systems as well as contrasting historical and cultural contexts. In this seminar, we will review the most important concepts of labor and employment law outside the US, including formation and termination of the employment relationship (\"just cause\" protections vs. US \"employment at will\"); the concept of \"information and consultation\" of works councils and other employee representative bodies; global discrimination and diversity matters; international labor standards; special employee protections which impact multinational corporate restructurings and transactions; non-competes and other restrictive covenants; and litigation of employment claims in systems which do not have US discovery and trial processes.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2510, "title": "International Criminal Law", "code": "LAW 7321", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2511, "title": "Islamic Law and History", "code": "LAW 7371", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce law students to the terminology, principles, and concepts of classical Islamic law. After discussing the origins and evolution of Islamic law, we will turn first to the organization of qadi courts (procedure and evidence) and then to specific areas of the law, e.g., personal status (marriage and divorce), the intergenerational transmission of property (bequests, gifts, and endowments), commerce (contracts, hire, allocation of loss), and crime. The application of legal doctrine to actual disputes will be analyzed through the reading of expert judicial opinions or fatwas (in English translation) issued in connection with medieval and modern court cases.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2512, "title": "Mortgage and Asset Securitization", "code": "LAW 7590", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course analyzes the structure of mortgage- and other asset-backed securities, as well as the participants in their creation, distribution, trading and regulation. The financial and legal characteristics of the underlying assets will be considered, including a basic understanding of the asset cash flows, and factors that vary those flows. Securities and Tax Law aspects of the creation, marketing and trading of these securities will be reviewed, with particular emphasis on the REMIC structure. There will be review of the secondary markets, including Government-sponsored Enterprises and \"Private Label\" securities issuers; the credit rating agencies; and private mortgage insurers. Lastly, there will be consideration of the laws currently governing the GSEs and what future changes they and the broader market might anticipate for those laws.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2513, "title": "Negotiation and Facilitation Seminar", "code": "LAW 7598", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Introduces students to the theory and practice of Negotiation and Facilitation in both legal and non-legal contexts. Theories of negotiation, conflict style, adversarial negotiation, and problem-solving negotiation will be covered, with an emphasis on developing necessary skills for use in meetings, with people in conflict, and with groups problem-solving together. Readings and lectures will provide students with a framework for analyzing negotiations as well as tools and concepts useful in negotiating more effectively, while practical exercises will highlight the challenges of this important but often-neglected lawyering skill. Simulations, exercises, readings and discussions will be used for this seminar. Participants will practice negotiation and will learn some of the challenges of this important, but often neglected, lawyering skill.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2514, "title": "Movement Lawyering Practicum", "code": "LAW 7603", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course gives students the opportunity to engage in the movement lawyering. The course has both a classroom component and a community component.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2515, "title": "Advanced Movement Lawyering Practicum", "code": "LAW 7604", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2516, "title": "Philosophical Legal Ethics", "code": "LAW 7611", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2517, "title": "Money Talks: Amping Up Political Speech Under the First Amendment", "code": "LAW 7691", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2518, "title": "The Role of the State Attorney General", "code": "LAW 7739", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2519, "title": "Taxation of Mergers and Acquisitions", "code": "LAW 7766", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This course will examine the federal income taxation of M&A transactions and prepare students for the practical aspects of transactional tax work in the context of mergers and acquisitions. \u00a0 We will explore selected tax issues that drive deal structure in both public and private M&A transactions and pay special attention to tax considerations relevant to private equity fund acquisitions. \u00a0We will also cover topics of current political relevance that relate to M&A taxation. \u00a0Students will learn to draft and negotiate tax provisions in M&A documents and conduct tax research in the manner of a transactional tax attorney. \u00a0The content of this course will be useful not only to students interested in transactional tax work but also to those who will pursue a more general corporate practice in which they will encounter significant tax issues.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2520, "title": "Asylum and Convention Against Torture Appellate Clinic", "code": "LAW 7801", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Students will learn asylum, Convention Against Torture, and immigration law in class lectures, readings, and while representing clients. Most students will represent clients on appeal before the Board of Immigration Appeals, although the Clinic does accept federal petitions for review and cases before asylum officers from time to time. Students will also learn advanced legal writing techniques, including appellate strategies, persuasive storytelling, the use of expert reports, and effective argument within complex legal frameworks. Students will work in teams to complete all tasks necessary to zealously represent their client, including drafting an appellate brief, affidavits, and motions; maintaining client contact; and locating expert and other witnesses. In addition, students will develop litigation skills such as advanced legal research, case theory development, factual development and analysis (including interviewing, transcript review, and international human rights research), collaboration, cultural competency, and self-evaluation. Students will learn to overcome the unique challenges attorneys face when representing clients from diverse economic and cultural backgrounds, as well as clients who are incarcerated. The instructors will consider the following factors (in no particular order) when admitting students: commitment to public interest or immigration law work, legal writing and research ability, and collegiality. For more information about the Clinic, visit the clinic website: http://www.lawschool.cornell.edu/academics/clinicalprogram/Asylum-Clinic/index.cfm", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2521, "title": "Advanced Labor Law Clinic", "code": "LAW 7805", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The Advanced Labor Law Clinic provides students another opportunity to deepen their understanding of traditional labor and employment law by representing the interests of workers with typical workplace issues. There is no classroom component to this course. Students will dedicate their time to addressing client inquiries related to organizing, collective bargaining, unfair labor practice charges, the Family Medical Leave Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act or other workplace issues. Students may also have the opportunity to represent their clients in a case before the National Labor Relations Board, in mediation or arbitration pursuant to the dispute resolution mechanism in the collective bargaining agreement. In addition to the domestic labor law inquiries, interested students may have the opportunity to address international labor law topics as well. The international labor law work typically occurs in Latin America. During the semester, there will likely be two guest speakers and two panel discussions on timely labor law topics, which students will be required to attend, along with weekly meetings to discuss case preparation and advancement. In this course students will advance the following skills: interviewing, counseling, factual investigation, legal research and writing, problem-solving and depending on the assignment, trial preparation skills (direct and cross-examinations, opening statement and evidentiary arguments).", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2522, "title": "Advanced Asylum and Convention Against Torture Appellate Clinic", "code": "LAW 7810", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2523, "title": "Capital Punishment Clinic I", "code": "LAW 7811", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Death penalty litigation: investigation and the preparation of petitions and briefs. Case selection and student assignments depend on both pedagogical factors and litigation needs of clinic clients. Students read the trial and lower court record and research legal issues. Some students are involved in investigation, while others primarily assist in the preparation of briefs, petitions and other case documents. No student will be required to participate in investigation. All students are included in discussions regarding the necessary investigation, research, and strategy for the cases.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2524, "title": "Capital Punishment Clinic II", "code": "LAW 7815", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Death penalty litigation: investigation and the preparation of petitions, memoranda, and briefs. This course is taught as a clinic. Two or possibly three capital cases are worked on by students. Case selection depends on both pedagogical factors and litigation needs of the inmates. Students read the record and research legal issues. Some students are involved in investigation, while others assist in the preparation of papers. All students are included in discussions regarding the necessary investigation, research, and strategy for the cases.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2525, "title": "Child Advocacy Practicum", "code": "LAW 7817", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2526, "title": "Child Advocacy Practicum II", "code": "LAW 7818", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2527, "title": "Externship - Full Time", "code": "LAW 7832", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The Externship - Full Time course allows students (24 each semester, for all externship courses) to earn 12 credit hours as externs working full time at approved placement sites at virtually any location (most sites are non-profit organizations or governmental agencies) during the fall or spring semester of their third year or the spring semester of their second year. \u00a0The course purpose is to provide a bridge between the study of law and its practice. \u00a0A written application for the course must be submitted to the instructor and approved during the semester preceding the semester the student plans to participate. \u00a0The student must be supervised/mentored by an attorney and engage in meaningful and \"attorney-like\" work at the placement which furthers the student's education and career goals. \u00a0 In addition to his or her work responsibilities for the placement, the extern will create a Learning Agenda, prepare weekly Journal entries, engage in a regular electronic Discussion Board with other externs and the instructor, host the instructor for a site visit, and do a written Description of Placement. \u00a0 See the BlackBoard web site for Externship - Full Time for more detail on these requirements. \u00a0Note: \u00a0This course requires off premises travel. \u00a0The student is responsible for travel to and from the sites.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2528, "title": "Externship - Part Time", "code": "LAW 7834", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The Externship - Part Time, Other Local course allows students to earn 4 or more credit hours as externs working at least 8 hours per week at approved placement sites in the Ithaca area while continuing to attend classes at the law school (most sites are with non-profit organizations or governmental agencies). \u00a0The course purpose is to provide a bridge between the study of law and its practice. \u00a0A written application for the course must be submitted to the instructor and approved during the semester preceding the semester the student plans to participate. \u00a0The student must be supervised/mentored by an attorney and engage in meaningful and \"attorney-like\" work at the placement which furthers the student's education and career goals. \u00a0In addition to his or her work responsibilities at the placement, the extern will create a Learning Agenda, prepare \u00a0 weekly Journal entries, engage in a regular electronic Discussion Board with other externs and the instructor, host the instructor for a site visit, and do a written Description of Placement (see the BlackBoard web site for \u00a0for Externship - Full Time for more detail on these requirements). \u00a0Note: \u00a0This course requires off premises travel. \u00a0The student is responsible for travel to and from the sites.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2529, "title": "Entrepreneurship Clinic 1", "code": "LAW 7839", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The Entrepreneurship Clinic provides students who are interested in transactional work with an opportunity to learn about the legal issues specific to starting and running a business venture. Weekly classes, which may include guest speakers, will introduce students to the common legal questions that entrepreneurs face, including how to choose and form a business entity, structure the ownership of the business, contract with employees and independent contractors, protect intellectual property, and set up the venture for successful financing. Building on the concepts learned in class, student teams will represent local entrepreneurs and start-up businesses on a variety of transactional matters. The client work will introduce students to fundamental transactional skills, ranging from legal research to drafting term sheets and contracts.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2530, "title": "Estate Planning Practicum", "code": "LAW 7840", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The newest addition to Cornell Law School's Clinical Programs, the Estate Planning Clinic aims to provide students with the unique opportunity of enriching and furthering their legal awareness and experience beyond the classroom environment.Participants will gain valuable, practical experience by assisting people from the local community with some of their more basic estate planning needs, thereby applying their theoretical knowledge to real-world scenarios. The students' best skills will be put to practice while they work towards creating an atmosphere of trust and comfort for their clients and learning the essentials of establishing solid attorney-client relationships. Specifically, students will be working in pairs under supervision of faculty to prepare an actual estate plan for the client which includes a last will and testament, a living will, a health care proxy and a power of attorney along with the statutory major gifts rider (if applicable). Students will take part in the entire estate planning process from the initial informational intake meeting, to the preparation of the client's estate planning documents, to discussing the drafts with the clients along with addressing their comments and changes and to preparing and assisting with the execution of the client's estate planning documents. To further enhance the learning experience, lectures will be provided on the fundamentals of estate planning from establishing a healthy attorney-client relationship, drafting considerations for the client's last will and testament, basic related estate and income tax issues, ethical issues and the administration of the client's estate upon death. The classroom component of the course ensures that students understand not only the legal issues but also the practical and human issues involved in a trusts and estates practice.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2531, "title": "1L Immigration Law and Advocacy Clinic", "code": "LAW 7841", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2532, "title": "Advanced Entrepreneurship Clinic", "code": "LAW 7845", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Students will continue to represent local entrepreneurs and start-up businesses on a variety of transactional matters. Students may also engage in additional related projects, such as preparing and delivering workshops to the local business community on relevant topics.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2533, "title": "Tenants Advocacy Practicum I", "code": "LAW 7854", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2534, "title": "Farmworker Legal Assistance Clinic I", "code": "LAW 7857", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Permission of instructor required. Students who wish to apply to the clinic should submit a resume, transcript, and short statement of interest (no more than two pages) to Prof. Lyon. For more information about the clinic, email Prof. Lyon (beth.lyon@cornell.edu) and schedule a meeting. This course requires off premises travel to meet with clients and participate in hearings. Employment on a farm is one of the worlds' most difficult and dangerous occupations. Farmworkers experience geographic, linguistic, and cultural isolation, separation from family, immigration insecurity reinforced by policing practices, workplace sexual violence, and exclusion from protective employment laws. Working with the new clinic's community partners, Farmworker Legal Assistance Clinic I student attorneys will handle immigration and employment matters on behalf of farmworkers in the region, work that will typically involve negotiation and often require litigation. Students will also work in brief advice and referral outreach sessions in farmworker communities. Clinic participants may also have the opportunity to work on research and writing projects with civil rights, environmental protection, and farmworker rights organizations. Farmworker Clinic students will participate in a lawyering seminar and work with a clinic partner on their assigned cases. The lawyering seminar will focus on skills students need for effective client representation. Students will develop key lawyering skills, including interviewing, counseling, fact investigation, drafting, negotiation, language accessible practice, and, in some cases, trial advocacy.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2535, "title": "Farmworker Legal Assistance Clinic II", "code": "LAW 7858", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Students collaborate with farmworkers, farmworker families, and partner organizations to use the law in service of their clients' goals. Students who have completed the first semester of any clinical course can seek the instructors' permission to enroll in Farmworker Clinic II, for 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 or 6 credits, depending on the number of projects undertaken. Students in Farmworker Clinic II work on individual cases for clients and/or non-litigation advocacy projects. They attend roughly four one-hour seminar class \"case rounds\" meetings during the semester, usually at the same time that Farmworker Clinic I meets. Other multi-clinic classes and trainings will be made available as well.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2536, "title": "Farmworker Legal Assistance Clinic III", "code": "LAW 7859", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Students collaborate with farmworkers, farmworker families, and partner organizations to use the law in service of their clients' goals. Students who have completed the first semester of any clinical course can seek the instructors' permission to enroll in Farmworker Clinic III, for 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 or 6 credits, depending on the number of projects undertaken. Students in Farmworker Clinic II work on individual cases for clients and/or non-litigation advocacy projects. They attend roughly four one-hour seminar class \"case rounds\" meetings during the semester, usually at the same time that Farmworker Clinic I meets. Other multi-clinic classes and trainings will be made available as well.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2537, "title": "International Human Rights: Litigation and Advocacy II", "code": "LAW 7860", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "In this clinical course, students will work on projects that will expose them to diverse forms of human rights advocacy. The clinic is litigation-oriented, although clinic students may have the opportunity to engage in fact-finding and research regarding human rights violations abroad. A current sampling of projects includes: (1) Advocacy on behalf of prisoners in Tanzania and Malawi whose legal rights have been violated. \u00a0Our work in Malawi has already resulted in the release of 250 prisoners, and a number of clinic students have traveled to both countries in connection with this project; (2) Representation of a Mexican national sentenced to death in the state of Ohio, including litigation of treaty violations in his case; and (3) Advocacy before the United Nations regarding human rights violations committed by Israel in the Occupied Syrian Golan.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2538, "title": "Externship - Pro Bono Scholars Program", "code": "LAW 7862", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The Externship - Pro Bono Scholars Program course allows third year students in their last semester to take the NY Bar Examination in February and then earn their last 12 credits hours working full time from the end of February through the end of May as externs at approved placement sites doing exclusively pro bono legal services for indigent clients. The course purpose is to provide a bridge between the study of law and its practice, as well as serving low income clients who might otherwise not receive legal services. A written application for the course must be submitted to the instructor and approved during the early fall of the student's third year. The student must be supervised/mentored by an attorney and engage in meaningful and \"attorney-like\" work at the placement. \u00a0The experience must further the student's education and career goals. \u00a0In addition to his or her work responsibilities for the placement and indigent clients, the extern will create a Learning Agenda, prepare weekly Journal entries, engage in a regular electronic Discussion Board with other externs and the instructor, host the instructor for a site visit, and do a written Description of Placement.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2539, "title": "Farmworker Legal Assistance Clinic IV", "code": "LAW 7864", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Students collaborate with farmworkers, farmworker families, and partner organizations to use the law in service of their clients' goals. Students who have completed the first semester of any clinical course can seek the instructors' permission to enroll in Farmworker Clinic IV, for 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 or 6 credits, depending on the number of projects undertaken. Students in Farmworker Clinic II work on individual cases for clients and/or non-litigation advocacy projects. They attend roughly four one-hour seminar class \"case rounds\" meetings during the semester, usually at the same time that Farmworker Clinic I meets. Other multi-clinic classes and trainings will be made available as well.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2540, "title": "First Amendment Law Clinic", "code": "LAW 7867", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This will be the first semester of the newly-created First Amendment Clinic. Students will engage in litigation and policy analysis supporting the interests of news outlets, journalists, researchers, and other newsgatherers in aid of their critical function of reporting and communicating important news and information, as well as human rights advocates, political activists, and other individuals targeted based on their expression. The Clinic's cases involve the intersection of Freedom of Information laws or the First Amendment with several substantive areas of law related to the promotion of social justice: immigration, criminal justice, scientific integrity, democratic institutions and norms, human rights, journalism, and internet speech. \u00a0Students will have the opportunity to vet potential cases, conduct offensive and defensive legal research, write party and amicus briefs, and, if they continue in the clinic next year, may have the possibility of conducting oral argument. \u00a0The First Amendment Clinic is committed to teamwork and developing student's collaborative skills, and students will have the opportunity to work on these skills in tandem with members of other clinics with which we are co-counseling. \u00a0In addition, in the clinic seminar, practitioners in the field will speak to the class to provide additional practical insight to students. Finally, students will have the option to visit a newsroom as part of the clinic's \"field trip\" toward the end of the semester. \u00a0Students who sign up for the clinic will be required to participate in a \"bootcamp\" to take place the weekend after the first week of classes. To apply, please submit a resume, statement of interest, short writing sample, and a transcript.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2541, "title": "First Amendment Law Clinic 2", "code": "LAW 7868", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2542, "title": "Juvenile Justice Clinic", "code": "LAW 7870", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2543, "title": "Low-Income Taxpayer Law and Accounting Practicum", "code": "LAW 7875", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Working with College of Business faculty, the law school has established this new practicum course to bring accounting and law students together in a law school clinic to provide inter-professional services to the community. The course carries two credits, one credit for thirteen hours of seminar meeting time, and one credit for forty hours of casework. Up to two additional credits can be earned with further casework.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2544, "title": "International Human Rights Clinic: Litigation and Advocacy III", "code": "LAW 7878", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2545, "title": "Tenants Advocacy Practicum II", "code": "LAW 7891", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2546, "title": "Advocacy for LGBT Communities Practicum", "code": "LAW 7905", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Prerequisite: completion of 2 full semesters of law study at a U.S. law school. Permission of the instructor.\u00a0 Limited enrollment.\u00a0 12 to 16 hours of work per week. This course has two components. First, a weekly seminar that covers a survey of different legal topics affecting lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender (LGBT) individuals and communities. Topics include relationship recognition, parentage, custody, asylum, employment discrimination, and more. This seminar generally takes place at Cornell Law School. Second, students will spend, on average, 8 hours per week doing client work and case rounds in Syracuse at the offices of the Volunteer Lawyers Project of Onondaga County. Students will work on a variety of legal cases and advocacy projects that advance or defend the rights of lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender (LGBT) individuals and communities.\u00a0 Students will work on developing fundamental lawyering skills such as interviewing, client counseling, and drafting of court forms.\u00a0 Students will also have the opportunity to engage in public education, legal research and other advocacy.\u00a0 Students must be able to arrange for their own travel to and from Syracuse on a weekly basis. Students are requested to submit a resume, transcript and letter of interest when applying.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2547, "title": "Advocacy for LGBT Communities Practicum II", "code": "LAW 7906", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Prerequisite: Completion of LGBT Practicum I. Completion of 2 full semesters of law study at a U.S. law school. Permission of the instructor.\u00a0 Limited enrollment.\u00a0 Class may be taken for 2 or 3 credits; 6 to 10 hours of work per week. Students will continue the client work portion of the Practicum I.\u00a0 Students will work with instructor to identify number of hours worked in Syracuse versus remotely. Students will attend on average 1 hour of class per week for case rounds and for new subject material not covered during their time in Practicum I.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2548, "title": "Advanced Gender Justice Clinic", "code": "LAW 7915", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "Clinic students contribute to efforts to address gender-based violence and discrimination by representing people in a variety of legal matters and undertaking advocacy projects in collaboration with community partners. Students will gain experience in legal advocacy on gender justice issues and develop lawyering and leadership skills. Students will participate in regular weekly team meetings and attend occasional seminars of the full Gender Justice Clinic. Students who wish to enroll in the Clinic should pre-register and contact Prof. Brundige (elizabeth.brundige@cornell.edu) to discuss their participation by the end of the pre-registration period. Supplementary application materials are not required. Please also contact Prof. Brundige if you have any questions about the course.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2549, "title": "New York Attorney General Practicum I", "code": "LAW 7925", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The New York State Attorney General offers a clinic in which law students work 12-15 hours per week in the Attorney General's Syracuse Regional Office and attend a weekly class at Cornell. Under the supervision of an Assistant Attorney General, students perform legal research, writing, analysis, draft original legal documents and provide trial support. Students will have an opportunity to attend hearings, trials, court arguments, and pre-trial proceedings. Students will acquire litigation skills as well as specialized knowledge of public advocacy litigation. The class will focus on legal and ethical issues seen in litigation and review student experiences working in the Attorney General's office. Each week there will be a different subject area of Attorney General practice discussed or there will be a guest speaker. Topics include medical malpractice, defective highway design, 1983 civil rights actions in Federal Court, petitions in State Court seeking to overturn state actions, prisoner claims public advocacy litigation. Guest speakers will be attorneys serving in various capacities in State or Federal government and often include a judge or court attorney. There will also be a pro bono opportunity to accompany an attorney to a volunteer legal services clinics operated by the Onondaga County Bar Association.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2550, "title": "Federal Indian Law Practicum I", "code": "LAW 7945", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This ongoing clinical course is pursuing a claim against the Department of the Interior under The Judgment Funds Act on behalf of disenrolled members of the Saginaw Chippewa Indian Tribe of Michigan, and focuses heavily on matters related to federal Indian law and administrative law. We filed a Request for Action asking the Secretary of the Interior to perform its non-discretionary duty to re-enroll our clients in the Tribe, and the Department declined to do so. During the fall semester of 2020, we will prepare all documents necessary for filing an appeal in the D.C. Circuit. Student work will entail research and document preparation related to the filing the appeal in federal court. Students will be expected to quickly familiarize themselves with a voluminous historical and administrative record, which includes expert reports, client declarations and interview transcripts, and myriad research memoranda.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2551, "title": "Federal Indian Law Practicum II", "code": "LAW 7946", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This ongoing clinical course is pursuing a claim against the Department of the Interior under The Judgment Funds Act on behalf of disenrolled members of the Saginaw Chippewa tribe. We have filed a complaint asking the Secretary to perform a non-discretionary action to re-enroll our clients. Because the tribe is not a necessary party we have avoided issues of sovereign immunity, but expect that it may be raised in an attempt to join the tribe. The Department has filed a motion to dismiss and we responded and are awaiting judgment. During the spring semester of 2019, we will continue to develop strategies that will permit us to go forward regardless of the decision. Student work will entail designing an administrative appeal and preparing documents for a motion for summary judgment. Students will continue gathering and preparing evidence as well as preparing memoranda on the various tactics. The voluminous historical record remains to be fully cataloged and exhibits for the client declarations also remain to be prepared.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2552, "title": "Federal Indian Law Practicum IV", "code": "LAW 7950", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2553, "title": "Securities Law Clinic I", "code": "LAW 7953", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The course will focus on fundamental investigatory and advocacy skills applicable to representation of public investors in disputes subject to arbitration at the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (f/k/a National Association of Securities Dealers), with particular attention to the elderly and to small investors. Substantive legal topics will include the scope and nature of binding arbitration under the Federal Arbitration Act and New York law, and the legal and regulatory remedies available to defrauded investors. Coursework will include training in skills such as interviewing potential clients, evaluating potential claims, preparing pleadings, conducting discovery, representing clients at hearings and negotiating settlements. Class work will include presentations by nationally-recognized experts on topics applicable to evaluation of securities accounts, trading, and products. Students will have the opportunity under faculty supervision to represent investors, to provide public education to community groups as to investment frauds, to draft position statements to regulatory authorities, and/or to participate in preparing amicus briefs, in support of public investors.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2554, "title": "Securities Law Clinic II", "code": "LAW 7954", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The course will focus on fundamental investigatory and advocacy skills applicable to representation of public investors in disputes subject to arbitration at the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (f/k/a National Association of Securities Dealers), with particular attention to the elderly and to small investors. Substantive legal topics will include the scope and nature of binding arbitration under the Federal Arbitration Act and New York law, and the legal and regulatory remedies available to defrauded investors. Coursework will include training in skills such as interviewing potential clients, evaluating potential claims, preparing pleadings, conducting discovery, representing clients at hearings and negotiating settlements. Class work will include presentations by nationally-recognized experts on topics applicable to evaluation of securities accounts, trading, and products. Students will have the opportunity under faculty supervision to represent investors, to provide public education to community groups as to investment frauds, to draft position statements to regulatory authorities, and/or to participate in preparing amicus briefs, in support of public investors.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2555, "title": "Securities Law Clinic III", "code": "LAW 7955", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "The course will focus on fundamental investigatory and advocacy skills applicable to representation of public investors in disputes subject to arbitration at the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (f/k/a National Association of Securities Dealers), with particular attention to the elderly and to small investors. Substantive legal topics will include the scope and nature of binding arbitration under the Federal Arbitration Act and New York law, and the legal and regulatory remedies available to defrauded investors. Coursework will include training in skills such as interviewing potential clients, evaluating potential claims, preparing pleadings, conducting discovery, representing clients at hearings and negotiating settlements. Class work will include presentations by nationally-recognized experts on topics applicable to evaluation of securities accounts, trading, and products. Students will have the opportunity under faculty supervision to represent investors, to provide public education to community groups as to investment frauds, to draft position statements to regulatory authorities, and/or to participate in preparing amicus briefs, in support of public investors.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2556, "title": "Cornell Research Colloquium", "code": "LAW 7991", "subject": "LAW", "descr": "This seminar is a course in advanced academic research methodology. The Colloquium is designed to prepare the students to engage in doctoral-level research, analysis and writing, especially in comparative and international contexts. How is the researcher to select an object or subject of investigation? How should she formulate research questions? How should she engage in the study of foreign and domestic legal institutions, doctrines and/or cultures? How is interdisciplinary work to be accomplished?\nThe early portions of the course will involve discussing readings in comparative research methodology, including functionalism, Common Core analysis, legal transplant theory, historicism, law and development, legal pluralism, cultural analysis, colonial studies, and comparative institutionalism. In the latter portions of the course, students will present and critique their methodologically reflective research projects. A modest number of external speakers will be invited to present their work in progress for the purposes of generating methodologically oriented discussion.", "tags": "LAW", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2557, "title": "Leadership Training Practicum", "code": "LEAD 1960", "subject": "LEAD", "descr": "This introductory course is intended for students interested in the Leadership Minor who are engaged in various leadership activities across campus. The course will be structured to teach principles of leadership that will be immediately applied to a student's activity. Formal training provided by the Public Service Center, Office of Engaged Initiatives, Greek leadership, Big Red Leadership Institute, Cornell Outdoor Education or other approved program is expected and included. Students enroll in the sub-lecture for their respective program.", "tags": "LEAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2558, "title": "Foundations in Leadership: Skills for Professional Success and Life", "code": "LEAD 3100", "subject": "LEAD", "descr": "This course frames leadership as a particular way of approaching life, one that is essential to both personal fulfillment and career effectiveness. The course begins with the inner work of a leader's personal development and then explores how leaders work through others to enhance their influence.", "tags": "KCM-AG|SBA-AG|LEAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2559, "title": "Leadership Minor ePortfolio", "code": "LEAD 4925", "subject": "LEAD", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to demonstrate that Leadership Minor students will have met all learning outcomes in the program prior to graduation by documenting relevant in-class and co-curricular activities in their individual ePortfolio. The ePortfolio will be evaluated based on the following elements: a personal profile, leadership philosophy statement, leadership experiences, personal development, examples of how the learning outcomes for the minor have been met through the capstone experience, and reflective writing on the capstone experience. The evaluation and assignment of a grade will be made by the student's advisor using a common rubric. Ideally, students will enroll in this course in their second-to-last semester so any deficiencies can be addressed prior to graduation.", "tags": "LEAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2560, "title": "Undergraduate Experience in Leadership", "code": "LEAD 4970", "subject": "LEAD", "descr": "The capstone leadership experience for the Leadership Minor should be designed with a member of the faculty or staff who will directly supervise the experience, include learning outcomes, and be pre-approved by the director of the minor. The leadership experience can be directed through Cornell athletics, organized campus clubs, the Greek system, Cornell Outdoor Education, the Cornell Public Service Center, the residential system or other similar organization. Every 45 hours outside of the classroom is equivalent to one credit hour.", "tags": "LEAD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2561, "title": "Introduction to the U.S. Legal System", "code": "LEGAL 5100", "subject": "LEGAL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LEGAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2562, "title": "Working with Business Contracts", "code": "LEGAL 5101", "subject": "LEGAL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LEGAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2563, "title": "Employment Law", "code": "LEGAL 5107", "subject": "LEGAL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LEGAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2564, "title": "A Global History of Love", "code": "LGBT 1940", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "By posing seemingly simple questions such as what is love and who has the right to love, this introductory-level lecture course surveys how love has been experienced and expressed from the pre-modern period to the present. Through case studies of familial and conjugal love in Africa, Asia, the US, Europe, and South and Latin America, the course will examine the debates about and enactment's of what constitutes the appropriate way to show love and affection in different cultures and historical contexts. Among the themes we will explore are questions of sexuality, marriage, kinship, and gender rights. A final unit will examine these themes through modern technologies such as the Internet, scientific advances in medicine, and a growing awareness that who and how we love is anything but simple or universal.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2565, "title": "Introduction to Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, and Transgender Studies", "code": "LGBT 2290", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to central issues, debates, and theories that characterize the field of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, and Transgender (LGBT) Studies. Starting from the assumption that neither \"sex\" nor \"sexuality\" is a private experience or category, we will explore some of the ways that these powerfully public and political terms have circulated in social, legal, economic, and cultural spheres. We will also examine how these categories are situated in relation to other formative categories including race, ethnicity, religion, family, marriage, reproduction, the economy, and the state. Using a comparative and intersectional approach, we will read from various disciplines to assess the tools that LGBT studies offers for understanding power and culture in our contemporary world.", "tags": "LA-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2566, "title": "Literature and Medicine", "code": "LGBT 2350", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "How does literary language depict the experience of physical suffering? Can a poem or a novel palliate pain, illness, even the possibility of death? From darkly comic narratives of black plague to the rise and fall of hysteria to depictions of the AIDS crisis, this course examines literature centered on medical practices from the early modern period through the twentieth century. Why have medical practices changed, and how do writers address their political, social, and ideological implications? Readings will include a broad range of genres, including poetry (Dickinson, Whitman, Keats), fiction (McEwan, Chekhov, Gilman, Kafka, Camus), theater (Kushner), nonfiction prose (Woolf, Freud), and critical theory (Foucault, Scarry, Canguilhem, Sontag).", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2567, "title": "Desire", "code": "LGBT 2760", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "\"Language is a skin,\" the critic Roland Barthes once wrote: \"I rub my language against the other. It is as if I had words instead of fingers, or fingers at the tip of my words. My language trembles with desire.\" Sexual desire has a history, even a literary history, which we will examine through an introductory survey of European dramatic literature from the Ancient Greeks to the present, as well as classic readings in sexual theory, including Plato, Freud, Foucault, and contemporary feminist and queer theory.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2568, "title": "Desire and Modern Drama", "code": "LGBT 2762", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2569, "title": "Gender and the Brain", "code": "LGBT 3210", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "Why are boys more likely than girls to be diagnosed with autism, and why are women more likely than men to be diagnosed with depression? Are there different \"gay\" and \"straight\" brains? And how does brain science interact with gender and sexuality in popular debate? Reading and discussing the original scientific papers and related critical texts, we will delve into the neuroscience of gender. In this course, we will delve into the neuroscience of gender difference. Reading the original scientific papers and related critical texts, we will ask whether we can find measurable physical differences in male and female brains, and what these differences might be. Do men and women solve spatial puzzles differently, as measured physiologically? Do nonhuman animals display sex-specific behaviors mediated by brain structure, and can we extrapolate these findings to human behavior? Why are boys three times more likely than girls to be diagnosed as autistic, and is there any connection between the predominantly male phenomenon of autism and other stereotypically male mental traits? Are there physical representations of sexual orientation in the brain, and how are these related to gender identity? And how are scientific studies represented and misrepresented in popular debate?", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2570, "title": "Undergraduate Independent Study", "code": "LGBT 3990", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "Individual study program intended for juniors and seniors working on special topics with selected reading or research projects not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with an LGBT Studies faculty member who has agreed to supervise independent study.", "tags": "LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2571, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "LGBT 4505", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2572, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "LGBT 4701", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday,\u00a0alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2573, "title": "Humanitarian Affects", "code": "LGBT 4876", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "Liberal feminists and political theorists argue that sentiments such as compassion and empathy have the capacity to alert us to suffering, injustice, and oppression, and thus incite transformative political action. This interdisciplinary seminar explores the challenges to this theory by staging a conversation between postcolonial, feminist, and queer theories of affect, and anthropological critiques of humanitarian projects. Sentiments are mobilized to defend borders, wage wars, grant asylum to refugees, provide medical care and disaster relief, and inspire feminist activism. We will analyze how these gendered and racialized ethical projects and political regimes are co-constituted, and how they mediate access to resources and survival, as well as political agency, subjectivity, citizenship, and national belonging.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2574, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "LGBT 6505", "subject": "LGBT", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "LGBT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2575, "title": "FWS: Language, Thought, and Reality", "code": "LING 1100", "subject": "LING", "descr": "In this course the students learn the skill of writing at the university level. Instructors offer themes for their courses within their own special areas of expertise.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2576, "title": "Introduction to Linguistics", "code": "LING 1101", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Overview of the science of language, especially its theoretical underpinnings, methods, and major findings. Areas covered include: the relation between sound and meaning in human languages, social variation in language, language change over time, universals of language, and the mental representation of linguistic knowledge. Students are introduced to a wide variety of language phenomena, drawn not only from languages resembling English, but also from many that appear to be quite unlike English, such as those native to the Americas, Africa, Asia, Australia, and the South Pacific.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2577, "title": "WIM: Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "LING 1104", "subject": "LING", "descr": "This section is highly recommended for students who are interested in learning about the topics covered in the main course through writing and discussion.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2578, "title": "English Words: Histories and Mysteries", "code": "LING 1109", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Where do the words we use come from? This course examines the history and structure of the English vocabulary from its distant Indo-European roots to the latest in technical jargon and slang. Topics include formal and semantic change, taboo and euphemism, borrowing, new words from old, \"learned\" English loans from Greek and Latin, slang, and society.", "tags": "HA-AS|ETM-AS|HST-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2579, "title": "Elementary Sanskrit II", "code": "LING 1132", "subject": "LING", "descr": "An introduction to the essentials of Sanskrit grammar. Designed to enable the student to read classical and epic Sanskrit as soon as possible.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2580, "title": "Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "LING 1170", "subject": "LING", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the science of the mind.\u00a0 Everyone knows what it's like to think and perceive, but this subjective experience provides little insight into how minds emerge from physical intities like brains.\u00a0 To address this issue, cognitive science integrates work from at least five disciplines: Psychology, Neuroscience, Computer Science, Linguistics, and Philosophy.\u00a0 This course introduces students to the insights these disciplines offer into the workings of the mind by exploring visual perception, attention, memory, learning, problem solving, language, and consciousness.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2581, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "LING 2212", "subject": "LING", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2582, "title": "Psychology of Language", "code": "LING 2215", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Provides an introduction to the psychology of language. The purpose of the course is to introduce students to the scientific study of psycholinguistic phenomena. Covers a broad range of topics from psycholinguistics, including the origin of language, the different components of language (phonology, morphology, syntax, and semantics), processes involved in reading, computational modeling of language processes, the acquisition of language (both under normal and special circumstances), and the brain bases of language.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2583, "title": "Native American Languages", "code": "LING 2248", "subject": "LING", "descr": "This course explores the wide variety of languages indigenous to the Americas. There were thousands of languages spoken in the Americas before the arrival of Europeans and hundreds of these languages are still spoken today. We will look at several of these languages in terms of their linguistic structure as well as from social, historical, and political perspectives. No prior linguistic background is required and no previous knowledge of any Native American languages is presumed.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2584, "title": "Intermediate Sanskrit II", "code": "LING 2252", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Readings from Sanskrit dramas and literary commentary.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2585, "title": "Introduction to Phonetics and Phonology", "code": "LING 3302", "subject": "LING", "descr": "This course is an introduction to both phonetics (the study of the physical properties of the sounds of human language) and phonology (the organization and patterning of those sounds). The first part of the course focuses on the main areas of phonetics: articulation, acoustics, and perception. Students acquire basic skills, such as production and perception of speech sounds, transcription using the International Phonetic Alphabet, and instrumental analysis of speech. In the second part of the course students are introduced to key concepts\u00a0in phonology, including rules, representations, and analysis of sound patterns. Throughout the course aspects of the sound systems of a wide range of world languages are studied.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2586, "title": "Introduction to Historical Linguistics", "code": "LING 3314", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Survey of the basic mechanisms of linguistic change, with examples from a variety of languages.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2587, "title": "Old Norse II", "code": "LING 3316", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Old Norse is a collective term for the earliest North Germanic literary languages: Old Icelandic, Old Norwegian, Old Danish, and Old Swedish. The richly documented Old Icelandic is the center of attention, and the purpose is twofold: the students gain knowledge of an ancient North Germanic language, important from a linguistic point of view, and gain access to the medieval Icelandic (and Scandinavian) literature.\u00a0 Extensive reading of Old Norse texts, among them selections from some of the major Icelandic family sagas: Njals saga, Grettis saga, and Egils saga, as well as the whole Hrafnkels saga.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2588, "title": "Cayuga Language and Culture II", "code": "LING 3325", "subject": "LING", "descr": "A continuation of LING 3324, with further exploration of Cayuga (Gayogo\u0331h\u00f3\ua789n\u01eb\u02bc) language and culture. Language instruction continues in an immersive learning environment with a focus on plants and growing in the spring.", "tags": "KCM-AS|GLC-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2589, "title": "Independent Study in Linguistics", "code": "LING 3390", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Independent study of linguistics topics not covered in regular curriculum for undergrads.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2590, "title": "Computational Linguistics", "code": "LING 4424", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Computational models of natural languages. Topics include tree syntax and treebank databases; broad-coverage probabilistic grammars; finite state generative phonology; computational semantics; computational minimalist grammar; finite state optimality-theoretic phonology; Hidden Markov models of acoustic realization; text and speech corpora; lab methods in Unix/Linux environment.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2591, "title": "Pragmatics", "code": "LING 4425", "subject": "LING", "descr": "What is the relationship between what words mean and how they are used? What is part of the grammar and what is a result of general reasoning? Pragmatics is often thought of as the study of how meaning depends on the context of utterance. However, it can be difficult to draw a line between pragmatics and semantics.\u00a0In this course, we will investigate various topics that walk this line, including varieties of linguistic inference (including entailment, presupposition, and implicature), anaphora, indexicals, and speech acts.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2592, "title": "Experimental Methods in Language Sciences", "code": "LING 4477", "subject": "LING", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2593, "title": "Honors Research Workshop II", "code": "LING 4492", "subject": "LING", "descr": "This course provides structure and guidance to students doing an honors thesis in linguistics. The course consists of biweekly meeting of all honors thesis writers with the course instructor. Students will submit drafts of the introduction, methodology, results, and conclusions. Students will comment on each others drafts. Students will also work on presentation skills.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2594, "title": "Honors Thesis Research", "code": "LING 4494", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Directed honors thesis research for students working on an honors thesis, taken with the student's honors thesis chair or other committee member.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2595, "title": "Native American Languages", "code": "LING 6248", "subject": "LING", "descr": "This course explores the wide variety of languages indigenous to the Americas. There were thousands of languages spoken in the Americas before the arrival of Europeans and hundreds of these languages are still spoken today. We will look at several of these languages in terms of their linguistic structure as well as from social, historical, and political perspectives. No prior linguistic background is required and no previous knowledge of any Native American languages is presumed.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2596, "title": "Introduction to Historical Linguistics", "code": "LING 6314", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Survey of the basic mechanisms of linguistic change, with examples from a variety of languages.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2597, "title": "Phonology II", "code": "LING 6402", "subject": "LING", "descr": "A continuation of LING 6401\u00a0with a focus on developing research skills.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2598, "title": "Syntax II", "code": "LING 6404", "subject": "LING", "descr": "A continuation of LING 6403, focusing on syntactic dependencies, including the theory of control, an examination of locality constraints on movement, covert versus overt movement, and the syntax of quantification. The purpose of the course is to develop the background needed for independent syntactic research.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2599, "title": "Semantics II", "code": "LING 6422", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Uses the techniques introduced in Semantics I to analyze linguistic phenomena, including quantifier scope, ellipsis, and referential pronouns. Temporal and possible worlds semantics are introduced and used in the analysis of modality, tense, and belief sentences. The phenomena of presupposition, indefinite descriptions, and anaphora are analyzed in a dynamic compositional framework that formalizes the idea that sentence meaning effects a change in an information state.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2600, "title": "Pragmatics", "code": "LING 6425", "subject": "LING", "descr": "What is the relationship between what words mean and how they are used?\u00a0 What is part of the grammar and what is a result of general reasoning?\u00a0 Pragmatics is often thought of as the study of how meaning depends on the context of utterance.\u00a0 However, it can be difficult to draw a line between pragmatics and semantics.\u00a0 In this course, we will investigate various topics that walk this line, including varieties of linguistic inference including entailment, presupposition, and implicature), anaphora, indexicals, and speech acts.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2601, "title": "Experimental Methods in Language Sciences", "code": "LING 6477", "subject": "LING", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2602, "title": "Topics in Phonetics-Phonological Theory", "code": "LING 6601", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Examination of recent developments in the core areas of phonetics and phonology as well as its interfaces with other components of the grammar (e.g., morphosyntax, semantics or pragmatics). Topics covered include current approaches and relevant theoretical and historical perspectives.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2603, "title": "Research Workshop", "code": "LING 6603", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Provides a forum for presentation and discussion of ongoing research, and development of professional skills.\u00a0Participants must enroll in a concurrent independent study with a special committee member, or a relevant workshop.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2604, "title": "Research Workshop", "code": "LING 6604", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Provides a forum for presentation and discussion of ongoing research, and development of professional skills. Participants must enroll in a concurrent independent study with a special committee member, or a relevant workshop.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2605, "title": "Indo-European Workshop", "code": "LING 6635", "subject": "LING", "descr": "An assortment of subjects intended for students with previous training in Indo-European linguistics: problems in the reconstruction of Proto Indo-European, topics in the historical grammars of the various IE languages, reading and historical linguistic analysis of texts, and grammatical sketches of \"minor\" IE languages.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2606, "title": "Phonetic Data Analysis Workshop", "code": "LING 6692", "subject": "LING", "descr": "The phonetics data analysis workshop provides students with practice in analysis and visualization of phonetic data, using Matlab, R, and Praat. Experiment design and statistical methods are emphasized.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2607, "title": "Directed Research", "code": "LING 7702", "subject": "LING", "descr": "An independent study for graduate students.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2608, "title": "Computational Seminar", "code": "LING 7710", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Addresses current theoretical and empirical issues in computational linguistics.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2609, "title": "Semantics Seminar", "code": "LING 7711", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Addresses current theoretical and empirical issues in semantics.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2610, "title": "Phonetics Seminar", "code": "LING 7713", "subject": "LING", "descr": "Addresses current theoretical and empirical issues in phonetics.", "tags": "LING", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2611, "title": "Latinos in the United States", "code": "LSP 2010", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "Exploration and analysis of the Hispanic experience in the United States. Examines the sociohistorical background and economic, psychological, and political factors that converge to shape a Latino group identity in the United States. Perspectives are suggested and developed for understanding Hispanic migrations, the plight of Latinos in urban and rural areas, and the unique problems faced by the diverse Latino groups. Groups studied include Mexican Americans, Dominicans, Cubans, and Puerto Ricans.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2612, "title": "U.S. Immigration Narratives", "code": "LSP 2251", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "Americans are conflicted about immigration. We honor and celebrate (and commercialize) our immigrant heritage in museums, folklife festivals, parades, pageants, and historical monuments. We also build fences and detention centers, and pass more and more laws to bar access to the United States. Polls tell us that Americans are concerned about the capacity of the United States to absorb so many immigrants from around the world. How often have we heard the laments \"Today's immigrants are too different. They don't want to assimilate\" or \"My grandparents learned English quickly, why can't they?\" The assumption is that older generations 'Americanized' quickly but that today's immigrants do not want to assimilate. Did 19th century immigrants really migrate to the United States to \"become Americans\"? Did they really assimilate quickly? Are today's immigrants really all that different from the immigrants who arrived earlier? Why do these particular narratives have such power and currency? This seminar will explore these issues and help students discern fact from fiction.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2613, "title": "Contemporary Narratives by Latina Writers", "code": "LSP 2460", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course will provide an introduction to some of the most important fictional work by US Latina writers, including short stories, novel, and film, with a particular focus on social justice, gender advocacy work, and work by Afro Latinx writers.\u00a0 We will begin with discussion of canonical figures like Gloria Anzald\u00faa and Cherr\u00ede Moraga, to provide a basis for our focus on more recent writers like Angie Cruz, Elizabeth Acevedo, Linda Yvette Ch\u00e1vez, and Carmen Maria Machado.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2614, "title": "Introduction to Latina/o/x Performance", "code": "LSP 2720", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Latina/o/x Performance investigating the historical and contemporary representations of Latina/o/xs in performance and media. Throughout the semester, students will critically examine central themes and issues that inform the experiences and (re) presentations of Latina/o/xs in the United States. How is latinidad performed? In situating the class around \"Latina/o/x,\" as both an umbrella term and an enacted social construction, we will then turn our attention to (re) presentations of latinidad within different genres of cultural expressions.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2615, "title": "Migration: Histories, Controversies, and Perspectives", "code": "LSP 2810", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This introductory course introduces students to issues and debates related to international migration and will provide an interdisciplinary foundation to understanding the factors that shape migration flows and migrant experiences. \u00a0We will start by reviewing theories of the state and historical examples of immigrant racialization and exclusion in the United States and beyond. \u00a0We will critically examine the notions of borders, citizenship/non-citizenship, and the creation of diasporas. \u00a0Students will also hear a range of perspectives by exposing them to Cornell guest faculty who do research and teach on migration across different disciplines and methodologies and in different world areas. Examples include demographic researchers concerned with immigrant inequality and family formation, geographic perspectives on the changing landscapes of immigrant metropolises, legal scholarship on the rights of immigrant workers, and the study of immigrant culture from a feminist studies lens. \u00a0Offered each fall semester.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2616, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "LSP 3336", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2617, "title": "Multicultural Issues in Education", "code": "LSP 3405", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course explores research on race, ethnicity and language in American education. It examines historical and current patterns of school achievement for minoritized youths. It also examines the cultural and social premises undergirding educational practices in diverse communities and schools. Policies, programs and pedagogy, including multicultural and bilingual education, are explored.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2618, "title": "Ethnoracial Identity in Anthropology, Language, and Law", "code": "LSP 3475", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "In this course, we examine the role that law and language, as mutually constitutive mediating systems, occupy in constructing ethnoracial identity in the United States. We will approach law from a critical anthropological perspective, as a signifying and significant sociocultural system, rather than as an objective\u00a0structure of rational rules and processes, to consider how legal norms, procedures, and discourses inform other processes of sociocultural production and reproduction, thus contributing to the creation and maintenance of differential power relations. We will draw on anthropological, linguistic, and critical race theory as well as ethnographic and legal material to guide and document our analyses.", "tags": "SCD-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2619, "title": "Latinx Popular Culture Matters", "code": "LSP 3980", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course examines several areas of Latinx popular culture that influence U.S. politics and society, artistic productions, and aesthetic sensibilities, as well as popular and civic cultures. Mapping a historical trajectory of Chicanidad and Latinidad in art, music, film, and popular media in the twentieth century, the course also engages contemporary art practices that are rooted in 1960s and 1970s civil rights and community art movements. Topics include Latinx people in film and TV, muralism and street art, music, spoken word as well as close examinations of representations of Latinx people in American mainstream culture.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2620, "title": "Contemporary Issues in Latin - Latino America", "code": "LSP 4000", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "Interested in Latino Studies and Latin American Studies? This course will explore topics in Anthropology, Art, Economics, History, Literature, Government, Sociology, etc., of US Latino and Latin American contexts. Course features guest speakers from Cornell and other institutions.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2621, "title": "Undergraduate Independent Study", "code": "LSP 4210", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "Guided independent study.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2622, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "LSP 4505", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2623, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "LSP 4701", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday,\u00a0alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2624, "title": "Contemporary Issues in Latin-Latino America", "code": "LSP 6000", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "Interested in Latino Studies and Latin American Studies? This course will explore topics in Anthropology, Art, Economics, History, Literature, Government, Sociology, etc., of US Latino and Latin American contexts. Course features guest speakers from Cornell and other institutions.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2625, "title": "Graduate Student Independent Study", "code": "LSP 6210", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "Guided independent study.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2626, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "LSP 6336", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2627, "title": "Ethnoracial Identity in Anthropology, Language, and Law", "code": "LSP 6424", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "In this course, we examine the role that law and language, as mutually constitutive mediating systems, occupy in constructing ethnoracial identity in the United States. We will approach law from a critical anthropological perspective, as a signifying and significant\u00a0sociocultural system, rather than as an objective\u00a0structure of rational rules and processes, to consider how legal norms, procedures, and discourses inform other processes of sociocultural production and reproduction, thus contributing to the creation and maintenance of differential power relations. We will draw on anthropological, linguistic, and critical race theory as well as ethnographic and legal material to guide and document our analyses.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2628, "title": "Queer Proximities", "code": "LSP 6505", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "How has the fiction and art of queers of color transformed the worlds we know? How have their theoretical interventions created new queer freedoms and new understandings of race and sexualities?\u00a0 In this course we will focus on the struggles against subjugation led by Black and Latinx artists and writers including Audre Lorde, Gabby Rivera, Marlon Riggs, F\u00e9lix, Gonz\u00e1lez-Torres, Essex Hemphill, Gloria Anzald\u00faa, James Baldwin, Cherr\u00ede Moraga. Building on their work, will turn to queer of color theory, a conceptual field that interrogates the ways race, gender, sexuality, regimes of embodiment, and class reinforce racializing technologies, in order to learn what queer of color thinkers can teach us about globalization, incarceration, immigration as well as joy, pleasure, intoxication, the unruly and the opaque.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2629, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "LSP 6701", "subject": "LSP", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday, alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "LSP", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2630, "title": "Freshman and Nontechnical Projects in Mechanical Engineering", "code": "MAE 1900", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Individual or group study or project for students who want to pursue a particular analytical, computational, or experimental investigation outside of regular courses or for informal instruction supplementing that given in regular courses. An engineering report on the project is required of each student. Students must make individual arrangements with a faculty sponsor and submit an Undergraduate Research Project Approval Form to the Student Services Office, 108 Upson Hall. Students are expected to spend 3-4 hours per week per credit hour working on the project. May not be used as a technical elective in the ME major. Intended for freshmen on project teams and for project team members performing non-technical\u00a0 tasks.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2631, "title": "Statics and Mechanics of Solids", "code": "MAE 2020", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Covers principles of statics, force systems, and equilibrium in solid structures. Topics include: free body diagrams in two and three dimensions; frames; mechanics of deformable solids; stress and strain; axial force; shear force, bending moment, and torsion in bars and beams; thermal stress; pressure vessles; statically indeterminate problems; buckling and yielding.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2632, "title": "Dynamics", "code": "MAE 2030", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Newtonian dynamics of a particle, systems of particles, rigid bodies, simple mechanisms and simple harmonic oscillators.\u00a0 Impulse, momentum, angular momentum, work and energy. Two-dimensional (planar) kinematics including motion relative to a moving reference frame. Three dimensional rigid-body dynamics are introduced at the instructor's option.\u00a0 Setting up the differential equations of motion and solving them both analytically and numerically with MATLAB. In-lecture laboratory demonstrations illustrate basic principles.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2633, "title": "Mechanical Synthesis", "code": "MAE 2250", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "A hands-on introduction to the mechanical design process, from conceptualization through prototype construction and testing. Design projects provide experience in basic prototyping skills using machine tools, 3D printing and laser cutting, as needed, as well as basic instruction in CAD and technical sketching.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2634, "title": "Atomic and Molecular Structure of Matter", "code": "MAE 3130", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course covers the atomic and molecular structure of crystalline and noncrystalline materials as well as selected analytical techniques for structural interrogation. Selected topics include, basic elements of structure; order and disorder; crystals; semicrystalline materials; amorphous materials; molecular materials; x-ray diffraction; small angle x-ray scattering.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2635, "title": "Heat Transfer", "code": "MAE 3240", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Topics include the following: steady and unsteady heat conduction; forced and free convection; external and internal flows; radiation heat transfer; and heat exchangers numerical solutions using ANSYS/FLUENT for conduction and convection.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2636, "title": "System Dynamics", "code": "MAE 3260", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Dynamic behavior of mechanical systems: modeling, analysis techniques, and applications; vibrations of single- and multidegree- of-freedom systems; feedback control systems. Computer simulation and experimental studies of vibration and control systems.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2637, "title": "Mechanics of Composite Structures", "code": "MAE 4130", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Covers the fundamentals of mechanical analysis and material selection for composite materials. Topics include an overview of composite types, advantages, applications and fabrication; anisotropic elasticity; specific composite constitutive equations including plane stress and lamination theory; failure analysis; boundary value problems using composite materials; experimental methods and an introduction to micromechanics. Lectures cover essential background material and theoretical developments. Labs provide hands-on experiences for understanding composite materials properties and performance.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2638, "title": "Mechanics of Composite Structures", "code": "MAE 4131", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Covers the fundamentals of mechanical analysis and material selection for composite materials. Topics include an overview of composite types, advantages, applications and fabrication; anisotropic elasticity; specific composite constitutive equations including plane stress and lamination theory; failure analysis; boundary value problems using composite materials; experimental methods and an introduction to micromechanics. Lectures cover essential background material and theoretical developments. Labs provide hands-on experiences for understanding composite materials properties and performance. Senior Design report required.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2639, "title": "Spacecraft Technology and Systems Architecture", "code": "MAE 4160", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "A survey in contemporary space technology from satellite subsystem design through launch and mission operations, focusing on the classical subsystems of robotic and human-rated spacecraft, rockets, planetary rovers, and habitats, and with an emphasis on issue of spacecraft-system architecture and design. Topics covered include subsystem technologies and the systems-engineering principles that tie them together into a spacecraft architecture. Subsystem technologies discussed include communications, thermal subsystems, structure, guidance/navigation/control, spacecraft power, space propulsion, payloads (remote sensing, insitu sensing, human life support), entry/descent/landing, surface mobility, and flight-computer hardware and software. The final project consists of architecting a complete spacecraft system with appropriate subsystems, with designs supported by parametric analysis and simulation. Discussions of current problems and trends in spacecraft operation and development.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2640, "title": "Spacecraft Technology and Systems Architecture", "code": "MAE 4161", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "A survey in contemporary space technology from satellite subsystem design through launch and mission operations, focusing on the classical subsystems of robotic and human-rated spacecraft, rockets, planetary rovers, and habitats, and with an emphasis on issue of spacecraft-system architecture and design. Topics covered include subsystem technologies and the systems-engineering principles that tie them together into a spacecraft architecture. Subsystem technologies discussed include communications, thermal subsystems, structure, guidance/navigation/control, spacecraft power, space propulsion, payloads (remote sensing, insitu sensing, human life support), entry/descent/landing, surface mobility, and flight-computer hardware and software. The final project consists of architecting a complete spacecraft system with appropriate subsystems, with designs supported by parametric analysis and simulation. Discussions of current problems and trends in spacecraft operation and development. Students will report expectations in a space-system design project in a senior design report.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2641, "title": "Autonomous Mobile Robots", "code": "MAE 4180", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Creating robots capable of performing complex tasks autonomously requires one to address a variety of different challenges such as sensing, perception, control, planning, mechanical design, and interaction with humans. In recent years many advances have been made toward creating such systems, both in the research community (different robot challenges and competitions) and in industry (industrial, military, and domestic robots). This course gives an overview of the challenges and techniques used for creating autonomous mobile robots. Topics include sensing, localization, mapping, path planning, motion planning, obstacle and collision avoidance, and multi-robot control.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2642, "title": "Introduction to Internet of Things \u2014 Technology and Engagement", "code": "MAE 4220", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This interdisciplinary design course aims to provide a holistic introduction to Internet of Things (IoT) and train students on the core technological and communication skills through community engagement and working on real-world applications. IoT has become an enabler for new economic activities and provides potentially cost-effective solutions to a wide range of societal challenges. Students team up with community partners throughout a semester to tackle a real-world problem using IoT technology. The project topics include, but are not limited to, energy, environmental, civic infrastructure monitoring. The project teams will apply engineering design principles and critically examine sensor selection, sensor deployment, wireless communication, data quality, security, and privacy as well as value proposition for IoT-based solutions. The key learning outcome of this course is that students will grasp how to develop IoT-based technological solutions and become competent in communicating how to use the IoT technology responsibly to create positive societal impact.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2643, "title": "Introduction to Internet of Things - Technology and Engagement", "code": "MAE 4221", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This interdisciplinary design course aims to provide a holistic introduction to Internet of Things (IoT) and train students on the core technological and communication skills through community engagement and working on real-world applications. IoT has become an enabler for new economic activities and provides potentially cost-effective solutions to a wide range of societal challenges. Students team up with community partners throughout a semester to tackle a real-world problem using IoT technology. The project topics include, but are not limited to, energy, environmental, civic infrastructure monitoring. The project teams will apply engineering design principles and critically examine sensor selection, sensor deployment, wireless communication, data quality, security and privacy as well as value proposition for IoT-based solutions. The key learning outcome of this course is that students will grasp how to develop IoT-based technological solutions and become competent in communicating how to use the IoT technology responsibly to create positive societal impact.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2644, "title": "Intermediate Fluid Dynamics", "code": "MAE 4230", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course builds on the foundation of MAE 3230. The lectures emphasize on the physics and mathematical analysis of the subject. Topics include incompressible flows, compressible flows, and computational fluid dynamics.\u00a0As an integral part of the course, you will learn numerical method and how to use ANSYS/Fluent to solve flow problems. The students will develop problem-solving skills, through which to cultivate an appreciation for the rich and complex structure of fluids,\u00a0and appreciation for fundamental ideas in fluid dynamics.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2645, "title": "Intermediate Fluid Dynamics", "code": "MAE 4231", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course builds on the foundation of MAE 3230. The lectures emphasize on the physics and mathematical analysis of the subject. Topics include incompressible flows, compressible flows, and computational fluid dynamics.\u00a0As an integral part of the course, you will learn numerical method and how to use ANSYS/Fluent to solve flow problems. The students will develop problem-solving skills, through which to cultivate an appreciation for the rich and complex structure of fluids,\u00a0and appreciation for fundamental ideas in fluid dynamics.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2646, "title": "FSAE Automotive Design Project", "code": "MAE 4250", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Project course to research, design, build, develop, and compete with a Formula SAE car for intercollegiate competition. Students work in interdisciplinary teams using concurrent engineering and systems engineering principles applied to complex mechanical, electromechanical, and electronic systems.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2647, "title": "Supervised Senior Design Experience", "code": "MAE 4291", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Substantial design experience based on the knowledge and skills acquired in earlier course work and incorporating engineering standards and realistic constraints. Sections of this course satisfy the BS ME senior design requirement. 3-credit sections are directed by a faculty member as an individual or a team design exercise. Consult www.mae.cornell.edu for enrollment details.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2648, "title": "Integrated Micro Sensors and Actuators: Bridging the Physical and Digital Worlds", "code": "MAE 4320", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to micro and nano devices that allow the digital world to both sense and actuate in the physical world. Design and analysis of modern MEMS/NEMS (Micro/Nano Electromechanical Systems) touch, accelerometers, gyroscopes, pressure, microphones, neural probe sensors. Design and analysis of electrostatic, piezoelectric, thermal, and magnetic actuators for frequency control and micro robotic applications. This is an interdisciplinary course drawing from mechanics, materials, solid state devices, CMOS electronics, and micro and nano fabrication. The students design, fabricate, and test a microsensor chip to implement class concepts.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2649, "title": "Aerospace Propulsion", "code": "MAE 4510", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to air and space propulsion. Emphasis on air-breathing gas-turbines. Chemical rocket propulsion. Brief discussion of electrical propulsion, of ramjets, and of reciprocating engines with propellers. Application of thermodynamic and fluid-mechanical principles to analysis of performance and design, including fuel efficiency and environmental impacts.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2650, "title": "Computer-Aided Engineering: Applications to Biological Processes", "code": "MAE 4530", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to simulation-based design as an alternative to prototype-based design; modeling and optimization of complex real-life processes for design and research, using industry-standard physics-based computational software. Emphasis is on problem formulation, starting from a real process and developing its computer model. Covers biomedical processes in thermal therapy and drug delivery that involve heat transfer, mass transfer, and fluid flow. Computational topics introduce the finite-element method, pre- and post-processing, and pitfalls of using computational software. Students choose their own semester-long biomedical project, which is the major part of the course (no final exam).", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2651, "title": "Introduction to Controlled Fusion: Principles and Technology", "code": "MAE 4590", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to the physical principles and various engineering aspects underlying power generation by controlled fusion. Topics include fuels and conditions required for fusion power and basic fusion-reactor concepts; fundamental aspects of plasma physics relevant to fusion plasmas and basic engineering problems for a fusion reactor; and an engineering analysis of proposed magnetic and/or inertial confinement fusion-reactor designs.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2652, "title": "Entrepreneurship for Engineers", "code": "MAE 4610", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Develops skills necessary to identify, evaluate, and begin new business ventures. Topics include intellectual property, competition, strategy, business plans, technology forecasting, finance and accounting, and sources of capital. A rigorous, quantitative approach is stressed throughout, and students create financial documents and plans, analyze human resource models, and work with sophisticated valuation methods, complicated equity structures, and legal and business documents. As such, this course represents the \"red meat\" of entrepreneurship, and the soft skills are left for other courses. Course work consists of discussions, assignments, and the preparation and presentation of a complete business plan.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2653, "title": "Advanced Product Design", "code": "MAE 4630", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "In this class we will use a combination of first-principles and bioinspired-design approaches to achieve unique, useful, and non-obvious technology. We will approach product design from both a \"push\" and \"pull\" customer demand focus. Individual and small team mentoring, in-class presentations, crowd-assisted development, and hardware prototyping and testing where possible will aid in refining the key innovations. This course presumes the enrolled students either: (i) have an existing application space in which they are developing a technological solution, or (ii) have enough training (i.e., B.S. degree) in a core engineering discipline to formulate a technical solution to an as-yet unidentified engineering contradiction (per the TRIZ paradigm).", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2654, "title": "Advanced Product Design", "code": "MAE 4631", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "In this class we will use a combination of first-principles and bioinspired-design approaches to achieve unique, useful, and non-obvious technology. We will approach product design from both a \"push\" and \"pull\" customer demand focus. Individual and small team mentoring, in-class presentations, crowd-assisted development, and hardware prototyping and testing where possible will aid in refining the key innovations. This course presumes the enrolled students either: (i) have an existing application space in which they are developing a technological solution, or (ii) have enough training (i.e., B.S. degree) in a core engineering discipline to formulate a technical solution to an as-yet unidentified engineering contradiction (per the TRIZ paradigm).", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2655, "title": "Orthopaedic Tissue Mechanics", "code": "MAE 4640", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Application of mechanics and materials principles to orthopaedic tissues. Physiology of bone, cartilage, ligament, and tendon and the relationship of these properties to their mechanical function. Mechanical behavior of skeletal tissues. Functional adaptation of these tissues to their mechanical environment. Tissue engineering of replacement structures.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2656, "title": "Orthopaedic Tissue Mechanics", "code": "MAE 4641", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Application of mechanics and materials principles to orthopaedic tissues. Physiology of bone, cartilage, ligament, and tendon and the relationship of these properties to their mechanical function. Mechanical behavior of skeletal tissues. Functional adaptation of these tissues to their mechanical environment. Tissue engineering of replacement structures. Senior design report required.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2657, "title": "Polymer Mechanics", "code": "MAE 4670", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course will provide foundations of polymer mechanics building from the basics of mechanics of materials. The focus will be split between experimental methods/data interpretation and modeling approaches. Topics will include hyper-elasticity, viscoelasticity, glass transition temperature, and plasticity with applications to both synthetic and biological materials. There will also be a scientific literature reading component through which students will be able to pick their own focus areas in the latter part of the semester.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2658, "title": "Polymer Mechanics", "code": "MAE 4671", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course will provide foundations of polymer mechanics building from the basics of mechanics of materials. The focus will be split between experimental methods/data interpretation and modeling approaches. Topics will include hyper-elasticity, viscoelasticity, glass transition temperature, and plasticity with applications to both synthetic and biological materials. There will also be a scientific literature reading component through which students will be able to pick their own focus areas in the latter part of the semester.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2659, "title": "Engineering Vibrations", "code": "MAE 4770", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Free and forced response of vibrating mechanical systems modeled as having one, two and several degrees of freedom, as well as models of continuous structures such as beams. Eigenanalysis. Vibration design: isolators, absorbers.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2660, "title": "Automotive Engineering", "code": "MAE 4860", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Selected topics in the analysis and design of vehicle components and vehicle systems. Emphasis on automobiles. Engines, transmissions, suspension, brakes, and aerodynamics are discussed. The course uses first principles and applies them to specific systems. The course is highly quantitative, using empirical and analytical approaches.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2661, "title": "Automotive Engineering", "code": "MAE 4861", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Selected topics in the analysis and design of vehicle components and vehicle systems. Emphasis on automobiles. Engines, transmissions, suspension, brakes, and aerodynamics are discussed. The course uses first principles and applies them to specific systems. The course is highly quantitative, using empirical and analytical approaches. Senior Design report required.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2662, "title": "Individual and Group Projects in Mechanical Engineering", "code": "MAE 4900", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Individual or group study or project for students who want to pursue a particular analytical, computational, or experimental investigation outside of regular courses or for informal instruction supplementing that given in regular courses. An engineering report on the project is required of each student. Students must make individual arrangements with a faculty sponsor and submit an Undergraduate Research Project Approval Form to the Student Services Office, 108 Upson Hall. Students are expected to spend 3-4 hours per week per credit hour working on the project.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2663, "title": "Teaching Experience in Mechanical Engineering", "code": "MAE 4980", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Students serve as teaching assistants in Cornell Mechanical Engineering classes or in local middle school technology classes.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2664, "title": "International Research Internship", "code": "MAE 4998", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2665, "title": "Future Energy Systems", "code": "MAE 5010", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Critically examines the technology of energy systems that will be acceptable in a world faced with global climate change, local pollution, and declining supplies of oil. The focus is on renewable energy sources (wind, solar, biomass), but other non-carbon-emitting sources (nuclear) and lowered-carbon sources (co-generative gas turbine plants, fuel cells) also are studied. Both the devices and the overall systems are analyzed.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2666, "title": "Mechanical Properties of Thin Films", "code": "MAE 5130", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Relationships between microstructure and mechanical behavior in thin films and other nanoscale structures. Topics include stresses, elastic and plastic deformation, creep and anelasticity, and fracture and delamination; and how mechanical behavior at the nanoscale deviates from the predictions of scaling laws derived for bulk materials. Applications in microelectronics, optics, microelectromechanical systems, coatings, etc.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2667, "title": "Spacecraft Technology and Systems Architecture", "code": "MAE 5160", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "A survey in contemporary space technology from satellite subsystem design through launch and mission operations, focusing on the classical subsystems of robotic and human-rated spacecraft, rockets, planetary rovers, and habitats, and with an emphasis on issue of spacecraft-system architecture and design. Topics covered include subsystem technologies and the systems-engineering principles that tie them together into a spacecraft architecture. Subsystem technologies discussed include communications, thermal subsystems, structure, guidance/navigation/control, spacecraft power, space propulsion, payloads (remote sensing, insitu sensing, human life support), entry/descent/landing, surface mobility, and flight-computer hardware and software. The final project consists of architecting a complete spacecraft system with appropriate subsystems, with designs supported by parametric analysis and simulation. Discussions of current problems and trends in spacecraft operation and development. Students in MAE 5160 will complete an additional project: an in-depth study of a space-technology problem to be integrated with a space-system design project.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2668, "title": "Autonomous Mobile Robots", "code": "MAE 5180", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Creating robots capable of performing complex tasks autonomously requires one to address a variety of different challenges such as sensing, perception, control, planning, mechanical design, and interaction with humans. In recent years many advances have been made toward creating such systems, both in the research community (different robot challenges and competitions) and in industry (industrial, military, and domestic robots). This course gives an overview of the challenges and techniques used for creating autonomous mobile robots. Topics include sensing, localization, mapping, path planning, motion planning, obstacle and collision avoidance, and multi-robot control.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2669, "title": "Dimensional Tolerancing in Mechanical Design", "code": "MAE 5210", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Designers use dimensional tolerances to limit spatial variations in mechanical parts and assemblies; the goals are interchangeability in assembly, performance, and cost. This course covers traditional limit tolerances briefly, but focuses mainly on modern geometric tolerances and their role in assembly control. Students are not required to complete the problem and project assignments. Students will learn the main concepts, principles, and techniques of dimensional tolerancing, but will not perform any assembly or tolerance analysis and design.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2670, "title": "Intermediate Fluid Dynamics with CFD", "code": "MAE 5230", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Builds on the foundation of\u00a0MAE 3230. The lectures emphasize on the physics and mathematical analysis of the subject. Topics include incompressible flows, compressible flows, and computational fluid dynamics.\u00a0As an integral part of the course, you will learn numerical method and how to use ANSYS/Fluent to solve flow problems. The students will develop problem-solving skills, through which to cultivate an appreciation for the rich and complex structure of fluids,\u00a0and appreciation for fundamental ideas in fluid dynamics.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2671, "title": "Design for Manufacture and Assembly", "code": "MAE 5260", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Successful component and system design is dependent on the ability to specify products that balance cost, performance, and component robustness. This course will consider methods for design optimization that are driven by an attention to manufacturing and assembly processes while maintaining consideration for functional sensitivities.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2672, "title": "Energy Seminar II", "code": "MAE 5469", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Energy resources, their conversion to electricity or mechanical work, and the environmental consequences of the energy cycle are discussed by faculty members from several departments in the university and by outside experts. Topics include energy resources and economics; coal-based electricity generation; nuclear reactors; solar power; energy conservation by users; and air pollution control.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2673, "title": "Aerospace Propulsion", "code": "MAE 5510", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to air and space propulsion. Emphasis on air-breathing gas-turbines. Chemical rocket propulsion. Brief discussion of electrical propulsion, of ramjets, and of reciprocating engines with propellers. Application of thermodynamic and fluid-mechanical principles to analysis of performance and design, including fuel efficiency and environmental impacts.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2674, "title": "Advanced Product Design", "code": "MAE 5630", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "In this class we will use a combination of first-principles and bioinspired-design approaches to achieve unique, useful, and non-obvious technology. We will approach product design from both a \"push\" and \"pull\" customer demand focus. Individual and small team mentoring, in-class presentations, crowd-assisted development, and hardware prototyping and testing where possible will aid in refining the key innovations. This course presumes the enrolled students either: (i) have an existing application space in which they are developing a technological solution, or (ii) have enough training (i.e., B.S. degree) in a core engineering discipline to formulate a technical solution to an as-yet unidentified engineering contradiction (per the TRIZ paradigm).", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2675, "title": "Orthopaedic Tissue Mechanics", "code": "MAE 5640", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Application of mechanics and materials principles to orthopaedic tissues. Physiology of bone, cartilage, ligament, and tendon and the relationship of these properties to their mechanical function. Mechanical behavior of skeletal tissues. Functional adaptation of these tissues to their mechanical environment. Tissue engineering of replacement structures.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2676, "title": "Polymer Mechanics", "code": "MAE 5670", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course will provide foundations of polymer mechanics building from the basics of mechanics of materials. The focus will be split between experimental methods/data interpretation and modeling approaches. Topics will include: hyper-elasticity, viscoelasticity, glass transition temperature, and plasticity with applications to both synthetic and biological materials. There will also be a scientific literature reading component through which students will be able to pick their own focus areas in the latter part of the semester.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2677, "title": "Engineering Vibrations", "code": "MAE 5770", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Free and forced response of vibrating mechanical systems modeled as having one, two and several degrees of freedom, as well as models of continuous structures such as beams. Eigenanalysis. Vibration design: isolators, absorbers.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2678, "title": "Nonlinear Dynamics and Chaos", "code": "MAE 5790", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to nonlinear dynamics, with applications to physics, engineering, biology, and chemistry. Emphasizes analytical methods, concrete examples, and geometric thinking. Topics include one-dimensional systems; bifurcations; phase plane; nonlinear oscillators; and Lorenz equations, chaos, strange attractors, fractals, iterated mappings, period doubling, renormalization.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2679, "title": "Automotive Engineering", "code": "MAE 5860", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Selected topics in the analysis and design of vehicle components and vehicle systems. Emphasis on automobiles. Engines, transmissions, suspension, brakes, and aerodynamics are discussed. The course uses first principles and applies them to specific systems. The course is highly quantitative, using empirical and analytical approaches.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2680, "title": "Systems Analysis Behavior and Optimization", "code": "MAE 5920", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This is an advanced course in the application of analytical methodologies and tools to the analysis and optimization of complex systems. On completion of this course, students should be able to use probability and statistics as a modeling and analysis tool for systems exhibiting uncertainty; be able to use algorithms and dynamic programming to model and optimize systems with a recursive structure; be able to use optimization tools to optimize complex systems and tune parameters.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2681, "title": "Professional Development for Master of Engineering in MAE", "code": "MAE 5940", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Covers tools needed to build skills for career development and the job search. Also covers a process to organize, complete and present the Master of Engineering Project.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2682, "title": "Enterprise Engineering Colloquium", "code": "MAE 5949", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Weekly meeting for master of engineering students. Discussion with industry speakers and faculty members on the uses of engineering in the economic design, manufacturing, marketing, and distribution and goods and services.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2683, "title": "Theory and Practice of Systems Architecture", "code": "MAE 5950", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Every system has an architecture (its essence, or DNA), i.e., a high-level abstraction of its design that provides a unifying concept for detailed design and commits most of the system's performance and lifecycle cost. This course presents the frameworks, methods, and tools required to analyze and synthesize system architectures. The course has a theory part that emphasizes synergies between humans and computers in the architecture process, and a practical part based on a long project and guest lectures by real system architects. The theory part covers topics such as architecture views, layers and projections, stakeholder networks, dealing with fuzziness, automatic concept generation, architecture space exploration, patterns and styles, heuristics, and knowledge engineering. The practice part focuses on special topics such as commonality, platforming, reuse, upstream and downstream influences, and software architecture.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2684, "title": "Tribology and Surface Engineering", "code": "MAE 6040", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This two-part course is aimed at giving students a knowledgebase to (i) fundamentally understand contact, friction, and wear mechanisms and (ii) design surface engineering processes for a desired tribological performance. The first part of the course covers fundamental science relevant to surfaces. Mechanics of contact at different length-scales, the origin of the frictional force, the use of lubrication to reduce friction, and different wear mechanisms, from adhesive to abrasive and erosive, will be discussed in the first part. The second part of the course will cover an overview of different surface modification processes and coating technologies with an emphasis on the physics of the process.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2685, "title": "Multiscale Computational Mechanics", "code": "MAE 6260", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "This course will provide the foundations for applied multiscale computational mechanics through a hands-on approach. The focus will be primarily on particle-based methods that emphasize practical usages of open-source software in a Linux environment, such as Python, ORCA, Quantum Espresso, LAMMPS, and NAMD. Topics will include introductory levels of python programming, quantum mechanics, density functional theory, statistical mechanics, molecular dynamics, and multiscale coupling methods with broad applications in characterizing the structural, mechanical, and thermal properties for both organic and inorganic materials.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2686, "title": "Turbulence and Turbulent Flows", "code": "MAE 6310", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Topics include the nature of turbulence and its physical manifestations, statistical description and scales of turbulent motion, turbulent free shear flows and wall bounded flows, Reynolds-averaged Navier-Stokes equations and closure models, introduction to large-eddy simulation, and mixing and reaction in turbulent flows.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2687, "title": "Computational Combustion", "code": "MAE 6430", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Examines laminar and turbulent flames and fundamental chemical and transport processes involved. Emphasis is on using computational tools\u00a0to calculate flame properties, which are compared to experimental data. Topics include thermodynamic equilibrium, chemical kinetics, reactor studies, conservation equations, transport properties, laminar premixed and non-premixed flames,\u00a0turbulence modeling, and common approaches to turbulent combustion modeling.\u00a0A knowledge of combustion at the level of MAE 5430, Combustion Processes, is useful but not required.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2688, "title": "Advanced Heat Transfer", "code": "MAE 6510", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "An advanced treatment of conduction and convection from a theoretical perspective. Topics include: conservation of linear momentum in integral and differential forms; steady state and transient conduction; boundary layer flows with emphasis on laminar conditions; scale analysis; forced convection; internal and external flows. Taught at the level of \"Conduction Heat Transfer\", by Arpaci and \"Convective Heat and Mass Transfer\", by Kays and Crawford.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2689, "title": "Space Exploration Engineering", "code": "MAE 6530", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "A graduate-level survey course on the engineering problems associated with the remote and in-situ exploration of space, with a particular focus on current and near-future practices and tools. Topics covered include science-driven robotic and human exploration of the solar system, astrophysical observatories, and exoplanet detection and characterization.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2690, "title": "Mechanics of Bone", "code": "MAE 6640", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Covers current methods and results in skeletal research, focusing on bone. Topics include skeletal anatomy and physiology, experimental and analytical methods for determination of skeletal behavior, mechanical behavior of bone tissue, and skeletal functional adaptation to mechanics.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2691, "title": "Soft Tissue Biomechanics II: Viscoelasticity and Phasic Theory", "code": "MAE 6670", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Application of mechanics and materials principles to orthopaedic soft tissues. Mechanical properties of cartilage, tendon, and ligaments; applied viscoelasticity theory for cartilage, tendon, and ligament; cartilage, tendon, and ligament biology; tendon and ligament wound healing; osteoarthritis.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2692, "title": "Advanced Dynamics", "code": "MAE 6700", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Advanced dynamics of particles and rigid objects with emphasis on 3D systems. Topics include: Rotations with Diads and matrices, angular velocity, Euler equations, top, rolling disk,\u00a0Hamilton's principle and Lagrange equations; stability theory; and approaches to multi-object systems. Examples will come from celestial mechanics, machines, robotics, and vehicle dynamics.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2693, "title": "Human-Robot Interaction: Algorithms and Experiments", "code": "MAE 6710", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "As robots move from factory floors and battlefields into homes, offices, schools, and hospitals, how can we build robotic systems made for human interaction?\u00a0 Course will cover core engineering, computational, and experimental techniques in human-robot interaction (HRI). Lectures will cover key algorithms in Probabilistic Robotics, including Bayesian Networks, Markov Models, HMMs, Kalman and Particle Filters, MDP and POMPD, Supervised Learning, and Reinforcement Learning. Seminal and recent papers in HRI will be discussed, including topics such as: generating intentional action, reasoning about humans, social navigation, teamwork and collaboration, machine learning with humans in the loop, and human-robot dialog. Students will learn methods for designing and analyzing HRI experiments.\u00a0 Presentation of papers in class, and an HRI-related research project in teams will be required.\u00a0 Intended for M.Eng to PhD students from multiple disciplines including MAE, CS, ECE and IS.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2694, "title": "Multivariable Control Theory", "code": "MAE 6780", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Introduction to multivariable feedback control theory in both time and frequency domain. Topics include model-based control, performance limitations, Linear Quadratic and H-infinity optimal control, control synthesis vis convex optimization, and model predictive control. Additional topics at the discretion of the instructor.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2695, "title": "Special Investigations in Mechanical and Aerospace Engineering", "code": "MAE 6900", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Project-based course in the area of mechanical or aerospace engineering under the guidance of a faculty member.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2696, "title": "M.Eng. Independent Study", "code": "MAE 6910", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Independent study at the MEng course level.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2697, "title": "Graduate Research Internship for International Students", "code": "MAE 6998", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2698, "title": "Introductory Nonlinear Finite Element Analysis for Solids", "code": "MAE 7750", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "The focus of this course is the development of the fundamentals of nonlinear finite element analysis for continuum solids, spanning topics from finite element formulations, functional analysis, numerical solution techniques to aspects of practical implementation. Most natural phenomena are nonlinear, so the main aim of this course is the development of an adequate framework to model nonlinear phenomena in solids and obtain approximate solutions. We will focus on several problems for solid mechanics, including material nonlinearities, geometric nonlinearities, contact mechanics, and multiphysics problems. All assignments will include coding.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2699, "title": "Applied Dynamical Systems", "code": "MAE 7760", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Topics include review of planar (single-degree-of-freedom) systems; local and global analysis; structural stability and bifurcations in planar systems; center manifolds and normal forms; the averaging theorem and perturbation methods; Melnikov's method; discrete dynamical systems, maps and difference equations, homoclinic and heteroclinic motions, the Smale Horseshoe and other complex invariant sets; global bifurcations, strange attractors, and chaos in free and forced oscillator equations; and applications to problems in solid and fluid mechanics.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2700, "title": "Mechanical and Aerospace Engineering Colloquium", "code": "MAE 7999", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Lectures by visiting scientists and Cornell faculty and staff members on research topics of current interest in mechanical and aerospace science, especially in connection with new research.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2701, "title": "Research in Mechanical and Aerospace Engineering", "code": "MAE 8900", "subject": "MAE", "descr": "Independent research in an area of mechanical and aerospace engineering under the guidance of a member of the faculty.", "tags": "MAE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2702, "title": "Academic Support for MATH 1106", "code": "MATH 1006", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Reviews material presented in MATH 1106\u00a0lectures, provides problem-solving techniques and tips as well as prelim review. Provides further instruction for students who need reinforcement. Not a substitute for attending MATH 1106\u00a0lectures or discussions.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2703, "title": "Academic Support for MATH 1110", "code": "MATH 1011", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Reviews material presented in MATH 1110\u00a0lectures, provides problem-solving techniques and tips as well as prelim review. Provides further instruction for students who need reinforcement. Not a substitute for attending MATH 1110\u00a0lectures.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2704, "title": "Academic Support for MATH 1120", "code": "MATH 1012", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Reviews material presented in MATH 1120\u00a0lectures, provides problem-solving techniques and tips as well as prelim review. Provides further instruction for students who need reinforcement. Not a substitute for attending MATH 1120\u00a0lectures or discussions.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2705, "title": "Academic Support for MATH 2210", "code": "MATH 1021", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Reviews material presented in MATH 2210 lectures, provides problem-solving techniques and tips as well as prelim review. Provides further instruction for students who need reinforcement. Not a substitute for attending MATH 2210 lectures or discussions.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2706, "title": "Modeling with Calculus for the Life Sciences", "code": "MATH 1106", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "The goal of this course is to give students a strong basis in some quantitative skills needed in the life and social sciences. There will be an emphasis on modeling, using fundamental concepts from calculus developed in the course, including: derivatives, integrals, and introductory differential equations. Examples from the life sciences are used throughout the course. To give a concrete example, we will study predator-prey populations. We will write down mathematical models that describe the evolution of these populations, analyze both quantitative and qualitative properties to make predictions about the future of these populations, and discuss the assumptions and limitations of the models. Note that while we will cover the topics of derivatives and integrals, this course has a different, much more applied, focus from courses such as\u00a0 MATH 1110 - Calculus I\u00a0or a typical high school calculus course.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2707, "title": "Calculus I", "code": "MATH 1110", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics include functions and graphs, limits and continuity, differentiation and integration of algebraic, trigonometric, inverse trig, logarithmic, and exponential functions; applications of differentiation, including graphing, max-min problems, tangent line approximation, implicit differentiation, and applications to the sciences; the mean value theorem; and antiderivatives, definite and indefinite integrals, the fundamental theorem of calculus, substitution in integration, the area under a curve. Graphing calculators are used, and their pitfalls are discussed, as applicable to the above topics.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2708, "title": "Calculus II", "code": "MATH 1120", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Focuses on integration: applications, including volumes and arc length; techniques of integration, approximate integration with error estimates, improper integrals, differential equations (separation of variables, initial conditions, systems, some applications). Also covers infinite sequences and series: definition and tests for convergence, power series, Taylor series with remainder, and parametric equations.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2709, "title": "Mathematical Explorations", "code": "MATH 1300", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "For students who wish to experience how mathematical ideas naturally evolve. The course emphasizes ideas and imagination rather than techniques and calculations. Homework involves students in actively investigating mathematical ideas. Topics vary depending on the instructor. Some assessment through writing assignments.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2710, "title": "Strategy, Cooperation, and Conflict", "code": "MATH 1340", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "We apply mathematical reasoning to problems arising in the social sciences. We discuss game theory and its applications to questions of governing and the analysis of political conflicts. The problem of finding fair election procedures to choose among three or more alternatives is analyzed.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2711, "title": "Statistical Theory and Application in the Real World", "code": "MATH 1710", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introductory statistics course discussing techniques for analyzing data occurring in the real world and the mathematical and philosophical justification for these techniques. Topics include population and sample distributions, central limit theorem, statistical theories of point estimation, confidence intervals, testing hypotheses, the linear model, and the least squares estimator. The course concludes with a discussion of tests and estimates for regression and analysis of variance (if time permits). The computer is used to demonstrate some aspects of the theory, such as sampling distributions and the Central Limit Theorem. In the lab portion of the course, students learn and use computer-based methods for implementing the statistical methodology presented in the lectures.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2712, "title": "Calculus for Engineers", "code": "MATH 1910", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Essentially a second course in calculus. Topics include techniques of integration, finding areas and volumes by integration, exponential growth, partial fractions, infinite sequences and series, tests of convergence, and power series.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2713, "title": "Multivariable Calculus for Engineers", "code": "MATH 1920", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to multivariable calculus. Topics include partial derivatives, double and triple integrals, line and surface integrals, vector fields, Green's theorem, Stokes' theorem, and the divergence theorem.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2714, "title": "Calculus III", "code": "MATH 2130", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics include vectors and vector-valued functions; multivariable and\u00a0vector calculus including multiple and line integrals\u00a0in different coordinate systems; and first- and\u00a0second-order differential equations with applications. Optional topics may include Green's theorem, the divergence theorem, and systems of differential equations.\u200b", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2715, "title": "Linear Algebra", "code": "MATH 2210", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics include vector algebra, linear transformations, matrices, determinants, orthogonality, eigenvalues, and eigenvectors. Applications are made to linear differential or difference equations. The lectures introduce students to formal proofs. Students are required to produce some proofs in their homework and on exams.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2716, "title": "Multivariable Calculus", "code": "MATH 2220", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Differential and integral calculus of functions in several variables, line and surface integrals as well as the theorems of Green, Stokes, and Gauss.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2717, "title": "Theoretical Linear Algebra and Calculus", "code": "MATH 2240", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics include vector fields; line integrals; differential forms and exterior derivative; work, flux, and density forms; integration of forms over parametrized domains; and Green's, Stokes', and divergence theorems.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2718, "title": "Deductive Logic", "code": "MATH 2810", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "A mathematical study of the formal languages of standard first-order propositional and predicate logic, including their syntax, semantics, and deductive systems. The basic apparatus of model theory will be presented. Various formal results will be established, most importantly soundness and completeness.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2719, "title": "Differential Equations for Engineers", "code": "MATH 2930", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to ordinary and partial differential equations. Topics include: first-order equations (separable, linear, homogeneous, exact); mathematical modeling (e.g., population growth, terminal velocity); qualitative methods (slope fields, phase plots, equilibria, and stability); numerical methods; second-order equations (method of undetermined coefficients, application to oscillations and resonance, boundary-value problems and eigenvalues); and Fourier series. A substantial part of this course involves partial differential equations, such as the heat equation, the wave equation, and Laplace's equation. (This part must be present in any outside course being considered for transfer credit to Cornell as a substitute for MATH 2930.)", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2720, "title": "Linear Algebra for Engineers", "code": "MATH 2940", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Linear algebra and its applications. Topics include matrices, determinants, vector spaces, eigenvalues and eigenvectors, orthogonality and inner product spaces; applications include brief introductions to difference equations, Markov chains, and systems of linear ordinary differential equations. May include computer use in solving problems.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2721, "title": "Prove It!", "code": "MATH 3040", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "In mathematics, the methodology of proof provides a central tool for confirming the validity of mathematical assertions, functioning much as the experimental method does in the physical sciences. In this course, students learn various methods of mathematical proof, starting with basic techniques in propositional and predicate calculus and in set theory and combinatorics, and then moving to applications and illustrations of these via topics in one or more of the three main pillars of mathematics: algebra, analysis, and geometry. Since cogent communication of mathematical ideas is important in the presentation of proofs, the course emphasizes clear, concise exposition.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2722, "title": "Introduction to Analysis", "code": "MATH 3110", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Provides a transition from calculus to real analysis. Topics include rigorous treatment of fundamental concepts in calculus: including limits and convergence of sequences and series, compact sets; continuity, uniform continuity and differentiability of functions. Emphasis is placed upon understanding and constructing mathematical proofs.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2723, "title": "Abstract Algebra", "code": "MATH 3340", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "An introduction to structures of abstract algebra, including groups, rings, fields, factorization of polynomials and integers, congruences, and the structure of finite abelian groups. Additional topics include modules over Euclidean domain and Sylow theorems.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2724, "title": "Applicable Algebra", "code": "MATH 3360", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to the concepts and methods of abstract algebra and number theory that are of interest in applications. Covers the basic theory of groups, rings and fields and their applications to such areas as public-key cryptography, error-correcting codes, parallel computing, and experimental designs. Applications include the RSA cryptosystem and use of finite fields to construct error-correcting codes and Latin squares. Topics include elementary number theory, Euclidean algorithm, prime factorization, congruences, theorems of Fermat and Euler, elementary group theory, Chinese remainder theorem, factorization in the ring of polynomials, and classification of finite fields.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2725, "title": "Dynamic Models in Biology", "code": "MATH 3620", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introductory survey of the development, computer implementation, and applications of dynamic models in biology and ecology. Case-study format covering a broad range of current application areas such as regulatory networks, neurobiology, cardiology, infectious disease management, and conservation of endangered species. Students also learn how to construct and study biological systems models on the computer using a scripting and graphics environment.", "tags": "MQR-AS|BIO-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2726, "title": "Honors Introduction to Analysis I", "code": "MATH 4130", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to the rigorous theory underlying calculus, covering the real number system and functions of one variable. Based entirely on proofs. The student is expected to know how to read and, to some extent, construct proofs before taking this course. Topics typically include construction of the real number system, properties of the real number system, continuous functions, differential and integral calculus of functions of one variable, sequences and series of functions.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2727, "title": "Honors Introduction to Analysis II", "code": "MATH 4140", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Proof-based introduction to further topics in analysis. Topics may include the Lebesgue measure and integration, functions of several variables, differential calculus, implicit function theorem, infinite dimensional normed and metric spaces, Fourier series, ordinary differential equations.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2728, "title": "Complex Analysis", "code": "MATH 4180", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Theoretical and rigorous introduction to complex variable theory. Topics include complex numbers, differential and integral calculus for functions of a complex variable including Cauchy's theorem and the calculus of residues, elements of conformal mapping.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2729, "title": "Nonlinear Dynamics and Chaos", "code": "MATH 4210", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to nonlinear dynamics, with applications to physics, engineering, biology, and chemistry. Emphasizes analytical methods, concrete examples, and geometric thinking. Topics include one-dimensional systems; bifurcations; phase plane; nonlinear oscillators; and Lorenz equations, chaos, strange attractors, fractals, iterated mappings, period doubling, renormalization.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2730, "title": "Numerical Analysis: Linear and Nonlinear Problems", "code": "MATH 4260", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to the fundamentals of numerical linear algebra: direct and iterative methods for linear systems, eigenvalue problems, singular value decomposition. In the second half of the course, the above are used to build iterative methods for nonlinear systems and for multivariate optimization. Strong emphasis is placed on understanding the advantages, disadvantages, and limits of applicability for all the covered techniques. Computer programming is required to test the theoretical concepts throughout the course.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2731, "title": "Introduction to Partial Differential Equations", "code": "MATH 4280", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics are selected from first-order quasilinear equations, classification of second-order equations, with emphasis on maximum principles, existence, uniqueness, stability, Fourier series methods, approximation methods.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2732, "title": "Linear Algebra", "code": "MATH 4310", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to linear algebra, including the study of vector spaces, linear transformations, matrices, and systems of linear equations. Additional topics are quadratic forms and inner product spaces, canonical forms for various classes of matrices and linear transformations.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2733, "title": "Honors Introduction to Algebra", "code": "MATH 4340", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Honors version of a course in abstract algebra, which treats the subject from an abstract and axiomatic viewpoint, including universal mapping properties. Topics include groups, groups acting on sets, Sylow theorems; rings, factorization: Euclidean rings, principal ideal domains and unique factorization domains, the structure of finitely generated modules over a principal ideal domain, fields, and Galois theory. The course emphasizes understanding the theory with proofs in both homework and exams.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2734, "title": "Matrix Groups", "code": "MATH 4500", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "An introduction to a topic that is central to mathematics and important in physics and engineering. The objects of study are certain classes of matrices, such as orthogonal, unitary, or symplectic matrices. These classes have both algebraic structure (groups) and geometric/topological structure (manifolds). Thus the course will be a mixture of algebra and geometry/topology, with a little analysis as well. The topics will include Lie algebras (which are an extension of the notion of vector multiplication in three-dimensional space), the exponential mapping (a generalization of the exponential function of calculus), and representation theory (which studies the different ways in which groups can be represented by matrices). Concrete examples will be emphasized. Background not included in the prerequisites will be developed as needed.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2735, "title": "Introduction to Differential Geometry", "code": "MATH 4540", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Differential geometry involves using calculus to study geometric concepts such as curvature and geodesics. This introductory course focuses on the differential geometry of curves and surfaces. It may also touch upon the higher-dimensional generalizations, Riemannian manifolds, which underlie the study of general relativity.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2736, "title": "Applicable Geometry", "code": "MATH 4550", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to the theory of n-dimensional convex polytopes and polyhedra and some of its applications, with an in-depth treatment of the case of three dimensions. Discusses both combinatorial properties (such as face counts) as well as metric properties (such as rigidity). Covers theorems of Euler, Cauchy, and Steinitz, Voronoi diagrams and triangulations, convex hulls, cyclic polytopes, shellability and the upper-bound theorem. Relates these ideas to applications in tiling, linear inequalities and linear programming, structural rigidity, computational geometry, hyperplane arrangements, and zonotopes.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2737, "title": "Basic Probability", "code": "MATH 4710", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Introduction to probability theory, which prepares the student to take MATH 4720. The course begins with basics: combinatorial probability, mean and variance, independence, conditional probability, and Bayes formula. Density and distribution functions and their properties are introduced. The law of large numbers and the central limit theorem are stated and their implications for statistics are discussed.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2738, "title": "Statistics", "code": "MATH 4720", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Statistics have proved to be an important research tool in nearly all of the physical, biological, and social sciences. This course serves as an introduction to statistics for students who already have some background in calculus, linear algebra, and probability theory. Topics include parameter estimation, hypothesis testing, and linear regression. The course emphasizes both the mathematical theory of statistics and techniques for data analysis that are useful in solving scientific problems.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2739, "title": "Stochastic Processes", "code": "MATH 4740", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "A one-semester introduction to stochastic processes which develops the theory together with applications. The course will always cover Markov chains in discrete and continuous time and Poisson processes. Depending upon the interests of the instructor and the students, other topics may include queuing theory, martingales, Brownian motion, and option pricing.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2740, "title": "Set Theory", "code": "MATH 4870", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "This course is a sequel to PHIL 3300\u00a0/ MATH 3840\u00a0but is also open to students who have not had the latter. After a brief review of the central ideas from the latter course, it will cover the construction of the real numbers, cardinality, the ordinal numbers, the cardinal numbers, the axiom of choice, and time permitting, another topic or two.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2741, "title": "Supervised Research", "code": "MATH 4900", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "An independent research course by arrangement with an individual professor.\u00a0 The goal is for the student to perform an independent investigation into a specific mathematical question.\u00a0 The student and professor will set expectations and grading policies at the beginning of the term.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2742, "title": "Supervised Reading", "code": "MATH 4901", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "An independent reading course by arrangement with an individual professor. The goal is for the student to master a body of mathematics outside the normal curriculum. The student and professor will set expectations and grading policies at the beginning of the term.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2743, "title": "Special Study for Teachers", "code": "MATH 5080", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Examines principles underlying the content of the secondary school mathematics curriculum, including connections with the history of mathematics, technology, and mathematics education research. One credit is awarded for attending three of the four Saturday workshops per year. Other credit options are available by permission of instructor for students completing additional work (e.g., independent study projects or presentations).", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2744, "title": "Complex Analysis", "code": "MATH 6120", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "This course covers complex analysis, Fourier analysis, and distribution theory.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2745, "title": "Applied Functional Analysis", "code": "MATH 6220", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Covers basic theory of Hilbert and Banach spaces and operations on them. Applications.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2746, "title": "Applied Dynamical Systems", "code": "MATH 6270", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics include review of planar (single-degree-of-freedom) systems; local and global analysis; structural stability and bifurcations in planar systems; center manifolds and normal forms; the averaging theorem and perturbation methods; Melnikov's method; discrete dynamical systems, maps and difference equations, homoclinic and heteroclinic motions, the Smale Horseshoe and other complex invariant sets; global bifurcations, strange attractors, and chaos in free and forced oscillator equations; and applications to problems in solid and fluid mechanics.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2747, "title": "Algebra", "code": "MATH 6320", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "MATH 6310-6320 are the core algebra courses in the mathematics graduate program. MATH 6320 covers Galois theory, representation theory of finite groups, and introduction to homological algebra.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2748, "title": "Algebraic Number Theory", "code": "MATH 6370", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "An introduction to number theory focusing on the algebraic theory. Topics include, but are not limited to, number fields, Dedekind domains, class groups, Dirichlet's unit theorem, local fields, ramification, decomposition and inertia groups, and the distribution of primes.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2749, "title": "Lie Groups and Lie Algebras", "code": "MATH 6390", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Covers the basics of Lie groups and Lie algebras. Topics include real and complex Lie groups, relations between Lie groups and Lie algebras, exponential map, homogeneous manifolds and the classification of simple Lie algebras.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2750, "title": "Algebraic Topology", "code": "MATH 6510", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "MATH 6510-MATH 6520\u00a0are the core topology courses in the mathematics graduate program. MATH 6510 is an introductory study of certain geometric processes for associating algebraic objects such as groups to topological spaces. The most important of these are homology groups and homotopy groups, especially the first homotopy group or fundamental group, with the related notions of covering spaces and group actions. The development of homology theory focuses on verification of the Eilenberg-Steenrod axioms and on effective methods of calculation such as simplicial and cellular homology and Mayer-Vietoris sequences. If time permits, the cohomology ring of a space may be introduced.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2751, "title": "Riemannian Geometry", "code": "MATH 6620", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics include linear connections, Riemannian metrics and parallel translation; covariant differentiation and curvature tensors; the exponential map, the Gauss Lemma and completeness of the metric; isometries and space forms, Jacobi fields and the theorem of Cartan-Hadamard; the first and second variation formulas; the index form of Morse and the theorem of Bonnet-Myers; the Rauch, Hessian, and Laplacian comparison theorems; the Morse index theorem; the conjugate and cut loci; and submanifolds and the Second Fundamental form.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2752, "title": "Probability Theory II", "code": "MATH 6720", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Conditional expectation, martingales, Brownian motion. Other topics such as Markov chains, ergodic theory, and stochastic calculus depending on time and interests of the instructor.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2753, "title": "Mathematical Statistics I", "code": "MATH 6730", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "This course will focus on the finite sample theory of statistical inference, emphasizing estimation, hypothesis testing, and confidence intervals.\u00a0 Specific topics include: uniformly minimum variance unbiased estimators, minimum risk equivariant estimators, Bayes estimators, minimax estimators, the Neyman-Pearson theory of hypothesis testing, and the construction of optimal invariant tests.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2754, "title": "Logic", "code": "MATH 6810", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Covers basic topics in mathematical logic, including propositional and predicate calculus; formal number theory and recursive functions; completeness and incompleteness theorems, compactness and Skolem-Loewenheim theorems. Other topics as time permits.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2755, "title": "Topics in Analysis", "code": "MATH 7120", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Selection of advanced topics from analysis. Course content varies.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2756, "title": "Topics in Dynamical Systems", "code": "MATH 7280", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Selection of advanced topics from\u00a0dynamical systems. Content varies.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2757, "title": "Seminar on Scientific Computing and Numerics", "code": "MATH 7290", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Talks on various methods in scientific computing, the analysis of their convergence properties and computational efficiency, and their adaptation to specific applications.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2758, "title": "Topics in Homological Algebra", "code": "MATH 7350", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Selection of advanced topics from homological algebra. Course content varies.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2759, "title": "Topics in Lie Groups and Lie Algebras", "code": "MATH 7390", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Topics will vary depending on the instructor and the level of the audience. They range from representation theory of Lie algebras and of real and p-adic Lie groups, geometric representation theory, quantum groups and their representations, invariant theory to applications of Lie theory to other parts of mathematics.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2760, "title": "Topics in Combinatorics", "code": "MATH 7410", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Selection of advanced topics in combinatorics. Course content varies.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2761, "title": "Berstein Seminar in Topology", "code": "MATH 7520", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "A seminar on an advanced topic in topology or a related subject. Content varies. The format is usually that the participants take turns to present.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2762, "title": "Topology and Geometric Group Theory Seminar", "code": "MATH 7560", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "A weekly seminar in which visiting or local speakers present results in topology, geometric group theory, or related subjects.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2763, "title": "Topics in Topology", "code": "MATH 7580", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Selection of advanced topics from modern algebraic, differential, and geometric topology. Content varies.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2764, "title": "Topics in Stochastic Processes", "code": "MATH 7720", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Selection of advanced topics from stochastic processes. Content varies.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2765, "title": "Seminar in Logic", "code": "MATH 7820", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "A twice weekly seminar in logic. Typically, a topic is selected for each semester, and at least half of the meetings of the course are devoted to this topic with presentations primarily by students. Opportunities are also provided for students and others to present their own work and other topics of interest.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2766, "title": "Supervised Reading and Research", "code": "MATH 7900", "subject": "MATH", "descr": "Supervised research for the doctoral dissertation.", "tags": "MATH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2767, "title": "FWS: Aspects of Medieval Culture", "code": "MEDVL 1101", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2768, "title": "FWS: Legends, Fantasy & Vision", "code": "MEDVL 1103", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2769, "title": "Medieval Romance: Voyages to the Otherworld", "code": "MEDVL 2100", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Romances were, essentially, medieval science fiction and fantasy writing. They were how authors in the Middle Ages imagined things beyond rational understanding that, at the same time, greatly extended the possibilities of the world around them.\u00a0 The course will survey some medieval narratives concerned with representative voyages to the otherworld or with the impinging of the otherworld upon ordinary experience. The syllabus will normally include some representative Old Irish otherworld literature:\u00a0 selections from\u00a0The Mabinogion; selections from the\u00a0Lays\u00a0of Marie de France; Chretian de Troye's\u00a0Erec,\u00a0Yvain, and\u00a0Lancelot; and the Middle English\u00a0Sir Gawain and the Green Knight.\u00a0 We will finish by looking at a few contemporary otherworld romances, such as selections from J.R.R. Tolkein. All readings will be in modern English. This class counts toward the pre-1800 requirement for English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2770, "title": "Popular Medievalisms", "code": "MEDVL 2150", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Why is popular culture so obsessed with the Middle Ages? Why are new fantasy worlds so often \"medievalesque\"? Why are we compelled to imitate, reinvent, and even relive aspects of the medieval past? What do these continuities and repetitions reveal about contemporary narratives of progress and identity formation (race, gender)? Examples of\u00a0popular medieval forms we will examine\u00a0include: premodern fandom (relics, saints' lives, heroic culture); fantasy series and movies (Game of Thrones;\u00a0Harry Potter); \"histories\" of medieval epochs (e.g.\u00a0The Saxon Stories; The Vikings); Tolkien and C.S. Lewis; gaming culture (Dungeons and Dragons\u00a0to\u00a0Assassin's Creed); medieval-inspired satire (Monty Python,\u00a0The Knight's Tale); Arthuriana; and children's films (Shrek, Frozen). Assignments will include medieval texts and translations as well as theoretical, analytical, and creative writing. This course may be used as one of the three pre-1800 courses required of English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2771, "title": "Early Modern Iberian Survey", "code": "MEDVL 2170", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "This course explores major texts and themes of the Hispanic tradition from the 11th to the 17th centuries. We will examine general questions on literary analysis and the relationship between literature and history around certain events, such as medieval multicultural Iberia, the creation of the Spanish Inquisition in the 15th century and the expulsion of the Jews in 1492; the encounter between the Old and the New Worlds; the 'opposition' of high and low in popular culture, and of the secular and the sacred in poetry and prose. Readings may be drawn from medieval short stories and miracle collections; chivalric romances, Columbus, Lazarillo de Tormes, Cervantes, Lope de Vega, Calder\u00f3n, and Sor Juana In\u00e9s de la Cruz, among others.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2772, "title": "Introduction to Medieval Art and Culture", "code": "MEDVL 2355", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Survey lecture course covering the creation, encoding, and reception of Medieval (roughly AD 500-1500) European, Byzantine, and Islamic architecture, ornament, manuscripts, liturgical and luxury objects.\u00a0 The approach is thematic but chronologically grounded; attention is also given to cultural interaction in the Mediterranean basin.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2773, "title": "The Crusades", "code": "MEDVL 2590", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "This course focuses on the ideas and practices of Crusading, from its birth ca. 1100 to the fall of the Kingdom of Jerusalem in 1292. We explore the roots of Crusading in Christian Europe and in the Islamic Near East; the conquest, settlement, and loss of the Latin Levant; and the impacts and afterlives of Crusading. Central themes include the institutional, intellectual, and political histories of Christianity (Latin, Byzantine, and other) and Islam; military, social, and economic narratives of the period; and social, cultural, and environmental analysis, using both material and textual sources.", "tags": "GLC-AS|HA-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2774, "title": "Introduction to Christian History", "code": "MEDVL 2695", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the history of Christianity from the first century through the seventeenth and perhaps a bit beyond. Our emphasis will be on the diversity of Christian traditions, beliefs, and practices throughout history. We will explore the origins of Christianity within the eastern Mediterranean world, the spread of Christianity, the development of ecclesiastical institutions, the rise and establishment of monasticism, and the various controversies that occupied the church throughout its history. Throughout the course, we will supplement our reading of primary texts with art, archaeology, music, and manuscripts.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2775, "title": "Beowulf", "code": "MEDVL 3120", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Beowulf is about monsters, dragons and heroes and is the longest and most interesting Old English heroic poem. In this course we will read the poem in the original and discuss the critical and scholarly problems which the poem presents. Some knowledge of Old English is appropriate, but the class is open to beginners in Old English who will be provided with tutorial help in preparing and reading assigned passages. Among the topics we will discuss are the relationship of Beowulf to \"pagan\" practice and belief, the related question of\u00a0 \"Christianity and Paganism \" in the poem, \"Beowulf and the tradition of\u00a0 Germanic heroic poetry\", \" Orality and Christian Latin learning \"and \"Beowulf, Tolkien, and the modern age\". The course will be open to student initiatives, if students wish to explore such topics as Beowulf and archeology or the historical context of the poem. The class counts toward the pre-1800 requirement for English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2776, "title": "Old Norse II", "code": "MEDVL 3316", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Old Norse is a collective term for the earliest North Germanic literary languages: Old Icelandic, Old Norwegian, Old Danish, and Old Swedish. The richly documented Old Icelandic is the center of attention, and the purpose is twofold: the students gain knowledge of an ancient North Germanic language, important from a linguistic point of view, and gain access to the medieval Icelandic (and Scandinavian) literature.\u00a0 Extensive reading of Old Norse texts, among them selections from some of the major Icelandic family sagas: Njals saga, Grettis saga, and Egils saga, as well as the whole Hrafnkels saga.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2777, "title": "Playing God: Medieval and Early Renaissance Drama", "code": "MEDVL 3720", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "After Rome's collapse, drama was gradually re-created from many sources: school-room debates, popular festivals, and, especially, religious liturgy. By the 17th century it was one of the most polished literary arts (and one of the sleaziest). This long span allows us to consider what happened in the middle. This course traces the residues of Roman drama and some \"rebeginnings\" of European drama, 10th to 13th centuries, then focuses mainly on late medieval drama in English in the 15th century, following that into the drama of the early Renaissance. We'll consider what became \"modern\"-and what was utterly unlike anything later. Discussion, lecture, regular writing, some experiments with production. English texts will be read in Middle English with lots of help; no previous knowledge required. This class counts as one of the three pre-1800 courses required of English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2778, "title": "Introduction to Dendrochronology", "code": "MEDVL 3750", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Introduction and training in dendrochronology (tree-ring dating) and its applications in archaeology, art history, climate and environment through lab work and participation in ongoing research projects using ancient to modern wood samples from around the world. Supervised reading and laboratory/project work. Possibilities exists for summer fieldwork in the Mediterranean, Mexico, and New York State.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2779, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "MEDVL 4002", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2780, "title": "Premodern Literature and Media", "code": "MEDVL 4295", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "This course introduces the canon of premodern German literature, including lyric poetry (Minnesang), Arthurian romance (Gottfried's Tristan, Wolfram's Parzival, Hartmann's Iwein), and the heroic epic (Nibelungenlied). With a focus on medieval manuscript culture, we will investigate problems of form, genre, and representation, as well as post-medieval approaches to materiality, hermeneutics, and textuality. Our larger questions, centering on the mediation of words, images, and sounds, will address the contested legacy of the premodern period in German modernity.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2781, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "MEDVL 4310", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2782, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: The Beginnings of Islam: 600-750", "code": "MEDVL 4618", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2783, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "MEDVL 6020", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2784, "title": "Beowulf", "code": "MEDVL 6120", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Beowulf is about monsters, dragons and heroes and is the longest and most interesting Old English heroic poem. In this course we will read the poem in the original and discuss the critical and scholarly problems which the poem presents. Some knowledge of Old English is appropriate, but the class is open to beginners in Old English who will be provided with tutorial help in preparing and reading assigned passages. Among the topics we will discuss are the relationship of Beowulf to \"pagan\" practice and belief, the related question of\u00a0 \"Christianity and Paganism \" in the poem, \"Beowulf and the tradition of\u00a0 Germanic heroic poetry\", \" Orality and Christian Latin learning \"and \"Beowulf, Tolkien, and the modern age\". The course will be open to student initiatives, if students wish to explore such topics as Beowulf and archeology or the historical context of the poem.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2785, "title": "Premodern Literature and Media", "code": "MEDVL 6285", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "This course introduces the canon of medieval German literature: lyric poetry (Minnesang), Arthurian romance (Gottfried's Tristan, Wolfram's Parzival, Hartmann's Iwein), and the heroic epic (Nibelungenlied). With a focus on twelfth-century courtly culture, we will investigate medieval problems of form, genre, and representation, as well as post-medieval approaches to materiality, hermeneutics, and textuality. Our larger questions, centering on the controversial concept of medieval alterity, will address the contested legacy of the Middle Ages in German modernity.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2786, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "MEDVL 6310", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2787, "title": "Playing God: Medieval and Early Renaissance Drama", "code": "MEDVL 6721", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "After Rome's collapse, drama was gradually re-created from many sources: school-room debates, popular festivals, and, especially, religious liturgy. By the 17th century it was one of the most polished literary arts (and one of the sleaziest). This long span allows us to consider what happened in the middle. This course traces the residues of Roman drama and some \"rebeginnings\" of European drama, 10th to 13th centuries, then focuses mainly on late medieval drama in English in the 15th century, following that into the drama of the early Renaissance. We'll consider what became \"modern\"-and what was utterly unlike anything later. Discussion, lecture, regular writing, some experiments with production. English texts will be read in Middle English with lots of help; no previous knowledge required.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2788, "title": "The Global Premodern: Methods and Perspectives", "code": "MEDVL 7235", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "This seminar investigates and interrogates the emergence of a\u00a0global\u00a0consciousness (a hallmark of \"the modern\")\u00a0across a range of academic disciplines. Our focus will be the historical retrojection of this call to \"go\u00a0global\" upon the\u00a0premodern, including a\u00a0global\u00a0history of ideas, a\u00a0global\u00a0history of science, a\u00a0global\u00a0medieval studies, and (of course) a\u00a0global\u00a0history of music. We will consider the various methodologies and methodological challenges (not least of which is the Eurocentrism of the very idea of the \"premodern\"), sub-disciplinary configurations (e.g., \"historical ethnomusicology\"), and liberal politics involved in the doing of\u00a0global\u00a0history within the Anglo-American academy. Topics include: historical global histories of music (Al-Farabi's\u00a0Kit\u0101b al-m\u016bs\u012bq\u012b al-kab\u012br, Fran\u00e7ois-Joseph F\u00e9tis'\u00a0Histoire g\u00e9n\u00e9rale de la musique, and Sourindro Mohun Tagore's\u00a0Universal History of Music: Compiled from Diverse Sources, Together with Various Original Notes on Hindu Music), recent historiographical debates about\u00a0longue dur\u00e9e\u00a0history vs. \"micro-history\"\u00a0(in response to\u00a0Jo Guldi and David Armitage's\u00a0The History Manifesto), networks of exchange and migration, the (perennial) problem of periodization, and a range of specific case studies (TBD by the participants of the seminar).", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2789, "title": "Directed Study - Individual", "code": "MEDVL 8010", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2790, "title": "Directed Study - Group", "code": "MEDVL 8020", "subject": "MEDVL", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MEDVL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2791, "title": "Managerial Reporting", "code": "MGMT 5020", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "This course focuses on using internal organizational data to improve decision making. In this class, we discuss cost behavior, the use of cost information for internal decision making, behavioral impacts on management planning and control, budgeting, variance analysis, and the measurement and management of innovation and customer relationships. Instruction is a mixture of lecture and case discussion. Grading is based on exams, short quizzes, and class contribution.", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2792, "title": "Operations Management", "code": "MGMT 5080", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "Operations management concerns managing different processes and activities that produce value in the form of products and services. Increased competition, expanding product variety and more demanding consumers require more efficient operations management. Effective operations management can enable companies to increase market shares, reduce costs, and improve customer service. This course is designed to introduce students to the basic concepts of operations management and the useful methods for solving real-world operations management problems.", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2793, "title": "Strategy", "code": "MGMT 5090", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "We will use economics-based theories of markets and firms to understand business strategy.\u00a0 We will cover various aspects of business strategy: What are key drivers in your industry? How do you fit in it and how to you create a sustainable competitive advantage? How can you change the industry and what your rivals do it to your advantage?", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2794, "title": "Systems and Analytics", "code": "MGMT 5225", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "An investigation of the systems and software that capture and store economic information, and of the tools and techniques that support a robust use of that data for the benefit of individual enterprises and greater society.\u00a0 Topics include \"Big Data\", Data Visualization, Optimization Tools, and Support Systems and Databases.\u00a0 Modules on emergent systems, including Blockchain and AI are also engaged.", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2795, "title": "Advanced Corporate Finance", "code": "MGMT 5260", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "This class is designed to provide you with the financial tools to (a) value potential corporate investment opportunities, and (b) understand which securities should be used to finance corporate investment (\"capital structure decision\"). These basic skills are essential for students interested in commercial banking, investment banking, mergers and acquisitions, private equity, venture\ncapital, corporate financial management, consulting and asset management. The class is divided into two sections, which correspond to the two main goals of the course. The first part of the course covers methods used to value investment projects. Particular attention will be given to calculating free cash flows, discount rates, valuing incremental investments, the effects of financing on value, the methods of weighted-average cost of capital (WACC) and adjusted present value (APV). The second part of the course will focus on understanding which securities should be used to finance investment. This section starts with an analysis of tax and bankruptcy implications of debt financing, and moves on to consider information and agency problems. We will discuss information problems associated with equity financing, the incentive effects of debt financing, and the conflicts between equity and debt stakeholders.", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2796, "title": "Entrepreneurship", "code": "MGMT 5640", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "The course provides a hand-on experience for learning the key philosophies and tactics of entrepreneurial activity and the entrepreneurial mindset. This includes the development of a viable business concept, meaningful customer discovery, the evaluation and planning of the start-up businesses, marketplace analysis, financing, and operations. The course utilizes lectures and the directed readings. The goal is a meaningful understanding of how to start a new business venture, achieved by building and communicating the framework for a viable business.", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2797, "title": "Investments", "code": "MGMT 5830", "subject": "MGMT", "descr": "A broad overview of various aspects of the Investment Industry. Topics, amongst others, will include: Overview of investment management industry, portfolio theory & practice, capital markets, fixed income, equities and security analysis, options, futures & other derivatives, and applied portfolio management. The instructor is the CEO of a Rochester-based company and Managing Partner at a local venture capital firm, and former Chief Investment Officer of the Cornell University endowment.\u00a0 As such, the course will focus on real world applications.\u00a0 Course Goal: (1) to provide you with an understanding of how modern capital markets operate from a practical, real-life perspective (2) to help you think critically about issues effecting the investment management industry, and (3) to have fun and instill a passion in some of you for future study and/or work in the investment management industry.\u00a0 Prerequisites: No specific courses required. Curiosity and a genuine interest in investment management a plus.\u00a0 A basic understanding of business statistics will be helpful but not required.\u00a0 Required Readings:\u00a0 (1) Investments (12th Edition) by Bodie Kane & Marcus;\u00a0 (2) Articles posted to Canvas;\u00a0 (3) Students will be asked to read the Wall Street Journal (daily reading is a good habit to get into), but at a minimum the day before and day of each class.", "tags": "MGMT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2798, "title": "Foundations in Leadership", "code": "MILS 1102", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Allows students to develop a basic understanding and appreciation of theories of social and organizational psychology and behavior as they apply to the military setting. Attention is given to leader types, the source and exercise of authority, and the impact of varying styles of leadership, resource management, motivation, and organizational effectiveness. The student is instructed in the concepts of integrity, ethics, and professionalism. Classes on historical events and strategy are also presented.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2799, "title": "Leadership Laboratory I", "code": "MILS 1111", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "MILS I cadets meet for two hours each week to learn a variety of military skills including rappelling, first aid, drill and ceremonies, weapons familiarization, physical fitness training, and small group leadership.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2800, "title": "Small Organizational Operation", "code": "MILS 2202", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Course focuses on team development and decision making.\u00a0 \u00a0Covers analytical techniques, creative thinking skills and problem solving process as related to situations faced by leaders when making decisions.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2801, "title": "Leadership Laboratory II", "code": "MILS 2211", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Cadets meet for two hours each week as members of the cadet organization to participate in practical leadership exercises. Types of practical activities include rifle marksmanship, orienteering, drill and ceremonies, signal communications, physical fitness training, first aid, tactics, field exercises, and small group leadership.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2802, "title": "Leadership and Ethics", "code": "MILS 3302", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Takes on the nature of decision making and the tactical application of the military team. Through the use of conferences and extensive practical exercises, students develop familiarity with the factors influencing a leader's decisions and the process of planning, coordinating, and directing the operations of military units through operation plans and orders.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2803, "title": "Leadership Laboratory III", "code": "MILS 3311", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Cadets meet for two hours a week and occasional weekends to prepare for a five-week summer camp that follows their junior year. Emphasis is placed on the development of individual practical and leadership skills. Cadets rotate through leadership positions to practice applying decision-making skills in a myriad of situations.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2804, "title": "Special Problems for Advanced Undergraduates", "code": "MILS 4400", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Individual investigation, research, studies, or surveys of selected problems. Total credit limited to 4 units, with a maximum of 2 units per quarter.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2805, "title": "Officership", "code": "MILS 4402", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "A continuation of MILS 4401. Conferences and seminars examine the techniques of effective military leadership, with special attention given to professionalism and ethical considerations in the armed forces during both peacetime and conflict. Army operations and basic doctrine are also discussed. This is a capstone course designed to prepare the student for commissioning.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2806, "title": "Leadership Laboratory IV", "code": "MILS 4411", "subject": "MILS", "descr": "Senior cadets plan and operate the leadership laboratory programs for MILS I-III cadets. The development of planning and supervisory skills is emphasized. Cadets have an opportunity to practice leadership skills developed during previous ROTC training and summer camp experiences. Includes two to three hours a week devoted to physical fitness.", "tags": "MILS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2807, "title": "Atomic and Molecular Structure of Matter", "code": "MSE 2060", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course covers the atomic and molecular structure of crystalline and noncrystalline materials as well as selected analytical techniques for structural interrogation. Selected topics include, basic elements of structure; order and disorder; crystals; semicrystalline materials; amorphous materials; molecular materials; x-ray diffraction; small angle x-ray scattering.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2808, "title": "Electronic Materials for the Information Age", "code": "MSE 2620", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Examines the electrical and optical properties of materials. Topics include the mechanism of electrical conduction in metals, semiconductors and insulators; tuning of electrical properties in semiconductors, charge transport across metal/semiconductor and semiconductor/semiconductor junctions, and the interaction of materials with light; semiconductor electronic devices; and the materials science of device fabrication. Applications in microelectronics, solar cells, electronics, and display technologies are discussed.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2809, "title": "Special Projects in Materials Science and Engineering", "code": "MSE 2900", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course is intended for an individual student, or small group of students, to pursue a particular project, analytical investigation, or experimental investigation outside of regular courses. The course may also be used for formal or informal instruction supplementing regular courses in the major. Students taking the course must obtain approval from an MSE field member who will be responsible for supervising and evaluating the project work.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2810, "title": "Research Involvement IIb", "code": "MSE 2920", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Supervised independent research project in association with faculty members and faculty research groups of the department. Students design experiments, set up the necessary equipment, and evaluate the results. Creativity and synthesis are emphasized. Each semester may be taken as a continuation of a previous project or as a one-semester affiliation with a research group.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2811, "title": "Kinetics, Diffusion, and Phase Transformations", "code": "MSE 3040", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Phenomenological and atomistic theories of diffusion in metals, alloys, ionic compounds, semiconductors and polymers. Introduction to general transport theory and non-equilibrium thermodynamics. Kinetic effects in solidification and solid state transformations that determine structure and properties of materials including: interfaces and microstructure; nucleation, growth and coarsening; alloy solidification; and diffusional and diffusionless transformations in solids.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2812, "title": "Electronic, Magnetic, and Dielectric Properties of Materials", "code": "MSE 3050", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Examines the electronic, magnetic, and dielectric properties of materials, including an understanding of the atomic level interactions that give rise to these properties. Topics include: use of tensors to describe equilibrium and transport macroscopic physical properties; connection between symmetry and properties; ferroelectrics, ferromagnets, and multiferroics; dispersion relations of phonons and electrons in solids; and effects of defects. Applications in microelectronics are discussed.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2813, "title": "Materials Design Concepts I", "code": "MSE 3070", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Introduces design in the context of real-world materials challenges as explored through reverse engineering. Students examine the materials, design, and cost constraints of a variety of technological products and the solutions commercially implemented. Analytical methods for materials testing and characterization are also introduced as part of the evaluation process.\u00a0 Students work in groups to develop a research plan, characterize materials, and report results.\u00a0 Exercises to develop technical writing and oral presentation skills are integrated throughout the course.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2814, "title": "Junior Laboratory II", "code": "MSE 3120", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Practical laboratory covering the characterization of material, analysis of data, and proper presentation of results. Labs are based on materials from courses in kinetics, diffusion and phase transformations (MSE 3040) and electronic, magnetic and dielectric properties (MSE 3050). Experiments include spectroscopic determination of a diffusion constants, thin film growth kinetics, anisotropic resistivity in polycrystalline materials, and characterization of magnetic properties. Data analysis is extended to include experimental design, use of custom model equations, and precision measurement techniques. Includes also continued development of technical writing skills.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2815, "title": "Special Projects in Materials Science and Engineering", "code": "MSE 3900", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course is intended for an individual student, or small group of students, to pursue a particular project, analytical investigation, or experimental investigation outside of regular courses. The course may also be used for formal or informal instruction supplementing regular courses in the major. Students taking the course must obtain approval from an MSE field member who will be responsible for supervising and evaluating the project work. Course may normally be used only as an advisor approved elective within the MSE curriculum.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2816, "title": "Research Involvement IIIb", "code": "MSE 3920", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Supervised independent research project in association with faculty members and faculty research groups of the department. Students design experiments, set up the necessary equipment, and evaluate the results. Creativity and synthesis are emphasized. Each semester may be taken as a continuation of a previous project or as a one-semester affiliation with a research group.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2817, "title": "Senior Experimental Thesis II", "code": "MSE 4060", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Second semester of two-semester senior thesis sequence. See MSE 4050\u00a0for thesis project requirements. Continued research in individual faculty groups with periodic oral and written updates. In class discussion of communication strategies and development of presentation skills. Final thesis will be presented in a formal conference style with (i) oral presentation, (ii) poster session and (iii) conference manuscript. Completion of both 4050\u00a0and 4060 required to satisfy senior laboratory requirement for graduation, and is required for graduation with honors.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2818, "title": "Materials Design Concepts II", "code": "MSE 4070", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Introduces materials design in the context of real-world materials design projects carried out in industry. In the first portion of the course, the process of engineering design is studied in light of economic, environmental, regulatory, and safety issues. Patent searching and communication skills are addressed. In the second portion, speakers from industry lecture on case studies of materials design problems. Students give oral presentations and write technical reports based on case studies.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2819, "title": "Biomedical Materials and Their Applications", "code": "MSE 4610", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Many types of materials are used in biomedical engineering to replace or supplement natural biological systems. Interaction with blood and tissues is always of primary importance, but depending on the use of the biomedical material, mechanical, optical, and transport properties may also be vital. The first half of the class will focus on establishing a common vocabulary and knowledge base in materials, biochemistry, cell biology, and immunology. The second half of the class will focus on a survey of commercially available biomaterials as well as future prospects.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2820, "title": "Special Projects in Materials Science and Engineering", "code": "MSE 4900", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course is intended for an individual student, or small group of students, to pursue a particular project, analytical investigation, or experimental investigation outside of regular courses. The course may also be used for formal or informal instruction supplementing regular courses in the major. Students taking the course must obtain approval from an MSE field member who will be responsible for supervising and evaluating the project work. Course may normally be used only as an advisor approved elective within the MSE curriculum.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2821, "title": "Research Involvement IVb", "code": "MSE 4920", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Supervised independent research project in association with faculty members and faculty research groups of the department. Students design experiments, set up the necessary equipment, and evaluate the results. Creativity and synthesis are emphasized. Each semester may be taken as a continuation of a previous project or as a one-semester affiliation with a research group. May be continuation or a one-semester affiliation with a research group.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2822, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching Involvement", "code": "MSE 4950", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Gives credit to students who help in the laboratory portions of select MSE courses. The number of credits earned is determined by the teaching load and is typically 1-3.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2823, "title": "MSE MEng Professional Development", "code": "MSE 5005", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Development of leadership skills and application to problem solving, forming and working on teams, project management, and networking. Development of graphical, verbal, and written communication skills. Effective technical project presentations. Professional portfolio development and marketing. Interpersonal skills and effective group behavior. Corporate, academic, and other cultures.\u00a0 Ethics in professional practice. Personal goal setting and progress metrics.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2824, "title": "MEng Project - Ongoing", "code": "MSE 5010", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Master of Engineering research project. Integration of technical, teamwork, and leadership skills to achieve a specific technical project goal defined by a project sponsor. MSE 5010 is for students who intend to complete their project in a later semester. Accordingly, success in MSE 5010 will be measured by progress against defined project goals. Students planning to complete course requirements in the current term should take MSE 5011.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2825, "title": "MEng Project - Terminal", "code": "MSE 5011", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Master of Engineering research project. Integration of technical, teamwork, and leadership skills to achieve a specific technical project goal defined by a project sponsor. MSE 5011 is for students who intend to complete their project in the current semester. Accordingly, success in MSE 5011 will be measured by successful completion of all final project deliverables. Students planning to complete course requirements in a later term should take MSE 5010.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2826, "title": "Mechanical Properties of Thin Films", "code": "MSE 5120", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Relationships between microstructure and mechanical behavior in thin films and other nanoscale structures. Topics include stresses, elastic and plastic deformation, creep and anelasticity, and fracture and delamination; and how mechanical behavior at the nanoscale deviates from the predictions of scaling laws derived for bulk materials. Applications in microelectronics, optics, microelectromechanical systems, coatings, etc.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2827, "title": "Structures and Materials for Sustainable Energy Systems", "code": "MSE 5150", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Design of sustainable energy systems is a critical challenge that must be addressed in the near future. This course will focus on the analysis, design and production of renewable energy (solar, wind, nuclear, hydro, and geothermal, etc.) systems, with a focus on understanding the critical material challenges as well as the design and manufacturing challenges of sustainable energy systems. Target audience is advanced undergraduate and M.Eng students who wish to gain a solid foundation in sustainable energy systems, including energy conversion and utilization technologies for both residential and industrial applications.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2828, "title": "Introduction to Ceramics", "code": "MSE 5310", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Covers ceramic processes and products, structure of ceramic crystals, structure of glasses, structural defects (point defects, dislocations), surfaces, interfaces and grain boundaries, diffusion in ionic materials (atomistic and phenomenological approach, relationships between diffusion and point defect structure), ceramic phase diagrams, phase transformations. Emphasizes physicochemical aspects of the different topics.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2829, "title": "Nanofabrication and Characterization of Electronics", "code": "MSE 5410", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course will give an introduction to modern nanofabrication technologies with emphasis on integrated circuits manufacturing. Thermal budget, scaling of geometry, pitch and registry and control of parametric yield will be used for integration guidelines. Physical principles and process modeling will be covered in lectures and labs will include a series of fabrication steps of lithography, metallization, plasma etching and annealing to produce semiconductor devices (Schottky diodes, pn junction diodes, MOS capacitors, and MOSFETs). Recent advances in nanofabrication will be briefly reviewed for their possible technology insertion and main integration challenges.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2830, "title": "Nanofabrication and Characterization of Electronics Laboratory", "code": "MSE 5411", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to nanofabrication technologies with emphasis on Si-based integrated circuits manufacturing as well as modern electronics based on GaN, 2D materials etc. The lab, primarily taught in the Cornell Teaching Cleanroom, includes basic fabrication steps of lithography, metallization, plasma etching and annealing. A series of devices will be fabricated: solar cells, MOS capacitors and transistors, 2D transistors, GaN HEMTs and LEDs.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2831, "title": "Soap Bubbles, Snowflakes, and Steps: Interfacial and Surface Phenomena in Materials Science", "code": "MSE 5440", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Surface and interface phenomena play a critical role in the processing and performance of advanced materials. Students and the instructor will identify topics of joint interest that build on the fundamentals of surfaces and interfaces contained in the core materials science curriculum (diffusion and growth, surface structure and energy, adhesion, etc.) and that address phenomena such as interfacial electronic states, gas adsorption at surfaces and surface forces in air and liquid. Course content will be organized collaboratively with necessary background provided in lectures and readings, and with students contributing oral presentations and student-led active learning exercises.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2832, "title": "Computational Materials Science", "code": "MSE 5720", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "An introduction to state-of-the-art computational methods in materials research with an emphasis on the atomic-scale and hands-on modeling using supercomputers. The course will focus primarily on firstprinciples quantum mechanical techniques (Density Functional Theory) for modeling extended (periodic) materials and properties, including electronic structure, vibrational properties, surfaces and interfaces, phase transformations and kinetics. Covers approaches to modeling a wide range of materials, including metals, ceramics and semiconductors.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2833, "title": "Materials Structure and Electronic Properties", "code": "MSE 5801", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Course is intended for first year graduate students in MSE, or graduate students in other fields, needing a solid foundation in structural and electronic properties for advanced study/research in materials. Atomic and molecular structure of crystalline, molecular, semicrystalline, and amorphous materials including: crystallography and symmetry; reciprocal lattice; order and disorder; point defects. Diffraction techniques for structural characterization: Bragg's Law, structure factors; thin film and size broadening; Debye scattering; symmetry breaking. Use of tensors to describe macroscopic physical properties and connections between symmetry and properties. Electrical properties of materials including: mechanisms of conduction; band structure and correlation with crystallography; modification of electrical properties in materials; charge transport across interfaces and semiconductor junctions; interaction of materials with light; fundamental semiconductor electronic devices (e.g. diodes, MOSFETS).", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2834, "title": "Kinetics, Diffusion, and Phase Transformation", "code": "MSE 5840", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Phenomenological and atomistic theories of diffusion in metals, alloys, ionic compounds, semiconductors and polymers. Introduction to general transport theory and non-equilibrium thermodynamics. Kinetic effects in solidification and solid state transformations that determine structure and properties of materials including: interfaces and microstructure; nucleation, growth and coarsening; alloy solidification; and diffusional and diffusionless transformations in solids.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2835, "title": "Electronic, Magnetic, and Dielectric Properties of Materials", "code": "MSE 5850", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Examines the electronic, magnetic, and dielectric properties of materials, including an understanding of the atomic level interactions that give rise to these properties. Topics include: use of tensors to describe equilibrium and transport macroscopic physical properties; connection between symmetry and properties; ferroelectrics, ferromagnets, and multiferroics; dispersion relations of phonons and electrons in solids; and effects of defects. Applications in microelectronics are discussed.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2836, "title": "Atomic and Molecular Structure of Matter", "code": "MSE 5860", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course covers the atomic and molecular structure of crystalline and non-crystalline materials as well as selected analytical techniques for structural interrogation. Selected topics include: basic elements of structure, order and disorder, crystals, semi-crystalline materials, amorphous materials, molecular materials, x-ray diffraction, and small angle x-ray scattering.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2837, "title": "Introduction to Electronic Materials", "code": "MSE 5862", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Examines the electrical and optical properties of materials. Topics include: the mechanism of electrical conduction in metals, semiconductors and insulators, tuning of electrical properties in semiconductors, charge transport across metal/semiconductor and semiconductor/semiconductor junctions, the interaction of materials with light, semiconductor electronic devices, and the materials science of device fabrication. Applications in microelectronics, solar cells, electronics, and display technologies are discussed. Students will complete and present a review of a current issues in semiconductor device evolution.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2838, "title": "Chemistry of Materials", "code": "MSE 6010", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Chemistry of materials with an emphasis on concepts of general applicability and modern developments in the materials field. The transition from atoms to molecules is developed by applying group theoretical approaches to chemical bonding, from molecules to materials by applying thermodynamic principles to self-assembly, and then to underpin these transitions with examples from the chemistry of low dimensional nanomaterials, sol-gel derived materials, surfactant and block copolymer self-assembly, mesoporous solids, and hierarchical materials. Throughout the course, examples from the current literature are discussed to familiarize students with the state-of-the-art in the field.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2839, "title": "Thermodynamics of Materials", "code": "MSE 6030", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course aims to provide a comprehensive understanding on the concepts of statistical thermodynamics in materials science and engineering. Topics include fundamental statistical thermodynamics concepts such as ensembles, partition functions, distribution functions, free energies, and applications in gases, vibrations, electrons, phase transitions, alloys, surfaces, and defects. Emphasis will be placed on the fundamental governing principles and their applications to phenomena in materials.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2840, "title": "Physics of Semiconductors and Nanostructures", "code": "MSE 6050", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Covers basic solid state and semiconductor physics relevant for understanding electronic and optical devices. Topics include crystalline structures, bonding in atoms and solids, energy bands in solids, electron statistics and dynamics in energy bands, effective mass equation, carrier transport in solids, Boltzmann transport equation, semiconductor homo- and hetero-junctions, optical processes in semiconductors, electronic and optical properties of semiconductor nanostructures, semiconductor quantum wells, wires, and dots, electron transport in reduced dimensions, semiconductor lasers and optoelectronics, high-frequency response of electrons in solids and plasmons.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2841, "title": "Solid State Chemistry", "code": "MSE 6210", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "This course is aimed at the broad community of chemists and engineers interested in the synthesis, structure, characterization, and application of extended solids. We will focus on the unique challenges and opportunities in materials chemistry, starting with the construction (how do we make it?) and characterization (how do we know?) of organic, hybrid, and inorganic materials. We will then explore\u00a0the relationship between a material's properties and its potential applications (what can we use it for?). Special topics including porous materials, metal-organic frameworks, conductivity, and defects.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2842, "title": "Advanced X-ray Characterization", "code": "MSE 6720", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Graduate-level introduction to coherent x-ray scattering and imaging in the context of nanoscale phenomena in metals, ceramics, polymers, and composites. The course focuses on in-situ x-ray characterization of functional materials through using the ability of novel x-ray sources to generate laser-like x-ray beams. Novel sources include recently build or upgraded x-ray synchrotrons (e.g., CHESS), table-top soft x-ray lasers, and x-ray free-electron lasers. Specific topics include coherence of x-ray beams, coherent x-ray imaging, x-ray cross correlation spectroscopy, resonant x-ray diffraction, in-situ x-ray characterization, ultrafast x-ray measurements, and the overview of existing x-ray sources and x-ray focusing techniques.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2843, "title": "Research in Materials Science", "code": "MSE 8000", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Independent research in materials science under the guidance of a member of the staff.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2844, "title": "Materials Science and Engineering Colloquium", "code": "MSE 8010", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Lectures by visiting scientists, Cornell staff members, and graduate students on subjects of interest in materials sciences, especially in connection with new research.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2845, "title": "Materials Science Research Seminars", "code": "MSE 8020", "subject": "MSE", "descr": "Short presentations on research in progress by students and staff.", "tags": "MSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2846, "title": "Elements of Musical Notation", "code": "MUSIC 1100", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This four-week course fulfills the requirement of basic pitch, rhythm, and score-reading skills needed for some introductory courses and 2000-level courses with prerequisites.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2847, "title": "An Introduction to Western Music Theory and African Diaspora Music of the Caribbean and Americas", "code": "MUSIC 1105", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course is divided into two parts: The first is a self-contained, experiential introduction to Western European functional counterpoint and harmony.\u00a0The second part examines the intersection and\u00a0synthesis of Western European and African Diaspora music through forced migration and enslavement during\u00a0the French,\u00a0Spanish, and Anglo-American colonial eras in the Caribbean and the Americas. A diverse collection of musical examples, from the 17th century Western European canon to Haitian roots music to blues, are analyzed on their own terms.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2848, "title": "Technological Musicianship", "code": "MUSIC 1108", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The persistent cultural disruption of the Covid-19 pandemic has made one thing very clear to waylaid musicians: concert presentation and musical events generally will be making a very slow comeback, at best, and may sustain long-lasting changes from this crisis no matter what. As the Italian composer Luciano Berio once said about the musical impact of WWII, \"Culture and its dynamics, however, are also made of these privations,\" this course is offered as a technological stopgap for those who are interested in engaging with technology in musically substantive ways. Best practices (and attitudes) for audio engineering, mixing, editing, video production, and synchronous/asynchronous collaboration will be outlined in a series of video lectures, with individual support available for enrolled students.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2849, "title": "European Music from the Middle Ages, Renaissance, and Baroque", "code": "MUSIC 1201", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This listening-intensive course will introduce students to key styles in European art music from before 1750 through a focus on several important musical centers at different historical moments: medieval Paris (chant, organum, monophonic songs), 15th-century Burgundy (sacred and secular polyphony), late 16th-century Mantua (madrigals, instrumental genres, early opera), late 17th-century Versailles (court ballet, instrumental suite), Leipzig around 1740 (organ music, cantata), and London around 1750 (concerto, opera, oratorio). Works by composers such as Perotin, Dufay, Monteverdi, Bach, and Handel will be studied within the cultural contexts that allowed them to flourish.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2850, "title": "Music on the Brain", "code": "MUSIC 1212", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course is for anyone who listens to music or plays music and wonders what's happening in your brain that makes you feel the way you do. Starting with the music each of you knows and loves\u2014the soundtrack to your life\u2014we'll tackle questions like: What is the relationship between speech and music? Do animals have music, too? How does the brain process aspects of music, including rhythm, melody, harmony, and form? Why does some music trigger an emotional response? What does it mean to say that music is an embodied behavioral act? What is the relationship between music and memory? Through lectures, discussions, experiments, compositions, recording technologies, student presentations/performances and writing assignments we'll explore how/why you've chosen the particular tunes on the soundtrack of your life, and how your brain processes musical thoughts and experiences.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2851, "title": "History of Rock Music", "code": "MUSIC 1312", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course examines the development and cultural significance of rock music from its origins in blues, gospel, and Tin Pan Alley up to alternative rock and hip hop. The course concludes with the year 2000.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2852, "title": "A Survey of Jazz", "code": "MUSIC 1313", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course addresses jazz from two perspectives: the various sounds of jazz, as well as the historical streams-musical and cultural-that have contributed to its development. Listening and writing assignments are major components of the course.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2853, "title": "Physics of Musical Sound", "code": "MUSIC 1466", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course explores the physics of musical sound. How and what do our ears hear? How does that determine the kinds of sounds we find pleasant and not so pleasant? How is sound generated by strings, pipes, and plates, and what determines the characteristics \u2013 pitch, timbre, attack, consonance, or dissonance \u2013 of that sound? How do the major families of musical instruments (string, wind, reed, brass, percussion) and specific examples (violin, guitar, piano, flute, oboe, trumpet, chimes, pipe organ) work, and how does that affect how they are played and the sounds they produce? How do we generate sound when we sing, and how does that vary in different kinds of singing? What makes for a good concert hall or listening space? These are explained using physical and mathematical concepts including vibrations, standing waves, harmonic series, beats, spectra, and logarithms, and illustrated using demonstrations, audio clips, and musical selections from a wide variety of genres. This course is a Writing In The Majors course: both science writing and physics problem-solving skills are developed through weekly assignments. Student activities include hands-on investigations of musical instruments and field trips. At the level of The Science of Sound by Rossing, Moore, and Wheeler.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2854, "title": "FWS: Sound, Sense and Ideas", "code": "MUSIC 1701", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This First-Year Writing seminar provides the opportunity to write extensively about music's place in our world. Topics vary by section.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2855, "title": "Theory, Materials and Techniques II", "code": "MUSIC 2102", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Theory, Materials, and Techniques II surveys tonal music as conceived and practiced throughout late-eighteenth and nineteenth-century Europe. The course combines modern pedagogical methods with the study of relevant historical sources and incorporates active learning at the keyboard. Topics to be covered include the analysis of form and genre; advanced techniques of modulation; transformational theory and other approaches to the configuration of diatonicism and chromaticism; and the relationship of words and music in nineteenth-century song. During section meetings, the concepts and skills introduced in lecture will be practiced at the keyboard as well as vocally. Other topics to be covered in sections include advanced aural skills; sight singing; score reading; and the improvisation of preludes.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2856, "title": "Songwriting", "code": "MUSIC 2111", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Songwriting introduces students to the practice of songwriting through workshop-formatted classes. We will explore the ingredients of song (lyrics, melody, delivery, harmony, rhythm, form, texture, timbre, and arrangement) through analysis, composition, recording technologies, performance, and concert reports.\u00a0Proficiency on one or more musical instruments is required. Songwriting can be taken as a stand-alone course or as part of the Songwriting sequence with Collaborative Songwriting.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2857, "title": "Introduction to Music Studies", "code": "MUSIC 2201", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course introduces students to the study of music as an expression of history and culture by examining the ways in which music creates meaning, knowledge, archives, and identities. Musical examples will be drawn from a broad range of styles, chronological periods, and geographical locations; and students will engage with live performance as well as various forms of recorded music and mediated performance.\u00a0 Along with considering music as sound, the course will examine different modalities of writing about music\u2014journalistic, academic, and creative\u2014and we will think about how these musical texts, and those that the students produce, function to situate music as discourse. The course will develop critical thinking, writing, and presentation skills.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2858, "title": "History of Western Music III: Postwar Music and Sound", "code": "MUSIC 2209", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course, intended for music majors, music minors, and suitably interested non-majors and non-minors, surveys the vast terrain and diverse topography of music since 1945. Involving a comprehensive listening component alongside score study and a wide range of primary and secondary sources, the course is designed to develop students'\u00a0knowledge of repertory, musical institutions, and social practices; it also aims to equip them with the means to think critically about music and texts amid shifting historical contexts. Topics will include electronic music, sound art, improvisation, minimalism, and noise.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2859, "title": "Music as Drama: An Introduction to Opera", "code": "MUSIC 2241", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Opera has been enthralling audiences for 400 years; this course explores the multiple facets of its appeal. Using seven operas as the focus-chosen from different periods, national traditions, and styles-the class will examine the texts that have been turned into operas, the musical conventions that have guided composers (or against which they have worked), and the decisions directors make when they put operas on stage. Each work will be seen as well as heard-either in a special screening or, at least once in the semester, in a live performance. Students who have a strong background in music may wish to also enroll in MUSIC 3901, which involves an extra class-period per week where the music is discussed in greater detail. Permission of the instructor is required for this one-credit addition.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2860, "title": "Music in and of East Asia", "code": "MUSIC 2330", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course explores the breadth of music found in present day China, Japan, and Korea--from indigenous musical traditions, through adaptations of Western art music, up to the latest popular styles--as well as the presence of traditional East Asian musics outside East Asia, including right here at Cornell. In both cases, music offers a lens for examining the myriad social and cultural forces that shape it, and that are shaped by it. The course's academic focus on critical reading and listening, written assignments, and discussion is complemented by\u00a0opportunities to engage directly with music, whether attending concerts or participating in workshops with student-led ensembles.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2861, "title": "Computers in Music Performance", "code": "MUSIC 2421", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "A course exploring strategies and techniques for live musical performance and real-time, interactive sound manipulation with computers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2862, "title": "Music and Digital Gameplay", "code": "MUSIC 2701", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course considers both music and digital games in light of their playability. It aims to provide students with critical frameworks for addressing the diverse roles played by music in digital games as well as the ways in which playing digital games can be\u00a0considered a musical activity. Focusing on games across an array of genres from first-person shooters to rhythm-action titles, the course will introduce students to recent scholarship on digital games from multiple disciplinary angles. No formal\u00a0musical training is necessary, but suitably qualified students may take the course as a 3000-level elective by signing up for MUSIC 3901 and completing additional research components involving the creation and/or analysis of specific soundtracks or performances.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2863, "title": "Thinking Media", "code": "MUSIC 2703", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "From hieroglyphs to HTML, ancient poetry to audiotape, and Plato's cave to virtual reality, \"Thinking Media\" offers a multidisciplinary introduction to the most influential media formats of the last three millennia. Featuring an array of guests from across Cornell, including faculty from Communication, Comparative Literature, English, German Studies, Information Science, Music, and Performing & Media Arts, the course will present diverse perspectives on how to think with, against, and about media in relation to the public sphere and private life, archaeology and science fiction, ethics and aesthetics, identity and difference, labor and play, knowledge and power, expression and surveillance, and the generation and analysis of data.", "tags": "ALC-AS|CA-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2864, "title": "Jazz Improvisation and Theory I", "code": "MUSIC 3111", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "An introduction to fundamental jazz theory, technique, and applied skills.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2865, "title": "The Composer's Toolbox II", "code": "MUSIC 3142", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The Composer's Toolbox is a two-semester sequence of courses that equips undergraduates with the skills and techniques they need to write music in a variety of styles and idioms, both tonal and otherwise. While a modicum of theoretical knowledge is required, the emphasis throughout the sequence is on the practical applications of that knowledge via both composition and the analysis of repertoire: students will learn through doing.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2866, "title": "Beyond the Five Lines", "code": "MUSIC 3151", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Beyond the Five Lines invites students from different disciplines to learn about the diversity of music notation. From graphic and text scores to arrangements and the inscription of listening practices, the course offers a collection of ways to communicate music. Students will explore their sonic and visual creativity with a critical and historical approach and from a hands-on creative environment. In this course, we will dive into design, illustration, visual communication, grammar, typography, and politics. Activities will include student compositions, performances by the members of the course, discussion of readings, and experiments with notation.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2867, "title": "Seminar in Advanced Music Studies", "code": "MUSIC 3211", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course explores historical, critical, and aesthetic writings on music extending from Ancient Greece to contemporary America. We will engage with significant ways of thinking about music from the Western classical tradition and beyond it, building our skills as writers and speakers about the sonic arts in a range of cultural contexts.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2868, "title": "Music and Money", "code": "MUSIC 3315", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "From the 1720 South Sea Bubble to the 2008 global financial crisis, from Handel's operas to Spotify's algorithms, music has chronicled the booms and busts of markets. This course investigates how music and money are entwined in discourse and practice by tracing an origin story of capitalism that began in eighteenth-century Europe. We will ask how music has captured the spirit of capitalism since its inception, stoking its fantasies and attuning to its effects. In turn, we will contemplate how systems of economic thought reckon with shifting ways of creating and consuming music. In allowing music ranging from broadside ballads to commercial jingles to illuminate mutually the writings of such thinkers as Smith, Marx, Adorno, and Graeber, our discussions will unravel varied musical lives through themes including credit and debt, labor and property, media and interest, trade and slavery, nature and environment.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2869, "title": "Sound Design", "code": "MUSIC 3431", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Covering the basics of digital audio, bioacoustics, psychoacoustics and sound design, as they apply to theatre, film and music production.\u00a0 Students create soundscapes for text and moving image using ProTools software.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2870, "title": "Individual Instruction", "code": "MUSIC 3511", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Individual instruction in voice, organ, harpsichord, piano and fortepiano, violin, viola, cello, percussion, and some brass and woodwind instruments to those students advanced enough to do college-level work in these instruments. For more information about individual instruction, see the section titled Musical Instruction.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2871, "title": "Individual Instruction", "code": "MUSIC 3512", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Individual instruction in voice, organ, harpsichord, piano and fortepiano, violin, viola, cello, percussion, and some brass and woodwind instruments to those students advanced enough to do college-level work in these instruments. For more information about individual instruction, see the section titled Musical Instruction.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2872, "title": "Individual Instruction", "code": "MUSIC 3513", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Individual instruction in voice, organ, harpsichord, piano and fortepiano, violin, viola, cello, percussion, and some brass and woodwind instruments to those students advanced enough to do college-level work in these instruments.\u00a0For more information about individual instruction, see the section titled Musical Instruction.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2873, "title": "Individual Instruction", "code": "MUSIC 3514", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Individual instruction in voice, organ, harpsichord, piano and fortepiano, violin, viola, cello, percussion, and some brass and woodwind instruments to those students advanced enough to do college-level work in these instruments.\u00a0For more information about individual instruction, see the section titled Musical Instruction.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2874, "title": "Chorus", "code": "MUSIC 3602", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "A nationally renowned treble-voice chorus specializing in music for sopranos and altos. Tours and records annually. The Chorus frequently combines with the Glee Club to work on mixed-voice repertoire and major works.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2875, "title": "Glee Club", "code": "MUSIC 3603", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "A nationally renowned tenor-bass ensemble specializing in choral music for lower voices. Tours and records annually. The Glee Club frequently combines with the Chorus to work on mixed-voice repertoire and major works.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2876, "title": "Chorale", "code": "MUSIC 3604", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "A course for singers wishing to develop their musicianship, sight-reading, and vocal technique.\u00a0 The Chorale may occasionally perform publicly but is more focused on the development of essential skills to a high level, preparing students for further singing in a cappella groups, the Chorus, the Glee Club, or the Chamber Singers.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2877, "title": "Brazilian Ensemble - Deixa Sambar", "code": "MUSIC 3609", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Deixa Sambar performs several styles of samba, Brazil's national music. Members need not have prior background in music-making, but a good sense of rhythm is desirable. Members include students as well as Ithaca community members, brasileiros as well as newcomers to Brazilian culture. Rehearsals develop playing skills, with a deep emphasis on cultural understanding of this vital, community-based music.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2878, "title": "Cornell Gamelan Ensemble", "code": "MUSIC 3610", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Study and performance mostly of traditional Javanese gamelan music. Group rehearsal once a week in preparation for one concert. Individual instruction is offered as necessary; those wishing to learn advanced techniques should also enroll in MUSIC 4641.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2879, "title": "Cornell Steel Band", "code": "MUSIC 3613", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The Cornell Steel Band explores the wide variety of music for an orchestra of instruments fashioned from 55-gallon oil drums, and an \"engine room\" of non-pitched percussion. Interwoven into the focus on hands-on practice is reflection on the meanings of steel band, historically and in the present, in its native Trinidad and Tobago and here in the United States. Formal musical training is not necessary, though a sense of rhythm and a good ear are helpful.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2880, "title": "Cornell Hip-Hop Collective", "code": "MUSIC 3616", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This course is open to experienced rappers, beatmakers, and vocalists interested forging collaborative relationships with other students. The fall semester will center on hip-hop's relationship to social justice. From the beginning of the semester, we will work together to plan and record a thematic album. As we develop this project, we will construct and analyze playlists that explore how hip-hop historically grew out of racialized struggle and how it is and could be used to comment on and challenge systemic racism today. We will identify and employ hip-hop compositional strategies for creating socially engaged beats and rhymes, including musical sampling and lyrical intertextuality, and will use these tools to create and workshop collaborative tracks in weekly meetings. Spring semester topic: TBD.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2881, "title": "Cornell Symphony Orchestra", "code": "MUSIC 3621", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Study and performance of a broad repertoire of orchestral works from Beethoven to the present.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2882, "title": "Cornell Wind Symphony", "code": "MUSIC 3631", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The Cornell\u00a0Wind Symphony unites student musicians in an ensemble dedicated to the study and performance of emerging and traditional wind repertoire.\u00a0\u00a0The Cornell\u00a0Wind Symphony unites student musicians in an ensemble dedicated to the study and performance of emerging and traditional wind repertoire. In Spring 2021, the Wind Symphony will likely make\u00a0music in both in-person and remote settings. Full details and audition instructions will be posted on\u00a0www.cuwinds.com\u00a0as they become available.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2883, "title": "Cornell Percussion Group", "code": "MUSIC 3634", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The Cornell Percussion Group explores and performs un-conducted chamber music of the rapidly expanding percussion repertoire.\u00a0 The Group takes advantage of the stylistic and sonic breadth that the relatively young medium of percussion chamber music engenders, performing music that ranges from classics of the percussive canon from composers such as John Cage and Iannis Xenakis, to collaborations with composers on new repertoire.\u00a0 Members of CPG will develop their percussive technique and collaborative musical skills through the study of a diverse array of un-conducted percussion chamber works and mixed chamber ensemble pieces. Prior experience with percussion instruments is required, and participants must meet with the instructor for a short audition before enrolling.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2884, "title": "Music Improvisation Ensemble", "code": "MUSIC 3660", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The Music Improvisation Ensemble provides students with the opportunity to explore the elements of music from an improviser's perspective. Fall 2020, we'll meet the particular challenges of the pandemic through innovative and exciting programming. The first half of the semester, we'll explore unique outdoor acoustic environments across campus in socially distant group improvisation. The second half of the semester, we'll explore improvisation through text pieces. The semester will culminate in a virtual performance made available to the public on the internet. This ensemble is open to any level of musician. An audition is required at the beginning of the semester simply as a means of introduction. Please contact instructor Annie Lewandowski for more information:\u00a0apl72@cornell.edu", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2885, "title": "Supplemental Study in Music", "code": "MUSIC 3901", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Intended primarily for music majors, this option allows students enrolled in an approved 1000- or 2000-level 3-credit music history course to pursue independent research and writing projects. Students will study various topics in music history at a more advanced level through supplementary reading, discussion, and writing, by arrangement with the professor.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2886, "title": "Individual Instruction", "code": "MUSIC 4501", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Individual instruction in voice, organ, harpsichord, piano and fortepiano, violin, viola, cello, percussion, and some brass and woodwind instruments to those students advanced enough to do college-level work in these instruments.\u00a0For more information about individual instruction, see the section titled Musical Instruction.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2887, "title": "Chamber Singers", "code": "MUSIC 4601", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "A mixed-voice chamber choir for students with outstanding sight-reading skills and considerable choral experience.\u00a0 Aims to rehearse at a professional level.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2888, "title": "Jazz Ensemble", "code": "MUSIC 4615", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Study and performance of classic and contemporary big band literature. Rehearsals twice a week with two to four performances per semester.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2889, "title": "Jazz Combos", "code": "MUSIC 4616", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Study and performance of classic and contemporary small-group jazz.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2890, "title": "Cornell Chamber Orchestra", "code": "MUSIC 4621", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "The goal of this music performance course is to provide the opportunity for you as a string performer to come together with other like-minded musicians in an ensemble setting to rehearse and perform the highest quality literature from the chamber orchestra repertoire. In this course we will focus on overall concepts of self and ensemble expression, engagement, participation, and performance. We will also address musical concepts of ensemble and individual balance, blend, intonation, phrasing, dynamics, articulation, tone, rhythmic precision, color, and ensemble clarity. We are going to listen to ourselves, to each other and to the composer's voice.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2891, "title": "Chamber Flute Ensemble", "code": "MUSIC 4631", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Small ensembles meet weekly to explore diverse flute repertoire including a variety of instrumentation (piccolo, alto flute, bass flute). \u00a0There will be a performance opportunity at the end of the semester on a chamber concert or in a studio class setting.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2892, "title": "Advanced Instruction in Gamelan", "code": "MUSIC 4641", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Concentrated instruction for students in advanced techniques of performance on Indonesian gamelan instruments.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2893, "title": "Chamber Music Ensemble", "code": "MUSIC 4651", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Study and performance of chamber music works from duos to octets, for pianists, string, and wind players.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2894, "title": "Independent Study in Music", "code": "MUSIC 4901", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Independent study affords students the opportunity to pursue special interests or research not treated in regularly scheduled courses. A faculty member, who becomes the student's instructor for the independent course, must approve the proposed study and agree to provide continuing supervision of the work. Students must prepare a proposal for independent study. To apply for independent study, please complete the online form. \u00a0Undergraduate student and faculty advisor to determine course of study and credit hours.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2895, "title": "Honors in Music", "code": "MUSIC 4912", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Second semester of the two semester honors program. In conjunction with faculty, selected candidates formulate a program that allows them to demonstrate their musical and scholarly abilities, culminating in an honors thesis, composition, or recital (or some combination of these), to be presented in their senior year.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2896, "title": "Composition", "code": "MUSIC 7111", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "A course for graduate or advanced undergraduate composers (by permission with a portfolio audition) seeking individual music composition instruction, the course combines one-on-one meetings with group seminars featuring workshops, master classes, and/or visiting guests. In addition to individual and group meetings, composers may have opportunities for the reading and/or performance of their work.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2897, "title": "Seminar in Performance Practice", "code": "MUSIC 7211", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This seminar helps develop tools for spearheading coherent and compelling projects that bring together musicians, scholars, and audiences. After examing historic and contemporary music festivals and critical responses to them, participants will work to construct their own two- or three-day festival-conference and work on: developing a theme; laying out programs of concerts, scholarly papers, panels, workshops, exhibitions; choosing performers and other contributors; considering connections to, and collaborations with, other disciplines; writing letters and calls for papers/programs; funding; program notes; working up and presenting a short version of the participant's own contribution to the conference (e.g., composition; recital; scholarly paper; composition). The course welcomes performers, composers, and scholars, and will encourage collaboration between participants.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2898, "title": "The Global Premodern: Methods and Perspectives", "code": "MUSIC 7235", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This seminar investigates and interrogates the emergence of a\u00a0global\u00a0consciousness (a hallmark of \"the modern\")\u00a0across a range of academic disciplines. Our focus will be the historical retrojection of this call to \"go\u00a0global\" upon the\u00a0premodern, including a\u00a0global\u00a0history of ideas, a\u00a0global\u00a0history of science, a\u00a0global\u00a0medieval studies, and (of course) a\u00a0global\u00a0history of music. We will consider the various methodologies and methodological challenges (not least of which is the Eurocentrism of the very idea of the \"premodern\"), sub-disciplinary configurations (e.g., \"historical ethnomusicology\"), and liberal politics involved in the doing of\u00a0global\u00a0history within the Anglo-American academy. Topics include: historical global histories of music (Al-Farabi's\u00a0Kit\u0101b al-m\u016bs\u012bq\u012b al-kab\u012br, Fran\u00e7ois-Joseph F\u00e9tis'\u00a0Histoire g\u00e9n\u00e9rale de la musique, and Sourindro Mohun Tagore's\u00a0Universal History of Music: Compiled from Diverse Sources, Together with Various Original Notes on Hindu Music), recent historiographical debates about\u00a0longue dur\u00e9e\u00a0history vs. \"micro-history\"\u00a0(in response to\u00a0Jo Guldi and David Armitage's\u00a0The History Manifesto), networks of exchange and migration, the (perennial) problem of periodization, and a range of specific case studies (TBD by the participants of the seminar).", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2899, "title": "Listening from the Other Side: Music, Masculinity, and the Homophobic Gaze", "code": "MUSIC 7327", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "This seminar focuses on the uses of music in the performative construction of masculinities. It pays particular attention to how issues of difference play a central role in the development of notions of masculinity, especially in relation to notions of race and class. In articulating the intersection of masculinity and difference students also focus on misogyny, homophobia, and xenophobia as fundamental regeants in the production of toxic masculinities. The seminar also seeks to challenge students to think critically about networks of male participation and circulation in musical culture and their reflection and impact on mainstream notions of sex, gender, and queerness in relation to larger geographic, political, and economic configurations such as the nation-state, the European Union, USMCA, etc.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2900, "title": "idEars- ideas for ears", "code": "MUSIC 7422", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "idEars invites composers and their dear ears to hear out new ideas. In an online workshop environment participants will create with unexpected sounds, nonexistent instruments, everyday objects, wearable instruments, hidden sounds, inner sounds, spaces, stars and planets, the human, the non-human, robotics, machines, body extensions, frozen sounds, smelly instruments and other curiosities. Participants are encouraged to let their imaginations run free, and think of their environment (bed, room, apartment, building, neighborhood, road, city, countryside, the world) as their new studio/lab. We will embrace imperfections. We will welcome the importance of unpredictability. We will share and shake our knowledge and beliefs. This way we will train our imagination and connective abilities to generate new forms of being with sound, together and online. Together we will pick game-changing compositions and artworks across time, as tools for stretching and strengthening our imagination and ways of making with sound.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2901, "title": "Independent Study in Music", "code": "MUSIC 7901", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "Independent study affords students the opportunity to pursue special interests or research not treated in regularly scheduled courses. A faculty member, who becomes the student's instructor for the independent course, must approve the proposed study and agree to provide continuing supervision of the work.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2902, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "MUSIC 9901", "subject": "MUSIC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "MUSIC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2903, "title": "Sea Power and Maritime Affairs", "code": "NAVS 1102", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "Discussions examine the history of the Navy as a force in diplomacy and an instrument of U.S. foreign policy. Relationships between Congress and the military for determining the national defense policy are also explored. An integrated examination of current events and issues lends historical perspective throughout the course.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2904, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "NAVS 1142", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week. The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events. Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors. During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2905, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "NAVS 2242", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week.\u00a0 The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events.\u00a0 Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors.\u00a0 During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2906, "title": "Principles of Navigation", "code": "NAVS 2301", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "Introduces the fundamentals of marine navigation emphasizing piloting and electronic navigation procedures. Covers coordinate systems, chart projections, navigational aids, instruments, compass observations, time, and study of tides and currents.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2907, "title": "Naval Ships Systems II (Weapons)", "code": "NAVS 3202", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "Examines the principles and theories used in the development of naval weapons systems. Extensive study is made of detection systems, especially radar and sonar, followed by discussions of ancillary systems for computing, stabilizing, tracking, and weapons control and delivery.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2908, "title": "Evolution of Warfare", "code": "NAVS 3310", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "A study of warfare that examines the relationship of military strategy to geography, economics, sociology, technology, and governing policy. This course examines the historical evolution of warfare, including principles of war, development of weapons and their effects on warfare, and the political goals associated with specific adversaries through history.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2909, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "NAVS 3342", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week. The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events. Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors. During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2910, "title": "Leadership and Ethics", "code": "NAVS 4402", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "The course integrates an intellectual exploration of Western moral traditions and ethical philosophy with a variety of topics, such as military leadership, core values, and professional ethics; the Uniform Code of Military Justice and Navy regulations; and discussions relating to the roles of enlisted members, junior and senior officers, command relationships and the conduct of warfare. The course provides midshipmen with a foundation of moral traditions, combined with a discussion of actual and historical events in the United States Navy and Marine Corps to prepare them for the roles and responsibilities of Naval leadership.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2911, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "NAVS 4442", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week. The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events. Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors. During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2912, "title": "Independent Study for Naval Science", "code": "NAVS 4991", "subject": "NAVS", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NAVS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2913, "title": "Designing New Ventures", "code": "NBA 3000", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The course provides an overview of several elements of entrepreneurial activity and private equity investment. You will engage in the customer discovery process for early stage ventures to learn how to develop a sustainable, scalable business model. As part of this course, you will apply your learnings from discussions in the classroom and participate on a team going through the experience of starting a company.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2914, "title": "Equity Investment Research and Analysis", "code": "NBA 4120", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the theory and practice of equity research and is similar to that provided to aspiring analysts, as apprentices, in buy-side investment firms. The course provides a comprehensive framework for analyzing equity securities and developing formal target prices and BUY/SELL/HOLD recommendations. Students define an industry to study and prepare an \"industry review.\" Students analyze in detail one stock in that industry and prepare a stock report. A live portfolio is invested in late March with student picks. Topics include the research process, analysis strategies, valuation techniques and portfolio construction methods. Detailed feedback on draft reports is provided. Students should be prepared to conduct rigorous, creative research based upon their own work and insights. Class is taught in a hybrid format composed of in-class and online lectures, in-class workshops, guest speakers, reading assignments, student presentations and investment conference calls. Limit is 30 students.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2915, "title": "Managing Family and Privately Held Firms", "code": "NBA 4720", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Most companies around the world are controlled by their founding families, including more than half of all public corporations in Europe, and more than two thirds of those in Asia. Even in the United States, where ownership dispersion is at its highest, founding families exercise a significant degree of control over more than half of all public corporations. This course explores the challenges and opportunities created by family leadership and ownership. This elective is designed for students who may be involved in family firms and closely held companies in a variety of roles: joining either their own family's or someone else's firm, and students who will do business with family firms, consult to them, invest in them, work with them in private wealth management, mergers and acquisitions, banking, consulting etc. Through case studies, lectures, student projects and guest speakers, the course provides students with exposure to the unique finance, governance, and management issues faced by family firms, and ways in which these issues can be addressed. The course provides students with a framework for analyzing how family ownership, control, and management affect value, and whether and how more value can be created for the various stakeholders. The course brings an integrated financial and managerial perspective to the study of family firms focusing on the financial and corporate governance aspects of family control and their managerial implications.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2916, "title": "Machine Learning Applications in Business", "code": "NBA 4920", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course introduces students to machine learning techniques used in business applications to draw managerial insights from data. The methods that would be covered include logistic regression, classification trees, clustering, and neural networks. Students will learn to apply these methods in a wide range of settings such as marketing, finance, healthcare and other business areas, and will gain hands-on experience through assignments and a group project.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2917, "title": "Intermediate Accounting", "code": "NBA 5000", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is relevant to a general business career, but is particularly relevant to careers that involve the use of financial statements.\u00a0 The specific accounting topics covered includes: Statement of Cash Flows; Income Taxes; Divestitures; Revenue Recognition; Financial Investments; Leases; Pensions; Equity-based Compensation; EPS; Goodwill. \u00a0My objective is to enable you to become more knowledgeable, skeptical consumers of financial information.\u00a0 This objective will be achieved by a combination of lectures and analyzing and discussing articles from the financial press and cases that are based on actual financial statements.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2918, "title": "Managerial Accounting and Reporting", "code": "NBA 5020", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course focuses on using internal organizational data to improve decision making. The class is divided into two units. In the first unit, we learn about cost fundamentals, cost behavior, budgeting, variance analysis, and the use of cost information for internal decision making. In the second unit, we discuss the pros and cons of different costing systems (with an emphasis on accounting for manufacturing) and considerations when designing systems for performance measurement and management. Instruction is a mixture of lecture and case discussion. Grading is based on exams, short quizzes, and class contribution.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2919, "title": "Federal Income Taxation of Real Estate Ventures", "code": "NBA 5040", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course presents the tax skills necessary to make business, and personal, decisions as it relates to real estate ventures. Emphasis is placed on such areas as acquiring ownership of real property, the various entity structures that a real estate venture can create, and the operational rules surrounding a real estate venture, including the sale and/or exchange of real estate. In addition, securitized real estate investments, such as limited/master limited partnerships and real estate investment trusts (REITS), will be introduced in the later part of course. Practical application of the tax law will be emphasized with proper consideration placed on the historical, economic and political perspectives of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC). The content and design of this course is, only, suitable for advanced undergraduate students and graduate students.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2920, "title": "Financial Statement Analysis", "code": "NBA 5060", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to give students a broad understanding of financial statement analysis and valuation issues. The emphasis is on helping students understand the basic equity research process for use in investment and business decision applications. The course format is a combination of examples, case studies, and lectures. We cover information sources, strategic ratio analysis, cash flow analysis, forecasting financial statements, and firm valuation using discounted cash flow and residual income techniques. The course deliverables include an equity research project and a final exam.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2921, "title": "Entrepreneurship for Scientists and Engineers", "code": "NBA 5070", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The course provides a hand-on experience for learning the key philosophies and tactics of entrepreneurial activity and the entrepreneurial mindset.\u00a0 The unique focus of this class is that it is designed for Scientists & Engineers who would start a business that would have meaningful technology at the heart of the company.\u00a0 This includes the development of a viable business concept, customer discovery, the evaluation and planning of the start-up businesses, go-to-market strategy, intellectual property, and financing. The course utilizes lectures,\u00a0 directed readings, and guest speakers. The goal is a meaningful understanding of how to design a new business venture, achieved by building and communicating the framework for a viable business.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2922, "title": "Big Red Ventures", "code": "NBA 5075", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Big Red Ventures is Cornell's student-run venture fund. Founded in 2000 as a student project, BRV fund managers source new investment opportunities, conduct opportunity assessments and due diligence, make investment recommendations, assess and vote on recommendations of other fund managers, and make investments in early-stage, high-growth startup companies. Fund managers also manage existing portfolio investments, conduct annual portfolio valuations, and prepare investor materials such as an annual report and annual meeting. BRV is a selective program, with an application and interview process open to MBAs, JDs, and PhD candidates. BRV fund managers operate under the guidance and oversight of experienced faculty. Open to selected students; full participation at either the Ithaca or Cornell Tech campuses, both fall and spring semester, is required.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2923, "title": "Advanced Financial Statement Analysis", "code": "NBA 5090", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course builds on the material of NBA 5060\u00a0and focuses on more advanced financial statement topics and specialized industries.\u00a0Topics may include investment research, accounting analysis, accounting quality, credit analysis, and advanced valuation issues.\u00a0\u00a0 Instruction focuses on a combination of lecture and case-based discussion.\u00a0 Students are expected to have taken NBA 5060\u00a0or possess a good understanding of basic financial statement analysis.\u00a0 The material is designed to broaden student's understanding of financial statement analysis and complement the tools developed in NBA 5060. The course deliverables include case write-ups, an equity research project, and a final exam.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2924, "title": "Financial Modeling", "code": "NBA 5110", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Financial modeling is the art and science of constructing spreadsheet models of firms' future financial statements. This class draws on and integrates students' knowledge of concepts learned in prior accounting classes by modeling the effect on the income statement, balance sheet, and statement of cash flows of financial transactions such as leveraged buyouts, mergers and acquisitions, and corporate reorganizations. The class meets in the state-of-the-art Parker Center computer lab, and active student participation is emphasized.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2925, "title": "Foundations of Financial Modeling", "code": "NBA 5111", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is NBA 5110 for non-MBA students. The course integrates financial analysis and financial modeling concepts to prepare students for careers in investment banking. Early classes focus on understanding and interpreting financial statements. Focus then shifts to building economically sound financial statement forecasts to create financial statement models. The second half of the course uses financial statement models to model equity valuations, alternative investment and financing decisions, leveraged buyouts and recapitalizations, and merger & acquisition transactions. The course presumes familiarity with basic financial accounting concepts, as well as basic corporate finance concepts and time-value of money.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2926, "title": "Applied Portfolio Management", "code": "NBA 5120", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the theory and practice of fundamental research, quantitative equity security selection, and equity portfolio management. Students have the unique opportunity as part of this course to manage the Cayuga Fund, a student managed fund with $1 million in assets under management from the Cornell University endowment. Students will serve as fundamental analysts, quantitative analysts and portfolio specialists for the fund. Instruction on analysis, portfolio management and the investment business are included in this course. Students are expected to assume leadership for managing the Fund by the end of the semester. The experience is similar to that offered to rising analysts and portfolio managers in buy-side investment firms. Students will learn credit research techniques, maintain their stock coverage and continue managing the Fund in the spring.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2927, "title": "Ethics and Corporate Culture", "code": "NBA 5140", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "In the high-pressure worlds of business and law, all too often good people do bad things.\u00a0 In many cases, the unethical behavior is due in part to a toxic corporate culture. The attitudes, values, and practices that prevail in their organizations induce otherwise ethical employees to take actions that violate widely shared norms of conduct. Such behavior can be costly-even disastrous-leading to ruined careers, tarnished corporate reputations, and legal liability for the individuals and their companies. In an environment where \"only results matter,\" it can be difficult for a new MBA or law school graduate to recognize the risks. If she does see the dangers, she may still find it hard to avoid them.\u00a0 This course seeks to help MBAs and law students understand how a firm's culture, combined with common human tendencies, can tempt-or push-employees into unethical behavior. It also considers how employees can meet ethical challenges posed by their firms' cultures. Class sessions include discussion of case studies and readings reporting on relevant research in psychology and organizational behavior, as well as the\u00a0annual Day Family Ethics Lecture by a noted guest speaker from business, law, journalism, or academia. The grade in the course is based on class participation and on two written case analyses, including a final project.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2928, "title": "Leadership Theory and Practice", "code": "NBA 5150", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course will focus on the challenges of effective leadership in a complex world. The course has four significant parts: 1. Exploring historical and contemporary theories and models of leadership through the required text and selected articles; 2. Examining and applying the Johnson School's Leadership Model; 3. Analyzing the practical challenges of leadership through case studies, and executive speakers; 4. Developing self-awareness of the student's leadership strengths and weaknesses through the use of behavioral instruments and group exercises and creating a personal action plan for improvement. A critical element of this course will be the coaching and feedback students will receive on their own leadership styles and behaviors from their peers and instructor.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2929, "title": "Intro to Design and Innovation", "code": "NBA 5180", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course introduces students to a design toolkit and mindset for creative problem solving. Embraced by major consulting firms, large corporations, tech start-ups and NGOs, design has rapidly emerged as an innovation driver. The design mindset enables a shift from a 20th century, market-based perspective to a more sustainable, human-centered approach to meet this century's systemic challenges. The course will introduce you to design strategy and provide you with the tools to apply it in a variety of settings, appropriate to careers in consulting, marketing, HR, new product development, financial services, digital tech, entrepreneurship and social innovation. Topics covered include: opportunity finding and innovation; the design thinking cycle of inspiration-interpretation-ideation-implementation; and visual communication. Students will learn to apply design strategies to their work to make it more integrated and collaborative. This course will require openness to new ways of (divergent) thinking.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2930, "title": "Retail Operations", "code": "NBA 5200", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course focuses on topics related to the operations of online and brick & mortar retailing firms, including the management of store operations, fulfillment and supply chains, merchandising, retail technology, and performance analysis of different kinds of retail formats. The course uses recent case studies, real-life data, and exercises to study these topics. It is designed for graduate students going into marketing, supply chain, and operations career paths.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2931, "title": "Introduction to Macroeconomics", "code": "NBA 5245", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The course introduces the basic tools of economic policies and the key issues of modern economies. The course provides the necessary knowledge to analyze the basic goals of macroeconomic policy i.e., low unemployment, stable inflation, financial stability, and stable and strong economic growth.\u00a0 Topics covered include, among others, economic growth, expansions and recessions, monetary and fiscal policies, GDP, inflation, unemployment, the public debt, interest rates, the trade deficit, exchange rates, and global markets. Although focusing on the U.S.\u2014 the world's largest national economy\u2014and paying special attention to its institutions and problems, the course will emphasize the global context in which it functions by periodically shifting attention to other economies around the world. Globalization-related issues such as international financial markets and global crises will be given special attention.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2932, "title": "Cayuga Fund Equity Analyst", "code": "NBA 5250", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The Cayuga Fund Equity Analyst program is designed for students interested in pursuing careers in securities research and investment management.\u00a0 This course allows select first year MBA students to participate in the management of the Cayuga Fund, a $1 million small-cap equity fund that invests money for the Cornell University endowment, under the guidance and mentorship of faculty and second year Cayuga Fund students who are taking NBA 5120\u00a0and NBA 5121.\u00a0 Students are assigned industry sectors to cover, and conduct investment research on the industries. Deliverables include participating in sector meetings and portfolio reviews and presenting industry research in the NBA 5120\u00a0class.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2933, "title": "Global Macroeconomics News and Events", "code": "NBA 5255", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The purpose of this advanced course is to help students become informed observers of\u2014and intelligent commentators on\u2014current global macroeconomic issues. Students are expected to have successfully completed\u00a0NBA 5245\u00a0(Introduction to\u00a0Macroeconomics) at Johnson (or an equivalent course elsewhere) and are hence expected to come with mastery of the\u00a0textbook concepts and topics. In this advanced course students will be using those concepts to dissect the most recent\u00a0news events. Every week, we will critically read and discuss cases, reports, forecasts, and analyses from government sources,\u00a0private-sector publications, academic studies, online commentary, and news outlets such as the Economist, Financial\u00a0Times, Wall Street Journal, and New York Times.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2934, "title": "Intermediate Design and Programming for Web", "code": "NBA 5301", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Web programming requires the cooperation of two machines: the one in front of the viewer (client) and the one delivering the content (server). INFO 1300\u00a0concentrates almost exclusively on the client side. The main emphasis in INFO 2300 is learning about server side processing. Students begin with a short overview of the PHP server-side scripting language, then look at interactions with databases, learning about querying via the database language SQL. Through a succession of projects, students learn how to apply this understanding to the creation of an interactive, data-driven site via PHP and the MYSQL database. Also considered are technologies such as Javascript and Ajax and techniques to enhance security and privacy. Design and usability issues are emphasized. A major component of the course is the creation of a substantial web site.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2935, "title": "Entrepreneurial Finance: Valuation and Term Sheet Design", "code": "NBA 5305", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to the challenges and pitfalls of financing new enterprises. The class sessions will combine lectures and cases. The course covers three broad topics: identifying and valuing opportunities, contract design and financing alternatives, and exit/harvesting strategies.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2936, "title": "Management Cases", "code": "NBA 5330", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is open only to Johnson first year students. The course builds case-cracking skills, a CEO perspective and developing and defending a fact-based point of view.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2937, "title": "Federal Income Taxation of Corporations and Shareholders", "code": "NBA 5350", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course presents the tax skills necessary to make business decisions pertaining to corporations and their shareholders.\u00a0 Emphasis is placed on such areas as a corporation's formation and capital structure, earnings and profits, dividend distributions, redemptions, liquidations and reorganizations of corporations.\u00a0 Practical application of the tax law will be emphasized with proper consideration placed on the historical, economic and political perspectives of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC).", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2938, "title": "Federal Income Taxation of Flow Through Entities, Estates and Trusts", "code": "NBA 5355", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course presents the tax skills necessary to make business decisions pertaining to \"flow-through entities\" and to a more limited extent transfer taxes, including the estate and gift tax.\u00a0 Emphasis is placed on such \"flow-through entities\" as partnerships and \"S\" Corporations.\u00a0 Partnership areas covered include the formation and operation of a partnership, transactions between partner and partnership, distributions from a partnership, including distributions to retiring or deceased partners, sale of a partnership interest, optional adjustments to property basis, and the termination of a partnership.\u00a0 The formation and operational rules surrounding an \"S\" corporation are also talked about, including the similarities and differences in compliance issues facing both a partnership and \"S\" corporation.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2939, "title": "Investment Banking Essentials", "code": "NBA 5360", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course will help students learn how to be investment bankers. Taught by an experienced ex-banker on the faculty of Johnson, this class will introduce students to capital raising, LBO, and strategic M&A transactions in a hands-on way that will focus on how to perform IB analyst-level duties. Students will be introduced to valuation (comps, precedents, and DCF), accretion/dilution, and how to assemble a pitch book. Working in groups, students will be presented with real-world assignments and will present their work in class. No prelim or final exam.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2940, "title": "Intensive Private Equity Practicum", "code": "NBA 5370", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The Practicum is an intense, hands-on program providing applied experience and maximum interaction with prominent private equity leaders. Prior to each meeting, the executives provide complete data sets on a recently closed or pending deal that the fund has managed. During scheduled class times and in independent and team-based work, the students perform analyses and prepare deal memoranda and presentations with respect to each deal. At each meeting, students meet with senior private equity executives from the firms and engage in discussion and analysis of these investments, acting as PE associates and making investment recommendations. The Practicum is designed to allow a more natural business interaction that mimics as closely as possible the partner/associate relationship.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2941, "title": "The Business Idea Factory", "code": "NBA 5380", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Do you want to become an entrepreneur, but you don't yet have that brilliant idea? This class will help you come up with new ideas and evaluate which ones are the most worth pursuing to ensure you invest your time and energies on ideas that have the most promise. The first section of the course will be about places and processes that you can use to find inspiration to come up with a large number of potential business ideas. We will then walk through a systematic process to evaluate, validate, and quantify the best ideas for each team. This process will be assisted by experienced entrepreneurs as guest speakers who will share the inspirations for their businesses, the methods they used to select those ideas as worthy of pursuit, as well as insights into their careers.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2942, "title": "Profiles in Leadership", "code": "NBA 5390", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Profiles in Leadership is Johnson's premier platform for c-level executive speakers. Johnson has long attracted an impressive array of executive speakers; this course provides a streamlined platform for students to engage regularly with industry luminaries such as Irene Rosenfeld, David Einhorn, and others. Each session will begin with a presentation by the invited guest, followed by a robust discussion about the topics raised in the lecture as well as issues related to current events and other experiences of the lecturer. Students are required to research each lecturer and submit a topical question via Canvas prior to the lecture.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2943, "title": "Project Management", "code": "NBA 5410", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course covers the basic concepts of project management. It will provide you an essential tool for introducing new products, programs, and processes in an organization, on time and on budget.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2944, "title": "Investment and Portfolio Management", "code": "NBA 5420", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The first half of the course focuses on the tools of disciplined investing: portfolio construction, diversification, arbitrage pricing, and valuation. We also cover factor investing (value & momentum strategies), fixed income pricing, and performance evaluation of institutional investors such as pension funds, private equity, and hedge funds. The second half of the course studies investing in the context of the global macroeconomy. We study how monetary policy and banking affect financial markets, along with the risks and opportunities of emerging market investing.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2945, "title": "The Search for Alpha", "code": "NBA 5450", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is intended primarily for more advanced students in finance and students interested in investing/investment management.\u00a0\u00a0 The course presumes an understanding of basic corporate finance theory, introductory accounting, financial analysis and an particularly an interest in financial markets. We will be covering several topics including active and passive investing, ETFs, fundamentals based quantitative investing and short-selling. I expect this course to be useful for students planning for careers in investment banking, investment management, wealth management, corporate management, private equity, venture capital, security analysis, credit analysis, consulting, or public accounting. \u00a0This course complements NBA 5060\u00a0(financial statement analysis), NBA 5110\u00a0(financial modeling), intermediate accounting and NBA 5090\u00a0(advanced financial statement analysis). You might consider taking these if you want to increase your knowledge in the area.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2946, "title": "Corporate Finance Immersion/Practicum", "code": "NBA 5490", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2947, "title": "Accounting and Financial Decision Making", "code": "NBA 5530", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Focuses on basic financial and managerial accounting and the economic and financial concepts that have a bearing on internal (i.e., managerial) and external (i.e., investors, creditors, regulators) users' decisions. The goals are to (1) give students a working knowledge of the accounting process and the value and limitations of the data that come out of the accounting information system; (2) familiarize students with key concepts in managerial accounting and the application of cost information to pricing and operating decisions; and (3) promote an understanding of the use of economic theory in the evaluation of capital investment projects.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2948, "title": "Investment Banking Immersion/Practicum", "code": "NBA 5560", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2949, "title": "Corporate Financial Policy", "code": "NBA 5580", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course develops the framework for evaluating the gains, costs, and risks of managing firms' financial assets and liabilities, as well as their interaction with real-side decisions (investment, mergers, R&D, employment, etc.). It takes the perspective of financial managers at public corporations, individuals that are responsible for financial decision-making, as well as that of market participants \u2015 e.g., investment bankers, analysts, fund managers, regulators \u2015 that monitor and evaluate corporate policies. Among other topics, the course will discuss issues related to corporate capital structure, dividend policy, issuance decisions, and liquidity risk management. The course will do so going beyond standard textbook coverage, making sense of available research on financial policy, looking at what CFOs think via field surveys, studying real-world examples of financial policy-making.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2950, "title": "The Venture Capital Industry and Private Equity Markets", "code": "NBA 5590", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Jesse Reyes is a leading private equity research expert providing advisory services to the private equity industry. His lectures will focus on the venture capital and private equity industries from the limited partner investor's perspective. Topics include (1) an introduction to the private equity ecosystem including its structure, participants, history, and trends; (2) institutional private equity investing-examining how private equity investment fits into the institutional investors asset allocation mix; (3) an examination of private equity performance measurement and trends and how structural differences in private equity investments make optimized allocation decisions challenging; and (4) emerging issues facing the private equity industry such as new regulatory initiatives, fundraising and market efficiency challenges. There is\u00a0an assigned problem set to be completed for class credit.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2951, "title": "Digital Platform Strategy", "code": "NBA 5615", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Business platforms are a set of business and technology building blocks that serve to facilitate the creation of complementary products and services. They are an essential feature of modern economies, particularly among products and services created by software. The emphasis of this course is on how to create, grow, gain value and capture market share from platforms. Course content will draw concepts from network effects, information asymmetry, pricing, and game theory. Students will apply these concepts to make decisions on how to manage platforms in case studies drawing from social media, entrepreneurship, enterprise software, and mobile services, among others. The course will be useful for students interested in founding new businesses, managing technology ventures and investing.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2952, "title": "Designing New Ventures", "code": "NBA 5640", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Designing New Ventures\u00a0is a comprehensive introduction to the key aspects of envisioning, starting and running a new business. New Ventures\u00a0focuses both on concepts and frameworks in entrepreneurship and on \"doing\" entrepreneurship. Students will form teams, ideate new businesses, complete customer development, construct business models and work towards\u00a0defining\u00a0minimum viable products. Topics covered will include definition of the market, sales and distribution, competition, hiring and management of people, cash flow and financial management, making compelling pitches and raising capital. The course culminates in a capstone project of writing a business plan and presenting to a group of entrepreneurs and investors.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2953, "title": "Corporate Governance", "code": "NBA 5650", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The goal of this course is to introduce you to the area of corporate governance. We will discuss the goal of the corporation and the role of stakeholders in the decision making. We will examine the sources of the conflict of interest between controllers of the organization and shareholders. We will then study the different mechanisms to overcome these conflicts, their advantages and disadvantages. We will also devote time to study differences in corporate governance systems across different countries. I put a strong emphasis in this class on current events and real life examples. Among the topics covered: the role, responsibilities, and strategies of the board of directors,\u00a0 shareholder activism and the mechanisms used to protect shareholders, the takeover market, the tender offer mechanism, and anti-takeover measures, the design of compensation contracts, and differences among the above mechanisms across different countries.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2954, "title": "Management Writing", "code": "NBA 5670", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is designed to develop your writing skills in the context of practical business applications. It begins with a strategic perspective on business writing and focuses on the elements that make your writing clear, concise, efficient, and effective.\u00a0 You will improve the engagement, clarity, content, and flow of your management writing as well as increase your confidence in your communication skills.\u00a0The course is suitable for students for whom English is their native language, as well as students for whom English may be a second or third language.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2955, "title": "Writing Style", "code": "NBA 5672", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course will help you explore how to phrase your ideas most effectively in professional settings\u2014in standard written (and carefully edited) American English.\u00a0 By focusing on principles that govern sentence structure, punctuation, phrasing, and tone, you'll learn to differentiate between what is grammatically correct, stylistically effective, and conventional in usage.\u00a0 Additionally, you'll learn to recognize common sentence-level writing weaknesses, to remedy them, and to produce powerful writing that readers can process quickly, easily, and unambiguously.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2956, "title": "Management Presentations", "code": "NBA 5680", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "NBA 5680 focuses on advancing the management presentation skills of graduate students. The course covers effective strategies and best practices for business presentations both in terms of content/organization and delivery (verbal and non verbal). The course emphasizes active learning and continuous student practice with feedback from peers and the instructor. By the\u00a0end of the class students raise their understanding and appreciation of effective presentation practices, increase their awareness of their own strengths and weaknesses and become noticeably improved communicators.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2957, "title": "Interpersonal Communications", "code": "NBA 5682", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Examines a range of interpersonal communication strategies and skills required of successful managers in the workplace. The course explores critical channels of communication distinctly different from formal management presentations and written business documents. Topics include listening skills, leading successful meetings, contributing effectively to meeting conversations, providing effective feedback (constructive criticism and crediting), accepting criticism in the work place, discussion skills, and persuading in dyads and small groups.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2958, "title": "Courageous Communication", "code": "NBA 5685", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "\"Courage is a heart word. The root of the word courage is cor - the Latin word for heart. In one of its earliest forms, the word courage meant \"To speak one's mind by telling all one's heart.\" Over time, this definition has changed, and today, we typically associate courage with heroic and brave deeds. But in my opinion, this definition fails to recognize the inner strength and level of commitment required for us to actually speak honestly and openly about who we are and about our experiences -- good and bad. Speaking from our hearts is what I think of as \"ordinary courage.\"\u00a0 Brene Brown", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2959, "title": "Management Consulting Essentials", "code": "NBA 5690", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course will help students learn about consulting and the skills and capabilities to be a successful consultant. The course will begin with a module on successful case interviews. The consulting process will be discussed and why it leads to successful solutions for complex business problems. With the consulting process understood the course will focus on developing a problem definition diagnostic framework, hypotheses, analytical approaches, data collection and conclusions. The course will also include concepts critical to consulting including interviewing to collect information, facilitating meetings, managing clients and their expectations, selling recommendations and developing impactful presentations. The course will use a combination of lectures, case work, individual and teamwork to learn the concepts.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2960, "title": "Cornell Management Simulation", "code": "NBA 5710", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "You've learned finance, marketing, operations, accounting, economics, management, leadership, statistics, and strategy. You've done a deep dive into at least one of these subject areas. But how do they fit together?\u00a0 How are they used to actually run a company? The Cornell Management Simulation elective course will give you the chance to form a team and run a company that will compete against your classmates in a simulated industry; this strategic management simulation was written by Johnson faculty and has been part of the MBA curriculum for over 20 years. At the beginning of the simulation, each team develops a strategy, and before the results of the last decision have been determined, presents an analysis of its performance and lessons learned in a final meeting. The first course meeting (mandatory to be in the class) introduces the simulation and its mechanics as well as a discussion of company strategy. Future weekly meetings review key business topics that teams encounter as they run their companies, and include\u00a0time for teams to review their performance and work on their company decisions. Grades are based on the value created for the company's shareholders (relative to other firms in the same industry), the team's strategy, and the instructor's evaluation of team's performance at the board meeting.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2961, "title": "Entrepreneurship in Creative Industries", "code": "NBA 5770", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course is focused on strategies for creating and growing market-leading firms in various creative industries. We will analyze business cases of such market-leaders in a wide range of creative industries such as art, fashion, film, food, music, publishing, and theater to explore and understand the economic, organizational, and sociological underpinnings of entrepreneurship, markets, and culture. The course is targeted towards students who are interested in creative work and creative industries and are inspired to start, work or consult for, or invest in large and small creative, high-impact firms. The course may also interest students more broadly seeking to understand how firms offering radical innovations can create new markets by addressing the entire market ecosystem.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2962, "title": "Consulting Problem-Solving Process", "code": "NBA 5780", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Focuses on understanding and applying the problem-solving process used by consultants. The course is organized around a simulated project to help students understand the process and skills needed to be successful in a consulting internship or beginning a career in consulting. There are assigned readings on interviewing and the client consultant relationship. You will work through the simulated project in problem definition and project planning, interview planning, data collection, analysis, developing conclusions and recommendations and final presentations.\u00a0There are three pairs assignments and two team assignments, an interim presentation and a final presentation. The final team presentation\u00a0will be live. We have a series of guest speakers for\u00a0almost all of the of the classes focusing on key areas for success in your internship and career.\u00a0 This course is designed for those interning in consulting or going into it full-time.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2963, "title": "Applied Principles of Business Strategy", "code": "NBA 5790", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course builds on the concepts covered in the core strategy course, NCC 5090.\u00a0It is designed to further develop and refine skills for analyzing, formulating, and implementing business strategies \u2013 and is organized into four modules.\u00a0Module 1 focuses on the entire \"ecosystem\" of strategy, including the strategy process, the key tools for strategic analysis, the key frameworks for strategy formulation, and the key levers for strategy implementation.\u00a0Module 2 goes deep into \"competitive games\" and research findings on what constitutes a \"successful\" strategy.\u00a0Module 3 focuses on strategy implementation, including decision-driven design models as the key linkage between strategy and organization, as well as repeatable models as the key engine to successful execution.\u00a0In addition, a methodology for change management will be introduced, illustrated, and put into practice.\u00a0Module 4 focuses on turbulence and the digital revolution, strategy under certainty, and full potential transformations.\u00a0Each module covers multiple real-life case examples and will conclude with a case study for classroom discussion.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2964, "title": "Investment Research & Asset Management Practicum", "code": "NBA 5830", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2965, "title": "Advanced Critical Thinking for Business Leaders", "code": "NBA 5885", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Building upon the foundational critical and strategic concepts introduced in NCC 5050\u00a0(Core Critical and Strategic Thinking), this course will:\u00a0(a) deepen your understanding of frameworks that aid in strategic analysis of organizational problems; (b)\u00a0explore additional concepts and skills that promote critically thoughtful analysis of complex dilemmas (e.g., framework for analyzing strategy/context fit, stakeholder analysis, change management, risk rating and monitoring); and (c) give you opportunities to practice persuasively communicating to key decision-makers your proposed solution to the complex organizational problems you have thoughtfully analyzed.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2966, "title": "Mergers and Acquisitions - Accounting, Modeling and Evaluations of Deals", "code": "NBA 5940", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course provides an overview of how to do the accounting and reporting for M&A deals.\u00a0 In addition, students are taught how to model, evaluate and perform critical analysis of M&A deals.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2967, "title": "Behavioral Finance", "code": "NBA 5980", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Behavioral Finance studies financial market phenomena that occur due to cognitive biases of market participants. This course introduces the conceptual framework of behavioral finance and investor psychology and then applies the framework to issues in stock market investing, real estate investing, and banking. Topics include: (1) investor psychological biases and irrational trading behavior; (2) limits of arbitrage and the risks of leveraged convergence trading; (3) behavioral finance trading strategies; (4) stock market and real estate bubbles; and (5) credit booms and financial crises.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2968, "title": "Leading Agile Innovation", "code": "NBA 6029", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "In this course students will work on improving their innovation skills. We will start by discussing the basic principles of agile innovation. We will then discuss those behaviors linked to innovation and creativity.\u00a0\u00a0Students will learn how to optimize innovation in a team setting. Students will also work on developing these skills in a 3 day innovation event (hackathon) where they will identify an unmet need and develop a solution to the opportunity build a prototype and business model around this solution and pitch this solution to a panel of investors. Students will gain a broader perspective of both the challenges (i.e. organizational and institutional) in an increasingly digital economy\u00a0and opportunities (i.e. unmet customer needs and possibilities for future ventures) in this economy. Students will formulate teams to generate solutions to real-world problems. Students will learn and apply team innovation principles, business model innovation, design thinking, and product development, the class will also cover the psychology of creativity, product pitches, and the basic principles of leading innovation in a team including team demography and team processes that drive innovation. Students will then practice these skills.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2969, "title": "Strategies for Sustainability", "code": "NBA 6030", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Corporations are under increasing pressure from shareholders, employees, communities, and activists to account for the environmental and social effects that their activities create. Increasingly, firms are taking strategic approach to addressing these issues, developing programs that fit their capabilities, resources, and cultures.\u00a0 Through a combination of cases, readings, lectures, videos, and simulations, class sessions will engage students in discussions to master new frameworks and tools that help make sense of the complexity of corporate sustainability and its role in business strategy.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2970, "title": "Evaluating Capital Investment Projects", "code": "NBA 6060", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course focuses on the financial-economic analysis of corporate investment (i.e., capital budgeting) decisions. One of the most important decisions a firm makes is how to best allocate its capital resources.\u00a0 This course will help students understand the tools and frameworks needed to analyze and communicate the value impact of proposed capital expenditures and strategic decisions.\u00a0 This course is especially useful to anyone preparing for a career role with input to business investment decisions, including marketing, operational, and corporate financial managers. Both conceptual understanding and practical implementations through case studies will be emphasized.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2971, "title": "Designing Data Products", "code": "NBA 6070", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course will help Johnson students to gain the necessary skills of building a data product. Many industries today are faced with high data volumes and there is an understanding that \"data is the new gold\". But value is not created by data; rather, it is created by the application of data for a B2B or B2C need.\u00a0To link the possibilities of data to business needs is a skill that is highly in demand in today's business world. This course aims to fill the current skill gap by educating students with the basic data skills that are needed in order to guide an organization to become data-centric and potentially create data products.\u00a0Classes will be a combination of lectures, discussions, and hands on training with data. The students will build their own predictive model, without the need to directly write code.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2972, "title": "Digital Marketing", "code": "NBA 6090", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The purpose of this class is to introduce you to fundamental concepts in digital marketing and prepare you for roles as a marketer, entrepreneur or product manager. Students will be exposed to an overview of the major players in the advertising and digital industries, as well as a variety of tools commonly found in start-ups and technology firms. I will cover this using a mixture of case studies, lectures, and guest speakers. My hope is that you will leave this course with the skills and a plan that you could refer to when you interview for established firms or starting your technology venture. Each year I will also use an emerging digital technology as an anchor for the speakers and the assignments, such as the interaction of AI and digital marketing.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2973, "title": "Disruptive Technologies", "code": "NBA 6120", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The continued half-century exponential growth of computer power has disrupted many historical business strategies and created new paradigm Shifts with the internet, the world wide web, search engines and mobile phones. Domains such as photography, television, entertainment, and the Computer industry itself have already been transformed and new technologies are emerging for communication, education, tourism as well as Scientific research for medicine, design, and manufacturing to name a few. To predict the disruptive changes of the future, it is best to first understand the technologies and their growth rates themselves. This short seven-week course attempts to explain the fundamentals behind the growth rates with emphasis on pictorial information including Computer graphics, modeling, rendering, simulations, and digital delivery systems. Topics such as social media, government regulations and Ethics will also be discussed.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2974, "title": "Women and Leadership", "code": "NBA 6130", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "What are the facts about the current state of women as leaders? What special challenges face women as they transition from students to managers to leaders? What do the latest research findings offer to\u00a0\u00a0organizations that want to benefit from more women leaders? In this course, we will take a multi-pronged approach to learning about women and leadership to better prepare students of both genders to lead in organizations. To do this, we will analyze case studies of women leaders pulled from a range of industries. We will review the current state of empirical evidence about the status of women as leaders, investigate the barriers that have made it more difficult for women to reach the top of the business world, and consider ways in which individuals and organizations can overcome them. Finally, there will be time to engage in deep reflection about what students expect from their careers, as well as a chance to consider the pathways they must take to become effective and inclusive leaders in increasingly diverse organizations.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2975, "title": "AI Strategy and Applications", "code": "NBA 6145", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Artificial Intelligence (AI) is a science and set of computational techniques that are inspired by the way that humans use their nervous systems and bodies to sense, learn, reason and take action. In recent years, AI has emerged as one of the most important disruptions facing business and society over the next several decades. While AI is not new and has been around for more than 60 years, the confluence of certain trends over the last decades and accelerating technological change has introduced a new urgency into the study of the impact of AI on business, government and society.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2976, "title": "Marketing Research", "code": "NBA 6200", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The course is aimed at students who are interested in pursuing activities in marketing strategy and analytics. The primary objective of this course is to provide students how marketing research can help drive strategic business and marketing decisions. Students will be exposed to the practical side of marketing research (e.g., research design, qualitative research, survey research, marketing analytics) through case studies, hands-on exercises, and projects. This course is particularly relevant for students interested in careers in consulting, product, service and brand management, and retailing as well as for entrepreneurs.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2977, "title": "Strategic Product and Marketing Immersion", "code": "NBA 6240", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2978, "title": "Core Leadership Skills for a VUCA World", "code": "NBA 6320", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Core Leadership Skills for a VUCA World is designed to provide students with an opportunity to expand their knowledge and understanding of the key leadership skills required for success in today's volatile, uncertain, complex, and ambiguous business world through discussion and interaction with an experienced practitioner and former leader of the United States Army. The course will be comprised of four modules: 1) Leadership Principles for a Volatile, Uncertain, Complex and Ambiguous World; 2) Developing and Communicating Vision and Strategy; 3) Setting Conditions for Success; and, 4) Character and Leadership. Coursework to include readings, discussion, and a final paper.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2979, "title": "Actualizing Your Startup - Part II", "code": "NBA 6330", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Actualizing Your Startup Parts 1 and 2 are performance learning courses, based around student projects in the form of students and teams starting their own companies. eLab's instructors serve as coaches, guides, mentors, teachers, and assistants to the teams, and will coordinate the involvement of a number of high-profile mentors from the startup and venture capital community. Students will enhance their business and entrepreneurship learning by putting theoretical concepts into practice in starting and growing their own companies in a team environment. We expect that students will take this opportunity to \"make it real\" - eLab is not about starting theoretical companies, or theoretically exploring potential business ideas. Rather, it is about starting real companies that have the potential to grow and provide employment and economic benefit to their founders, and to provide deep experiential learning in starting and growing a business.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2980, "title": "Customer Analytics and Strategy", "code": "NBA 6340", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The course is aimed at students who are interested in pursuing activities in customer strategy and analytics built around the notion of customer centricity. The primary objective of this course is to provide students how customer management can help accomplish strategic initiatives, improve firm profitability and build lasting competitive advantage. Students will be exposed to the practical side of customer management through case studies and hands-on exercises. This course is particularly relevant for students interested in careers in consulting, product, service and brand management, and retailing as well as for entrepreneurs.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2981, "title": "Current Global Issues for Business: the US, Europe, China, and Emerging Markets", "code": "NBA 6370", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The objective of the course is to deepen students' understanding of current issues of business-government relations. In particular, the course will help students contextualize political, economic or business events and their consequences for conducting business in different parts of the world. The course is organized around the analysis of a series of current events that illustrate specific challenges and opportunities. Some of the main topics include world trade in the current context, nationalism and business in Europe, doing business under single-party rule in China, populism's risks and opportunities for business environments. Students will analyze current news in both developed (US, Europe) and emerging markets (China, Brazil, Mexico). The course will strive to expose students to different points of view on these issues and their implications.\u00a0 This course will give students the tools to navigate the volatility, uncertainty, complexity, and ambiguity of the current international environment. It will provide a VUCA and scenario planning frameworks to help students understand 1) The rapid pace of political, economic and financial changes in both developed and emerging markets and the connections between both 2) Paradigm changes 3) Risk scenario management 4) Business strategies for different types of markets and 5) Different sources of news/data from emerging markets.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2982, "title": "Finance and Sustainable Global Enterprise Colloquium", "code": "NBA 6380", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Finance + Sustainable Global Enterprise Colloquium is meant to provide students the opportunity to hear in-depth presentations in interactive sessions with leaders from the private, public, or non-profit sectors who are on the cutting edge of the finance-sustainability domain. The class will leverage connections from the Center for Sustainable Global Enterprise and faculty active in the finance industry. Session structures will vary in format and are likely to include lectures, living case studies, panel discussions, and moderated Q&A. The instructor will strive for representation of a variety of areas, including public and private equity, investment banking, and managerial finance. Content will span environmental finance, impact investing, socially responsible investing, capital budgeting, project financing, and other areas relevant to the sustainable global enterprise space. The course will be open to any interested student, but students selected for the Center's Environmental Finance & Impact Investing (EFII) Fellows Program will be required to enroll in the course. In addition to speaker sessions, there will be 1-3 additional sessions focused on synthesizing.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2983, "title": "Entrepreneurial Strategy for Technology Ventures", "code": "NBA 6385", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "For description and learning outcomes, see AEM 6385.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2984, "title": "Supply Chain Analytics", "code": "NBA 6420", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "A supply chain is a network of organizations that are involved in the different processes and activities that produce value in the form of products and services.\u00a0 Supply chain management is an essential tool for firms to achieve profit maximization as well as social responsibility.\u00a0 Innovations arise from three main sources: application of information technology, reconfiguration of the supply chain network, and modification of incentives.\u00a0 In this course, we will introduce analytical methods and innovative designs of supply chain management, with applications in both developed and emerging economies.\u00a0 We will address the following issues: cross-docking and automation; global project management and coordination; dynamic pricing and revenue management; humanitarian logistics and sustainability; and counter-strategy for illicit supply chains.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2985, "title": "Managerial Spreadsheet Modeling", "code": "NBA 6430", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The goal of this hands-on, lab-style course is to develop proficiency in quantitative modeling within the environment of Microsoft Excel. Students develop and use spreadsheets to analyze a variety of business problems. The course has two principal components: spreadsheets and models. Spreadsheet topics include principles of good spreadsheet design, the effective presentation of information through spreadsheets (including graphical controls and dashboard design), and advanced Excel features (e.g., conditional formatting, data validation). Modeling topics include the art of finding the appropriate level of modeling detail, sensitivity analysis, and using solver and regression to perform optimization and estimation tasks.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2986, "title": "Financial Institutions", "code": "NBA 6460", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course explores the economic functions, institutional design, and regulation of financial institutions. Beginning with conventional deposit-taking banks, the course examines the risks embedded within the business of banking, along with how regulation seeks to manage these risks. It then expands this framework to examine several other forms of 'non-bank' financial intermediation including investment banks, insurance companies, wholesale funding markets, structured finance markets, money market and other investment funds, and financial market infrastructure. The course also examines some of the related consumer/investor protection problems and how financial regulation seeks to address them.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2987, "title": "Advanced Spreadsheet Modeling", "code": "NBA 6470", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2988, "title": "Digital Technology Practicum", "code": "NBA 6480", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2989, "title": "Strategic Operations Immersion Practicum", "code": "NBA 6500", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2990, "title": "Introduction to SQL and Tableau", "code": "NBA 6550", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course teaches the basic skills for management, manipulation, and visualization of large datasets. It is designed for business applications, and thus, features datasets and assignments related to different kinds of business data. Students will learn how to use SQL to store, manage, and query databases; construct quick and insightful multi-dimensional analyses; and use Tableau to build visualizations. Along the way, students learn basic coding skills. Students with good background in programming or SQL should not take this course. This material complements, but is not required, for the course in machine learning for business applications NBA 6920.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2991, "title": "Valuation Principles", "code": "NBA 6560", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course provides fundamental concepts and tools to value firms and assets using an economic framework. It begins with an overview of three approaches to valuation: 1) discounted cash flow (DCF); 2) valuation by multiples using comparable firms; and 3) real-options. We will first discuss how valuation by multiples and the DCF approach are one and the same. Then, we will discuss these two approaches in detail. We will also discuss issues concerning the cost of capital, and the real-options approach to value assets. Both conceptual understanding and practical implementations through case studies will be emphasized.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2992, "title": "Sustainable Global Enterprise Practicum", "code": "NBA 6580", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2993, "title": "Executive Compensation", "code": "NBA 6607", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course will provide students with an overview of the design, structure, purpose, and \"fairness\" of executive compensation as seen from the perspective of all stakeholders including executives, other employees, regulators, board members, institutional shareholders, independent advisors, and the independent press. Students will learn the structure of all components of executive pay (including base pay, annual incentives, performance plans, and equity-based pay), understand how performance and pay levels are determined, and investigate how the various stakeholders interact in the decision-making process. The course will examine each critical decision made in the executive pay determination process to uncover why decisions are made and the leverage applied by each of the constituent parties. The course will also examine the linkages between executive compensation, corporate governance,\u00a0and business strategy as well as the issues surrounding compliance with securities laws, tax regulations, accounting standards, and corporate governance. Lectures will be supplemented with guest speakers representing the stakeholder groups.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2994, "title": "Managerial Decision Making", "code": "NBA 6630", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course attempts to make its participants better managerial decision makers. However, most students find that the course applies equally well to their personal decisions. There are two other objectives. The first is to convey an enduring understanding of decision concepts, skills, and tools that, taken as a whole, comprise a troubleshooter's guide to dealing with the uncertainty, complexity, and conflict of the professional world. The second is to provide a framework for a good decision process in which all of the decision concepts, skills, and tools fit coherently. The pedagogical approach uses lectures, in-class exercises, and applications.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2995, "title": "The Strategic Management of Technology and Innovation", "code": "NBA 6650", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This is an introductory management course covering the strategic management of technology and innovation in established firms as well as startup organizations. This course is designed for students who may someday work in, consult for, and/or create firms whose primary product is fundamentally related to technology or innovation. The course typically includes both M.B.A. students and graduate students in science. It starts by examining how industries are transformed by new technologies and how these patterns of industrial change generate both opportunity and high rates of firm failure. We will then explore the questions: Why do some technology leaders fail? and How do technology innovators successfully take on and replace incumbent firms? This leads to an examination of internal management issues, focusing on the design of innovative organizations: designing reward systems, managing growth, overcoming resistance to change, and using organizational culture to promote innovation.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2996, "title": "Crisis Communications for Business Leaders", "code": "NBA 6682", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Business leaders today constantly face crises that threaten their company's reputation. Such defining moments require effective crisis communication to mitigate negative effects, build trust with the organization's internal and external audiences and navigate through the crisis gracefully and effectively towards resolution. In this course you will learn to anticipate and appreciate the complexities and challenges of brand reputation management during a crisis and develop strategies and techniques to communicate with various constituencies, especially the media/public, employees and major stakeholders. You will apply principles of effective crisis communication management through a simulation, and will develop message maps for emergency and other crisis scenarios. Course work includes readings, case analyses, and simulations.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2997, "title": "Building a Consumer Internet Business", "code": "NBA 6690", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Building almost any consumer-facing business at scale requires using the internet for core operations around attracting and engaging users, and generating revenue. Even traditionally \"offline\" industries, such as transportation and education, have been deeply disrupted by the deployment of consumer-facing internet services, by both new entrants and incumbents. This trend has been accelerated by the Covid-19 pandemic and the social distancing steps taken to contain it. In this course, we study key themes relevant to building a successful consumer-facing internet business - (1) user growth and engagement, (2) monetization, and (3) leveraging platforms.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2998, "title": "Ethical Decision Making in Management", "code": "NBA 6710", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Poor moral judgment can ruin a manager's career or even sink a company. In general, an organization cannot survive without the trust of numerous stakeholders, and ethical lapses destroy trust and threaten vital stakeholder relationships. In today's volatile and fiercely competitive business environment, a manager must be able to identify and effectively resolve ethical issues that inevitably arise in the pursuit of business (and career) objectives. This course is designed to enhance students' skills in moral reasoning as it applies to managerial decision making. It thus examines normative concepts and principles that typically enter into moral reasoning and uses those concepts and principles in analyzing real-world cases.\u00a0Discussions are designed to help students understand the moral issues confronting the decision makers in the cases and explore how those issues might be addressed in ethically responsible ways.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":2999, "title": "Managing Family and Privately Held Firms", "code": "NBA 6720", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Most companies around the world are controlled by their founding families, including more than half of all public corporations in Europe, and more than two thirds of those in Asia. Even in the United States, where ownership dispersion is at its highest, founding families exercise a significant degree of control over more than half of all public corporations. This course explores the challenges and opportunities created by family leadership and ownership. This elective is designed for students who may be involved in family firms and closely held companies in a variety of roles: joining either their own family's or someone else's firm, and students who will do business with family firms, consult to them, invest in them, work with them in private wealth management, mergers and acquisitions, banking, consulting etc. Through case studies, lectures, student projects and guest speakers, the course provides students with exposure to the unique finance, governance, and management issues faced by family firms, and ways in which these issues can be addressed. The course provides students with a framework for analyzing how family ownership, control, and management affect value, and whether and how more value can be created for the various stakeholders. The course brings an integrated financial and managerial perspective to the study of family firms focusing on the financial and corporate governance aspects of family control and their managerial implications.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3000, "title": "Negotiation I: Negotiation Essentials", "code": "NBA 6820", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Negotiation is the art and science of securing an agreement between people who have some conflicting interests.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3001, "title": "Digital Business Operations", "code": "NBA 6850", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Digital Business Operations is designed for students who wish to work in the tech industry or tech consulting, and want to gain knowledge for designing and managing operations for digital and data-driven businesses. The course is divided into four modules --- the first uses case studies to analyze how data enables productivity, efficiency, scale and creation of better products, the second module studies an organization as a data factory, the third module examines applications of technology in manufacturing, retail, and services businesses, and the final module examines the implications of the future of work for operations. The course uses recent case studies and exercises drawn from a variety of current companies and topics.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3002, "title": "Startup Learning Series", "code": "NBA 6860", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "An introduction of core concepts encountered in entrepreneurial businesses. The class is designed to broadly prepare students for working in start-up entrepreneurial environments and assist in fostering a like mindset. The course consists of lectures, guest speakers and a short written paper. By the end of the course, students will be able to discuss topics and issues related to beginning and running start-up companies. Participants will understand terminology and general concept categories including idea validation and market assessment, product and marketing strategy, networking, team selection culture and team building, legalities formation issues, business partnerships, marketing tactics, patents trademarks copyrights and financing business.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3003, "title": "Leading Across Differences: Understanding Identity, Dialogue, and Influence", "code": "NBA 6870", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "As a leader in any organizational context, your ability to collaborate with a diverse range\u00a0of colleagues is a key driver of individual influence and collective success. Through a highly interactive and engaging process known as intergroup dialogue, this course will provide students with an opportunity to: explore how their own social identities shape their professional choices and leadership style, build capability to have meaningful dialogue and effective collaboration across social, cultural and power differences, and explore the power of alliances and allies when seeking to create an inclusive team/organizational environment. The primary assignments for this course are readings and written reflections\u00a0with class participation being a significant portion of the grade.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3004, "title": "Financial Distress, Bankruptcy and Restructuring", "code": "NBA 6880", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "This course develops the framework for evaluating the gains, costs, and risks of managing firms' assets and liabilities in financial distress, including periods of formal bankruptcy and restructuring. It takes the perspective of managers as well as that of capital market participants \u2015 e.g., distress investors, analysts, legal professionals, regulators \u2015 that monitor and evaluate corporate policies in distress situations. The course will do so going beyond standard textbook coverage, making sense of practice and available research on financial distress, bankruptcy and reorganizations, looking at what professionals think and act via surveys, as well as in-depth study of real-world situations. All of these elements are integrated and analyzed with rigorous method. Our ultimate goal is to understand the objectives different economic agents mean to achieve given the institutional constraints they face in distress situations.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3005, "title": "Physical Product Entrepreneurship", "code": "NBA 6910", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "The Physical Product Entrepreneurship course introduces students to the renaissance in physical product development created by the emergence of new desktop manufacturing technologies, small-scale electronics production, and internet based market aggregation all combined with Lean Startup principals. Unlike an engineering course that focuses on the \"nuts and bolts\" of creating a physical product this course will examine the creation of the product business itself rather than the actual device. This course is appropriate for the student exploring the creation of a hardware startup as well as students pursuing a career in product management at a physical product company. Topics covered will include both the current state of the ecosystem and provide a framework for accessing and incorporating upcoming innovations.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3006, "title": "Machine Learning Applications in Business", "code": "NBA 6920", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Learn the diverse data mining techniques used in business applications to recognize patterns and make intelligent use of large amount of data. This includes logistic regression, classification trees, clustering and more.\u00a0\u00a0 Get a sense of the range of applications of data mining techniques in business, healthcare, and elsewhere, gain hands-on experience through realistic samples and a project using real data.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3007, "title": "Machine Learning Applications in Business", "code": "NBA 6921", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3008, "title": "Strategy and Tactics of Pricing", "code": "NBA 6930", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Pricing is one of the most powerful levers that a firm can use to maximize profits. However, this opportunity to impact profits often remains untapped as many managers do not know how to improve upon historical pricing practices within their companies and industries.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3009, "title": "Game Theory and Business Strategy", "code": "NBA 6950", "subject": "NBA", "descr": "Game theory is a systematic tool of analysis when a situation involves more than one\u00a0interest groups. Strategic interactions among these groups often lead to interesting and unexpected outcomes. The key to good business decision lies in the ability to think in the shoes of others. This course delivers the basic concepts and tools of game theory with focus on intuition and applications. We will encounter some simple algebra, but math is not the focal point.", "tags": "NBA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3010, "title": "Managerial Reporting", "code": "NBAY 5020", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "This course focuses on using internal organizational data to improve decision making. In this class, we discuss cost behavior, the use of cost information for internal decision making, behavioral impacts on management planning and control, budgeting, variance analysis, and the measurement and management of innovation and customer relationships. Instruction is a mixture of lecture and case discussion. Grading is based on exams, short quizzes, and class contribution.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3011, "title": "Social Entrepreneurship", "code": "NBAY 5100", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "The goal of this course to prepare students to lead companies that have embedded social missions and to engage various stakeholders that are at the nexus of business and social value. Internally, leaders will need to be prepared to manage the organization's culture, establish a mission, and find synergies in pursuit of a triple bottom line. Externally, leaders must manage not only supply chain and customer relationships, but also seek to fundamentally change the social, environmental and legal environments in which business operates.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3012, "title": "Design Thinking", "code": "NBAY 5180", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "This hands-on course will prepare you to be future innovators by teaching you Design Thinking, the human-centered design methodology pioneered by IDEO and Stanford d.school founder, David Kelley. You will work on a team with peers from other disciplines so as to experience the importance of \"radical collaboration.\" All teams will work on the same challenge, and you will be asked to design an innovative solution to this complex problem.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3013, "title": "Future of Work", "code": "NBAY 5295", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "This integrative course is designed for advanced MBA students to develop an understanding of the drivers changing the nature of work, jobs, management, and leadership, explore the primary dimensions reshaping work and careers, and to prepare students to lead large organizations and startups with an understanding of these new dynamics.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3014, "title": "Entrepreneurship and Alternative Finance in Emerging Economies", "code": "NBAY 5550", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "Economic and financial development are inextricably intertwined. Unless companies have sufficient access to financial resources, they are unable to grow, become more productive and create new jobs. Entrepreneurial startups face particularly important challenges. In the early phases of their life cycle, few, if any, young firms have enough tangible assets that they can pledge as collateral. As a result, these companies usually find it difficult to borrow from banks. While this is true in advanced economies, this challenge is often unsurmountable in emerging economies. At the same time, however, startups tend to be particularly innovative. Without transformational entrepreneurs who have access to sufficient funding, it is difficult for emerging economies to foster technological change and productivity growth through a process of creative destruction. As a result, underdeveloped financial systems are generally seen as a major impediment to economic growth.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3015, "title": "FinTech Intensive Practicum", "code": "NBAY 5600", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "The goal of the Fintech Intensive is to immerse students in the emerging Financial Technology sector. \u00a0We will explore the landscape, analyze past moves, discuss current trends, and identify future opportunities, while discussing real problems and solutions at start-ups, traditional financial services firms, and the VC and consulting communities which serve them.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3016, "title": "Sales and Business Development", "code": "NBAY 5640", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "Sales and Business Development provides an overview of the principles and practices of direct sales and business development leveraging research, practical and experiential resources.\u00a0 Classes include instructor-driven content, expert practitioner guests, and experiential exercises. \u00a0Participants will develop a go-to-market sales strategy for their startup projects as a final deliverable for the class.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3017, "title": "FinTech Group Field Project", "code": "NBAY 5650", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3018, "title": "Cryptocurrencies and Blockchains", "code": "NBAY 5710", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "The course provides a crash course in modern cryptography, and next applies tools from cryptography to introduce students to the main ideas underlying cryptocurrencies and blockchains.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3019, "title": "Entrepreneurship in Creative Industries", "code": "NBAY 5770", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "Firms in creative industries influence many physical and psychological aspects of our lives, from what we eat and wear to how we entertain ourselves, but markets for cultural goods are complex and difficult to navigate. Entrepreneurs must, therefore, understand the structure and functioning of the cultural market and ecosystem in order to sustainably capture economic value. Students will analyze business cases of firms in a wide range of creative industries such as art, fashion, music, publishing, and theater to explore and understand the strategic underpinnings of entrepreneurship and markets in an increasingly global and digital world. The course is appropriate for students wishing to pursue careers in incumbent and entrepreneurial firms in the art, fashion, media, publishing, film and music industries.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3020, "title": "Digital Marketing Foundations", "code": "NBAY 5800", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "The objective of this course is to provide a framework for understanding digital marketing planning within the context of a total integrated marketing plan, with an opportunity to apply the learning in both this course's individual assignment and the team project course. The goal is to help students better understand the capabilities of the different digital marketing platforms to move the target along the customer journey and achieve the key business objectives brands measure: awareness, trial, repeat purchase (frequency & amount per occasion), advocacy, net promoter score, ROI or ROAS, conversions, sales, profits and market share. The course incorporates the latest thinking and practices in digital marketing plan development, taking big data into account.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3021, "title": "Digital Marketing Group Field Project", "code": "NBAY 5850", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "The objectives of this\u00a0Digital Marketing Project course is to enable students to develop an annual digital marketing plan for a product or service within the context of a total 360 degree marketing plan.\u00a0 It will be a capstone project that will enable students to apply learning from the Digital Marketing Analytics and Platforms, Tools & Technologies courses.\u00a0 It is very practical, as it reflects how brands plan and make trade-offs between traditional and digital marketing and among digital marketing options, when informed by available data analytics.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3022, "title": "Big Data in Marketing", "code": "NBAY 6030", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "The skills needed to thrive in marketing careers, and the skills needed to practice marketing in startups, are evolving very fast, from discrete campaigns, executed by creative people, to continuous processes, certainly designed by creative people but now executed by smart machines. Marketing is changing because we have much more data, new ways to store and deploy the data, new machine learning capabilities, more social forms of media, shifts in how retailing is done, new platform business models, and, resisting these trends, a growing consumer concern for privacy. This course examines five slices of data-intensive marketing. They are advertising, customer relationship management, identity and privacy, platforms, and the integration of human judgment with machine learning. We study the new institutions that support marketing, and that is important for several reasons. First, marketing managers need to decide who to partner with. They have to assemble what the industry calls a \"stack\" of marketing technology partners and suppliers. Second, the entrepreneurs who build these institutions need to know how they fit together into an ecosystem, how they collaborate and how they compete. Third there is a tension between the tech giants, Google, Amazon, and Facebook, that offer themselves as fully integrated systems for the practice of data-driven marketing, and the rest of the institutional space, which contains large specialized firms such as Salesforce.com and Adobe, and smaller niche specialists. Marketers and investors should have a point of view on whether, or to what extent, the future lies with the giants, or the more open system of data flows among the niches.\u00a0 In sum, the goal of the course is to introduce the marketing ecosystem within which students of today, both data scientists and managers, will make their careers. The course uses case studies and guests.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3023, "title": "Disruptive Technologies", "code": "NBAY 6120", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3024, "title": "Women Leading in Tech", "code": "NBAY 6130", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "What are the facts about the current state of women as leaders? What special challenges face women as they transition from students to managers to leaders? What do the latest research findings offer to organizations in Tech\u00a0that want to benefit from more women leaders? In this course, we will take a multi-pronged approach to learning about women and leadership to better prepare students of both genders to lead in organizations. To do this, we will analyze case studies of women leaders pulled from a range of industries. We will review the current state of empirical evidence about the status of women as leaders, investigate the barriers that have made it more difficult for women to reach the top of the business world, and consider ways in which individuals and organizations can overcome them. Finally, there will be time to engage in deep reflection about what students expect from their careers, as well as a chance to consider the pathways they must take to become effective and inclusive leaders in increasingly diverse organizations.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3025, "title": "Core Leadership Skills for a VUCA World", "code": "NBAY 6320", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "Core Leadership Skills for a VUCA World is designed to provide students with an opportunity to expand their knowledge and understanding of the key leadership skills required for success in today's volatile, uncertain, complex, and ambiguous business world through discussion and interaction with an experienced practitioner and former leader of the United States Army. The course will be comprised of four modules: 1) Leadership Principles for a Volatile, Uncertain, Complex and Ambiguous World; 2) Developing and Communicating Vision and Strategy; 3) Setting Conditions for Success; and, 4) Character and Leadership. Coursework to include readings, discussion, and a final paper.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3026, "title": "Business Models", "code": "NBAY 6570", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "What does it take to make an idea or concept into a successful commercial undertaking? Well, a whole lot - a great product in a compelling market, a strong team with determination, and most certainly a sound business model. A business model defines how a company creates value with key resources and processes, how that value is delivered to customers, and ultimately how the company makes profits for shareholders. This course will cover different business model types as they evolve through a company's growth as well as the implications communicated via its financial models.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3027, "title": "Great Books V2.0: Lessons for Living and Leading in a Digital World", "code": "NBAY 6600", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "This is a course modeled on a \"core curriculum\" comprising foundational texts that provide a comprehensive and shared base of knowledge that enables students to critically examine the role of technology, and by extension, their own role as leaders in the current social, economic, and political context. Like any 'Great Books' course, this course aims to prepare informed and active leaders for the greater good in the digital era. The books we will read in this seminar-style, discussion-based course are both cheerleaders and challengers of technology and business and the classroom discussions of the merits and demerits of the arguments in these books will help students learn about both the impact of technology on business and in society as well as how to mitigate the negative and augment the positive consequences. It will also build students' abilities to analyze topics and construct and articulate arguments.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3028, "title": "Managerial Decision Making", "code": "NBAY 6630", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "This course has one overarching objective, to make its participants better decision makers through the provision of a framework for a good decision process. More specific objectives are: (a) to understand the critical role of framing, so that participants are able to structure their decisions in the most useful way(s) and to see how coworkers, competitors, and other stakeholders view the same decision situation; (b) to identify typical shortcomings in intuitive judgment and provide methods for overcoming these shortcomings; (c) to develop the skill of using multiple scenarios to make decisions in the face of great uncertainty and complexity; and (d) to provide tools for managing group decisions.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3029, "title": "Negotiations", "code": "NBAY 6660", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "We negotiate every day with prospective employers, teammates, roommates, landlords, service providers, and many others. What prices we want to pay, how much we want to be paid, how assignments will be divided and credit allocated\u2026 all of these are negotiations. Yet, while we negotiate routinely, many of us know very little about the strategy and psychology of effective negotiations. Why do we sometimes get our way while other times we walk away feeling frustrated by our inability to achieve the agreement we desire?", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3030, "title": "Leading Digital Transformation and Innovation", "code": "NBAY 6750", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "We are in the midst of a digital tsunami. Digital technologies have progressed exponentially over the last decades and a tipping point has been reached. Further the pace of progress in digital technologies shows no signs of slowing down. All industries are susceptible to the forces of digital transformation and most executives are or will soon be confronted by the dynamics of digital disruption. There will be significant new opportunities as the underlying forces of digital disruption and value creation are understood and leveraged. Succeeding in this rapidly changing world will require both a solid understanding of digital products, services and business models and an inspirational leadership style to be bold, take risks and lead complex change.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3031, "title": "Digital Wealth Management", "code": "NBAY 6770", "subject": "NBAY", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NBAY", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3032, "title": "Marketing Management", "code": "NCC 4530", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "This course introduces students to the basic principles of marketing management. The course will familiarize students with all the key concepts in the field, including marketing strategy, marketing analysis (i.e., customer analysis, competitor analysis, and company analysis), and marketing mix (product/ pricing/ advertising and promotion, and distribution). The course will employ a mix of lectures and field-based reading materials to introduce these principles.\u00a0 A major component of the course will focus on case discussions that will provide students an opportunity to apply the marketing principles by critically analyzing real-world marketing scenarios.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3033, "title": "Data Analytics and Modeling", "code": "NCC 5010", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "This course will expose you to data analysis and modeling techniques for understanding business situations and improving business decisions under uncertainty. Specific topics are structured data, unstructured data, probability, sampling, confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression, simulation, data visualization, decision analysis, and practical applications.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3034, "title": "Managing Operations", "code": "NCC 5080", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "Focuses on managing processes: actions that convert inputs into outputs. Almost any business function can be modeled as a network of processes. The first part of the course examines processes, both individually and as part of a larger system.\u00a0 It also covers queuing theory and Monte Carlo simulation, both of which are particularly helpful for analyzing process capabilities. The second part of the course analyzes how goods and services are produced. \u00a0In particular, it examines quality and lean operations, inventory and forecasting, and supply chain management.\u00a0 The second part also covers constrained optimization models, which provides information about handling finite resources. \u00a0An overall common course theme is the deleterious effect of variability (in demand, supply, quality, or capacity) in complex systems.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3035, "title": "Financial Accounting", "code": "NCC 5500", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "Introductory accounting course that examines the subject from the viewpoint of users external to the organization. Topics include transaction analysis; the accounting cycle; financial-statement preparation, use, and analysis; revenue recognition and cost measurement; present value; and problems in financial-accounting disclosure.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3036, "title": "Marketing Management", "code": "NCC 5530", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "This course introduces students to the basic principles of marketing management. The course will familiarize students with all the key concepts in the field, including marketing strategy, marketing analysis (i.e., customer analysis, competitor analysis, and company analysis), and marketing mix (product/ pricing/ advertising and promotion, and distribution). The course will employ a mix of lectures and field-based reading materials to introduce these principles.\u00a0 A major component of the course will focus on case discussions that will provide students an opportunity to apply the marketing principles by critically analyzing real-world marketing scenarios.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3037, "title": "Managerial Finance", "code": "NCC 5560", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to business finance through lectures and assignments. The content of the course varies with the section and instructor. Topics may include basic financial accounting, time value of money, stock and bond valuation, capital budgeting, portfolio theory, asset-pricing models, cost of capital, dealing with risk, capital structure, acquisitions, and options. Application of theory to practical applications will be stressed in the lectures.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3038, "title": "Managing Operations", "code": "NCC 5580", "subject": "NCC", "descr": "Operations Management is the design and management of processes that transform inputs into finished goods or services. All organizations have operations that directly affect their ability to execute on their specified strategies. This course prepares students to think analytically and managerially about operations processes, and to use the tools and intuition they acquire to ensure that the operations in production and service systems support the business strategies for these systems. A process view of operations will be used to analyze different key operational dimensions such as flow time management, service operations management, quality management, inventory management and supply chain management.", "tags": "NCC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3039, "title": "Elements of Nepali Language and Culture", "code": "NEPAL 1100", "subject": "NEPAL", "descr": "The course will introduce basic Nepali language and elements of Nepalese culture to anyone who is interested in the subject matter, e.g. those planning to travel to Nepal, those having a desire to know about Nepalese culture, or those having the goal to excel in Nepalese language skills in the future.", "tags": "NEPAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3040, "title": "Elementary Nepali II", "code": "NEPAL 1102", "subject": "NEPAL", "descr": "Intended for beginners. The emphasis is on basic grammar, speaking, and comprehension skills, using culturally appropriate materials and texts. Devanagari script for reading and writing is also introduced.", "tags": "NEPAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3041, "title": "Intermediate Nepali Conversation II", "code": "NEPAL 2202", "subject": "NEPAL", "descr": "Intermediate instruction in spoken grammar and verbal comprehension skills, with special attention to developing technical vocabularies and other verbal skills appropriate to students' professional fields.", "tags": "NEPAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3042, "title": "Intermediate Nepali Composition II", "code": "NEPAL 2204", "subject": "NEPAL", "descr": "Systematic review of written grammar and reading comprehension, with special attention to the technical vocabularies, necessary writing skills, and published materials typical of advanced students' professional fields.", "tags": "NEPAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3043, "title": "Advanced Nepali II", "code": "NEPAL 3302", "subject": "NEPAL", "descr": "Reading of advanced texts, together with advanced drill on the spoken language.", "tags": "NEPAL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3044, "title": "Introduction to Urdu Script", "code": "NES 1312", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This class is an introductory class for beginners. This course will teach students how to listen, speak, read and write Urdu through vocabulary, grammar, oral and written activities, with an emphasis on reading and writing basic Urdu. The course begins by introducing the alphabet and their combinations. In addition to learning the script we will also introduce the basic knowledge and background on Urdu culture.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3045, "title": "Archaeology-Great Discoveries", "code": "NES 1602", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This introductory course surveys the archaeology of the ancient Greek and Roman Mediterranean. Each week, we will explore a different archaeological discovery that transformed scholars' understanding of the ancient world. From early excavations at sites such as Pompeii and Troy, to modern field projects across the Mediterranean, we will discover the rich cultures of ancient Greece and Rome while also exploring the history, methods, and major intellectual goals of archaeology.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3046, "title": "Elementary Yiddish II", "code": "NES 1777", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Intended for advanced beginners. Builds further competence in reading, writing, oral comprehension, speaking and grammar. Course material is presented and discussed in the context of Ashkenazi Jewish culture.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3047, "title": "FWS: Radical Love: The Mystical Traditions of Islam", "code": "NES 1921", "subject": "NES", "descr": "The eleventh century Muslim poet Rumi called love \"the water of life.\" While Islam today is often viewed through the lens of politics and violence, this class will provide an introduction to the mystical traditions of Islam with a particular focus on the importance of love.\u00a0 Other themes will include mystical understandings of the body, the self, the natural world, sexuality, the role of music and art in becoming close to the divine, and more. We will be writing about many of these themes, and will read works of poetry and philosophy, passages from the Quran, and histories of mystical movements past and present. In doing so, we will be able to understand how mystical love operates not just as a metaphor, but a way of life.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3048, "title": "FWS: Ruins of Modernity", "code": "NES 1933", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Ruins move people to write. They inspire poets and philosophers, archaeologists and anthropologists, geographers and architects to think about the remnants of the worlds humans create, abandon, and destroy. No era in history has produced more ruins than modernity. In this course, we will use the concept of 'the ruin' to examine different ways of writing in the humanities, particularly archaeology and anthropology. We will read and write about ruination and time, materiality and decay, and the livelihoods that take shape in the debris of capitalism, socialism, colonialism and industrialization. You will write a series of short essays, guided by a multi-step process, from planning, to drafting, to revising, to editing. Together, we will dig deep into the art of crafting persuasive, energetic expository prose.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3049, "title": "FWS: Ancient Near East in Modern Science Fiction", "code": "NES 1960", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Though science fiction is a genre\u00a0of literature traditionally far removed from the study of the Ancient Near East, they are both united in their efforts to describe cultures (be they real\u00a0or imaginary), science, technology, and the natural world around them. The literature of the Near East has provided the seeds to many modern works of fiction and through a selection of texts from the eyes of the Hebrew Bible, the Epics of Gilgamesh and Atrahasis, and other ancient peoples, this class will explore how these ancient traditions appear in our modern world through the medium of science fiction. Students will craft analytical essays exploring these relationships and an original final research paper that will help develop key writing, research, and analytical skills.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3050, "title": "Israeli Masculinity", "code": "NES 2167", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Representations of masculinity play important roles in modern Hebrew texts. Through introduction to scholarship on gender and sexuality, students learn to critically analyze Hebrew texts featuring such representations and to synthesize how diverse textual representations of masculinity reflect and seek to influence the changing ways that Jewish and Israeli identities are conceived and performed. The course's tripartite structure aids student perception of masculine representations' diachronic development. In the first section, students analyze traditional depictions of Jewish masculinity and observe how Zionism's emergence brought about Jewish masculinity's reconceptualization; in the second section, students dissect diverse texts depicting and participating in efforts to redefine Jewish masculinity in Palestine; in the third section,\u00a0 students probe texts written and produced after 1948 that challenge the form of masculine identity dominant at the Israeli state's inception and push for greater diversity in how masculinity and femininity, heterosexuality and homosexuality, are conceived and performed.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3051, "title": "Intermediate Urdu Reading and Writing II", "code": "NES 2202", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course is designed to develop competence in Urdu reading and writing for students with a first-year knowledge of Hindi and knowledge of Urdu script. The goal of this course is to improve listening, speaking, reading and writing abilities in Urdu. By the end of the course, students will have the ability to read articles, write short stories and translate Urdu writings. This course may be taken concurrently with Intermediate Hindi.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3052, "title": "Drinking through the Ages: Intoxicating Beverages in Near Eastern and World History", "code": "NES 2522", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course examines the production and exchange of wine, beer, coffee and tea, and the social and ideological dynamics involved in their consumption. We start in ancient Egypt and Mesopotamia, and end with tea and coffee in the Arab and Ottoman worlds. Archaeological and textual evidence will be used throughout to show the centrality of drinking in daily, ritual and political life.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3053, "title": "Medicine, Magic and Science in the Ancient Near East", "code": "NES 2599", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course explores the history of medicine and other sciences in the ancient Near East, broadly defined. In addition to medicine, the other scientific disciplines covered in this course include mathematics, astrology, astronomy, alchemy, zoology, among others. Geographically, the course traces the transmission of scientific knowledge in ancient Babylonia, Iran, Egypt, Israel, Turkey, and beyond. As such, the course offers students a tour of different ancient civilizations and corpora. Students read selections from cuneiform Akkadian tablets, Egyptian Christian Coptic spellbooks, rabbinic sources such as the Talmud, among many other works. At the same time, students will be required to critically engage recent scholarship in the history of science and medicine as a way to help frame their analyses of the ancient materials. The course interrogates how ancient civilizations transmitted and received scientific knowledge, as well as the relationship between what we today tend to call science, medicine, magic, and religion. This course is intended not only for students in the Humanities and Social Sciences, but also for those majoring in science or medicine.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3054, "title": "Introduction to the Ancient Near East", "code": "NES 2601", "subject": "NES", "descr": "The pyramids and mummies of Egypt, the ziggurats of Babylonia, and the armies of Assyria are all part of the legacy of the ancient Near East. This course serves as a basic introduction to the history, societies, and cultures of the major civilizations of the ancient world from c. 3300-300 B.C., focusing on Egypt and Mesopotamia but including lesser-known groups such as the Hittites in Anatolia and the Elamites in Iran. Students will learn how these states were organized, how each culture related to their gods, and how they chose to be remembered, as well as many other mysteries of the ancient world.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3055, "title": "Introduction to Judaism", "code": "NES 2644", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Jewish identities, values, and practices from the ancient to modern era. Organized thematically, it examines Judaism as a religious phenomenon, with a particular emphasis on its cultural and textual diversity across three millennia. Themes covered include creation, Sabbath, prayer, Jerusalem, pious customs, magic, reincarnation, revelation, among others. Throughout the semester students perform close readings of a wide selection of Jewish texts from the Bible, Talmud, kabbalah (mysticism), philosophy, liturgy, and modern Jewish thought. In what ways are these various traditions of Judaism interrelated and/or in tension with one another? In the face of the Jewish history's tremendous diversity, what is it that has unified Judaism and the Jewish people over the centuries? By exploring these types of questions, this course examines the appropriateness of defining Judaism as a religion, an ethnicity, a civilization, and/or a culture. Readings include introductory-level textbooks and essays, as well as a range of primary source materials in translation.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3056, "title": "Controversy and Debate in Islam", "code": "NES 2649", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Whether it is politics, society, the law, sexuality, popular culture or minorities' rights, the media are saturated with news on Islam. This course introduces topical issues in Islam as a religious, historical, cultural and political phenomenon. We will discuss this religion's manifold interpretations and investigate its multiple manifestations across the globe, giving special attention to Asia (from Iran to China, Indonesia, Afghanistan, India, Thailand, etc.). Key themes include religious devotion, the arts, Islamic law, gender, statehood, jihad, and sectarianism. No previous knowledge of Islam is required as the course covers the fundamentals of Islam as a religious system as well as a historical phenomenon.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3057, "title": "Ancient Ships and Seafaring: Introduction to Nautical Archaeology", "code": "NES 2661", "subject": "NES", "descr": "A survey of the history and development of ships and seafaring as revealed by shipwrecks, boat burials, texts, art, and other evidence. The role of nautical technology and seafaring among the maritime peoples of the ancient Mediterranean world-Canaanites, Minoans, Mycenaeans, Phoenicians, Hebrews, Greeks, and Romans-and the riverine cultures of Mesopotamia and Egypt is addressed. The survey stretches from the earliest evidence for Mediterranean seafaring around 10,000 bce to the first transatlantic voyages in the 15th century, including Arab, Viking, and European explorers, and the birth of modern capitalism in the Italian Maritime Republics. Along the way, economics, war, exploration, cult, life at sea, and colonization are discussed.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3058, "title": "Cleopatra's Egypt: Tradition and Transformation", "code": "NES 2688", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Following the conquests of Alexander, the ancient civilization of Egypt came under Greek rule. This period is best known for its famous queen Cleopatra, the last independent ruler of ancient Egypt. But even before Cleopatra's life and death, the Egypt that she governed was a fascinating place \u2013 and a rich case study in cultural interactions under ancient imperialism. This course explores life in Egypt under Greek rule, during the three centuries known as the Ptolemaic period (named after Cleopatra's family, the Ptolemaic dynasty). We will examine the history and culture of Ptolemaic Egypt, an empire at the crossroads of Africa, the Near East, and the Mediterranean. We will explore the experiences of both Egyptians and Greeks living in this multi-cultural, multi-ethnic, and multi-linguistic society. Finally, we will investigate the ways that Ptolemaic Egypt can shed light on modern experiences of imperialism, colonialism, and globalization.", "tags": "HA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3059, "title": "Introduction to Christian History", "code": "NES 2695", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the history of Christianity from the first century through the seventeenth and perhaps a bit beyond. Our emphasis will be on the diversity of Christian traditions, beliefs, and practices throughout history. We will explore the origins of Christianity within the eastern Mediterranean world, the spread of Christianity, the development of ecclesiastical institutions, the rise and establishment of monasticism, and the various controversies that occupied the church throughout its history. Throughout the course, we will supplement our reading of primary texts with art, archaeology, music, and manuscripts.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3060, "title": "Jewish Films and Filmmakers: Hollywood and Beyond", "code": "NES 2790", "subject": "NES", "descr": "What does it mean to call a film is \"Jewish\"? Does it have to represent Jewish life? Does it have to feature characters identifiable as Jews? If artists who identify as Jews\u2014actors, directors, screenwriters, composers\u2014play significant roles in a film's production does that make it Jewish? Our primary point of entry into these questions will be Hollywood, from the industry's early silent films, through the period generally considered classical, down to the present day. We will also study films produced overseas, in countries that may include Israel, Egypt, France, Italy, and Germany. Our discussions will be enriched by contextual material drawn from film studies, cultural studies, Jewish studies, American studies, and other related fields. Students will be expected to view a significant number of films outside of class\u2014an average of one per week\u2014and engage with them through writing and in-class discussion. The directors, screenwriters, composers, and actors whose work we will study may include: Charlie Chaplin, Irving Berlin, Al Jolson, Fanny Brice, Billy Wilder, Barbra Streisand, Woody Allen, Mel Brooks, Aviva Kempner, Joan Micklin Silver, the Marx Brothers, and the Coen Brothers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3061, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "NES 2812", "subject": "NES", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3062, "title": "History of State and Society in Modern Iran: Through Literature and Film", "code": "NES 3519", "subject": "NES", "descr": "In the conditions of strict censorship and numerous limitations on various forms of political organization and activism, literature and cinema, especially Iran's internationally acclaimed art cinematography, have been the major outlets through which the social and political concerns of the Iranian society have been voiced throughout the modern period. The course explores major themes and periods in Iran's transition from the secular state of the Pahlavi dynasty to the religious state of the Islamic Republic in the 20th and 21st centuries. We will focus on social as well as political themes including the Anglo-Russo-American Occupation of Iran, the 1979 Islamic Revolution, U.S.-Iranian relations, Iraq-Iran War, the Green Movement and the crisis of Islamic government, Images of the West in Iran, Modern Youth Culture, Gender segregation, and the struggle between modernity and traditionalism in contemporary Iran. We will watch selected Iranian documentary and feature films and draw on modern Persian literature but will approach them not as art forms but as reflections of major socio-economic, political, and religious phenomena in Iran's modern history. We will read and watch what the Iranians wrote and produced, read and watched, in order to view and explain Iran and its relations with the West through the Iranian eyes. We will examine how the Iranians perceived themselves and the others, how they viewed their own governments and the West, what issues inspired and shaped their outlook outside the official censorship during the period in question. All readings are in English translation and the films are with English subtitles. The course includes lectures deconstructing political, religious, and social evolution of modern Iran as well as regular class discussions where we will address the issues in question from a variety of perspectives.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3063, "title": "Minorities of the Middle East", "code": "NES 3655", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course examines the historic diversity of the modern Middle East, exploring histories of inter-communal contact and conflict. We begin by investigating the legacy of the Ottoman Empire and the impact of its dissolution. We will focus our attention on commercial centers that fostered inter-communal relations, as well as investigating sites of strife and cases of minority repression. We will read histories, memoirs, and fiction, and view films that help us better understand inter-communal relations, tensions, and conflict. We will also interrogate the terms for exploring a range distinctions among majority and minority populations including: religious difference (Muslims, Christians, and Jews); divisions of religious rite (Sunni and Shi'a); entho-linguistic minorities (Armenians and Kurds); national identities (Israelis and Palestinians); cultures of origin (Mizrahi, Sephardi, and Ashkenazi Jews). We will explore how these divisions inform urgent current conflicts: the civil war in Syria and the refugee crisis; the civil war in Iraq and the campaign by ISIS against minorities; as well as tensions between Saudi Arabia and Iran.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3064, "title": "Humanities Scholars Research Methods", "code": "NES 3750", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course explores the practice, theory, and methodology of humanities research, critical analysis, and communication through writing and oral presentation. We will study the work and impact of humanists (scholars of literature, history, theory, art, visual studies, film, anthropology, gender and sexuality studies), who pose big questions about the human condition. By reading and analyzing their scholarship\u2014critiquing them and engaging their ideas\u2014we will craft our own methods and voices. Students will refine their research methods (library research, note taking, organizing material, bibliographies, citation methods, proposals, outlines, etc.) and design their own independent research project. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in the Humanities Scholars Program.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3065, "title": "Understanding Uprising: The Iranian Revolution", "code": "NES 3887", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This class analyzes the phenomenon of political uprising through the case study of the Iranian Revolution.\u00a0 Undoubtedly one of the watershed moments of the twentieth century, it was declared by political scientist Richard Cottam as one of \"the most popular revolutions in the history of mankind.\" Rather than employing a strictly historiographical approach, we will utilize a diverse set of methodologies \u2013 anthropological, sociological, feminist, neo-Marxist, etc -- in order to better understand not only the Revolution itself, but what unique perspective these disparate schools of thought may offer. Major themes include the relationship between religion and politics, class struggle, economic inequalities, foreign influence and colonialism, the use of violence, the impact of intellectuals, the role of women, tactics of political mobilization, comparisons with the Arab Spring, and more.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3066, "title": "Theory and Method in Near Eastern Studies", "code": "NES 4560", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Requirement for NES majors.\u00a0In this seminar we will read and discuss a range of theories and methods that have been employed by scholars in the interdisciplinary area of Near Eastern Studies. After giving attention to the historical development of area studies programs and their current status and relevance, we read a wide range of influential works in Near Eastern Studies, with special attention to the concept of \"orientalism\".\u00a0Literary theory, anthropology, historiography, post-colonialism, archaeology, gender theory, and comparative religions are a few of the approaches, methods, and theories we will explore.", "tags": "CA-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3067, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: The Beginnings of Islam: 600-750", "code": "NES 4618", "subject": "NES", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3068, "title": "Gnosticism and Early Christianity", "code": "NES 4628", "subject": "NES", "descr": "What is \"Gnosticism\" and why has it come to be so hotly debated among scholars and in our contemporary media? What is the Gospel of Judas and are its ideas \"heretical\"? Who wrote the Gospel of Thomas and the Gospel of Mary and why were these Gospels not included in the New Testament canon? To what extent did Dan Brown's The Da Vinci Code draw from ancient Christian gnostic sources? This seminar will explore answers to these questions and many others by focusing on the complex array of literary sources from late antiquity-primarily from a cache of manuscripts found at Nag Hammadi, Egypt, in 1945-that have long been associated with a so-called \"Christian Gnosticism\". Church Fathers condemned the \"movement\" on a variety of grounds, but in this course we will not simply read the condemnations written by the opponents of gnostic thought; rather, we will focus our attention on reading (in English translation) substantial portions of the \"gnostic\" texts written by the adherents themselves. We will give special attention to the ways in which conflicts about Gnosticism connected with conflicts about gender, heresy, power, and authority. To set these texts within a socio-historical context, we will discuss the possible Jewish and hellenistic roots of early Christian Gnosticism and ties to Stoic and other ancient philosophical movements.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3069, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "NES 4659", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3070, "title": "Mass Media and Identities in the Modern Middle East", "code": "NES 4666", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This reading seminar will explore the expansion and influence of mass media in the Middle East from the late nineteenth to the turn of the twenty-first century.\u00a0 We will examine how the intersection of popular music, theater, poetry, film, and satellite television shaped culture, ideology, and identities in the modern Middle East.\u00a0 Topics we will consider include contested media representations of \"modernity,\" gender, and evolving cultural, religious, national, and transnational identities.\u00a0 Although this seminar focuses upon the Middle East, it aims to locate the region within a larger global context.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3071, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "NES 4691", "subject": "NES", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3072, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "NES 4700", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3073, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "NES 4721", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3074, "title": "Independent Study, Undergraduate Level", "code": "NES 4992", "subject": "NES", "descr": "For undergraduates who wish to obtain research experience or do extensive reading on a special topic. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3075, "title": "Senior Honors Essay", "code": "NES 4998", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Each fall, a small number of highly qualified seniors enter the Near Eastern Studies Honors Program. The Honors Program is open to NES majors who have done superior work and who wish to devote a substantial part of their senior year to advanced, specialized, independent research and writing of a thesis. Successfully completing an honors thesis will require sustained interest, exceptional ability, diligence, and enthusiasm. Students must also take two honors courses NES 4998 in fall and\u00a0NES 4999\u00a0in spring, in addition to the regular major requirements. While admission to the Honors Program and completion of a thesis do not guarantee that students will be awarded honors in Near Eastern Studies, most students find the experience as intellectually rewarding as it is rigorous.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3076, "title": "Senior Honors Essay", "code": "NES 4999", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Each fall, a small number of highly qualified seniors enter the Near Eastern Studies Honors Program. The Honors Program is open to NES majors who have done superior work and who wish to devote a substantial part of their senior year to advanced, specialized, independent research and writing of a thesis.\u00a0 Successfully completing an honors thesis will require sustained interest, exceptional ability, diligence, and enthusiasm. Students must also take two honors courses\u00a0NES 4998\u00a0in fall and NES 4999 in spring, in addition to the regular major requirements. While admission to the Honors Program and completion of a thesis do not guarantee that students will be awarded honors in Near Eastern Studies, most students find the experience as intellectually rewarding as it is rigorous.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3077, "title": "Theory and Method in Near Eastern Studies", "code": "NES 6560", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Requirement for NES majors.\u00a0In this seminar we will read and discuss a range of theories and methods that have been employed by scholars in the interdisciplinary area of Near Eastern Studies. After giving attention to the historical development of area studies programs and their current status and relevance, we read a wide range of influential works in Near Eastern Studies, with special attention to the concept of \"orientalism\".\u00a0Literary theory, anthropology, historiography, post-colonialism, archaeology, gender theory, and comparative religions are a few of the approaches, methods, and theories we will explore.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3078, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: 600-750", "code": "NES 6618", "subject": "NES", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3079, "title": "Gnosticism and Early Christianity", "code": "NES 6628", "subject": "NES", "descr": "What is \"Gnosticism\" and why has it come to be so hotly debated among scholars and in our contemporary media? What is the Gospel of Judas and are its ideas \"heretical\"? Who wrote the Gospel of Thomas and the Gospel of Mary and why were these Gospels not included in the New Testament canon? To what extent did Dan Brown's The Da Vinci Code draw from ancient Christian gnostic sources? This seminar will explore answers to these questions and many others by focusing on the complex array of literary sources from late antiquity-primarily from a cache of manuscripts found at Nag Hammadi, Egypt, in 1945-that have long been associated with a so-called \"Christian Gnosticism\". Church Fathers condemned the \"movement\" on a variety of grounds, but in this course we will not simply read the condemnations written by the opponents of gnostic thought; rather, we will focus our attention on reading (in English translation) substantial portions of the \"gnostic\" texts written by the adherents themselves. We will give special attention to the ways in which conflicts about Gnosticism connected with conflicts about gender, heresy, power, and authority. To set these texts within a socio-historical context, we will discuss the possible Jewish and hellenistic roots of early Christian Gnosticism and ties to Stoic and other ancient philosophical movements.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3080, "title": "Minorities of the Middle East", "code": "NES 6655", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This examines the historic diversity of the modern Middle East, exploring histories of inter-communal contact and conflict. We begin by investigating the legacy of the Ottoman Empire and the impact of its dissolution. We will focus our attention on commercial centers that fostered inter-communal relations, as well as investigating sites of strife and cases of minority repression. We will read histories, memoirs, and fiction, and view films that help us better understand inter-communal relations, tensions, and conflict. We will also interrogate the terms for exploring a range distinctions among majority and minority populations including: religious difference (Muslims, Christians, and Jews); divisions of religious rite (Sunni and Shica); entho-linguistic minorities (Armenians and Kurds); national identities (Israelis and Palestinians); cultures of origin (Mizrahi, Sephardi, and Ashkenazi Jews). We will explore how these divisions inform urgent current conflicts: the civil war in Syria and the refugee crisis; the civil war in Iraq and the campaign by ISIS against minorities; as well as tensions between Saudi Arabia and Iran.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3081, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "NES 6659", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the\u00a0Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3082, "title": "Mass Media and Identities in the Modern Middle East", "code": "NES 6666", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This reading seminar will explore the expansion and influence of mass media in the Middle East from the late nineteenth to the turn of the twenty-first century.\u00a0 We will examine how the intersection of popular music, theater, poetry, film, and satellite television shaped culture, ideology, and identities in the modern Middle East.\u00a0 Topics we will consider include contested media representations of \"modernity,\" gender, and evolving cultural, religious, national, and transnational identities.\u00a0 Although this seminar focuses upon the Middle East, it aims to locate the region within a larger global context.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3083, "title": "Race and Slavery, Old and Modern", "code": "NES 6691", "subject": "NES", "descr": "What does it mean to live in the aftermath of slavery? How has the human history of slavery contributed to the production of \"natural\" values that we take for granted\u2014such as community, property, citizenship, gender, individuality, and freedom? This course explores the history of enslavement throughout the human past, from the ancient world to the modern era. We will pay particular attention to the relationship between slavery and the construction of racial blackness. We will explore various institutionalized forms of servitude throughout time and space, from the Indian Ocean to the Atlantic worlds, from eunuchism to concubinage, from slavery in the Roman Empire to \"modern slavery\" and sex trafficking. Readings will be in English and will engage a variety of dynamic sources: theoretical, historiographical, anthropological, religious, legal, literary and multimedia.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3084, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "NES 6700", "subject": "NES", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3085, "title": "Graduate Colloquium", "code": "NES 6722", "subject": "NES", "descr": "A series of lectures on a range of themes in the discipline sponsored by the Department of Near Eastern Studies. Presentations include lectures by invited speakers and works in progress presented by faculty and graduate students.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3086, "title": "Understanding Uprising: The Iranian Revolution", "code": "NES 6887", "subject": "NES", "descr": "This class analyzes the phenomenon of political uprising through the case study of the Iranian Revolution.\u00a0 Undoubtedly one of the watershed moments of the twentieth century, it was declared by political scientist Richard Cottam as one of \"the most popular revolutions in the history of mankind.\" Rather than employing a strictly historiographical approach, we will utilize a diverse set of methodologies \u2013 anthropological, sociological, feminist, neo-Marxist, etc -- in order to better understand not only the Revolution itself, but what unique perspective these disparate schools of thought may offer. Major themes include the relationship between religion and politics, class struggle, economic inequalities, foreign influence and colonialism, the use of violence, the impact of intellectuals, the role of women, tactics of political mobilization, comparisons with the Arab Spring, and more.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3087, "title": "Independent Study: Graduate Level", "code": "NES 6992", "subject": "NES", "descr": "For graduate students who wish to do intensive reading on a focused topic. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member that has agreed to supervise the course.", "tags": "NES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3088, "title": "CFA Review Level I", "code": "NMI 5061", "subject": "NMI", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3089, "title": "CFA Review Level II", "code": "NMI 5062", "subject": "NMI", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3090, "title": "CFA Review Level III", "code": "NMI 5063", "subject": "NMI", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3091, "title": "Doctoral Seminar in Behavioral Marketing", "code": "NRE 5150", "subject": "NRE", "descr": "This seminar focuses on behavioral marketing. Topics may include judgment and decision making, consumer memory, learning, and cognition, the social psychology of consumer behavior, and the self in consumption and production, among others. The specific topics discussed in this seminar change every semester. Please contact the instructor for information.", "tags": "NRE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3092, "title": "PhD Seminar in Micro Organizational Behavior", "code": "NRE 5170", "subject": "NRE", "descr": "This research-based graduate seminar involves a critical review of theory and research in Micro- and Meso-Organizational Behavior \u2013 research related to individual and group behavior in an organizational context. We will read both classic and current articles in the field, and students will be responsible for helping to shape the reading list and guide the class discussions. Due to the nature of the class it is critical that all students read the assigned materials before class and\u00a0be prepared to contribute to a lively intellectual discussion about the work.\u00a0\u00a0Upon completion of this course, students should be able to: \u00a01) Discuss \u00a0and critique theory and research in major topic areas of Organizational Behavior, 2) integrate material within and across topics, and 3) propose new research questions that will extend management scholarship.", "tags": "NRE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3093, "title": "Doctoral Seminar in Quantitative Models", "code": "NRE 5220", "subject": "NRE", "descr": "This sequence of two half-semester courses is designed to introduce students to the key questions and quantitative models and estimation methods commonly used in marketing. Specifically, the course has two main objectives: (1) to acquaint students with research questions, state-of-the-art modeling approaches and key findings, and (2) to enable students to build quantitative models to address research questions. All topics covered in the courses are empirical in nature. Class will be a combination of lectures, discussion of assigned articles, and presentations of research proposals.", "tags": "NRE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3094, "title": "PhD Seminar in Empirical Asset Pricing", "code": "NRE 5280", "subject": "NRE", "descr": "Johnson PhD Seminar-Content changes regularly.", "tags": "NRE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3095, "title": "PhD Seminar in Behavioral Operations", "code": "NRE 5580", "subject": "NRE", "descr": "Behavioral operations management is an emerging field that utilizes laboratory experiments, field experiments, behavioral modeling, and/or empirical analyses to investigate how managers and consumers make decisions in various operational settings. The objectives of this course are to (1) provide an overview of the seminal research and methods in related fields, (2) review how these methods are applied to operational settings by discussing behavioral papers on service operations, inventory management, supply chain contracting, B2B bargaining, and strategic sourcing, and (3) discuss how to conduct effective research in operations management using behavioral methods (students will be required to identify/design research projects).", "tags": "NRE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3096, "title": "Nutrition, Health, and Society", "code": "NS 1150", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Discusses the facts and fallacies concerning the role that nutrition, exercise, and other health behaviors play in preventing disease, maintaining good health, and maximizing athletic performance. Emphasis is on understanding the biological mechanisms through which good nutrition and regular exercise affect psychological and physical health.", "tags": "PBS-HE|NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3097, "title": "Nutrition and Health: Issues, Outlooks, and Opportunities", "code": "NS 1200", "subject": "NS", "descr": "For students interested in exploring careers in the broad fields of food, nutrition, and health. Experts representing different areas discuss their work, focusing on current issues and trends as well as the requisite knowledge and skills. This course introduces many of the disciplines that are drawn upon in addressing human problems related to food, diet, and health. Students explore career opportunities through a variety of assignments.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3098, "title": "Nutrition and the Life Cycle", "code": "NS 1220", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Biology of the life cycle including development, growth, maturation and aging and its impact on nutritional requirements of humans from the zygote to the elderly is considered. How to meet these nutritional requirements is discussed relative to the feeding issues and context of each major life stage. Course emphasizes the critical analyses of beneficial and adverse outcomes of various nutrient intakes and dietary patterns on the nutritional status and well-being through integration of nutrition and other health sciences in understanding nutritional needs during the life cycle.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3099, "title": "Site-Specific Preparation for Engaged Learning in Global and Public Health Sciences", "code": "NS 2061", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This course provides pre-engagement preparation tailored to the research project or site where students will complete the experiential learning required for the GPHS major.\u00a0Students will meet with the faculty member in charge, at a time and place to be arranged.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3100, "title": "Food for Contemporary Living", "code": "NS 2470", "subject": "NS", "descr": "During this laboratory course, the understanding of food ingredients and techniques of food preparation is applied to positive nutritional practices and health promotion goals; basic food science and nutrition principles, food safety/sanitation, sensory evaluation, and social-cultural influences on food choices; food preparation, recipe modification, sensory evaluation (taste testing required); basic cooking skills, techniques. Introduction to basic menu planning and meeting nutritional requirements while restricted to a budget. Lab performance and a lab practical factored into final student evaluation; attendance at all labs is expected.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3101, "title": "Introduction to Global Health", "code": "NS 2600", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Explore contemporary topics, issues, and controversies in the field of global health through several different perspectives. This course will first introduce the global burden of disease, and then engage students in examining complex social, economic, political, environmental, and biological factors that structure the origins and consequences of global health problems, as well as potential solutions. The three core modules of this course focus on HIV/AIDS, maternal mortality, and water/sanitation and hygiene.", "tags": "D-AG|CA-HE|D-HE|NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3102, "title": "Human Biology and Evolution", "code": "NS 2750", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Examines the theories and mechanisms of modern evolutionary biology as they apply to present-day humans and their hominid ancestors. Lectures and discussions of molecular and paleontological evidence of human evolution, the causes and consequences of contemporary human biological diversity, and biological and behavioral modes of human adaptation to past and present natural and cultural environments.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3103, "title": "Nutrition, Health and Vegetarian Diets", "code": "NS 3030", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Course Goals: The three primary goals of this course are to present the scientific evidence concerning:", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3104, "title": "Obesity and the Regulation of Body Weight", "code": "NS 3150", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Multidisciplinary discussion of the causes, effects, and treatments of human obesity. Topics include the biopsychology of eating behavior, the genetics of obesity, the role of activity and energy metabolism, the psychosocial determinants of obesity, anorexia nervosa, therapy and its effectiveness, and social discrimination.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3105, "title": "Human Nutrition and Nutrient Metabolism", "code": "NS 3310", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Examines the biochemical, physiological, molecular and genomic aspects of human nutrition. Covers the topics of food sources, digestion, metabolism and function of nutrients (i.e., carbohydrates, proteins, lipids, vitamins, and minerals). Metabolic and chronic diseases related to nutrition are highlighted throughout the semester. Discussion sections provide an opportunity to examine in greater depth selected topics from lecture.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3106, "title": "Human Anatomy and Physiology", "code": "NS 3410", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Introduces human anatomy and physiology by detailing the structure and function of the human body and mechanisms used to maintain homeostasis. Emphasis is given to aspects relevant to the nutritional sciences and medicine. Content includes language of anatomy, cells, tissue, integumentary, respiratory, skeletal, muscular, digestive, nervous, cardiovascular, urinary, and reproductive systems. Clinical examples are provided to highlight the physiology of systems covered. Weekly clinical correlate activities are used to encourage active learning and group discussions. Evaluation is based on attendance class interaction, two take home case studies, weekly quizzes, two preliminaries and a midterm and final.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3107, "title": "Human Anatomy and Physiology Laboratory", "code": "NS 3420", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Principles of human anatomy and physiology will be presented using anatomical models, drawings, dissections, and histology as well as non-invasive interactive assessments of physiological functions and review of clinical case studies. Weekly lecture will provide content connections with NS 3410. Emphasis will be on location, recognition, and description of anatomical structures and their relation to function. Content includes anatomical terminology, gross and microscopic anatomy, and regulation of various organ systems. Evaluation based on attendance, two lab practicums, and lab assignments.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3108, "title": "Directed Readings", "code": "NS 4000", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Study that predominantly involves library research and independent reading.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3109, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "NS 4010", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Study that predominantly involves data collection and analysis or laboratory or studio projects.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3110, "title": "Supervised Fieldwork", "code": "NS 4020", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Study that involves both responsible participation in a community setting and reflection on that experience through discussion, reading, and writing. Academic credit is awarded for this integration of theory and practice.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3111, "title": "Teaching Apprenticeship", "code": "NS 4030", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Study that includes assisting faculty with instruction.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3112, "title": "Diet and the Microbiome", "code": "NS 4200", "subject": "NS", "descr": "In this course, students will acquire a present-day overview of the reported effects of diet on the microbiome with an emphasis on host physiology outcomes. The microbiome field is rapidly evolving, and this course has no textbook; we will mainly be assessing primary literature and scientific reviews. Students will learn to critically analyze the conclusions drawn from microbiome studies to empower them to make informed judgments as new research findings are reported.", "tags": "PBS-HE|NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3113, "title": "Nutrition Communications and Counseling", "code": "NS 4250", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Students learn the theoretical basis of effective health promotion communications and develop effective nutrition communication skills through application in a variety of settings. Provides hands-on experiences in counseling, educational program development, and oral and written communications.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3114, "title": "Proteins, Transcripts, and Metabolism: Big Data in Molecular Nutrition", "code": "NS 4300", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This course will cover fundamental concepts of big data analysis at an introductory level in the context of gene expression at the mRNA and protein levels with a focus on metabolic regulatory networks. Programming in Python and R will be required, but no prior experience is necessary. Programming in this course will focus methods to parse large data sets and perform informatics analyses.", "tags": "PBS-HE|NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3115, "title": "Economics of Food and Malnutrition", "code": "NS 4480", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This course focused on the economics of food and malnutrition from the perspective of individuals and households; that is, a micro-economic approach. Topics include characteristics and constraints associated with food production in both developed and developing countries; the determinants of household food security; the social and economic causes and consequences of undernutrition; the social and economic causes and consequences of obesity; intervention design to reduce food insecurity, undernutrition and obesity.", "tags": "D-AG|SBA-HE|NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3116, "title": "Public Health Nutrition", "code": "NS 4500", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Public health nutrition is the major professional career track for nutritionists outside of dietetics. It deals with efforts to improve the diets and nutritional status of whole populations by working at the community, state, and national levels. Course helps prepare students to work in public health nutrition by describing methods used in the assessment of nutrition problems, the development of nutrition-related policies, and the delivery of health, nutrition, and food assistance programs.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3117, "title": "Global Service Learning Pre-Departure Seminar", "code": "NS 4620", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This seminar will prepare students for Global Service Learning Summer Programs in diverse locales. Students will hear from Cornell faculty and staff on relevant global health and development issues. Course sessions will cover important country and regional-specific factors relating to geography, culture, history, politics, and health systems. Students will be actively engaged in reading, discussing and presenting on key seminar topics.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3118, "title": "Applied Dietetics in Food Service Systems", "code": "NS 4880", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Gain experience in facility design; equipment selection, use, and care; job analysis and evaluation; human resources planning; management of financial resources; recipe development and volume food production; computer-assisted management; employee training; and applied safety and sanitation standards. Through planning and executing a themed event, students develop skills required to operate/manage a food service program. Application of quality management in food service operations and facility management is stressed. Laboratories are arranged through Cornell Dining and other off-campus sites. Completion of a professional portfolio is required. ServSafe training and examination is conducted; successful completion results in ServSafe manager certification.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3119, "title": "Honors Problem", "code": "NS 4990", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Students who have been accepted into the honors research program work on their projects under the guidance of their faculty mentors. Honors research students must complete a minimum of 6 credits of NS 4990, typically spread over two or more semesters. The student and the mentor determine the appropriate number of credits for each semester. Research activities may include reviewing the literature, writing a proposal, developing research methods, collecting data in the field or laboratory, analyzing data, and writing the honors thesis. To enroll, please use a paper ADD form - please note that enrollment should be completed by the end of the ADD period.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3120, "title": "Experiential Learning in Global and Public Health in Washington, DC", "code": "NS 4997", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This course centers on the student's global and public health internship in Washington DC to engage in an applied and holistic way with the global and public health policy world. Students will contribute to some work of their host organization and identify a particular global and public health policy issue they have encountered in their internship. They will analyze this issue in NS 4997 using guidance provided in their ePortfolios and they will do further analysis on it using complementary frameworks and perspectives gained from the policy and politics course - NS 4998.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3121, "title": "Inquiry in Politics and Policy", "code": "NS 4998", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This required course forms the core of the Cornell in Washington academic program. The foundational skill of both politics and policy is taking knowledge, analyzing it, figuring out how to convert it into action. This course aims to give students the experience and understanding of how this process of knowledge into action works. Students will undertake a substantial research project in a topic related to or affected by politics and/or policy (broadly defined), and examine it through a variety of approaches and disciplines. The main goal is to understand the issue, analyze what is going on, and evaluate what options are available to respond.\u00a0 The idea is to not only define and examine the issue, but also think how to create and implement a solution. To do this, students will examine their issue using multiple different forms of inquiry (normative, empirical, and policy analysis) to see what each of those reveal as well as to see how the choice of how they investigate it shapes their results. CAPS students must do a topic that is related to\u00a0Asia. GPHS students must do a topic that is related to public health.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3122, "title": "Special Problems for Graduate Students", "code": "NS 6000", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Emphasizes independent advanced work. Experience in research laboratories in the Division of Nutritional Sciences may be arranged.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3123, "title": "Division of Nutritional Sciences Seminar", "code": "NS 6190", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Lectures on current research in nutrition.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3124, "title": "Translational Research and Evidence-based Policy and Practice in Nutrition", "code": "NS 6200", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This team taught graduate nutrition course addresses the frameworks used in evidenced-based approaches and decision making to set nutrition policy and practice guidelines where emerging and conflicting scientific data are commonplace. The course format is 50% lecture-based with content lectures given by experts in the subject area, and 50% discussion based, with interactive discussions and case-study discussions facilitated by practice and policy guest experts using videoconferencing.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3125, "title": "Regulation of Macronutrient Metabolism", "code": "NS 6320", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Course provides a comprehensive overview of macronutrient metabolism with an emphasis on issues relevant to human nutrition. Topics include regulation of macronutrient utilization by various tissues in response to food intake, energy stores, and energy expenditure; cellular pathways for integration of nutrient, growth, and stress signals; biological regulation of food intake and energy expenditure; the regulation of utilization of macronutrients for growth; dietary reference intakes for macronutrients; specialized functions of essential amino acids and essential fatty acids; lipoprotein and cholesterol metabolism; and the regulation, or dysregulation, of macronutrient utilization in various disease/physiological states.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3126, "title": "Economics of Food and Malnutrition", "code": "NS 6480", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This course focused on the economics of food and malnutrition from the perspective of individuals and households; that is, a micro-economic approach. Topics include characteristics and constraints associated with food production in both developed and developing countries; the determinants of household food security; the social and economic causes and consequences of undernutrition; the social and economic causes and consequences of obesity; intervention design to reduce food insecurity, undernutrition and obesity.", "tags": "D-AG|SBA-HE|NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3127, "title": "The Foundations of Epidemiology", "code": "NS 6520", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Intent is to train students to conduct epidemiologic research. Through lectures, classroom discussion, and project-based work, students will learn the principles of epidemiology, including study design and sources of bias in estimation of effects, evaluate evidence from epidemiologic studies and design an epidemiologic case study on a topic of interest. Students will apply epidemiologic approaches to study questions in health-related specialties including clinical medicine, and nutritional sciences.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3128, "title": "International Nutrition Seminar", "code": "NS 6980", "subject": "NS", "descr": "Discussions and presentations by Cornell faculty, graduate students, and invited outside speakers representing a range of multisectoral perspectives on global nutrition. Topics and themes focus on research, policy, and programs related to nutrition in low- and middle-income countries.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3129, "title": "Seminar in Nutritional Sciences", "code": "NS 7030", "subject": "NS", "descr": "This graduate nutrition course addresses the analytic and professional skills required to critique original research publications and make public presentations to a broad audience. Students critically analyze and interpret findings from research articles published in a wide variety of journals related to the field of nutritional sciences. Students present these critiques to a broad multi-disciplinary audience, and participate in the seminars presented by other students.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3130, "title": "Master's Thesis and Research", "code": "NS 8990", "subject": "NS", "descr": "A course for Division of Nutritional Sciences (DNS) Graduate Students doing research related to completing their Master's degree.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3131, "title": "Doctoral Thesis and Research", "code": "NS 9990", "subject": "NS", "descr": "A course for Division of Nutritional Sciences (DNS) Graduate Students doing research related to completing their Doctoral degree.", "tags": "NS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3132, "title": "Introduction to Controlled Fusion: Principles and Technology", "code": "NSE 4840", "subject": "NSE", "descr": "Introduction to the physical principles and various engineering aspects underlying power generation by controlled fusion. Topics include fuels and conditions required for fusion power and basic fusion-reactor concepts; fundamental aspects of plasma physics relevant to fusion plasmas and basic engineering problems for a fusion reactor; and an engineering analysis of proposed magnetic and/or inertial confinement fusion-reactor designs.", "tags": "NSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3133, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "NSE 5900", "subject": "NSE", "descr": "Independent study or project under guidance of a faculty member.", "tags": "NSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3134, "title": "Project", "code": "NSE 5910", "subject": "NSE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3135, "title": "M.S. Thesis Research", "code": "NSE 6900", "subject": "NSE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "NSE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3136, "title": "Global Water Sustainability", "code": "NTRES 1201", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This course will cultivate an interdisciplinary, solution-oriented perspective on water resource challenges from local to global scales. Water is central to all of life, yet its management represents a \"wicked challenge\" in sustainability science because tradeoffs and feedbacks among multiple objectives are commonplace. Readings and parallel mini-lectures from natural and social science instructors will embrace the diversity of perspectives involved in managing water resources, and students will engage in collaborative problem-solving during class to deepen their understanding of each weekly theme. Meetings with case study experts from around the world will ground this dialog in reality, and all students will participate in debate-style examination of major controversies\u00a0in water sustainability. Reflective writing assignments will encourage students to assess their own role in achieving water sustainability.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3137, "title": "Environmental Conservation", "code": "NTRES 2010", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Our lives are touched increasingly by questions about environmental degradation at local, regional, and global scales. Business-as-usual is being challenged. This course stimulates students to go beyond the often-simplistic portraits of environmental dilemmas offered by the mass media to gain a firmer basis for responsible stewardship and informed action on environmental issues. Students will practice and apply critical-thinking skills.", "tags": "HA-AG|OPHLS-AG|NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3138, "title": "Society and Natural Resources", "code": "NTRES 2201", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "The actions of people are crucial to environmental well-being. This course addresses the interrelationships between social phenomena and the natural (i.e., biophysical) environment. It is intended to (1) increase student awareness of these interconnections in their everyday lives; (2) introduce students to a variety of social science perspectives, including sociology, economics, psychology, and political science, that help us make sense of these connections; (3) identify the contributions of each of these perspectives to our understanding of environmental problems; and (4) discuss how natural resource management and environmental policy reflect these perspectives.", "tags": "SBA-AG|NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3139, "title": "Nature and Culture", "code": "NTRES 2320", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Examines the history of human-environment relationships, the diversity of environmental values and ethics, cultural manifestations of nature, and the role of society in forming natural resource and environmental policy. The history of natural resource conservation and management in North America, including the history and philosophy of ecology, is introduced.", "tags": "CA-AG|HA-AG|NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3140, "title": "DNA, Genes and Genetic Diversity", "code": "NTRES 2830", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Covers molecular, Mendelian and population genetic principles as they relate to population biology and biodiversity.\u00a0 A laboratory section is devoted to problem solving, computer exercises and discussions.\u00a0 We will focus on mechanisms generating and shaping genetic variation within and among populations, examine the regulation of gene expression, and consider the conservation relevance of variation at multiple levels. Recommended as a preliminary to upper-level ecology, evolution, and natural resource management courses.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3141, "title": "Sustainable, Ecologically Based Management of Water Resources", "code": "NTRES 3240", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "In-depth analyses of those ecological and biological principles relevant to the sustainable management of global fresh and marine water resources. Lectures and discussion integrate scientific literature with current management issues, including water supply, dams, irrigation, and groundwater overdraft, and coastal development. Topics include linkages between hydrologic variability and communities, groundwater-surface connections, flow paths for dispersal, patchily distributed water resources, and water quality controls on organisms, and adaptations to climate change.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3142, "title": "Applied Conservation Ecology", "code": "NTRES 3260", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "An interactive-field and lab course designed to provide direct experience with some of the most important field methods and analytical techniques used to examine species, ecosystem and community-level function, structure, and value, especially within the context of contemporary conservation ecology and evolutionary theory. Tools include field sampling techniques, resource and conservation mapping, spatial referencing, GIS, measures of biodiversity, and manual and automated techniques for studying soil, stream, forest, terrestrial, and marine biota and related physical factors. The class is designed to provide a strong background in field research methods and theory related to ecological conservation.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3143, "title": "Introduction to Ethics and Environment", "code": "NTRES 3320", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Introduction to ethics, aesthetics, and epistemology as related to the environment. Asks the question \"How should I live?\" and explores the implications of different answers to that question for our treatment of nature. Also examines the various approaches to ethical theory; the relations between art, literature, religion, and morality; the objective nature of value judgments; and the subjective nature of nature.", "tags": "KCM-AG|NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3144, "title": "Conservation with Communities for One Health", "code": "NTRES 4150", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This course integrates life, social, and medical sciences with the humanities to explore the concept of \"One Health\", the idea that the health of the environment, animals, and people are all inextricably linked. The course provides a comprehensive framework that enables students to critically examine varied perspectives and expand their view of the world, skills that are essential to a career in the interdisciplinary fields of One Health, Planetary Health and Conservation Medicine. The course also serves as a preparatory course for a subset of students who will be selected for international field experiences to work with communities to conserve endangered rhinoceroses and great apes with our partners in Indonesia (Ujung Kulon National Park and Alliance of Integrated Forest Conservation) and Africa (Jane Goodall Institute).", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3145, "title": "Environmental Policy Processes II", "code": "NTRES 4300", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This course provides students an exploration of the federal environmental policy process and an overview of how policy issues move onto the federal agenda and through the federal policy-making process. It focuses on defining environmental policy problems and understanding the interrelated set of phases, actors, institutions, and constraints that typically comprise the policy cycle. Case studies provide in-depth examples and allow students to discuss the policy process with policymakers as guest panelists. Research topic requires conducting several independent interviews with experts, preparation of one short and one long policy brief based on the interviews and additional research, and an oral presentation.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3146, "title": "Resource Management and Environment Law", "code": "NTRES 4440", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Introduces the application of legal concepts and processes to the management of natural resources and natural-resource areas. Explores the role of the common law, statutory law, administrative regulations, and judicial decisions in managing these resources. Particular focus is given to the management of wildlife, wetlands, and critical resources on public lands, and to the conflicts inherent in government attempts to regulate important natural resources on private lands.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3147, "title": "Decision Making in Natural Resource Management", "code": "NTRES 4601", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This course will provide an introduction to the principles and practice of structured decision making and its application in natural resource management. Students will become familiar with methods for finding optimal solutions to decision problems, and will apply these methods to natural resource problems. Students will become familiar with the application of quantitative decision modeling tools: single and multiple-objective trade-off techniques, decision trees, Bayesian belief and decision networks, linear programming, and dynamic optimization.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3148, "title": "Special Topics in Natural Resources", "code": "NTRES 4940", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the semester starts. Courses offered under the number will be approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3149, "title": "Internship in Natural Resources", "code": "NTRES 4960", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "On-the-job learning experience under the supervision of professionals in a cooperating organization. A learning contract is written between the faculty supervisor and the student, stating the learning objectives, conditions of the work assignment, nature of on-the-job supervision, and reporting requirements, including the formal basis on which the faculty supervisor will assign a grade. All 4960 internship courses must adhere to the CALS guidelines at cals.cornell.edu/academics/student-research/internship.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3150, "title": "Individual Study in Environmental Social Science and Resource Policy", "code": "NTRES 4970", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Individual study under faculty supervision. Topics in environmental social science resource policy are arranged depending on the interests of students and availability of staff.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3151, "title": "Individual Study in Applied Ecology and Conservation Ecology", "code": "NTRES 4971", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Individual study under faculty supervision. Topics in applied ecology or conservation biology are arranged depending on the interests of students and availability of staff.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3152, "title": "Individual Study in Ecosystem Science and Biochemistry", "code": "NTRES 4972", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Individual study under faculty supervision. Topics in ecosystem science and biogeochemistry are arranged depending on the interests of students and availability of staff.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3153, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching in Natural Resources", "code": "NTRES 4980", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Designed to give students an opportunity to obtain teaching experience by assisting in labs, field trips for designated sections, discussions, and grading. Students gain insight into the organization, preparation, and execution of course plans through application and discussions with instructor.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3154, "title": "Undergraduate Research", "code": "NTRES 4990", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Undergraduate research projects in natural resources; contingent on finding a faculty person to work with.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3155, "title": "Seminar on Selected Topics in Resource Policy and Management", "code": "NTRES 6040", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Special topics seminar on subjects related to resource policy and management.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3156, "title": "Collaborative and Reproducible Data Science in R", "code": "NTRES 6100", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "As datasets grow larger and more complex across all areas of science, computational skills are increasingly in high demand. This course introduces a series of practical tools that enable researchers to spend less time wrestling with software or repeating error-prone manual data processing and more time getting research done in efficient and transparent ways that facilitate collaboration and reproducibility. We will work in R/RStudio. Topics covered include 1) tidy data formatting, 2) rearrangement, filtering, exploration, and visualization of complex datasets, 3) basic programming, 4) version control with Git and GitHub, and 5) using R Markdown to combine text, code, tables, and figures into reports, websites, and presentations. The course emphasizes practical skill development and is structured around hands-on (the keyboard) learning.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3157, "title": "Spatial Modeling and Analysis", "code": "NTRES 6200", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Theory and practice of applying geo-spatial data for resource inventory and analysis, biophysical process modeling, and land surveys. Emphasizes use and evaluation of spatial analytical methods applied to agronomic and environmental systems and processes. Laboratory section is used to process, analyze, and visualize geo-spatial data of interest to the student, ending in a comprehensive student project.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3158, "title": "Sustainable Water Resource Management in the Face of Climate Change", "code": "NTRES 6240", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "In-depth analyses of those ecological and biological principles relevant to the sustainable management of global fresh and marine water resources. Lectures and discussion integrate scientific literature with current management issues, including water supply, dams, irrigation, and groundwater overdraft, and coastal development. Topics include linkages between hydrologic variability and communities, groundwater-surface connections, flow paths for dispersal, patchily distributed water resources, and water quality controls on organisms, and adaptations to climate change.Students taking the course for graduate credit are required to meet one additional day each week outside the normal class times in order to participate in a collaborative graduate group project, which includes reading supplemental materials, weekly discussions, data collection/synthesis and write-up.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3159, "title": "Current Topics in Molecular Ecology and Population Genomics", "code": "NTRES 6300", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This graduate seminar will take the form of a journal club that meets weekly to discuss the burgeoning literature on genomic approaches used to address ecological and evolutionary questions in non-model organisms (i.e. organisms that have not been selected by large research communities for extensive study). The class time is used for discussion of recent primary research articles. Paper topics will be determined based on student interest and will include both novel results and methodological advances, primarily in evolutionary and ecological genomics or molecular ecology. To earn course credit, students are required to actively participate in class discussions each week and lead the discussion of at least one paper over course of the semester.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3160, "title": "Decision Making in Natural Resource Management", "code": "NTRES 6601", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This course will provide an introduction to the principles and practice of structured decision making and its application in natural resource management. Students will become familiar with methods for finding optimal solutions to decision problems, and will apply these methods to natural resource problems. Students will become familiar with the application of quantitative decision modeling tools: single and multiple-objective trade-off techniques, decision trees, Bayesian belief and decision networks, linear programming, and dynamic optimization.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3161, "title": "Perspectives in International Development", "code": "NTRES 6960", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "A variety of speakers present seminars on international development topics relating to sustainable development throughout the world. Students attend each seminar and submit a five-page essay at the end of the semester reflecting on the speakers' presentations and analyzing connections between topics.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3162, "title": "Graduate Individual Study in Natural Resources", "code": "NTRES 6970", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Study of topics in natural resources more advanced than, or different from, other courses. Subject matter depends on interests of students and availability of staff.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3163, "title": "Molecular Genetic Approaches to the Study of Ecology and Evolution", "code": "NTRES 7283", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "This group intensive study crosses traditional disciplinary lines to examine discoveries in natural history, ecology and evolution made through the innovative analysis of molecular genetic polymorphisms. Class time is devoted to the discussion of exemplary or representative primary research articles. During Spring 2019 we will focus on phenotypic plasticity and its interactions with evolutionary processes such as local adaptation and the rate of evolution. Specific topics/methods/markers/taxa depend on student interests.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3164, "title": "Graduate-Level Thesis Research", "code": "NTRES 7900", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3165, "title": "Master's Thesis Research", "code": "NTRES 8900", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3166, "title": "Doctoral-Level Thesis Research", "code": "NTRES 9900", "subject": "NTRES", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "NTRES", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3167, "title": "Data Science for All", "code": "ORIE 1380", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to data science. Given data from economics, medicine, biology, or physics, collected from internet denizens, survey respondents, or wireless sensors, how can one understand the phenomenon generating the data, make predictions, and improve decisions? We focus on building skills in inferential thinking and computational thinking, guided by the practical questions we seek to answer. The course teaches critical concepts and skills in computer programming and statistical inference, in conjunction with hands-on analysis of real-world datasets including economic data, document collections, geographical data, and social networks. We will also consider social issues in data analysis such as privacy and design.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3168, "title": "Practical Tools for Operations Research, Machine Learning and Data Science", "code": "ORIE 3120", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "The practical use of software tools and mathematical methods from operations research, machine learning, statistics and data science. Software tools include structured query language (SQL), geographical information systems (GIS), Excel and Visual Basic programming (VBA), and programming in a scripting language (either R or Python). Operations research methods include inventory management, discrete event simulation, and an introduction to the analysis of queuing systems. Machine learning and statistical methods include multiple linear regression, classification, logistic regression, clustering, time-series forecasting, and the design and analysis of A/B tests. These topics will be presented in the context of business applications from transportation, manufacturing, retail, and e-commerce.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3169, "title": "Optimization II", "code": "ORIE 3310", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "A variety of optimization methods stressing extensions of linear programming and its applications but also including topics drawn from integer programming, dynamic programming, and network optimization. Formulation and modeling are stressed as well as numerous applications.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3170, "title": "Introduction to Engineering Stochastic Processes I", "code": "ORIE 3510", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Uses basic concepts and techniques of random processes to construct models for a variety of problems of practical interest. Topics include the Poisson process, Markov chains, renewal theory, models for queuing, and reliability.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3171, "title": "Service System Modeling and Design", "code": "ORIE 4130", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Service systems arise primarily from the service sector of the economy. Examples are contact centers (also known as call centers), airlines, insurance and healthcare. This course describes techniques that are useful in the analysis and design of such systems. The class is structured around a number of cases. The emphasis is on modeling, solving the models, and interpreting the results. Both operational and strategic decisions are covered through appropriate examples.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3172, "title": "Entrepreneurship for Engineers", "code": "ORIE 4152", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Develops skills necessary to identify, evaluate, and begin new business ventures. Topics include intellectual property, competition, strategy, business plans, technology forecasting, finance and accounting, and sources of capital. A rigorous, quantitative approach is stressed throughout, and students create financial documents and plans, analyze human resource models, and work with sophisticated valuation methods, complicated equity structures, and legal and business documents. As such, this course represents the \"red meat\" of entrepreneurship, and the soft skills are left for other courses. Course work consists of discussions, assignments, and the preparation and presentation of a complete business plan.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3173, "title": "Introduction to Financial Engineering", "code": "ORIE 4600", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This is an introduction to the most important notions and ideas in modern financial engineering, such as arbitrage, pricing, derivatives, options, interest rate models, risk measures, equivalent martingale measures, complete and incomplete markets, etc. Most of the time the course deals with discrete time models.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3174, "title": "Statistical Data Mining I", "code": "ORIE 4740", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Examines the statistical aspects of data mining, the effective analysis of large datasets. Covers the process of building and interpreting various statistical models appropriate to such problems arising in scientific and business applications. Topics include na\u00efve Bayes, graphical models, multiple regression, logistic regression, clustering methods and principal component analysis. Assignments are done using one or more statistical computing packages.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3175, "title": "Info Theory, Probabilistic Modeling, and Deep Learning with Scientific and Financial Apps", "code": "ORIE 4742", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This course is about building and understanding machine learning models for scientific and financial applications. It will cover foundational aspects of information theory and probabilistic inference as they relate to model construction and deep learning. Topics include hamming codes, repetition codes, entropy, mutual information, Shannon information, channel capacity, likelihood functions, Bayesian inference, graphical models, and deep neural networks. The section on deep neural networks will consider fully connected, convolutional, recurrent, and LSTM networks, generative adversarial training, and variational autoencoders.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3176, "title": "Spreadsheet-Based Modeling and Data Analysis", "code": "ORIE 4820", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Students develop and implement practical spreadsheet models to analyze data and evaluate decision problems in a hands-on learning environment. Microsoft Excel is heavily used. A wide variety of application areas are covered that incorporate concepts from probability, statistics, and constrained optimization.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3177, "title": "Teaching in ORIE", "code": "ORIE 4990", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Involves working as a TA in an ORIE course. The instructor assigns credits (the guideline is 1 credit per four hours per week of work with a limit of 3 credits).", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3178, "title": "ORIE Project", "code": "ORIE 4999", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Project-type work, under faculty supervision, on a real problem existing in some firm or institution. Opportunities in the course may be discussed with the associate director.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3179, "title": "Principles of Supply Chain Management", "code": "ORIE 5126", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Supply chain management focuses on the flow of products, information, and money through organizations that constitute the supply chain. The course provides an overview of the key principles on which an effective supply chain should be constructed. These principles are presented and illustrated through a collection of cases. These cases are taught using an experiential learning model. Additionally, applications of analytic and simulation tools to the design and operation of supply chains are given.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3180, "title": "e-Logistics", "code": "ORIE 5129", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Many online and tech businesses face logistics challenges that require optimal management of physical resources. These challenges may take the form of opening fulfillment centers at the right locations, stocking the right amount of inventory, running optimal number of servers to satisfy computing needs, repositioning bikes in urban bike-sharing systems, and dispatching and repositioning vehicles in online ride-sharing systems. Addressing these challenges often requires building and deploying large-scale optimization models that can make decisions on the fly. We will cover logistics models that allow firms to optimally use its physical resources. From an application perspective, our models will cover the inventory and supply chain theory, network design and transportation logistics. From a methodology perspective, we will use linear and integer programming, stochastic programming, and Markov decision processes. The course will include a number of large case studies that focus on practical implementations.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3181, "title": "Service System Modeling and Design", "code": "ORIE 5130", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Service systems arise primarily from the service sector of the economy. Examples are contact centers\u00a0(also known as call centers), airlines, insurance and healthcare. This course describes techniques that are useful in the analysis and design of such systems. The class is structured around a number of cases. The emphasis is on modeling, solving the models, and interpreting the results. Both operational and strategic decisions are covered through appropriate examples.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3182, "title": "Service Systems and Online Markets", "code": "ORIE 5132", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This course covers online and physical service systems with a focus on designing and managing them. When designing service systems, we need to determine the sales channels to use when offering services, design incentive mechanisms and make tactical capacity decisions. When operating service systems, we need to make rea-time pricing decisions, allocate capacity between different needs, make product recommendations, and forecast demand and customer behavior. Depending on the application setting, the capacity we manage can be physical, such as seats on an airplane to be allocated to passengers with different willingness to pay amounts, or digital, such as visitors on a webpage to be allocated between advertisers. We will cover ideas from revenue management, experimentation for demand learning, auctions, mechanism design and network theory.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3183, "title": "Networks and Markets", "code": "ORIE 5138", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "The course examines how the computing, economic and sociological worlds are connected and how these connections affects these worlds. Tools from computer science, game theory and mathematics are introduced and then used to analyze network structures present in everyday life. Topics covered include social networks, web search, auctions, markets, voting, and crypto-currencies (e.g. bitcoin).", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3184, "title": "Systems Analysis Behavior and Optimization", "code": "ORIE 5142", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This is an advanced course in the application of analytical methodologies and tools to the analysis and optimization of complex systems. On completion of this course, students should be able to use probability and statistics as a modeling and analysis tool for systems exhibiting uncertainty; be able to use algorithms and dynamic programming to model and optimize systems with a recursive structure; be able to use optimization tools to optimize complex systems and tune parameters.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3185, "title": "Selected Topics in Applied ORIE", "code": "ORIE 5191", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Current topics dealing with applications of operations research.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3186, "title": "Big Data Technologies", "code": "ORIE 5270", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This course offers a broad overview of computational techniques and mathematical skills useful for data scientists. Topics include: unix shell, regular expressions, version control: (git), data structures and algorithms, working with databases, data analysis using Python and related libraries (Pandas, NumPy/Scipy, scikit-learn), parallel computing (Map-Reduce, Spark, Hadoop), basic finite-precision arithmetic, an overview of standard machine learning and optimization algorithms, and time-permitting, a guided tour of functional programming.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3187, "title": "Optimization II", "code": "ORIE 5310", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "A variety of optimization methods stressing extensions of linear programming and its applications but also including topics drawn from integer programming, dynamic programming, and network optimization. Formulation and modeling are stressed as well as numerous applications.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3188, "title": "Optimization Modeling in Finance", "code": "ORIE 5370", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Explores optimization in the context of finance, including methodologies beyond linear programming, such as second-order cone programming and semidefinite programming.\u00a0 Topics include Markowitz portfolio theory and modeling; factor models for portfolio selection and risk control; the Black-Litterman model (and related Bayesian topics); utility functions; coherent risk measures; stochastic programming; and optimal execution of portfolio transactions.\u00a0 Emphasis is on concepts that are directly implementable.\u00a0 Homework and projects require considerable coding in MATLAB.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3189, "title": "Introduction to Engineering Stochastic Processes I", "code": "ORIE 5510", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Uses basic concepts and techniques of random processes to construct models for a variety of problems of practical interest. Topics include the Poisson process, Markov chains, renewal theory, models for queuing, and reliability.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3190, "title": "Applied Time Series Analysis", "code": "ORIE 5550", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Introduces statistical tools for the analysis of time-dependent data. Data analysis and application will be an integral part of this course. Topics include linear, nonlinear, seasonal, multivariate modeling, and financial time series.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3191, "title": "Monte Carlo Methods in Financial Engineering", "code": "ORIE 5582", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "An overview of Monte Carlo methods as they apply in financial engineering. Generating sample paths. Variance reduction (including quasi random number), discretization, and sensitivities. Applications to derivative pricing and risk management.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3192, "title": "Statistics for Financial Engineering", "code": "ORIE 5640", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Regression, ARIMA, GARCH, stochastic volatility, and factor models. Calibration of financial engineering models, estimation of diffusion models, estimation of risk measures, multivariate models and copulas, bayesian statistics. Students are instructed in the use of R software; prior knowledge of R is helpful but not required. This course is intended for M.Eng. students in financial engineering and assumes some familiarity with finance and financial engineering. Students not in the financial engineering program are welcome if they have a suitable background. Students with no background in finance should consider taking ORIE 4630\u00a0instead.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3193, "title": "Manufacturing Option Project", "code": "ORIE 5911", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Project course coordinated by Center for Manufacturing Enterprise.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3194, "title": "Systems Engineering Project", "code": "ORIE 5940", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Substantial, group-based design project that has a strong systems design component. The project must be approved by an ASE 1 instructor before the student enrolls in the course. (The following projects are preapproved: FSAE, HEV, Robocup, Brain.) A formal report is required.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3195, "title": "Applied ORIE and IT Project", "code": "ORIE 5981", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Identification, analysis, design, and evaluation of feasible solutions to some applied problem in the ORIE field.\u00a0 A formation report and oral defense of the approach and solution are required.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3196, "title": "Computational Methods in Operations Research", "code": "ORIE 6125", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "A suite of tools and techniques that enable computation in operations research. Structured and efficient programming, code optimization, code review, version management systems, building a user interface, exploring and manipulating large-scale datasets.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3197, "title": "Mathematics of Data Science", "code": "ORIE 6340", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3198, "title": "Probability", "code": "ORIE 6510", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Covers sample spaces, events, sigma fields, probability measures, set induction, independence, random variables, expectation, review of important distributions and transformation techniques, convergence concepts, laws of large numbers and asymptotic normality, and conditioning.\u00a0 In the last part of the course, we will cover applications to epidemic modeling.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3199, "title": "Approximate Dynamic Programming and Reinforcement Learning", "code": "ORIE 6590", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "This course develops theories and algorithms for optimal sequential decision making under uncertainty. The emphasis will be on approximate algorithms to deal with large-scale decision models that can be highly uncertain. Various bounding techniques in recent literature will be covered. The course will intersect with traditional topics such as Markov decision processes, reinforcement learning, and bandit problems.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3200, "title": "Data-Driven Optimization Under Uncertainty: Theory, Methods, and Current Trends", "code": "ORIE 6751", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Optimization with random costs and constraints underlies many important decision-making problems in operations, healthcare, policymaking, and beyond. Models for these problems include stochastic, chance-constrained, robust, and distributionally robust optimization. Recent years have seen intense interest in using data to inform such decision-making models - both data on the uncertain variables themselves and on auxiliary observations. The aim of this course is to understand the landscape of recent developments and prepare students to both use these tools and contribute to them in their own research. The course will combine lectures on the relevant fundamental theoretical constructs and tools with presentations of selected recent papers, clustered into themes, including contextual stochastic optimization, data-driven robust and distributionally robust optimization, optimization of counterfactuals from observational data, and sequential decision making.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3201, "title": "Bayesian Statistics and Data Analysis", "code": "ORIE 6780", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Priors, posteriors, Bayes estimators, decision theory, asymptotic theory, Bayes factors, credible regions, hierarchical models, nonparametric Bayes, computational methods, Bayesian robustness, and applications.\u00a0 This is a theory-oriented course intended for PhD students.\u00a0 For a more applied introduction to Bayesian statistics, students should take STSCI 4780, Bayesian Data Analysis: Principles and Practice, which is offered in the spring.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3202, "title": "Selected Topics in Mathematical Programming", "code": "ORIE 7391", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Current research topics in mathematical programming.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3203, "title": "Selected Topics in Applied Probability", "code": "ORIE 7590", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Topics are chosen from current literature and research areas of the staff.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3204, "title": "Special Investigations", "code": "ORIE 7900", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "For individuals or small groups. Study of special topics or problems.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3205, "title": "PhD Independent Research", "code": "ORIE 7999", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Independent research for ORIE Ph.D. students.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3206, "title": "ORIE Graduate Colloquium", "code": "ORIE 9000", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Weekly one and one-half hour meeting devoted to presentations by distinguished visitors, by faculty members, and by advanced graduate students on topics of current research in the field of operations research.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3207, "title": "Enterprise Engineering Colloquium", "code": "ORIE 9100", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "Weekly meeting for master of engineering students. Discussion with industry speakers and faculty members on the uses of engineering in the economic design, manufacturing, marketing, and distribution and goods and services.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3208, "title": "M.Eng. Professional Review", "code": "ORIE 9110", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "An interactive course in which students present findings and share lessons from their summer internship experiences.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3209, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "ORIE 9999", "subject": "ORIE", "descr": "For individuals doing thesis research for master's or doctoral degrees.", "tags": "ORIE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3210, "title": "Special Studies", "code": "PADM 5000", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course is for students wishing to do independent study with a PADM faculty member.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3211, "title": "CIPA Public Affairs Colloquium", "code": "PADM 5010", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Practitioners in the field of public affairs/administration/policy discuss current, cross-cutting issues affecting scholarship and practice.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3212, "title": "Professional Development for Public Affairs", "code": "PADM 5012", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course prepares MPA students to enter the job market with the expertise and experience to launch a successful career as well as obtain professional skills necessary to be leaders in the field of public affairs.\u00a0 Topics covered in this course include the role of change management, leading people, results-driven leadership, business acumen, and coalition-building in successful public affairs practice.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3213, "title": "Academic Writing", "code": "PADM 5053", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Designed for non-native speakers of English, this course focuses on developing core academic writing skills in a policy context. The course starts with focused on two overarching patterns in academic writing: the movement from general to specific and movements from problem to process to solution. Data commentaries are developed and summaries and critiques are written. The earlier work is viewed as preparation to write genre specific texts later in the course.", "tags": "CA-HE|D-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3214, "title": "Cross-Cultural Presentations", "code": "PADM 5055", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Designed for non-native speakers of English, this\u00a0course is designed to develop a variety of skills needed to develop effective academic presentations. This includes the examination of organizational strategies relative to major speech types, enhancing flow by the use of linking words, design focus on organizing introductions, developing summary outlines, increasing speaker-listener interactions, the use of evidence, strategically qualifying claims and specific pronunciation work including pausing, stress and intonation.", "tags": "CA-HE|SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3215, "title": "Public Administration", "code": "PADM 5110", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course prepares students to work within government departments and agencies, state and local authorities, and nonprofit public benefit corporations; and with private firms working in the public interest at the interface with governments and public benefit corporations. While the emphasis is on local and mid-size organizations, some material will address international and domestic national level organizations. As a first-year graduate program course it prepares students to conduct research on public organizations leadership and management and to be effective in public careers. It also prepares upper-level undergraduate students for internships and entry into public-sector careers.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3216, "title": "Systems Leadership", "code": "PADM 5114", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course will provide MPA students with a graduate-level overview of key principles and techniques in applying systems thinking to organizational leadership, change and design in public and nonprofit contexts. CIPA is a graduate program that prepares students for leadership positions in public and nonprofit service; although CIPA's learning outcomes are still in progress, we expect mastery in three foundation areas (management/administration, economic analysis, quantitative techniques) followed by specialization in one of eight concentrations. This course, as it is structured, provides students with a range of applied methodologies and tools that are relevant across all MPA degree concentrations. Of particular note is the opportunity for students to present their original research at a public symposium/conference at the end of the semester.", "tags": "KCM-HE|SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3217, "title": "Public Finance: Economics of the Public Sector", "code": "PADM 5220", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course covers topics in public economics, macroeconomics, and political economy. The course will use the tools of economics to consider when and how the government should intervene in the economy, and how different levels of government might intervene differently. We will also devote some coverage to fiscal and monetary policy tools, basics of the business cycle, and determinants of economic growth. Both theory and applications will be covered.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3218, "title": "Applied Multivariate Statistics in Public Affairs", "code": "PADM 5310", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This class is an applied introduction to multivariate statistical inference that is aimed at graduate students with little prior statistical experience, and satisfies the Quantitative Methods and Analytics requirement in CIPA. We will begin with a brief introduction to basic statistical concepts and probability theory before introducing the linear regression model. We then review several tools for diagnosing violations of statistical assumptions, including how to deal with outliers, missing data, omitted variables, and weighting. We will next consider situations in which linear regression will yield biased estimates of the population parameters of interest, with particular attention paid to measurement error, selection on unobservables, and omitted variables. The course will end with an introduction to extensions of the linear regression model, including models for binary and categorical outcomes. While statistical modeling is the focus of the course, we proceed with the assumption that models are only as good as the theoretical and substantive knowledge behind them. Thus, in covering the technical material, we will spend considerable time discussing the link between substantive knowledge and statistical practice. The course is designed primarily for professional masters students.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3219, "title": "Evaluation of International Programs and Projects", "code": "PADM 5345", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course examines results-based management of the programs and projects of international organizations, with an emphasis on evaluation. The course covers how results-based management concepts can be applied at the international level, the process of planning an evaluation, the main analytical techniques that are usually employed and, as a final step, undertakes evaluations of specific projects and programs made by the main organizations at the international level.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3220, "title": "Bridging the Gap: Connecting Research and Policy in the New York State Legislature", "code": "PADM 5382", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "The overarching goal of this course is to offer students the chance to engage in bridging research and state policy, with a particular focus on two-generation (2gen) approaches to supporting family and child well-being. The semester will culminate in a full-day event in Albany, which will include presentations by Cornell students and faculty and one-on-one meetings with legislators, legislative staff, and staff from the Governor's office.", "tags": "CA-HE|D-HE|HA-HE|SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3221, "title": "Technological Change at Work", "code": "PADM 5411", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Computers and digital technologies including robotics, machine learning, artificial intelligence (AI), internet-enabled platforms, and other \"high-tech\" drivers of automation have revolutionized the nature and organization of work in the U.S., with material implications for workers and their families, among others. This upper-level seminar begins with a rhetorical inquiry into whether and when the technological change engendered by digitization and the so-called \"Information Technology (IT) Revolution\" benefits workers. We then consider the broader impact of recent technological advances on manufacturing and fabrication, low- and semi-skilled service work, i.e., restaurant servers and bus drivers, and even on expert and professional work like that to which most of you presumably aspire. Among the central themes is the notion that technology does not unilaterally act upon workers, their employers, or society-at-large. Rather, workers, managers, customers, institutions, and policymakers shape which advances take hold and which do not, the ways that these technologies are deployed in the workplace, and the ways that society can actively mitigate the costs to technological advancement while harnessing its benefits.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3222, "title": "Strategic Stakeholder Engagement", "code": "PADM 5418", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This graduate-level survey course addresses the key concepts and tools of stakeholder identification, mapping, analysis and engagement strategies in working toward sustainable, positive development. With a particular focus on extractive industries in developing and emerging economies, the course is designed for students pursuing careers in sustainability in the public, private, or nonprofit sectors.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3223, "title": "Fundraising, Grantmaking, and Lobbying", "code": "PADM 5431", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course is designed for graduate students considering a career in the non-profit sector.\u00a0 It will provide an overview of philanthropy, specific giving vehicles (annual fund, major gifts, capital gifts, deferred gifts, etc.), capital campaigns, grant writing, working with private foundations and community foundations, and crowdfunding techniques.\u00a0 At the completion of the course students will have a strong working knowledge of key principles and techniques of fundraising and a familiarity with gift vehicles and instruments.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3224, "title": "Effective Writing for Public Policy", "code": "PADM 5441", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3225, "title": "Leveraging Information Technology for Public and Nonprofit Management", "code": "PADM 5472", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Information and communications technologies are fundamentally transforming public and nonprofit sectors. This course combines 1) managerial topics: technology acquisition, outsourcing, project management, risk governance, digital strategies; 2) emerging technologies: social media, artificial intelligence, cloud, analytics, big data; 3) real-life cases from global markets; 4) analytical and problem-solving frameworks. This course doesn't require technical background.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3226, "title": "Intergovernmental Relations", "code": "PADM 5612", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Public and private sector professionals interacting with government agencies need a working understanding of the jurisdictional boundaries of government, the interplay between federal, state, and local government, and the rise of nonprofits, regionalism, and public/private partnerships.\u00a0 This course is designed to enhance upper level undergraduate and graduate students' ability to navigate the complex and ever-evolving US system of government, the delivery of funding and services, and the implementation of statutes and regulations.\u00a0 This course will provide students with first-hand accounts and analysis of governmental functions and roles, from local boards to state and federal government.", "tags": "HA-HE|SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3227, "title": "Corruption, Governance, and Development", "code": "PADM 5634", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This interdisciplinary graduate-level survey course addresses issues related to the nature and extent of corruption and fraud, waste, and abuse in the public sector, and in private/nonprofit sector organizations interfacing with the public sector.", "tags": "CA-HE|HA-HE|KCM-HE|SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3228, "title": "Infrastructure Financing", "code": "PADM 5755", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This course is designed for graduate students considering a career in the public sector in budgeting and debt management, a career in planning, implementing and operating public infrastructure (including transportation, water and sewer, power, education, etc.) or a career in capital markets. At the completion of the course students will have a strong working knowledge of key principles and techniques of public finance and a familiarity with finance instruments.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3229, "title": "Infrastructure Project Management and Finance Practicum", "code": "PADM 5757", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This engaged learning course will provide students with a first-hand look at the technical, social, economic and political dimensions associated with a real-world infrastructure challenge. Students will learn about the procedures, methods, challenges and opportunities involved in planning, executing and maintaining public infrastructure.\u00a0 Note that this course requires an intensive field study over winter break. Students should contact the instructor for application and enrollment procedures.\u00a0 Although this course is open to all students, priority will be given to students enrolled in CIPA's Infrastructure Project Management and Finance (IPMF) Certificate Program.", "tags": "HA-HE|SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3230, "title": "International Human Rights", "code": "PADM 5855", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "The course looks at the origins and operation of the international human rights system developed primarily through the United Nations. It looks at the history of the way in which human rights are defined, how their content is agreed by governments and how they are enforced through international bodies and the work of non-governmental organizations. After a general introduction to the concept of human rights, and a review of the history of their formulation, subsequent sessions will look at specific groups of human rights, including some now being defined, and how they are dealt with.", "tags": "CA-HE|D-HE|HA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3231, "title": "Consulting for Nonprofit and Government Organizations", "code": "PADM 5900", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This class teaches practical skills that will enable students to work with clients in the local community, learn about organizational structure and culture, and gain real-world experience as they complete a public-service project. Students receive instruction on topics such as organizational development, program evaluation, project management, professional communication, and strategic planning. A significant portion of the course will focus on project management.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3232, "title": "Special Topics: Cornell Institute for Public Affairs Domestic Capstone", "code": "PADM 5910", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Provides 2nd year MPA students with opportunities to practice skills they've learned in their coursework and professional experiences to address policy or management problems for real-world clients in government or nonprofit agencies in the US. CIPA students may use the reports produced in this course to meet the CIPA writing requirement.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3233, "title": "Public Affairs Externships", "code": "PADM 5920", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Combines a professional public affairs externship in a metropolitan area with academic study to provide experience and understanding of the planner's role in formulating and implementing plans and policies. Externships are available in international organizations, federal, state, and local government agencies, legislative offices, and comparable settings include development of research, analysis, and other technical skills.\u00a0 Weekly seminars draw on student field experiences, assigned readings, and guest speakers to examine current issues of federal, urban, and regional policy from the perspective of public affairs practice.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3234, "title": "Systems Thinking Modeling and Leadership", "code": "PADM 5949", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3235, "title": "Special Topics: Cornell Institute for Public Affairs International Capstone", "code": "PADM 5950", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "Provides 2nd year MPA students with opportunities to practice skills they've learned in their coursework and professional experiences to address policy or management problems for real-world clients in government or nonprofit agencies worldwide. CIPA students may use the reports produced in this course to meet the CIPA writing requirement.", "tags": "PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3236, "title": "Environmental Finance and Impact Investing Practicum", "code": "PADM 5979", "subject": "PADM", "descr": "This experiential learning course will provide the opportunity for students to work as a team on some of the leading questions in the area of sustainable finance and impact investing today, while developing skills in client relationship management and project execution. Students will work with experts at South Pole, a leading sustainable finance firm based in Zurich, Switzerland, to develop and propose a financial product intended to deliver both economic as well as environmental and social returns. Specifically, the student team will be charged with conceptualizing and proposing a fund focused on investments in companies and projects in the area of sustainable tourism. Note that this is a multi-semester course open to students enrolled in CIPA's Environmental Finance and Impact Investing (EFII) Fellows Program. Students must take PADM 5978\u00a0(EFII Pre-Sessional) before enrolling in PADM 5979.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PADM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3237, "title": "PAM Career Explorations", "code": "PAM 1050", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This is a course designed specifically for PAM majors and those interested in exploring the range of careers that a PAM degree can provide. Careers may include public policy, research, higher education, government, finance, consulting, law, non-profit work, and so much more. Alumni representing these disciplines will be invited to discuss how PAM influenced their work while addressing current issues, trends, and career opportunities.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3238, "title": "Rose Scholars Program", "code": "PAM 1200", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Rose Scholars program is an interdisciplinary course targeted at residents of Flora Rose House, but open to all. The program requires weekly participation in one of about five guided trips, workshops, discussions, lectures, and performances in social sciences, natural sciences, arts, humanities, and other fields. Participants reflect on their experiences with weekly digital media postings. The program is designed to introduce participants to the breadth of intellectual resources and activities on the Cornell campus and in the nearby community.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3239, "title": "Intermediate Microeconomics", "code": "PAM 2000", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Topics include theory of demand and consumer behavior including classical and indifference curve analyses; theories of production and cost; models for the following markets-competitive, monopoly, monopolistic competition, oligopoly, and inputs; general equilibrium; welfare economics; public goods; and risk.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3240, "title": "Population and Public Policy", "code": "PAM 2030", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Population and Public Policy exposes students to the logic and skills of demographic research and policy analysis. The course emphasizes the nature, collection, and interpretation of demographic data, the application of demographic techniques, the major components (i.e., fertility, mortality, and migration) of national and global population change, and contemporary population problems (e.g., population aging, teen childbearing, the rise in non-marital childbearing, immigrant adaptation). The course also emphasizes public policies that can influence demographic change. The format primarily involves lectures and class discussion. Students are expected to attend each class and be prepared to discuss assigned materials.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3241, "title": "Big Data for Big Policy Problems", "code": "PAM 2070", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course is an introductory overview of new innovations in data science, management, and programming, with accessible applications to a dynamic set of the most pressing social policy issues.\u00a0 Each semester, we will cover rotating topical modules ranging from income inequality to education to climate change to diversity and nativism to health. Students will learn about important policy issues through both the economics and sociological lenses, how big data are being used to address policy problems, and technical skills for how to begin using data in similar ways to address policy problems.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3242, "title": "Introduction to Statistics", "code": "PAM 2100", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "The course introduces students to standard methods of describing and analyzing data, probability theory, statistical inference, and ordinary least squares. Students will learn to describe data with summary tables and charts, understand and apply probability theory to data, understand sampling distributions, conduct hypothesis tests, estimate regressions, and interpret statistical findings. Students will also learn to use the basics of Excel to analyze data.", "tags": "MQR-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3243, "title": "Social Inequality", "code": "PAM 2208", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course reviews contemporary approaches to understanding social inequality and the processes by which it comes to be seen as legitimate, natural, or desirable. We address questions of the following kind: what are the major forms of stratification in human history? Are inequality and poverty inevitable? How many social classes are there in advanced industrialism societies? Is there a \"ruling class\"? Are lifestyles, attitudes, and personalities shaped fundamentally by class membership? Can individuals born into poverty readily escape their class origins and move upward in the class structure? Are social contacts and \"luck\" important forces in matching individuals to jobs and class positions? What types of social processes serve to maintain and alter racial, ethnic, and gender discrimination in labor markets? Is there an \"underclass\"? These and other questions are addressed in light of classical and contemporary theory and research.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3244, "title": "Migration: Histories, Controversies, and Perspectives", "code": "PAM 2810", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This introductory course introduces students to issues and debates related to international migration and will provide an interdisciplinary foundation to understanding the factors that shape migration flows and migrant experiences. \u00a0We will start by reviewing theories of the state and historical examples of immigrant racialization and exclusion in the United States and beyond. \u00a0We will critically examine the notions of borders, citizenship/non-citizenship, and the creation of diasporas. \u00a0Students will also hear a range of perspectives by exposing them to Cornell guest faculty who do research and teach on migration across different disciplines and methodologies and in different world areas. Examples include demographic researchers concerned with immigrant inequality and family formation, geographic perspectives on the changing landscapes of immigrant metropolises, legal scholarship on the rights of immigrant workers, and the study of immigrant culture from a feminist studies lens. \u00a0Offered each fall semester.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3245, "title": "Multiple Regression Analysis", "code": "PAM 3100", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Introduces basic econometric principles and the use of statistical procedures in empirical studies of economic models. Discusses assumptions, properties, and problems encountered in the use of multiple regression procedures. Students are required to specify, estimate, and report the results of an empirical model.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3246, "title": "Research Design, Practice, and Policy", "code": "PAM 3120", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Examines systematic approaches for addressing questions about poverty, family life, racial inequality, and a range of other issues central to public policy. It emphasizes the logic and methods of social science research, including the measurement of social phenomena, generalizing results to groups of interest, establishing cause and effect, social experiments, survey research, and qualitative methods. It develops skills to critically evaluate the research of others and provides hands-on experience applying research methods to policy-related problems.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3247, "title": "Behavioral Economics and Public Policy", "code": "PAM 3130", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Standard economic theory assumes that individuals are rational decision-makers; however, that is often not the case in the real world. Behavioral economics uses findings from psychology to determine ways in which individuals are systematically irrational to improve upon existing models. The first part of this course reviews these theories, while the second part of the course focuses on how these findings have been used to design better education, health, and tax policies as well as many others.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3248, "title": "Labor Markets and Public Policy", "code": "PAM 3160", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course provides a survey of labor economics with an emphasis on policy issues. While the course teaches the analytical tools necessary to understand how labor markets work, it is structured around a number of prominent labor market policy issues, such as immigration, inequality, minimum wages, affirmative action and the role of unions.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3249, "title": "Cost-Benefit Analysis", "code": "PAM 3300", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "In-depth treatment of methods for public policy analysis. The course focuses on cost-benefit analysis, a method grounded in microeconomics and applied welfare economics. Topics include market failures; willingness to pay; opportunity costs; discounting future costs and benefits; handling uncertainty and risk; incorporating distributional impacts; methods to value a statistical life; and methods to value environmental quality and other non-market goods. Numerous examples are taken from a variety of policy areas, including crime, education, health, welfare, and regulation.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3250, "title": "Corporations, Shareholders, and Policy", "code": "PAM 3340", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Uses economic analysis to study the interaction of the market, the corporation, and the law and how these interactions affect the well-being of shareholders and consumers. Examines the costs and benefits of the corporate form of organization. The legal institutions defining the corporation, such as limited liability and shareholder voting, are analyzed along with regulations governing these institutions. A particular focus is mechanisms that control the behavior of managers. Those mechanisms include hostile takeovers, insider trading, outside directors on the board, the role of large investors, and executive compensation plans. Additional topics include government ownership of corporations and nonprofit enterprises.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3251, "title": "The Economics of Consumer Policy", "code": "PAM 3400", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Familiarizes students with the economic analysis of consumer policy issues. Uses the tools of microeconomic analysis to investigate the interaction between government and the marketplace, with an emphasis on how that interaction affects consumers. Examines the rationale for and effects of regulation of industry. Considers alternative theories of regulation, including the capture, economic, and public interest theories. Applies those theories to specific types of regulation, including economic regulation of specific industries (e.g., telecommunications, electricity, trucking, railroads, postal services) as well as to broader social regulation (e.g., health, safety, environmental). The effects of regulatory reform in numerous industries are also examined. An attempt is made to examine current topics relating to consumer policy.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3252, "title": "Intellectual Property Law and Policy", "code": "PAM 3764", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course covers domestic copyright law, which protects creative expression; patent law, which protects novel and useful inventions; and trademark law, which protects brand identifiers.\u00a0 It also explores common law intellectual property rights like trade secret protections.\u00a0 The aim of the course is not simply to learn what the law is, but why.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3253, "title": "Sick Around the World? Comparing Health Care Systems Around the World", "code": "PAM 3780", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction into Comparative Health Care System Analysis. Using a unifying framework, students learn how to systematically analyze the institutional and organizational setup of different health care systems around the world. The structure and performance of several health care systems is benchmarked against the US health care system.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3254, "title": "Federal Policy Making in Action", "code": "PAM 3910", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "The purpose of this one-credit course is to provide a behind-the-scenes examination of the U.S. federal policy making process with examples primarily relating to labor policy.\u00a0 We will begin with a discussion of the statutory framework that shapes this process and defines the roles of the many entities involved.\u00a0 Understanding how policy is developed in law and regulation will be a major emphasis of the course.\u00a0 Policy implementation, administration, and oversight will also be addressed.\u00a0 We will focus on a variety of related topics, including the President's Budget, congressional appropriations, inter-agency collaboration, and the effect of good government initiatives on substantive policy making. Early efforts to respond to the economic effects of the COVID-19 crisis will also be discussed.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3255, "title": "Empirical Research", "code": "PAM 4010", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "For study that predominantly involves data collection and analysis.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3256, "title": "Demographic Techniques", "code": "PAM 4080", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This is the second course in the demographic techniques sequence. It has two foci. First, we will learn the basics of constructing single and multiple decrement life tables, along with extensions to cause-deleted life tables. Second, we will learn the basics of survival analysis, as well as how survival analysis relates to life tables. Although the primary goal is learning to use these techniques, this class also has a heavy emphasis on thinking about how to use these methods to produce something new and important for research.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3257, "title": "The Ethnography of Poverty and Inequality", "code": "PAM 4160", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course explores poverty and inequality in American society through the lens of ethnographic and other field-based research. We will read classic and contemporary texts which have shaped our understanding of how social inequality and exclusion constrain people's daily lives and how groups develop innovative responses to these constraints.", "tags": "CA-HE|D-HE|KCM-HE|SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3258, "title": "Gender and Health: Concepts, Data, Theories and Evidence", "code": "PAM 4230", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course will provide a broad, policy-oriented introduction to the subject of gender as a factor in health and development. In recent years the literature on the subject has grown and led to several calls to make gender issues central to policies for health in particular and development in general. While much of this literature is focused on the special disadvantages of women and girls, the course will include this focus but will also ask important questions related to the ignored distinction between sex and gender. When we think about the health impact of the social and economic disadvantages of women, we will look at the ways in which these female handicaps also translate into poor health outcomes for others, as well as put a brake on development in general.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3259, "title": "Collaborative Modeling Methods for Policy and Program Evaluation", "code": "PAM 4540", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course addresses the evaluation of policies and their programmatic implementation. The course introduces a framework for understanding the policy-program system, provides skills in a variety of methodologies for facilitating the development of well-articulated policy and program models among key stakeholders (e.g., policy makers, funders, government entities, administrators and the general public), and critically assesses the strengths of different approaches.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3260, "title": "International Perspectives on Population Policy", "code": "PAM 4600", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Demographers expect the world's population to reach 8 billion people in the next decade. How did we get there, and what lies ahead? How do population trends vary by countries and regions of the world, and why? How do demographers think about the past and present \u2013 let alone the future \u2013 of populations? How do they understand the impact of population trends on economic development, health and well-being, and family systems? How does this demographic knowledge inform population policy? And how has population policy shaped demographic change in different parts of the globe? Addressing these questions through case studies in South and East Asia and sub-Saharan Africa, this course offers an intermediate-level survey of international population issues and their interplay with public policy.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3261, "title": "PAM Engaged Learning Capstone", "code": "PAM 4950", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This engaged learning course offers students the opportunity to integrate and apply knowledge and skills by addressing a real-world question presented by a community partner. Students will work collaboratively on an applied research project, produce a professional report, and brief community members on the outcomes and recommendations of their research.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3262, "title": "Honors Program", "code": "PAM 4990", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Provides students with the opportunity to undertake basic or applied research that will be preparation of a thesis representing original work of publishable quality. Intended for students who desire the opportunity to extend their interests and efforts beyond the current course offerings in the department. Furthermore, the program is designed to offer the student the opportunity to work closely with a professor on a topic of interest. The number of hours of thesis credit is determined by the student's research mentor. See the director of undergraduate studies for more details.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3263, "title": "Behavioral Economics and Public Policy", "code": "PAM 5130", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Standard economic theory assumes that individuals are rational decision-makers; however, that is often not the case in the real world. Behavioral economics uses findings from psychology to determine ways in which individuals are systematically irrational to improve upon existing models. The first part of this course reviews these theories, while the second part of the course focuses on how these findings have been used to design better education, health, and tax policies as well as many others.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3264, "title": "Population Health for Health Managers", "code": "PAM 5280", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Population health focuses on the health and well\u2010being of entire populations. Populations may be geographically\u00a0defined, such as neighborhoods or counties; may be based on groups of individuals who share common\u00a0characteristics such as age, race\u2010ethnicity, disease status, or socioeconomic status; or may be \"attributed\" to\u00a0accountable healthcare organizations using a variety of methods. With roots in epidemiology, public health, and demography, a key component of population health is the focus on the social determinants of health and collaborative, holistic, patient\u2010centered and coordinated care to improve population health, identify and reduce health disparities, improve healthcare quality, and reduce healthcare costs. Given the shifting health care environment \u2013 from fee\u2010for\u2010service to value\u2010based care \u2013 healthcare managers who are able to apply tools to measure, analyze, evaluate and improve population health (one aim of IHI's Triple Aim) will be well\u2010positioned for positions in health care as the field continues to evolve.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3265, "title": "Corporations, Shareholders, and Policy", "code": "PAM 5334", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "The term \"firm\" has very broad usage. It refers to any organizational form that people use to create teams or groups that focus on achieving a specific purpose. Firms provide a structure through which people can organize themselves into those groups or teams. They are categorized by the nature of the property rights owners hold in the firm, and by the details of the firm's contractual arrangements. Common firm types include partnerships, sole proprietorships, non-profits, mutuals, and publicly traded corporations, among others. This course focuses on one important firm type: the modern publicly traded, privately owned corporation. The course uses economic and statistical analysis to study the interaction of the public corporation, the market, and the law, and how those interactions affect the welfare of managers, shareholders and consumers. The costs and benefits of that standard corporate form of organization are examined. A variety of legal institutions, some of which have evolved over decades, are analyzed. Those institutions define and govern the corporation. They include limited liability, fiduciary duties, the business judgment rule, and shareholder voting. The mechanisms of corporate governance, i.e., those legal and market-based forces that help control the corporation and ensure that managers operate it in shareholders' interest, are examined. Corporate governance mechanisms include hostile takeovers, insider trading, outside directors on the board, the monitoring role of institutional investors, audits, and executive compensation plans. State corporate law and anti-takeover devices are also discussed. The role and impact of federal policies, such as the 1933-34 Exchange Acts, the Sarbanes-Oxley Act and the Dodd-Frank Act in affecting corporate structure and managerial behavior will be an important focus. Other institutions and policies related to publicly traded corporations, such as sovereign wealth funds and government-sponsored enterprises, will also be examined along the way.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3266, "title": "Economics of Consumer Policy", "code": "PAM 5400", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course is designed to develop students' critical understanding of government policies aimed toward protecting consumers' wellbeing in markets. The course uses the tools of microeconomic analysis to investigate the various rationales for and the effects of these forms of government regulation. Economic theory is applied to the study of specific consumer protection policies in the United States and elsewhere.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3267, "title": "Microeconomics for Management and Policy", "code": "PAM 5470", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Introduces microeconomic theory and its application to decision making in the management and policy arenas. Places special emphasis on the economic environment of health care organizations and the problems faced by managers in this environment.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3268, "title": "Collaborative Modeling Methods for Policy and Program Evaluation", "code": "PAM 5550", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course addresses the evaluation of policies and their programmatic implementation. The course introduces a framework for understanding the policy-program system, provides skills in a variety of methodologies for facilitating the development of well-articulated policy and program models among key stakeholders (e.g., policy makers, funders, government entities, administrators and the general public), and critically assesses the strengths of different approaches.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3269, "title": "Managerial Finance", "code": "PAM 5563", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to business finance through video lectures and assignments. Topics include basic financial accounting, time value of money, stock and bond valuation, capital budgeting, portfolio theory, asset-pricing models, cost of capital, dealing with risk, capital structure, acquisitions, and options. Application of theory to practical applications will be emphasized.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3270, "title": "The Healthcare Industry from a Consulting Perspective", "code": "PAM 5580", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course aims to help students develop a holistic and pragmatic view of the healthcare industry and enhance their consulting toolkit. It offers an overview of different segments (pharma, payer, provider), the major challenges different players are trying to solve, and the consulting approach to address these challenges. Students will get to practice core consulting skills such as problem solving, synthesis and storytelling.", "tags": "SBA-HE|PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3271, "title": "Managing Operations", "code": "PAM 5583", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course prepares students to think analytically and managerially about operations processes, and to use the tools and intuition they acquire to ensure that the operations in production and service systems support the business strategies for these systems. A process view of operations will be used to analyze different key operational dimensions such as flow time management, service operations management, quality management, inventory management and supply chain management.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3272, "title": "Health Care Finance for Managers", "code": "PAM 5633", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This case-based course focuses on the financial analyses that managers in the health care industry use to make strategic and operating decisions.\u00a0 We will begin by examining how health insurers design and price their products and manage enrollees' medical expenditures.\u00a0 The reimbursement methods that public and private insurers use in turn affect how physicians, health systems, and other providers are organized and managed.\u00a0 Therefore, we will measure a health system's profitability by product/service line and examine how reimbursement can be used to align physician and hospital incentives.\u00a0 In the second half of the course we will we will review how firms set prices and forecast sales and cash flows.\u00a0 We will then review and apply three different methods of valuing medical products/services and companies: the expected net present value of free cash flows, multiples, and the venture capital method, and explore how to price products/services.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3273, "title": "Health Policy", "code": "PAM 5670", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Addresses major health policy issues and the critical processes that influence them. Focuses primarily on the United States, with some coverage of health policy in other countries. Topics include Medicare, Medicaid, the uninsured, public health, the effect of welfare policy on health care, managed care development and regulation, state and federal health care reform, and many others. The course analyzes the politics of health policy in terms of legislative and executive processes; the forces involved including economic, social, ethical, and political factors; and key players in health policy, such as special interest groups, public agencies, and elected officials.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3274, "title": "Desktop and Modeling Solutions", "code": "PAM 5679", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course presents an advanced approach to data-intensive problem-solving using Microsoft Excel. Advanced concepts such as external queries, data tables, arrays, iterative techniques and macros will be reviewed. These will then be incorporated into an integrated business model. Emphasis will be on clear, separated input and output, data integrity, user interface design, documentation, maintainability, robustness and user support.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3275, "title": "Leadership, Innovation and Change Management", "code": "PAM 5713", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course will take on two major topics: organizational culture and identifying and aligning products, services, and strategies throughout a healthcare organization. The course will equip students with the proper tools to lead innovation and change within a healthcare organization. Topics will include culture, business analysis models such as BCG matrix, SWOT analysis, porters five forces, and strategic plans.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3276, "title": "Short Course in Fundamentals of Health Facility Planning for Managers", "code": "PAM 5740", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Provides M.H.A. and other students who may be interested in careers in health care management with a basic familiarity regarding some of the concepts and terminology related to health facility planning projects. The course touches on areas that a manager might encounter, including working with designers, the relationship between strategic planning issues and facility planning, basic cost estimating techniques, simplified plan interpretation, and use of architectural and engineering scales. The course have two primary components. One portion is lectures and hands-on demonstrations on plan reading/measurements and an overview of the process of project planning. We anticipate a tour of an active or recently completed project at either Cornell or Cayuga Medical Center as time allows. The other involves live or videoconference presentations from invited practitioners and researchers in the health facilities area.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3277, "title": "Special Topics in Health Administration and Finance", "code": "PAM 5900", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "A special topics course specifically designed for students in the Sloan Program in Health Administration. Possible multiple offerings using adjunct faculty teaching in areas of expertise not covered in depth in the Sloan core curriculum and relevant to students preparing for careers in health management. Format ranges from intensive courses offered over several full days to longer courses meeting on a weekly basis. Each section represents a separate stand-alone course occurring over the dates indicated.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3278, "title": "Field Study in Health Administration and Planning", "code": "PAM 5952", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Students interested in developing administrative and program-planning research skills are given an opportunity to evaluate an ongoing phase of health care agency activity in the light of sound administrative practice and principles of good medical care. In planning and carrying out the research, students work closely with a skilled practicing administrator and with members of the faculty.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3279, "title": "Field Studies for Health Managers", "code": "PAM 5953", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "The course is designed to act as an integrative experience combining the competencies and knowledge gained during the student's time at Sloan and the experiences gained in employment. The field study allows students to work on a long term project within their organization which has been identified as relevant to the coursework and important to the organization. Students will work on a project within their own health care organization throughout the 18 month course of the program. Applying what has been learned in courses and in their career, the students are expected to develop relevant and actionable strategic solutions for the project, culminating in an oral presentation, with a written summary of analysis, documentation and rationale.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3280, "title": "Challenges and Trends in the Health Services Industry", "code": "PAM 5990", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Provides students with information and exposure to current and emerging issues in the health services industry. Topics may include financial management of health care facilities, human resource management, information systems, cost-effective clinical decision making, quality measurement and outcomes, public health, and entrepreneurship in the health services industry.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3281, "title": "Special Problems for Graduate Students", "code": "PAM 6000", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Independent advanced work by graduate students recommended by their chair and approved by the department chair and the instructor.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3282, "title": "Intermediate Statistics for Sociological Research", "code": "PAM 6020", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course provides the second part of a two-semester introduction to quantitative methods in sociological research. It is designed for first-year graduate students in sociology. The course covers intermediate topics in linear regression, and provides an introduction to models for categorical and count data, the analysis of time data, and longitudinal data. We'll also discuss data-related issues such as missing data and weighting, and data that are complicated by issues of non-random design. While statistical modeling is the focus of the course, we proceed with the assumption that models are only as good as the theoretical and substantive knowledge behind them. Thus, in covering the technical material, we will spend considerable time discussing the link between substantive knowledge and statistical practice.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3283, "title": "Demographic Techniques", "code": "PAM 6060", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This is the second course in the demographic techniques sequence. It has two foci. First, we will learn the basics of constructing single and multiple decrement life tables, along with extensions to cause-deleted life tables. Second, we will learn the basics of survival analysis, as well as how survival analysis relates to life tables. Although the primary goal is learning to use these techniques, this class also has a heavy emphasis on thinking about how to use these methods to produce something new and important for research. The grad students will also be asked to complete a 10 page research proposal.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3284, "title": "Empirical Strategies for Policy Research II", "code": "PAM 6091", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course is the second of a two-course sequence. Both PAM 6090\u00a0and this course are, for the most part, targeted at students looking to do empirical research into the effects of some X on some Y. Both courses require students to complete problem sets that involve \"hands-on\" exercises \u2013 some based on real data and some using Monte Carlo simulations. The hope is that this \"learning by doing\" will reinforce what is taught in class. Usually, the first course covers core methods, specifically regression adjustment, matching and instrumental variables. This second course covers additional topics in matching (we will touch on machine learning methods in the process), regression discontinuity designs, panel data methods, and mediation analysis in spring 2019.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3285, "title": "Health Economics II", "code": "PAM 6420", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "This course belongs to the health economics sequence. In addition to health economics, some topics cover public and labor economics. Students will also learn how to develop research sketches. First, we talk about U.S. health insurance and its intersection with the labor market. Then, we talk about health care providers, their reimbursement and behavior. Next, we study social insurance systems for health risks, such as disability or sick leave insurance. Finally, we cover specific topics like health measurement, the value of a statistical life or cost-benefit analysis. The lectures will not cover health behaviors (PAM 6410), human capital and early childhood effects, the environment-health literature, and effects of income, education, and unemployment on health (behaviors).", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3286, "title": "Health Economics Workshop", "code": "PAM 6440", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "Presentations of completed papers and work in progress by faculty members, advanced graduate students, and speakers from other universities. Focuses on professionalization and on the formulation, design, and execution of research papers and dissertations.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3287, "title": "Demography Training Seminar", "code": "PAM 6810", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "CPC's weekly training seminar provides training and professional development to graduate students in demography and serves as a requirement for the graduate demography minor. Includes workshops and presentations of completed papers and work in progress by faculty members, advanced graduate students, and external speakers.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3288, "title": "Empirical Public Finance and Taxation", "code": "PAM 6970", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "The principal objective of this course is to explore empirical evidence on the role of government intervention in the economy. The focus of the course will be on reading important papers and learning techniques that will allow you to produce original research in public economics and to analyze critically existing research in the field.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3289, "title": "Master's Thesis and Research", "code": "PAM 8990", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3290, "title": "Doctoral Thesis and Research", "code": "PAM 9990", "subject": "PAM", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PAM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3291, "title": "Beginning Swimming", "code": "PE 1100", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Instruction and practice in skills leading to passing the basic swimming proficiency test.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3292, "title": "Swimming Conditioning", "code": "PE 1104", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Introduction to and practice of different types of training methods. Final objectives: 2500 yards in one class period. Please note: This is primarily a conditioning course and not a stroke instruction one. The focus will be on workouts, workout planning and different types of training methods. This course is intended for more advanced swimmers. Students who have just completed beginning or advanced beginning swimming may have a very difficult time in this course.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3293, "title": "Open Water Scuba", "code": "PE 1130", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Program includes classroom work, skill training in the pool, and open-water training in Cayuga Lake in the summer and fall. Spring classes will be referral only (no open water dives). P.A.D.I. open-water certification awarded upon successful completion of summer and fall classes. Please carefully read the additional information on the PE website for particulars.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3294, "title": "Introduction to Belly Dancing", "code": "PE 1155", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Belly Dance, as it is called in the West, is an exciting art form expressing joy and happiness originating in the Middle East. Learning the correct posture and basic movements that are used in the many styles of this dance, we will combine movements and isolations of the body and put them together into several different dances including a drum solo. Dancing to the variety of Middle Eastern rhythms and melody is a fun, relaxing, stress free way to enjoy the day while developing flexibility, body awareness and overall body tone. Loose comfortable clothing is worn and the instructor provides hip scarves to use in class, if you have a coin belt please feel free to wear it in class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3295, "title": "Group Fitness Instructor Apprentice", "code": "PE 1232", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The hours for the course are arranged with the instructor.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3296, "title": "Bootcamp", "code": "PE 1233", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course is designed as a modern military style workout program with an emphasis on both aerobic and anaerobic fitness. Each ninety minute workout session will consist of stretching, warm-up calisthenics, cardio training using many forms of running, upper body development using circuit courses on Trotter equipment and some free weights, abdominals and cool down stretching. This is a high energy course that will teach students the importance of motivation, enthusiasm and teamwork while familiarizing them with total-fitness techniques and concepts. Students should be prepared to train inside and out at each session. If you are ready to push yourself and train hard, Bootcamp is for you. Students of all fitness levels will benefit greatly from this course.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3297, "title": "8 O'Clock Rock", "code": "PE 1235", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class combines the best of the Principals of Weight Training and Cardio Crazy to get your day off to a rocking and rolling great start. Students will use resistance and cardio equipment to create the perfect morning wake-up call.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3298, "title": "Cardio Fuego", "code": "PE 1236", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class offers an exciting new Group Fitness experience. Each class will combine simple International dance rhythms with a fitness component of strength and core work. Students will work thru basic progressions of many globally influenced dance styles to build their skills in this very fun new fusion of dance. This class will start with the basics and gradually build the skill levels as the semester progresses.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3299, "title": "Yasaride", "code": "PE 1237", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class combines two wonderful activities, indoor cycling and yoga into a mindful stress reducing hour of fitness. The yoga portion will focus on full body stretching as well as areas that need more attention after cycling such as hamstrings, hips, and the spine.\u00a0 The class will also include work on breath, alignment, and mindfulness in both the cycling and yoga portions of the class. The length of time for each activity will vary from class to class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3300, "title": "Indoor Stationary Cycling", "code": "PE 1245", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Based on the foundation of the Spinning\u00ae Program this indoor stationary cycling class combines basic cycling movements with motivational coaching, breathing awareness, and heart rate training. This non-impact, individually paced, cardiovascular fitness class is held in a fun environment with music that will move you! A great alternative to traditional group fitness classes.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3301, "title": "Army ROTC Physical Training", "code": "PE 1250", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Physical training is a key component to any personal development program. Training early and often allows one to get the day's workout out of the way, starting the day focused and relaxed, and increasing discipline throughout the semester. Physical training consists of early morning workouts with Army ROTC Cadets and Instructors, that focus on cardiovascular and muscular development, following a holistic workout to help achieve a strong core and heart.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3302, "title": "Cardio Kickboxing", "code": "PE 1260", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Cardio-Kickboxing is a series of movements that consists of kicks, punches, and blocks done to music. It is similar to a typical aerobics class except the moves consist of martial arts techniques. Cardio-Kickboxing is a total body workout in its most complete form burning over 800 calories and hour. No experience necessary.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3303, "title": "Fitness and Conditioning", "code": "PE 1261", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Fitness and conditioning is designed to familiarize the student with several different forms of exercise. Facilities used include the track, the gymnasium and other places around campus. The components of physical fitness include cardiovascular endurance, muscular strength, general flexibility and agility. The course will offer activities that enhance each component and help the individual to design a personal conditioning program for future fitness and well-being.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3304, "title": "Fitness for Women", "code": "PE 1262", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The design of this course includes both lecture and physical activity. Students are presented with a variety of topics and information that involves physical fitness and health. Each student will learn to design a fitness program that is geared toward her own interests and abilities. Topics include: nutrition, time management, relaxation techniques, and stress management. Activities will include aerobic dance, walking, jogging, weight training, flexibility exercises, relaxation and stress management routines, and yoga techniques.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3305, "title": "Wellness and Fitness", "code": "PE 1265", "subject": "PE", "descr": "\"Here's to a Healthier You\" - A wellness experience for the busy student. This course will assess the student's physical fitness status, blood cholesterol levels and overall lifestyle health habits. Each student will receive an individual exercise prescription. Lectures on Nutrition and Stress Management are also presented. There will be one hour arranged with the instructor outside of normal class hours. This course has been made possible through the generosity of the Bateman family in memory of Ms. Dorothy Bateman, Cornell's first Director of Women's Sports and Physical Education (1920 to 1962).", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3306, "title": "Introduction to Jogging", "code": "PE 1270", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Covers running and stretching techniques. It comprises a conditioning program with the objective to develop the capacity to run 3 miles after 12 weeks of training.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3307, "title": "Jogging Tours", "code": "PE 1271", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course is designed for the intermediate runner who can run an average of 3 miles in 30 minutes. Most tours will be 3 miles long and will go through campus and the nearby countryside. At times, weather may necessitate indoor training.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3308, "title": "Walking Tours", "code": "PE 1272", "subject": "PE", "descr": "A series of walking tours around the Cornell Campus and beyond. Class will meet regardless of weather, so please come prepared.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3309, "title": "Walking Meditation", "code": "PE 1273", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course combines walking and meditation, two life-enhancing activities that can help students create balance in their hectic lives. Walking is the optimum exercise for good health and meditation offers the opportunity to calm an active and busy mind. Drawing on the teachings from the Vietnamese Zen Buddist monk, Thich Nhat Hanh, will involve meditating in motion.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3310, "title": "Introduction to Bowling", "code": "PE 1300", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Instruction available during each class session for the Beginning or Intermediate level bowler. Choice of two 45 minute classes per week or one class for 90 minutes on Fridays. Shoe rental included in course fee which covers approximately 72 games.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3311, "title": "Professional Instructional Golf", "code": "PE 1320", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Equipment furnished. PGA program of instruction geared to all levels of experience and ability. The objective is to give beginners enough skill to play, and to give more advanced players direction in their thinking, practice, and play, through a thorough understanding of fundamentals.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3312, "title": "Recreational Golf", "code": "PE 1321", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Students must play a minimum of 10 rounds of nine holes to receive credit. Students must be EXPERIENCED golfers\u00a0(i.e. they MUST have golf playing experience on a course) and have their own set of clubs or use a rental set from the pro shop. Students who do not have the appropriate skills will be removed from the course and will not receive a refund. Locker rental is available.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3313, "title": "Intermediate-Advanced Downhill Skiing", "code": "PE 1331", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Transportation, instruction, ski-lift fees, and skiing time are offered in a package deal. Greek Peak personnel should be contacted to explain the program and fees. Please carefully read the additional information on the PE website for particulars. Bus transportation to Greek Peak is provided for some sessions for six weeks.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3314, "title": "Juggling", "code": "PE 1340", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The class focuses on teaching 3 ball juggling patterns as well as introducing a wide variety of other props which may include: rings, clubs, diabolo, flower sticks, poi, and spinning plates. Advanced students will also be able to learn club passing, 4 and 5 balls and advance tricks. Instruction will be given both as a group and on an individual basis. The course fee includes 3 high quality juggling balls of your own for class and future practice!", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3315, "title": "Introduction to Boxing", "code": "PE 1345", "subject": "PE", "descr": "One of the oldest forms of competition known, boxing has become the sport of choice for many people. Boxing's simplistic method has few techniques, yet the application of these techniques is the true art and science of the sport. Kevin Seaman has over 30 years of experience as a boxing participant, trainer and coach. He has coached dozens of competitors, several Golden Gloves champions and hundreds of enthusiasts in this ring sport. His proven training methods are sure to improve and develop your defensive and offensive skills, cardiovascular endurance, footwork, agility, speed, timing and power. Training will include shadow boxing, jump rope, two person drills, focus glove and heavy bag work. Learn the fundamentals of one of the world's most popular sports: BOXING!", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3316, "title": "Intermediate Boxing", "code": "PE 1346", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Covers the basic skills of footwork, defensive, and offensive techniques. Skipping rope, shadow boxing, and heavy bag work are taught as methods for individual aerobic conditioning.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3317, "title": "HIIT Boxing", "code": "PE 1350", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Burn a ton of calories, get stronger, and punch out your stress! Learn how to move with power and confidence. Not only do participants get a 45-minute fitness/cardio workout with our attentive and expert instructors, they also learn to use real kickboxing techniques on a heavy bag. Level up and track your progress with our Achievement Sets. Kickboxing will help you build a great body, power, confidence, and self defense skills!", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3318, "title": "Jeet Kune Do and MMA", "code": "PE 1360", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The Jeet Kune Do Class at Cornell is taught as an MMA (Mixed Martial Arts) format. This focus will include JKD's approach to stand-up striking, teaching a blend of boxing, kickboxing, knee and elbow strikes. The ground format will include takedowns, mixed blends of grappling using Brazilian Jiu Jitsu, Erik Paulson's Combat Submission Wrestling, Filipino Kali grappling and striking from the ground. This is a blended system of martial arts that combines a modern western training approach with eastern martial arts training methods. Two person partner training and use of equipment to develop the student's strength, power and focus is stressed. The class format will emphasize the application of Jeet Kune Do in regard to Mixed Martial Arts training and competition. The class will maintain a strict regard for safety, but none the less instruct the student in the No-Nonsense approach of Modern Mixed Martial Arts. The system emphasizes footwork and agility, economy of motion, counter ability and strong practical self-defense, using a strategic approach to training and combat. This realistic, modern training approach cultivates strong physical, self-discipline, mental and emotional development in the student.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3319, "title": "Karate Basics", "code": "PE 1365", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class is meant for those that want to start studying Karate or have not studied in a while.\u00a0 Students learn about traditional Okinawan Karate (Shito Ryu) by practicing self-defense combinations that involve blocks, strikes, kicks, joint locks and throws.\u00a0 Along the way we will work on stances, body positioning/mechanics and conditioning.\u00a0 There is strong emphasis on partner work as a mechanism to practice what is being taught in a safe and controlled environment.\u00a0 Free sparring and competition are not\u00a0part of this class.\u00a0 The last day of class students are encouraged to participate in that semester's belt test.\u00a0 Passing this test sets you up to continue studying with the next class, should you decide to continue your studies of Karate.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3320, "title": "Karate", "code": "PE 1366", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class is meant for those that have recently studied Karate at Cornell or somewhere else and wish to continue their study of Karate.\u00a0 Primary instruction is in the Shito Ryu style.\u00a0 Every semester a different kata is presented along with the applicable self-defense techniques associated with that kata and there is an opportunity to test for a new rank/belt. \u00a0Bo staff is used as part of one kata in the curriculum.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3321, "title": "Beginning Tae Kwon Do", "code": "PE 1375", "subject": "PE", "descr": "C.W. (Cho Whang) TaeKwonDo of Ithaca conducts the course. The purpose of the program is to teach TaeKwonDo in its diverse aspects as a form of self-defense, as an art form, and as a competitive sport. Classes will consist of extensive stretching, the teaching of basics to beginners, forms of self-defense, and sparring techniques. TaeKwonDo emphasizes the use of the whole body, enhances flexibility and coordination and increases aerobic capability. Promotional tests are held at the end of each semester. Han Cho may be reached at 257-7810.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3322, "title": "Intermediate Tae Kwon Do", "code": "PE 1376", "subject": "PE", "descr": "C.W. (Cho Whang) TaeKwonDo of Ithaca conducts the course. The purpose of the program is to teach TaeKwonDo in its diverse aspects as a form of self-defense, as an art form, and as a competitive sport. Classes will consist of extensive stretching, the teaching of basics to beginners, forms of self-defense, and sparring techniques. TaeKwonDo emphasizes the use of the whole body, enhances flexibility and coordination and increases aerobic capability. Promotional tests are held at the end of each semester. Han Cho may be reached at 257-7810.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3323, "title": "Tai Chi Chuan", "code": "PE 1380", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Fundamentally, Tai Chi is an integrative exercise that joins the various elements of functional fitness into a single, organically connected whole. Through a rich vocabulary of movements that enhance spatial and body awareness, Tai Chi provides a medium for harmonizing balance, coordination, flexibility, and supple strength. This course will consist of warm-ups, stretching, an introduction to the 24 Movement Form, and 2 person interactive exercises. Please loose, comfortable clothing. Students must be in bare or sock feet during class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3324, "title": "Thai Boxing", "code": "PE 1385", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This martial art system, developed from the unique culture of Thailand, is a blend of art, science and sport. The Thai art is a very powerful ring fighting method, yet is also an excellent form of physical conditioning and street self-defense. The fighting techniques taught in Thai boxing include; the Western Boxing method, elbow -knee strikes, and the powerful Thai style of kicking. This combined with the unique training method and discipline makes Thai Boxing one of the most effective systems in the world. Kevin Seaman is the New York State Representative for the Thai Boxing Association USA.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3325, "title": "Filipino Kali", "code": "PE 1396", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This is an eclectic form of Filipino stick fighting and self defense that evolved as a means of preservation in the hostile environment of the Jungles of the Philippines. Having roots in the 9th century, this is one martial art that truly equalizes your chances of survival in even the most dangerous circumstances, yet is also an amazing method of increasing your coordination and fitness, keeping both your mind and your body SHARP! Kali/Escrima addresses empty hand and kicking, grappling, and tools of the jungle warrior. Kevin Seaman has studied with many of the leading exponents of this amazing Martial Art for nearly 30 years. His skill in this art made him a regional, National and World Champion, competing Full Contact in the Orient in 1992.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3326, "title": "Body-Mind", "code": "PE 1400", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Do you want to learn to recognize and manage stress; to know and change your mental, physical, and emotional state? Do you want to leave class feeling calmer, more peaceful, refreshed? In this class you will learn relaxation/meditation, breathing awareness and sounding, gentle guided and spontaneous movement, self-massage, embodied imagination and more. You will discover how self-talk (what goes on in your mind) affects the quality of your life. You will experience simple and fun ways to be in your life with more ease and wellbeing. Dress in comfortable clothing suitable for movement on the floor and standing.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3327, "title": "Movement, Music and Meditation", "code": "PE 1402", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class is designed to awaken and reinforce the power of our own presence, which can only be done in the present moment. We will use various yoga and movement exercises to tune into our bodies, and we will engage in ancient meditation practices to calm our over-active minds. We will be supported by enlivening inspirational music as we expand our awareness of ourselves.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3328, "title": "Living Routines", "code": "PE 1405", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Once a week you will participate in a health routine. After a short brisk walk, (inside in poor weather) you will engage in an energizing stretching session, followed by a short meditation. In addition to being introduced to stretching and meditation, the class will offer you the opportunity to get to know your classmates through partnered self-awareness exercises and group sharing.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3329, "title": "Massage and Self Care", "code": "PE 1417", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Learn valuable techniques as you use them for self-care. As you practice massage and related techniques on yourself, you will enhance immune function, mood, well-being and performance. Class will include a variety of specific massage techniques, techniques for specific body areas, the use of acupoints, associated movement activities, simple hydrotherapy, and a pre- sleep routine.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3330, "title": "Introduction to Meditation", "code": "PE 1420", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course provides the opportunity to explore a variety of ancient and modern methods designed to bring one to the state of meditation. The methods serve to evoke the deep relaxation from which heightened awareness and creativity arise. If these classes do not fit your schedule, try Body-Mind, Living Routines or Moving into the Moment which have meditation in them.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3331, "title": "Relaxation and Stress Management", "code": "PE 1421", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course offers a mind/body approach to gaining realization and managing the stress in our lives. Participants will leave this course with a greater understanding and appreciation of their own unique ways of coping with stressful situations. We will explore a variety of techniques which can be used to ease the pressures of student life. A sample of these activities includes; stretching (Yoga), creative art, conversation, new games and meditation.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3332, "title": "Meditation and Relaxation", "code": "PE 1422", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course is designed to assist you in learning to meditate, or to deepen your existing practice. As you learn to practice meditation and relaxation exercises, you will find that as little as 15 minutes a day can benefit your physical, mental, emotional and spiritual health. With some assistance, we are all capable of learning to relax deeply, sleep better, detach from the mind's chatter, focus with renewed concentration and become aware of the joy and energy that is deep within us. If these classes do not fit your schedule, try Body-Mind or Living Routines which both have meditation in them.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3333, "title": "Chi Gong for Stress Reduction and Well Being", "code": "PE 1425", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Chi Gong is an ancient Chinese practice meaning exercise with your vital energy or breathing exercise. Although this course is not being taught as a martial art, it can be considered the grandmother of the many different martial arts forms. You will learn Tai Chi Chi Gong Exercises Eighteen Ways. This form focuses on relaxation and rejuvenation through slow, graceful movements.\u00a0 You will coordinate breathing, body position and mental activity. You will also learn passive Chi Gong/meditation, explore healing sounds, and self-massage. Benefits of practice include stress reduction, strength and balance, and inner harmony. In just moments of practice each day you can learn to shift your mental and physical state.\u00a0 Practice is done in any comfortable clothing.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3334, "title": "Ashtanga Yoga Foundations", "code": "PE 1427", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This beginner's class will introduce Ashtanga Yoga to the new student. With asanas (poses) from the Primary Series we will focus on using the breath, core engagement, and gaze point to begin your own home-based practice. We will also introduce breath work and meditation. Leave the class feeling energized, refreshed, and strong.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3335, "title": "Vinyasa Yoga", "code": "PE 1429", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course teaches the practice of Vinyasa Yoga. It explores postures flowing from one to the next (breath to movement) and also includes study of philosophy, meditation, breath-work, and alignment.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3336, "title": "Introduction to Yoga", "code": "PE 1430", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Learn the alignment foundations of yoga while building strength, flexibility, and vitality! This class is for those who are new to yoga or those looking to fine tune their practice. Students will learn the \"ins and outs\" of a variety of standing poses, back bends, and maybe even a few inversions or arm balances! Modifications will be given to accommodate all levels. Each class will also include breath instruction and poses for stress reduction.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3337, "title": "Intermediate Yoga", "code": "PE 1431", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The course covers more of the fundamentals of Hatha Yoga, including basic postures, breathing techniques, and deep relaxation and chanting techniques.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3338, "title": "HIIT Yoga", "code": "PE 1439", "subject": "PE", "descr": "HIIT yoga is a great way to get your heart rate up, burn calories, and have a mind-body connection. This 90 minutes course will have 60 minutes of HIIT and 30 minutes of yoga.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3339, "title": "Introduction to Badminton", "code": "PE 1440", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Instruction and practice in the basic skills and rules for both singles and doubles play.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3340, "title": "Intermediate Badminton", "code": "PE 1441", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Should have past experience in badminton. Strategies are taught for both singles and doubles play.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3341, "title": "Outdoor Beginning Tennis", "code": "PE 1445", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Instruction and practice in the basic skills of the game. Grip, serve, forehand, backhand, and lob are areas covered along with scoring systems. All equipment is furnished.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3342, "title": "Outdoor Intermediate Tennis", "code": "PE 1446", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Review and further instruction in strokes: forehand, backhand, serve, volley, and lob. Topspin and underspin are covered along with doubles strategy. All equipment is furnished.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3343, "title": "Outdoor Advanced Tennis", "code": "PE 1447", "subject": "PE", "descr": "For players with high school team or tournament experience. Skills emphasized are spins, serve and return of serve, volley, overhead smash, court positioning, and playing strategies. Class will meet twice a week for 1 1/2 hours.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3344, "title": "Introduction to Large Boat Sailing", "code": "PE 1482", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course teaches the basic skills necessary to sail large 23 - 26 foot sailboats safely. Instruction will be done on large boats to be able to accommodate different weather situations. Skills learned include: sailing terminology, safety and etiquette, boat handling, sail trimming and heavy wind considerations. There are a total of eighteen hours of instruction and sailing on Cayuga Lake. Transportation will be provided. Course fee includes all equipment and a copy of a sailing text. Open to sailors of all skill levels.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3345, "title": "Introduction to Trap and Skeet", "code": "PE 1505", "subject": "PE", "descr": "All courses will meet in the Teagle Hall lobby for introduction and orientation. Range participation at Tompkins County Rod and Gun Club. Guns and shells furnished. Cost includes birds, shells, range use and instruction. Each participant is entitled to 6 X 25 bird rounds. Class meets once a week and transportation is provided.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3346, "title": "Riflery", "code": "PE 1510", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Instruction and practice in the use of a small bore target rifle. The course includes 3 position small bore .22 cal. (prone, standing and kneeling) target shooting. Class meets once a week and transportation is provided.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3347, "title": "Introduction to Handgun Safety", "code": "PE 1515", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Introduction to and instruction in the use of the pistol in the three modes of 50 foot competitive target shooting, i.e., slow fire, timed fire and rapid fire. Major emphasis is placed on safety resulting from a thorough understanding of the operation of the firearm and the personal responsibility of each individual on the range. Class meets once a week and transportation is provided.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3348, "title": "Introduction to Archery", "code": "PE 1520", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Instruction in the care of equipment; seven basic steps for shooting; scoring; practice shooting at 20, 30, and 40 yards. Class meets twice a week. Attendance for the first two classes is mandatory for safety reasons! If these classes are missed, the student can no longer continue to attend, and will be dropped from the course. Students dropped for this reason will be responsible for the full course fee.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3349, "title": "Olympic Fencing", "code": "PE 1527", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Olympic fencing (or simply \"fencing\") is a modern type of fencing that belongs to the family of combat sports using bladed weapons and refers to the fencing seen in most current competitions, including the Olympic Games and the World Cup. Originating in the 19th century, as a direct continuation of the 18th century French school of fencing which had in turn been influenced by the Italian school of the Renaissance. Includes warm-up exercises and all basic offensive and defensive moves.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3350, "title": "Beginning-Intermediate Volleyball", "code": "PE 1570", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Fundamentals of ball handling, serves, defensive blocks, and position play are stressed. Classes scrimmage.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3351, "title": "Principles of Weight Training", "code": "PE 1580", "subject": "PE", "descr": "A comprehensive understanding of weight training and its place in the world of fitness. Topics to be covered include: selectorized equipment, free weight exercises, isometrics, circuit training, toning, stretching, strength development, and program design based on goal setting.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3352, "title": "Weight Training for Women", "code": "PE 1581", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class will focus on the basics of weight lifting. Topics covered will include: toning vs. building, theory of program design, training with dumbbells, selectorized equipment, free weight exercises for all muscle groups, flexibility, and proper nutrition for weight training.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3353, "title": "Advanced Weight Training", "code": "PE 1582", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The primary focus of this course will be learning and practicing the Olympic lifts (the snatch, clean and jerk and related exercises). We will study these lifts in detail while working on building the strength and flexibility necessary for their proper performance. Additional topics will be determined based on the interests of the class. Possible topics might include: advanced programming for strength training, kettlebell training, training for sport performance, advanced muscle-building strategies and splits.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3354, "title": "Introduction to Aerials", "code": "PE 1600", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This aerial arts course will focus on trapeze, aerial fabric, hammock, and lyra, as well as conditioning and flexibility training to enhance your practice and creative exercises to develop your artistry. Transportation provided.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3355, "title": "Day Hiking", "code": "PE 1605", "subject": "PE", "descr": "From spectacular gorges and waterfalls, to wooded ridges and glacially carved lakes, the Finger Lakes Region is justly famous for its scenery.\u00a0 Get off campus to discover the natural wonder surrounding us.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3356, "title": "Outdoor Birding Basics", "code": "PE 1606", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Come join us as we watch the bird migration come to life throughout the season as well as the other nature and wildlife patterns. Learn to identify and understand the behaviors of the birds and natural world in our area.\u00a0For more information about this course, please visit scl.cornell.edu/coe.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3357, "title": "Trail Running", "code": "PE 1608", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Tired of that same old route on campus? Come trail running! We'll get you out on the spectacular local trails, provide training tips, teach you how to navigate in the woods, and run you over hill and dale, through forests, fields, and mudpits. It will be a confidence-building, life-changing, attitude-adjusting experience.\u00a0We'll start easy and gradually build over the duration of the course, but you should be able to run comfortably for 50 minutes.\u00a0Group pace. No one will be left behind.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3358, "title": "Geocaching", "code": "PE 1609", "subject": "PE", "descr": "It's the world's biggest treasure hunt! You might not know it but people all over the world have been hiding boxes of treasure all around your neighborhood. Come learn how to find their secret locations, what do do with them, and even make one of your own. This class will introduce students to a bit of map reading, use of a GPS in a natural setting. No experience is necessary.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3359, "title": "Introduction to Circus Arts", "code": "PE 1615", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The circus arts are an exciting hybrid of art and sport. In this class you'll dive deep into the basics of a multitude of circus disciplines, including aerial apparatus (aerial fabric, lyra, and trapeze) partner acrobatics, handstands, juggling, and tight wire. The circus arts have been proven to increase brain matter, develop executive function, improve physical fitness, build strength, and create community. No experience is necessary to participate, and all skills can be modified for different levels of fitness.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3360, "title": "Introduction to Camping", "code": "PE 1616", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Learn the essentials of traveling and camping in the winter. Build a snow shelter, travel on snowshoes, melt snow for water, and learn to sleep toasty warm. Winter camping opens up whole new horizons for exploration, without the bugs, crowds or mud.\u00a0Please note that you'll need warm clothes from head to toe.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3361, "title": "Day Hiking: Self-Guided", "code": "PE 1622", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Interested in getting PE credit for hiking, but on your own schedule? This fully independent section of day hiking will meet twice online to discuss the basics of hiking and outdoors safety practices, then subsequently participants will run independently and will log their activity.\u00a0Those who have logged at least 15 hours total by the end of the semester will receive a PE credit. Anyone may participate, even if you are not in Ithaca, although those in Ithaca will benefit from weekly suggested routes, advice, and video tours of our favorite local hiking areas.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3362, "title": "Geocaching: Self-Guided", "code": "PE 1623", "subject": "PE", "descr": "It the world's biggest treasure hunt! Through two online 1-hour classes students will be exposed to the wonder of Geocaching. Online classes will provide students with the information and skills to conduct their own geocaching experiences. Students will use an online tracking system to submit their hikes to the class Instructor for credit for the class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3363, "title": "Trail Running: Self-Guided", "code": "PE 1624", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Interested in getting PE credit for trail running, but on your own schedule? This fully independent section of Trail Running will meet twice online to discuss the basics of trail running, then subsequently participants will run independently and will log their activity.\u00a0Those who have logged at least 15 hours total by the end of the semester will receive a PE credit. Anyone may participate, even if you are not in Ithaca, although those in Ithaca will benefit from weekly suggested routes, advice, and video tours of our favorite local running areas.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3364, "title": "Wilderness First Aid", "code": "PE 1625", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This course focuses on essentials first with an emphasis on backcountry and wilderness issues. Includes a certificate of completion in Wilderness First Aid, as well as American Red Cross Certification in Standard First Aid and CPR. Patient assessment, body systems, equipment improvisation, trauma care, environmental medicine, toxins, backcountry medicine, and wilderness rescue are all covered. Designed for those who travel in small parties in the backcountry and who wish to be self-sufficient and well prepared, but equally useful for handling everyday medical emergencies.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3365, "title": "Wilderness First Responder", "code": "PE 1626", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This 8-day, 80-hour course, provides the prerequisite training and certification necessary for employment as a professional outdoor instructor at nationally recognized programs such as NOLS and Outward Bound. The curriculum goes beyond the basics needed for first aid certification to emphasize the skills and knowledge needed in backcountry rescue situations when extended care may be needed.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3366, "title": "Unicycling", "code": "PE 1628", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Learn how to ride a unicycle! Often considered a circus or clown activity, Unicycling is a great way to travel. And an excellent test of your balance and athleticism. This class will take place at Circus Culture Ithaca's own Circus school.\u00a0 Transportation and unicycles will be provided with the course fee.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3367, "title": "Rock Climbing Conditioning", "code": "PE 1639", "subject": "PE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3368, "title": "Basic Rock Climbing", "code": "PE 1640", "subject": "PE", "descr": "If you have ever wanted to try rock climbing, Cornell is the place to begin!\u00a0Our Basic Rock Climbing course requires NO PREVIOUS EXPERIENCE.\u00a0Basic Rock introduces you to rock climbing equipment, knots, rope handling, belaying, rappelling, safety, and various climbing techniques. Classes have at least a 1:4 instructor-to-student ratio, ensuring a high degree of individual attention. Graduates of the class will be certified to belay at the Lindseth Climbing Wall.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3369, "title": "Black, Indigenous, People of Color Rock Climbing", "code": "PE 1641", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Come climb with COE and take part in the Cornell climbing community! We will introduce you to rock climbing movement and techniques, belaying, equipment, knots, rappelling, and safety at the Lindseth Climbing Center. Graduates of this\u00a0course\u00a0will have the knowledge and skills to push themselves to\u00a0new\u00a0challenges while climbing safely and responsibly. We will also talk about\u00a0BIPOC\u00a0individuals and groups in rock climbing. This class is designed to enable Black, Indigenous, Latinx, Asian, or other people of color underrepresented in the sport of rock climbing to learn the sport and to feel included and supported. The class is open to all Cornell students interested in learning rock climbing with this special focus.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3370, "title": "Women's Basic Rock Climbing", "code": "PE 1642", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The class is open to all women - no experience necessary. In addition to teaching skills and techniques, and providing a supportive atmosphere, we will also emphasize the development and celebration of women as climbers. This class is similar to Basic Rock Climbing in all other respects.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3371, "title": "Intermediate Rock Climbing", "code": "PE 1646", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Refine your climbing skills and get individual coaching to build your techniques on various terrain, learn how to stand on and grip more advanced holds, and expand your climbing repertoire as you piece moves together to work through tricky sequences. This class is designed for those with exposure to rock climbing basics and belay experience.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3372, "title": "Sport Lead Climbing", "code": "PE 1647", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Sport Lead Climbing focuses on learning the skills needed to safely sport lead climb at Lindseth Climbing Center and refine your climbing technique towards this style of climbing. Our most accomplished staff will teach you about sequencing, high angle footwork, endurance and mental conditioning. Classes are held on the Lindseth Climbing Center. Tuition includes a semester climbing pass that starts after the first day of class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3373, "title": "Technique and Training", "code": "PE 1650", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Technique & Training is designed to improve your climbing through climbing specific training and cross-training conditioning. You will learn how to build and implement a climbing training routine, safely and effectively use a campus board and hang board, and participate in balanced muscle development to help prevent injury and keep climbing for a lifetime! This class does not cover the skills necessary for lead climbing, please refer to PE 1647\u00a0Sport lead Climbing.\u00a0Tuition includes a semester climbing pass that starts after the first day of class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3374, "title": "Ice Climbing", "code": "PE 1654", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Join us as we tiptoe up frozen waterfalls in the beautiful setting of the Adirondack Mountains.\u00a0Come learn the fundamentals of this incredibly unique form of climbing while enjoying a long weekend in the beauty of a Northeastern winter. This course will take place in very cold temperatures during the day and includes indoor lodging at night. Emphasis is on front pointing and belayed technical climbing - techniques best suited to the steep water ice typically found in the Northeast. Covers equipment, German technique (front pointing), tool selection and placement, and winter safety and comfort.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3375, "title": "Tree Climbing", "code": "PE 1657", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Cornell Outdoor Education's Tree Climbing course will teach you how to get up into the canopy of any tree, to move around, even to climb from one tree to another without touching the ground.\u00a0All equipment is included in the course fee. Travel around the Ithaca area is provided.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3376, "title": "Mountain Biking", "code": "PE 1664", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Grab your bike and get ready for a quick release from hectic campus life. Cruise along double and single track trails, grind up hills, splash through creek crossings, pause at scenic vistas and explore the local trails in style.\u00a0Learn trail etiquette, trailside bike repairs and other useful tips to keep you and your bike working well together. No extensive mountain biking experience necessary, but students should be very comfortable on a bike as this course is true trail riding. Don't have a bike? Don't fret! COE can lend you a bike during class days for an additional $60 fee. Transportation is provided for classes off campus.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3377, "title": "Bike Touring", "code": "PE 1666", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Take your bicycle riding to the next level and come learn the ins and outs of bike touring! The course will take you on weekly rides to develop your knowledge of bike safety, road riding and route planning. Don't have a bike? Don't fret! COE can lend you a bike during class days for an additional $60 fee. Transportation is provided for classes off campus.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3378, "title": "Recreational Biking", "code": "PE 1668", "subject": "PE", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3379, "title": "Recreational Canoeing", "code": "PE 1671", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class is designed to teach you the fundamentals of canoeing in a relaxed environment. Enjoy being outside for class as you explore Beebe Lake and other Finger Lakes area waterways. Meet new friends, learn new skills, and experience nature all while you keep active.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3380, "title": "Stand Up Paddleboarding", "code": "PE 1675", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Try paddling standing up! We are excited to show you how much fun you can have on stand up paddleboards.\u00a0 Experience Cayuga Lake from a new vantage point.\u00a0 Stay active and engage your whole body. Learn something fun in a small group setting. Our instructors will teach you all the basics including: stance, paddling technique, turning, and more. No previous paddling experience is necessary but you must be a comfortable recreational swimmer to take this course.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3381, "title": "Cross Country Skiing", "code": "PE 1690", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Thoroughly enjoy your winter in upstate NY with cross-country skiing. Learn the basics to effectively glide across snow-covered landscapes. Start out with getting comfortable on skis on flat land and progress to learning how to navigate hills and trails on cross-country skis. This is a beginner friendly class and no previous skiing experience is required. Transportation, equipment, and instruction are all included. Students will need to provide their own winter attire appropriate for cross-country skiing.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3382, "title": "Outdoor Yoga", "code": "PE 1702", "subject": "PE", "descr": "This class, an introduction to Yoga, takes place at various places around campus.\u00a0 COE provides all transportation.\u00a0 No experience is necessary, students will gain a greater awareness of their movements and breathing, improved flexibility, fitness, strength, and wellness in a relaxing outdoor setting.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3383, "title": "Leadership Laboratory I", "code": "PE 1851", "subject": "PE", "descr": "MILS I cadets meet for two hours each week to learn a variety of military skills including rappelling, first aid, drill and ceremonies, weapons familiarization, physical fitness training, and small group leadership.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3384, "title": "Leadership Laboratory II", "code": "PE 1852", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Cadets meet for two hours each week as members of the cadet organization to participate in practical leadership exercises. Types of practical activities include rifle marksmanship, orienteering, drill and ceremonies, signal communications, physical fitness training, first aid, tactics, field exercises, and small group leadership.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3385, "title": "Leadership Laboratory III", "code": "PE 1853", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Cadets meet for two hours a week and occasional weekends to prepare for a five-week summer camp that follows their junior year. Emphasis is placed on the development of individual practical and leadership skills. Cadets rotate through leadership positions to practice applying decision-making skills in a myriad of situations.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3386, "title": "Leadership Laboratory IV", "code": "PE 1854", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Senior cadets plan and operate the leadership laboratory programs for MILS I-III cadets. The development of planning and supervisory skills is emphasized. Cadets have an opportunity to practice leadership skills developed during previous ROTC training and summer camp experiences. Includes two to three hours a week devoted to physical fitness.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3387, "title": "Initial Military Experiences II", "code": "PE 1861", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 1141.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3388, "title": "Intermediate Military Experiences II", "code": "PE 1863", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Continuation of AIRS 2241.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3389, "title": "Precommissioning Laboratory", "code": "PE 1867", "subject": "PE", "descr": "Factors that facilitate transition from civilian to military life are reviewed. The need for military security, base services and activities, personal finances, travel regulations, and social obligations are introduced.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3390, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "PE 1871", "subject": "PE", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week. The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events. Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors. During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3391, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "PE 1873", "subject": "PE", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week.\u00a0 The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events.\u00a0 Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors.\u00a0 During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3392, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "PE 1875", "subject": "PE", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week. The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events. Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors. During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3393, "title": "Naval Professional Laboratory", "code": "PE 1877", "subject": "PE", "descr": "All students in the program participate in a two-hour professional development session each week. The session is held from 2:30 until 4:30 on Wednesday afternoons and consists of drill, athletics, and professional information events. Students gain experience in actual leadership situations and learn the fundamentals of seamanship, military formations, movements, commands, discipline, courtesies, and honors. During information briefings, special emphasis is given to applied leadership as it relates to the administrative and managerial aspects of a Navy or Marine Corps officer's duties.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3394, "title": "Physical Education Independent Study", "code": "PE 1999", "subject": "PE", "descr": "The Independent Study class is only for those individuals who are differently abled and need to have a specifically structured program.\u00a0It is not open to other students.\u00a0Any student wishing to enroll in Independent Study must first apply through the office of Student Disability Services.\u00a0 If it is determined that the student requires Independent Study, then arrangements will be made with the student by the Physical Education Office. Permission to enroll must be gained from the Physical Education Office after referral by the Office of student Disability Services. No preregistration is allowed for this class.", "tags": "PE", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3395, "title": "Elementary Persian/Farsi II", "code": "PERSN 1321", "subject": "PERSN", "descr": "Intended for beginners and heritage speakers alike, this course is a quick and easy way to a popular worldly language in a modern day context (Farsi)!\u00a0 Students develop all four skills - speaking, listening, reading, and writing. Additional materials from authentic culture-focused readings and Persian poetry are an integral part of the curriculum. By the end of this course students will be able to actively participate in conversations centered around family and friends, hometown, country, studies and work, daily activities, modern Iran as well as write extensively on familiar topics. Students will acquire cultural competence and be able to function in authentic Persian cultural context using the taarof.", "tags": "PERSN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3396, "title": "Intermediate Persian/Farsi II", "code": "PERSN 2322", "subject": "PERSN", "descr": "The course is designed with strong integration of modern colloquial Persian (Farsi).\u00a0 Only colloquial Persian is used for all speaking and listening activities, while reading and writing tasks are performed in formal Persian. Authentic material drawn from Persian language TV, radio and movies is introduced regularly in accordance with the topic and vocabulary of given week.\u00a0 By the end of the semester students will be able to speak, read and comprehend material on a range of social, cultural, political and everyday topics. You'll learn how to write emails and notes as educated Persian speakers, read Persian newspapers and comprehend audio material intended for native speakers. We'll also delve into Persian folk tales, modern Persian rap and pop and Persian humor.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|PERSN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3397, "title": "Introduction to Philosophy", "code": "PHIL 1100", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "A general introduction to some of the main topics, texts, and methods of philosophy. Topics may include the existence of God, the nature of mind and its relation to the body, causation, free will, knowledge and skepticism, and justice and moral obligation. Readings may be drawn from the history of philosophy and contemporary philosophical literature.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3398, "title": "FWS: Philosophical Problems", "code": "PHIL 1111", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This First-Year Writing Seminar discusses problems in philosophy and gives the opportunity to write about them.\u00a0 Topics vary by section.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3399, "title": "FWS: Philosophical Conversations", "code": "PHIL 1112", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This First-Year Writing Seminar offers the opportunity to discuss and write about philosophy.\u00a0 Topics vary by section.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3400, "title": "Philosophy of Race", "code": "PHIL 1650", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the philosophy of race. It canvasses key debates in the field concerning the metaphysical status of race, the relationship between the concept of race and racism (and the nature of the latter), the first-person reality of race, and the connections and disconnections between racial, ethnic, and national identities.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SCD-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3401, "title": "Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "PHIL 1910", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the science of the mind.\u00a0 Everyone knows what it's like to think and perceive, but this subjective experience provides little insight into how minds emerge from physical intities like brains.\u00a0 To address this issue, cognitive science integrates work from at least five disciplines: Psychology, Neuroscience, Computer Science, Linguistics, and Philosophy.\u00a0 This course introduces students to the insights these disciplines offer into the workings of the mind by exploring visual perception, attention, memory, learning, problem solving, language, and consciousness.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3402, "title": "WIM: Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "PHIL 1911", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This section is highly recommended for students who are interested in learning about the topics covered in the main course through writing and discussion.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3403, "title": "Introduction to Political Theory", "code": "PHIL 1920", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course introduces students to political theory as a distinctive mode of political inquiry. By surveying the wide range of forms through which political theory has been practiced\u2014such as treatises, dialogues, plays, aphorisms, novels, manifestos, letters, speeches, illustrations, and films\u2014we explore the ways in which political theory reflects upon, criticizes, and reshapes the basic concepts, habits of perception, and modes of feeling through which people make sense of the political world, from big events like wars and revolutions to everyday experiences of felt injustice or alienation. Our approach will be both historical and conceptual, attending to the force of each theoretical intervention in its context, while also drawing out the broader philosophical and political questions it continues to pose to us now.", "tags": "HA-AS|SSC-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3404, "title": "Law, Society, and Morality", "code": "PHIL 1960", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "An introduction to leading topics in legal theory and political philosophy such as: what the laws should be, how they shape and are shaped by society, how they are and should be interpreted, the proper role of ethical and religious outlooks in lawmaking, the obligation to obey the law, and the relationship between private life and public legislation.", "tags": "ETM-AS|KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3405, "title": "Modern Philosophy", "code": "PHIL 2220", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "A survey of Western philosophy in the 17th and 18th centuries: Descartes, Locke, Spinoza, Leibniz, Berkeley, Hume, and Kant. We focus largely on epistemology (ideas, skepticism, belief, knowledge, science) and metaphysics (bodies, minds, God, causation, natural laws, afterlife, and personal identity). Some of the ethical implications of these systems will also be mentioned in passing.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|HST-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3406, "title": "Introduction to Deductive Logic", "code": "PHIL 2310", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Covers sentential languages, the truth-functional connectives, and their logic; first-order languages, the quantifiers \"every\" and \"some,\" and their logic.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3407, "title": "Ethics", "code": "PHIL 2410", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This will be a lecture course on classic and contemporary work on central topics in ethics. The first third of the course will focus on\u00a0metaethics: we will examine the meaning of moral claims and ask whether there is any sense in which moral principles are objectively valid. The second third of the course will focus on\u00a0normative ethics: what makes our lives worth living, what makes our actions right or wrong, and what do we owe to others? The final third of the course will focus on\u00a0moral character: what is moral praiseworthiness, and how important is it? Can we be held responsible for what we do? When and why?", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3408, "title": "Introduction to Moral Psychology", "code": "PHIL 2415", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the moral mind from philosophical and psychological perspectives. Many traditional philosophical problems about morality are being illuminated by current work in cognitive science. In this course, we will look at several of these problems. In each case, we will begin with a presentation of the philosophical problems, and we will proceed to examine recent empirical work on the topic. A wide range of topics will be covered, including moral judgment, agency, the self, and punishment.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3409, "title": "Philosophy of Applied Jurisprudence", "code": "PHIL 2465", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course examines a series of epistemic and metaphysical issues raised in modern applied jurisprudence. For example: What constitutes an actionable 'harm' and how can successful plaintiffs be 'made whole?' What kinds of evidence should juries consider in their deliberations, and how should they be guided in so doing? How does more or less speculative evidence from modern neuroscience complicate questions of culpability and mens rea? How do we justify punishment generally, and incarceration specifically? Does it make sense for juries to apply the 'reasonable person' standard in sexual harassment cases if we cannot conceive of a genderless person? We will examine these and other questions, applying philosophical rigor to modern jurisprudence.", "tags": "KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3410, "title": "Minds and Machines", "code": "PHIL 2621", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Throughout history, metaphors drawn from technology of the time have been proposed to understand how the mind works. While Locke likened the newborn's mind to a blank slate, Freud compared the mind to hydraulic and electro-magnetic systems. More recently, many have endorsed Turing's proposal that the mind is a computer. Why is this idea attractive and what exactly is a computer? Is it at all plausible that the cells of your brain are computing? Could a computer ever really have a mind, beliefs, emotions and conscious experiences? What are these mysterious things anyway? Could a machine ever count as a person and make choices based on its own free will? Is it really so clear that we have this kind of free will?", "tags": "KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3411, "title": "Ethics and the Environment", "code": "PHIL 2960", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Politicians, scientists, and citizens worldwide face many environmental issues today, but they are neither simple nor straightforward. Moreover, there are many ways to understand how we have, do, and could value the environment from animal rights and wise use to deep ecology and ecofeminism. This class acquaints students with some of the challenging moral issues that arise in the context of environmental management and policy-making, both in the past and the present. Environmental concerns also highlight important economic, epistemological, legal, political, and social issues in assessing our moral obligations to nature as well as other humans. This course examines various perspectives expressed in both contemporary and historical debates over environmental ethics by exploring four central questions: What is nature? Who counts in environmental ethics? How do we know nature? Whose nature?", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3412, "title": "Plato", "code": "PHIL 3202", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "We will study several of Plato's major dialogues, including the Apology, the Meno, Phaedo, and Republic. Topics include knowledge and reality; morality and happiness; and the nature of the soul.", "tags": "KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3413, "title": "Kant", "code": "PHIL 3230", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "An intensive study of the metaphysical and epistemological doctrines of the Critique of Pure Reason. Some editions of the course may also consider Kant's ethical views as laid out in the Groundwork of the Metaphysics of Morals and related works.", "tags": "KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3414, "title": "Deductive Logic", "code": "PHIL 3310", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "A mathematical study of the formal languages of standard first-order propositional and predicate logic, including their syntax, semantics, and deductive systems. The basic apparatus of model theory will be presented. Various formal results will be established, most importantly soundness and completeness.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3415, "title": "Modern Political Philosophy", "code": "PHIL 3460", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course will primarily focus on studying and scrutinizing general conceptions of justice. Topics explored typically include liberty,economic equality, democracy, community, the general welfare, and toleration. We will also look at implications for particular political controversies such as abortion, welfare programs and pornography.", "tags": "KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3416, "title": "Philosophy of Law", "code": "PHIL 3480", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This will be a class on various topics in the philosophy of law.\u00a0 Some questions we'll be considering:\u00a0 What is law?\u00a0 Do laws have moral content?\u00a0 What is the proper role of judges in interpreting the law?\u00a0 What do alternatives to our legal system look like?\u00a0 Is there an obligation to obey the law?\u00a0 Might there sometimes be an obligation to disobey the law?\u00a0 What, if anything, justifies punishment by the state? What counts has having an excuse for wrongdoing?\u00a0 What counts as good evidence of guilt? What are the justifications for and limits of the right to free speech?\u00a0 When, if ever, is paternalistic interference by the state into the lives of its citizens justified?\u00a0 And what special ethical problems do practicing lawyers face?", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3417, "title": "Moses to Modernity", "code": "PHIL 3535", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Jewish philosophy \u2013 from Biblical texts to 20th century work. Our inquiries will span metaphysics, epistemology, ethics, philosophy of religion, and political philosophy. We will reflect on questions such as the relation between philosophy or reason on the one hand, and religion and ethics on the other, on the possibility of knowledge of God, the ethics of human relations, the nature of suffering, and finally the nature of a tolerant and just society. We will read works by Maimonides, Spinoza, Mendelssohn, Marx, Buber, Rosenzweig, Cohen, Arendt, Levinas, and Butler, among others.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3418, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "PHIL 3900", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "To be taken only in exceptional circumstances. Must be arranged by the student with his or her advisor and the faculty member who has agreed to direct the study.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3419, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "PHIL 4002", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3420, "title": "Greek Philosophical Texts", "code": "PHIL 4110", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Reading and translation of Greek philosophical texts.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3421, "title": "Set Theory", "code": "PHIL 4300", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This course is a sequel to PHIL 3300\u00a0/ MATH 3840\u00a0but is also open to students who have not had the latter. After a brief review of the central ideas from the latter course, it will cover the construction of the real numbers, cardinality, the ordinal numbers, the cardinal numbers, the axiom of choice, and time permitting, another topic or two.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SMR-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3422, "title": "Feminism and Philosophy", "code": "PHIL 4490", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Feminist approaches to questions in metaphysics, epistemology, language, and value theory.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SCD-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3423, "title": "Topics in Philosophy of Mind", "code": "PHIL 4620", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Advanced discussion of a topic in Philosophy of Mind.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3424, "title": "Topics in Metaphysics", "code": "PHIL 4640", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Advanced discussion of a topic in metaphysics.", "tags": "KCM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3425, "title": "Pragmatics", "code": "PHIL 4720", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "What is the relationship between what words mean and how they are used? What is part of the grammar and what is a result of general reasoning? Pragmatics is often thought of as the study of how meaning depends on the context of utterance. However, it can be difficult to draw a line between pragmatics and semantics.\u00a0In this course, we will investigate various topics that walk this line, including varieties of linguistic inference (including entailment, presupposition, and implicature), anaphora, indexicals, and speech acts.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3426, "title": "Informal Study for Honors I", "code": "PHIL 4900", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Majors in philosophy may choose to pursue honors in their senior year. Students undertake research leading to the writing of an honors essay by the end of the final semester. Prospective candidates should apply at the Department of Philosophy office, 218 Goldwin Smith Hall.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3427, "title": "Informal Study for Honors II", "code": "PHIL 4901", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Majors in philosophy may choose to pursue honors\u00a0in their senior year. Students undertake research leading to the writing of an honors essay by the end of the final semester. Prospective candidates should apply at the Department of Philosophy office, 218 Goldwin Smith Hall.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3428, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "PHIL 4909", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "KCM-AS|SCD-AS|PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3429, "title": "Greek Philosophical Texts", "code": "PHIL 6010", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Reading and translation of Greek Philosophical texts.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3430, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "PHIL 6020", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3431, "title": "Seminar in Ethics and Value Theory", "code": "PHIL 6410", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Graduate seminar covering a topic in ethics and value theory.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3432, "title": "Feminism and Philosophy", "code": "PHIL 6490", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Feminist approaches to questions in metaphysics, epistemology, language, and value theory.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3433, "title": "Topics in Philosophy of Mind", "code": "PHIL 6620", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Advanced discussion of a topic in Philosophy of Mind.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3434, "title": "Topics in Metaphysics", "code": "PHIL 6640", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Graduate seminar covering a topic in Metaphysics.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3435, "title": "Pragmatics", "code": "PHIL 6720", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "What is the relationship between what words mean and how they are used?\u00a0 What is part of the grammar and what is a result of general reasoning?\u00a0 Pragmatics is often thought of as the study of how meaning depends on the context of utterance.\u00a0 However, it can be difficult to draw a line between pragmatics and semantics.\u00a0 In this course, we will investigate various topics that walk this line, including varieties of linguistic inference including entailment, presupposition, and implicature), anaphora, indexicals, and speech acts.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3436, "title": "Semantics II", "code": "PHIL 6731", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Uses the techniques introduced in Semantics I to analyze linguistic phenomena, including quantifier scope, ellipsis, and referential pronouns. Temporal and possible worlds semantics are introduced and used in the analysis of modality, tense, and belief sentences. The phenomena of presupposition, indefinite descriptions, and anaphora are analyzed in a dynamic compositional framework that formalizes the idea that sentence meaning effects a change in an information state.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3437, "title": "Semantics Seminar", "code": "PHIL 6740", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Addresses current theoretical and empirical issues in semantics.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3438, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "PHIL 6909", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3439, "title": "Foundations of the Social Sciences", "code": "PHIL 6922", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Social science research almost always combines empirical observation (data), the construction of concepts (language), and the logical analysis of the relations between observations and concepts (statistics).\u00a0 This course examines the relations between these three dimensions as the analyst moves from one to the other both as practice and in the crafting of a formal summary of findings and argument. We will be particularly interested in the foundational assumptions that underpin the connections between empirical reality, language, and statistical analysis. While these foundational assumptions are often taken for granted by social scientists, they vary dramatically between social science disciplines.\u00a0 The implicit contradiction between that variance and their doxic acceptance within disciplines will be a primary focus of the course.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3440, "title": "Female Acts: From Antiquity to Jelinek", "code": "PHIL 6995", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Woman caring for the dead; women sacrificed; fatal female desire - these images have been constitutive for Western aesthetic and theoretical discourse. How is female agency, in word and deed, delimited in a world divided along the lines of public/private, state/family, visible/invisible, outside/inside, mind/body, culture/nature? How are knowledge and thought conditioned by positing gendered and racial others? Have investigations of \"public feelings\" (Cvetkovich, Berlant) changed the perspective on gendered affects (rage, revenge)?", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3441, "title": "Informal Study", "code": "PHIL 7000", "subject": "PHIL", "descr": "Independent study for graduate students only.", "tags": "PHIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3442, "title": "Physics 1112 Supplement", "code": "PHYS 1012", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Provides auxiliary instruction and practice for PHYS 1112\u00a0and promotes a deep understanding of basic concepts in mechanics. Recommended for students who seek additional opportunities to engage with course content, to gain confidence in applying physics principals, or to develop their problem-solving skills. Class time is also spent exploring real-life applications and discussing strategies to be successful in PHYS 1112\u00a0.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3443, "title": "Physics 2213 Supplement", "code": "PHYS 1013", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Provides auxiliary instruction and practice for PHYS 2213\u00a0and promotes a deep understanding of basic concepts in electromagnetism. Recommended for students who seek additional opportunities to engage with course content, to gain confidence in applying physics principals, or to develop their problem-solving skills. Class time is also spent exploring real-life applications and discussing strategies to be successful in PHYS 2213\u00a0.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3444, "title": "General Physics II", "code": "PHYS 1102", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "PHYS 1101\u00a0and PHYS 1102 emphasize both quantitative and conceptual understanding of the topics and tools of introductory physics developed without the use of calculus.\u00a0The courses offer individualized instruction. Students learn through completing assigned readings, problems, and laboratory exercises, and through individualized tutoring. Additionally, recorded lectures, overview sessions, short videos, sample tests, and online tutorials are provided. The course format provides flexibility, but in some ways is more demanding than a course with a traditional format. Success requires discipline and well-developed study habits. Students without high school physics should allow extra time. Evaluation includes an oral lab check, a selection of graded homework problems, and a written test for each unit; these must be completed within a flexible set of deadlines. Major topics for PHYS 1102: electric and magnetic forces and fields, electric currents and circuits, electromagnetic induction, alternating current, electromagnetic waves, optics, interference and diffraction, relativity, quantum physics, and nuclear physics. At the level of College Physics vol. 2, 4th ed., by Giambattista, Richardson, and Richardson.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3445, "title": "Physics I: Mechanics and Heat", "code": "PHYS 1112", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "First course in a three-semester introductory physics sequence. This course is taught in a largely \"flipped', highly interactive manner, with reading preparation required for class. Covers the mechanics of particles with focus on kinematics, dynamics, conservation laws, central force fields, periodic motion.\u00a0Mechanics of many-particle systems: center of mass, rotational mechanics of a rigid body, rotational equilibrium, and fluid mechanics. Temperature, heat, the laws of thermodynamics. At the level of University Physics, Vol. 1, by Young and Freedman.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3446, "title": "Physics I: Mechanics and Special Relativity", "code": "PHYS 1116", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "First in a three-semester introductory physics sequence. Explores quantitative modeling of the physical world through a study of mechanics. More mathematical and abstract than a typical mechanics course - for example, considers how choice of coordinate system (Cartesian, cylindrical, etc.) influences the nature of kinematical equations. Fast paced. Includes kinematics, dynamics, conservation laws, central force fields, periodic motion, and special relativity. At the level of An Introduction to Mechanics by Kleppner and Kolenkow.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3447, "title": "Introductory Laboratory (Transfer Supplement)", "code": "PHYS 1190", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Students perform the laboratory component of one of the introductory courses (PHYS 1112, PHYS 2207, PHYS 2208, PHYS 2213, PHYS 2214) to complement the lecture-related course credit acquired elsewhere. Those wishing to take equivalent of one of these introductory courses at another institution should receive prior approval from the physics director of undergraduate studies.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3448, "title": "Physics of the Heavens and the Earth", "code": "PHYS 1203", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This course offers opportunities to face fundamental issues in scientific thought, and to provide a sense of the profound ideas that form the modern views of our world. Physics is not a collection of laws, or dry mathematical formulas that must be painfully memorized and exercised. Astronomy is not just a collection of fascinating, disconnected facts about our universe. This course introduces physics and astronomy as the development of a basic curiosity about our world, and a grand desire to understand how it works.\u00a0A significant theme of this course will be: \"What and how do we know?\" This will include discussions of how scientific thought and ideas have evolved over time, as well as who has been involved in that evolution.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3449, "title": "Physics of Musical Sound", "code": "PHYS 1204", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This course explores the physics of musical sound. How and what do our ears hear? How does that determine the kinds of sounds we find pleasant and not so pleasant? How is sound generated by strings, pipes, and plates, and what determines the characteristics \u2013 pitch, timbre, attack, consonance, or dissonance \u2013 of that sound? How do the major families of musical instruments (string, wind, reed, brass, percussion) and specific examples (violin, guitar, piano, flute, oboe, trumpet, chimes, pipe organ) work, and how does that affect how they are played and the sounds they produce? How do we generate sound when we sing, and how does that vary in different kinds of singing? What makes for a good concert hall or listening space? These are explained using physical and mathematical concepts including vibrations, standing waves, harmonic series, beats, spectra, and logarithms, and illustrated using demonstrations, audio clips, and musical selections from a wide variety of genres. This course is a Writing In The Majors course: both science writing and physics problem-solving skills are developed through weekly assignments. Student activities include hands-on investigations of musical instruments and field trips. At the level of The Science of Sound by Rossing, Moore, and Wheeler.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3450, "title": "Fundamentals of Physics II", "code": "PHYS 2208", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "PHYS 2208 follows PHYS 2207\u00a0in the two-semester introduction to physics intended for students majoring in biological science, physical science, or mathematics. PHYS 2208 provides a rich exposure to the methods of physics and to the basic analytical and scientific skills required by all scientists. Lectures are highly interactive and illustrated with applications from the sciences, medicine, and everyday life. Labs highlight lecture topics via a hands-on environment. Recitation sections reinforce the lecture topics via cooperative problem-solving. \u00a0\u00a0The course content includes electricity and magnetism, optics, and topics from quantum mechanics, nuclear physics and particle physics.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3451, "title": "Physics II: Electromagnetism", "code": "PHYS 2213", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Second in a three semester introductory physics sequence. Topics include electrostatics, behavior of matter in electric fields, DC circuits, magnetic fields, Faraday's law, AC circuits, and electromagnetic waves. At the level of University Physics, Vol. 2, by Young and Freedman, 13th ed.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3452, "title": "Physics III: Oscillations, Waves, and Quantum Physics", "code": "PHYS 2214", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "For majors in engineering (including bio-, civil, and environmental engineering), computer and information science, physics, earth and atmospheric science, and other physical and biological sciences who wish to understand the oscillation, wave, and quantum phenomena behind everyday experiences and modern technology including scientific/medical instrumentation. Covers the physics of oscillations and wave phenomena, including driven oscillations and resonance, mechanical waves, sound waves, electromagnetic waves, standing waves, Doppler effect, polarization, wave reflection and transmission, interference, diffraction, geometric optics and optical instruments, wave properties of particles, particles in potential wells, light emission and absorption, and quantum tunneling.\u00a0 With applications to phenomena and measurement technologies in engineering, the physical sciences, and biological sciences.\u00a0 Some familiarity with differential equations, complex representation of sinusoids, and Fourier analysis is desirable but not essential. As with\u00a0PHYS 1112\u00a0and PHYS 2213, pre-class preparation involves reading notes and/or watching videos, and in-class activities focus on problem solving, demonstrations, and applications.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3453, "title": "Introduction to Special Relativity", "code": "PHYS 2216", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Introduction to Einstein's Theory of Special Relativity, including Galilean and Lorentz transformations, the concept of simultaneity, time dilation and Lorentz contraction, the relativistic transformations of velocity, momentum and energy, and relativistic invariance in the laws of physics. At the level of An Introduction to Mechanics by Kleppner and Kolenkow.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3454, "title": "Physics II: Electricity and Magnetism", "code": "PHYS 2217", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Second in a three semester introductory physics sequence. Explores quantitative modeling of the physical world through a study of electricity and magnetism. More mathematical and abstract than a typical introductory electricity and magnetism course. Topics include electrostatics, behavior of matter in electric fields, circuits, magnetic fields, Faraday's law, AC circuits, and electromagnetic waves. Makes substantial use of vector calculus. At the level of Electricity and Magnetism by Purcell.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3455, "title": "Physics III: Waves and Thermal Physics", "code": "PHYS 2218", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This course is divided into two parts. The larger segment of the course typically focuses on wave phenomena. Topics include coupled harmonic oscillators, strings, sound and light waves, superposition principle, wave equations, Fourier series and transforms, diffraction and interference. The discussion is at the level of The Physics of Waves by Georgi. The second segment of the course covers thermodynamics and statistical mechanics at the level of Thermal Physics by Schroeder.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3456, "title": "Intermediate Experimental Physics", "code": "PHYS 3310", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Would you find it appealing to operate a physical system that allows you to sharply distinguishes between rational and irrational numbers? How about using a microwave thermometer to measure the temperature of a distant object namely the sun's outer surface? Would you like to quantitatively observe the transformation of a confined electromagnetic wave into one that propagates away into the rest of the universe? In Physics 3310, you will have experiences such as these as you decide for yourself how valid or applicable various theoretical results are that you have already encountered or look forward to encountering in 3000 level intermediate level courses such as\u00a0 quantum and classical mechanics and electrodynamics.\u00a0 Besides performing three complete investigations of such phenomena, you will gain experience in the design and development of new ones. You'll acquire\u00a0 essential skills to tease out the truth about nature as an experimental physicist with particular emphasis on the awareness and management of uncertainty. The environment of 3310 promotes individual creativity and discovery with the encouragement and aid of coursemates and staff.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3457, "title": "Basics of Quantum Mechanics", "code": "PHYS 3316", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Topics include breakdown of classical concepts in microphysics; light quanta and matter waves; Schr\u00f6dinger equation and solutions for square well, harmonic oscillator, and the hydrogen atom; wave packets, scattering and tunneling effects, angular momentum, spin, and magnetic moments. At the level of An Introduction to Quantum Physics by French and Taylor and Introduction to Quantum Physics by Griffiths.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3458, "title": "Analytical Mechanics", "code": "PHYS 3318", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Covers Newtonian mechanics of particles and systems of particles, including Lagrangian and Hamiltonian formulations, conservation laws from symmetries, with applications to two-body orbits in a central force, systems undergoing small amplitude oscillations, rigid body motion, motion in non-inertial reference frames, perturbation theory, and nonlinear behavior. Both analytical and numerical methods for solving problems in mechanics are covered. At the level of Classical Mechanics by Goldstein, Mechanics by Landau and Lifshitz, and Analytical Mechanics by Hand and Finch.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|SMR-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3459, "title": "Electronic Circuits", "code": "PHYS 3360", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Practical electronics as encountered in a scientific or engineering research/development environment. Analyze, design, build, and test circuits using discrete components and integrated circuits. Analog circuits: resistors, capacitors, operational amplifiers, feedback amplifiers, oscillators, comparators, passive and active filters, diodes, and transistor switches and amplifiers. Digital circuits: combinational and sequential logic (gates, flipflops, registers, counters, timers), analog to digital (ADC) and digital to analog (DAC) conversion, signal averaging, and computer architecture and interfacing. Additional topics may include analog and digital signal processing, light wave communications, transducers, noise reduction techniques, and computer-aided circuit design. At the level of Art of Electronics by Horowitz and Hill.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3460, "title": "Informal Advanced Laboratory", "code": "PHYS 4400", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Experiments of widely varying difficulty in one or more areas, as listed under PHYS 4410, may be done to fill the student's special requirements.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3461, "title": "Advanced Experimental Physics", "code": "PHYS 4410", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Over 50 available experiments on various topics including atomic and molecular spectroscopy, optics, condensed matter physics, nuclear physics, electrical and microwave circuits, x-rays, and magnetic resonance. Each student selects and performs three experiments. Independent work is stressed, and scientific writing and presentation skills are emphasized. Weekly lectures will cover techniques and skills necessary for the class and experimental physics in general.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3462, "title": "Intermediate Quantum Mechanics", "code": "PHYS 4443", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Provides an introduction to concepts and techniques of quantum mechanics, at the level of An Introduction to Quantum Mechanics by Griffiths.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3463, "title": "Introduction to Particle Physics", "code": "PHYS 4444", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Covers the standard model of particle physics; Introduction to fields and particles and relativistic Quantum Mechanics; Symmetries in physics; Basic introduction the Feynman diagrams. At the level of Introduction to Elementary Particles by Griffiths or Modern Elementary Particle Physics by Kane.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3464, "title": "Teaching and Learning Physics", "code": "PHYS 4484", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This 1.5-hour weekly seminar provides undergraduate and graduate students with an introduction to core concepts in teaching and learning physics. Participants read and discuss articles and videos, reflect on their own teaching and learning experiences, and engage in collaborative activities that help them become more effective teachers, learners, and communicators. This seminar is especially valuable for those considering teaching physics at some point in their careers, or who want to improve their own physics learning skills. Topics may include: question types and questioning strategies; classroom discourse; neurological basis of learning; expertise acquisition and expert performance; deliberate practice; misconceptions, mental models and conceptual change; mindsets and psychological interventions; classroom diversity and microaggressions; multiple intelligences and multiple representations; metacognition; active learning; the nature of science; the qualities of effective teachers; and evaluating teaching and learning.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3465, "title": "Teaching Experience I", "code": "PHYS 4485", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Designed to provide qualified undergraduate students who possess an interest in teaching with a structured experience teaching physics. \u00a0Participants collaborate with instructors and graduate teaching assistants to facilitate cooperative learning sessions, laboratory investigations, or homework help sessions.\u00a0 Total weekly time commitment is 3-4 hours, including instructional contact time (2 hours), preparation time, and instructional staff meeting time.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3466, "title": "Teaching Experience II", "code": "PHYS 4486", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Teaching experience for qualified undergraduate students in PHYS 1101/PHYS 1102. Contact time will be in the course's Learning Center, in a team environment with graduate student TAs and faculty. Activities include tutoring individual students, working with small groups, assisting students with lab experiments, and participating in course development initiatives.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3467, "title": "Teaching Experience III", "code": "PHYS 4487", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Continuation of PHYS 4486. Teaching experience for qualified undergraduate students to help with PHYS 1101/PHYS 1102. Contact time will be in the course's Learning Center, in a team environment with graduate student TAs and faculty. Activities include tutoring individual students, working with small groups, assisting students with lab experiments, and participating in course development initiatives.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3468, "title": "Statistical Mechanics", "code": "PHYS 4488", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This course focuses on those topics in statistical mechanics of interest to scholars in many fields. Topics include random walks and emergent properties; temperature and equilibrium; phase space dynamics and ergodicity; entropy; free energies; quantum statistical mechanics; calculation and computation; order parameters, broken symmetries, and topology; correlations, response, and dissipation; abrupt phase transitions; and continuous phase transitions, fractals, and the renormalization group. Taught in conjunction with the graduate course PHYS 6562, this version is advised for undergraduates and interested graduates outside of Physics.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3469, "title": "Independent Study in Physics", "code": "PHYS 4490", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Individual project work (reading or laboratory) in any branch of physics.\u00a0 Products vary, but may include a thesis. Evaluation criteria are decided between student and faculty member.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3470, "title": "Senior Thesis II", "code": "PHYS 4499", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "The second half of a two-semester thesis course involving physics-related research under the direct supervision of a faculty member. The thesis research may take many forms including but not restricted to : theoretical calculations, design of instrumentation, experimental research, or numerical simulations. Students wishing to pursue the senior thesis must submit a proposal, with the approval of a faculty supervisor, in spring of their junior year.", "tags": "PBS-AS|PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3471, "title": "Informal Graduate Laboratory", "code": "PHYS 6500", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Experiments of widely varying difficulty in one or more areas, as listed under PHYS 6510, may be done to fill special requirements.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3472, "title": "Advanced Experimental Physics", "code": "PHYS 6510", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Over 50 available experiments on various topics including atomic and molecular spectroscopy, optics, condensed matter physics, nuclear physics, electrical and microwave circuits, x-rays, and magnetic resonance. Each student selects and performs three experiments. Independent work is stressed, and scientific writing and presentation skills are emphasized. Weekly lectures will cover techniques and skills necessary for the class and experimental physics in general.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3473, "title": "Projects in Experimental Physics", "code": "PHYS 6520", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Projects of modern topical interest that involve some independent development work by student. Opportunity for more initiative in experimental work than is possible in PHYS 6510.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3474, "title": "Physics of Black Holes, White Dwarfs, and Neutron Stars", "code": "PHYS 6525", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Compact objects (neutron stars, black holes and white dwarfs) are the endpoints of stellar evolution. They are responsible for some of the most exotic phenomena in the universe such as supernovae, magnetars, gamma-ray bursts, neutron star and black hole mergers.\u00a0 Supermassive black holes also lie at the heart of the violent processes in active galactic nuclei. The study of compact objects allows one to probe physics under extreme conditions (high densities, strong magnetic fields, and gravity). This course surveys the astrophysics of compact stars and related subjects. Emphasis is on the application of diverse theoretical physics tools to various observations of compact stars. There are no astronomy or general relativity prerequisites.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3475, "title": "General Relativity II", "code": "PHYS 6554", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "A continuation of PHYS 6553\u00a0and ASTRO 6509\u00a0that covers a variety of advanced topics and applications of general relativity in astrophysics, cosmology, and high-energy physics.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3476, "title": "Statistical Physics I", "code": "PHYS 6562", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "A broad, graduate level view of statistical mechanics, with applications to not only physics and chemistry, but to computation, mathematics, dynamical and complex systems, and biology. Some traditional focus areas will not be covered in detail (thermodynamics, phase diagrams, perturbative methods, interacting gasses and liquids).", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3477, "title": "Applications of Quantum Mechanics II", "code": "PHYS 6574", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Possible topics include identical particles, many electron atoms, second quantization, quantization of the electromagnetic field, scattering of complex systems, radiative transitions, and introduction to the Dirac equation.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3478, "title": "Solid-State Physics II", "code": "PHYS 7636", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Continuation of PHYS 7635.\u00a0The course is structured in two parts. The first half is on setting up the formalism and language of correlation function and responses that are used to define properties of phases. The second half is on applying the formalism to different symmetry broken phases (magnetism, superconductivity) and topological phases. The second half will also include topical subjects that are at the frontier of research.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3479, "title": "Relativistic Quantum Field Theory II", "code": "PHYS 7652", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "A continuation of PHYS 7651. Introduces more advanced methods and concepts in quantum field theory. Topics include functional integral methods, quantization of spin-1 fields, quantum electrodynamics, non-Abelian gauge theories, renormalization group techniques, spontaneous symmetry breaking, and anomalies.\u00a0 At the level of An Introduction to Quantum Field Theory by Peskin and Schroeder.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3480, "title": "Teaching and Learning Physics", "code": "PHYS 7684", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This 1.5-hour weekly seminar provides undergraduate and graduate students with an introduction to core concepts in physics education. Participants discuss articles and videos drawn from physics and science education research and from cognitive science, and engage in collaborative activities that help them become more effective teachers, communicators and learners. This seminar is especially valuable for those considering teaching physics at some point in their careers. Topics include: Questioning Strategies, Classroom Discourse, Teaching through misconceptions, Argumentation approach to instruction, Learning Theory, Conceptions and Conceptual Change and Fixed vs Growth Mind-set,\u00a0Science communication.\u00a0Text: Articles from science, engineering, and math education journals.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3481, "title": "Special Topics in Physics", "code": "PHYS 7687", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "This is an advanced graduate level course that will introduce and demystify field theory and path-integral based methods for studying quantum many-body systems. We will connect to the latest experimental developments in the field of quantum materials at every stage of the course. The aim of this course is to enable students to develop technical and intuitive skills for solving the many-body problem. The course is meant for condensed matter theorists and experimentalists, as well as students from other fields who want an exposure to the field. A tentative course outline appears below (the list of topics might change based on student feedback and time constraints).", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3482, "title": "Independent Study in Physics", "code": "PHYS 7690", "subject": "PHYS", "descr": "Special graduate study in some branch of physics, either theoretical or experimental, under the direction of any professorial member of the staff.", "tags": "PHYS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3483, "title": "Light and Life: The Relationship between Light and Life in the Natural World", "code": "PLBIO 1130", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "By most accounts, whether theological or scientific, light is fundamental for life. Throughout the living world, there are vital processes, such as photosynthesis and vision that are associated with light. Living organisms use the daily and seasonal changes in illumination to regulate their rhythms. However, too much of a good thing is not necessarily a good thing as too much light can result in photodamage. The extraordinary relationship between \"light and life\" provides an important unifying framework for understanding the luminescence of living organisms, the striking and flamboyant coloration of plants and animals as well as the inconspicuous nature of their camouflage in terms of physics, chemistry and biology. This course will enhance your understanding of the natural world through studying the relationships between light and life.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|OPHLS-AG|PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3484, "title": "Medical Ethnobotany", "code": "PLBIO 2100", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Plants have always played a key role in the history of life on Earth and have served as medicinal agents in all societies since prehistoric times. Medical Ethnobotany is the study of medicinal plants used by a group of people. Medicinal plants are either critical constituents of many modem drugs or provide templates for synthetic analogous molecules. In this course we will introduce and be acquainted with past and current plant-based natural remedies used across the globe, exploring their efficacy and mode of actions. We will analyze and compare how plants are employed in the different continents to heal (or alleviate) a plethora of pathological conditions, and explore how they affect our bodies (which organic system is affected, i.e., gastro-intestinal, central nervous or respiratory system). The course is designed for students with an interest in the natural world and in traditional medicine.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3485, "title": "Evolutionary Plant Biology", "code": "PLBIO 2440", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "This course provides a comprehensive overview of evolution with an emphasis on plants as excellent exemplars for understanding evolutionary theory and the interpretation of data pertaining to evolution. The topics will include population generics, developmental biology (including comparative embryology and anatomy), theories about speciation (including allopatric, sympatric, and peripatric models), the empirical study of speciation (examples include autopolyploidy, and allopolyploidy), macroevolution (including species selection, kin selection, and multilevel selection theory), the evolution of multicellularity, physical constraints on evolution, evolutionary ecology, and major evolutionary transitions as recorded in the fossil record.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3486, "title": "Plant Physiology, Lectures", "code": "PLBIO 3420", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Integrated and interdisciplinary study of the processes that contribute to the growth, competition, and reproduction of plants. Topics include, but are not limited to, plant-water relations, membrane properties and processes, photosynthesis, plant respiration, mineral and organic nutrition, stress physiology, control of growth and development, and responses to the environment. Emphasis is on the relationship between structure and function from the molecular to the whole-plant level.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3487, "title": "Plant Physiology, Laboratory", "code": "PLBIO 3421", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Experiments exemplify concepts covered in PLBIO 3420\u00a0and offer experience in a variety of biological and biochemical techniques, from the cellular to whole plant level, with emphasis on experimental design.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3488, "title": "Molecular Biology and Genetic Engineering of Plants", "code": "PLBIO 3430", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Introduction to current studies involving recombinant DNA technology and its application to the improvement of plants. Emphasizes genetic transformation methodology, gene expression systems, and strategies for increasing productivity. The course is directed toward undergraduates who wish to become familiar with the theory and practice of plant biotechnology.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3489, "title": "Laboratory in Molecular Biology and Genetic Engineering of Plants", "code": "PLBIO 3431", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Companion to PLBIO 3430\u00a0with laboratory activities that focus on the practice of plant biotechnology. Students construct transgenes using recombinant DNA methods, transfer genes to plants by a variety of approaches including tissue culture-based methods, assess the integration of transgenes in the host genome and analyze their expression by use of reporter gene assays and by preparing and analyzing nucleic acids. Students will also gain basic skills in bioinformatics.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3490, "title": "Concepts and Techniques in Computational Biology", "code": "PLBIO 4000", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "This course is geared towards graduate students and advanced biology undergraduates seeking a better understanding of computational biology. Lectures will be a combination of presentations, paper discussions and hands-on sessions. Labs and paper discussions will have a significant component of plant science, but students from non-plant fields are also encouraged to register. Students will learn to work in a Unix environment, code using Python/R, and deploy tools for genome assembly, RNA-seq data analysis, local and global sequence alignment, protein domain searching using Hidden Markov Models, phylogenetic reconstruction, metabolomic analysis, and machine learning. Lectures will cover the algorithmic concepts underlying popular tools. The students will also learn practical aspects of implementing these tools in their own research using facilities available at Cornell.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3491, "title": "Phylogenetic Systematics", "code": "PLBIO 4400", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Basic and advanced theory and methods of phylogenetic analysis. Introduces students to cladistic analysis using parsimony and gain experience with computer-aided analysis of taxonomic data, including both morphological and molecular data sources. Topics include applications of phylogenetic methods to biogeography and evolutionary studies.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3492, "title": "Plant Form and Function: Anatomy, Cell Biology, and Development", "code": "PLBIO 4841", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "This course is broken into three sections focusing on plant anatomy, cell biology, and development. In each section, we will discuss our current understanding of the key concepts, talk about some of the remaining open questions, and describe the techniques used in research to address these questions. Topics covered will include: cell versus organismic theory, meristems, organs, anatomical evolution, the cytoskeleton, cell wall, cell growth, cell division, advanced microscopy, subcellular trafficking, cell differentiation, pattern formation, intercellular signaling, and plant hormones.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3493, "title": "Molecular Biology and Genetic Engineering of Plants", "code": "PLBIO 5430", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Introduction to current studies involving recombinant DNA technology and its application to the improvement of plants. Emphasizes genetic transformation methodology, gene expression systems, and strategies for increasing productivity. The course is directed toward students who wish to become familiar with the theory and practice of plant biotechnology.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3494, "title": "Laboratory in Molecular Biology and Genetic Engineering of Plants", "code": "PLBIO 5431", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Companion to PLBIO 3430\u00a0with laboratory activities that focus on the practice of plant biotechnology. Students construct transgenes using recombinant DNA methods, transfer genes to plants by a variety of approaches including tissue culture-based methods, assess the integration of transgenes in the host genome and analyze their expression by use of reporter gene assays and by preparing and analyzing nucleic acids. Students will also gain basic skills in bioinformatics.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3495, "title": "Concepts and Techniques in Computational Biology", "code": "PLBIO 6000", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "This course is geared towards graduate students and advanced biology undergraduates seeking a better understanding of computational biology. Lectures will be a combination of presentations, paper discussions and hands-on sessions. Labs and paper discussions will have a significant component of plant science, but students from non-plant fields are also encouraged to register. Students will learn to work in a Unix environment, code using Python/R, and deploy tools for genome assembly, RNA-seq data analysis, local and global sequence alignment, protein domain searching using Hidden Markov Models, phylogenetic reconstruction, metabolomic analysis, and machine learning. Lectures will cover the algorithmic concepts underlying popular tools. The students will also learn practical aspects of implementing these tools in their own research using facilities available at Cornell.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3496, "title": "Systematic Biology Journal Club", "code": "PLBIO 6470", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Discussions led by staff, visitors, and students on topics of current importance to systematic biology.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3497, "title": "Topics in Plant Evolution", "code": "PLBIO 6560", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Series of selected topics to provide a background in plant evolution, paleobotanical literature, and evolutionary theory. Among the topics discussed are: the origin of a terrestrial flora, the evolution of the seed plants, and the origin and adaptive radiation of the angiosperms.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3498, "title": "Plant Biology Seminar", "code": "PLBIO 7400", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Lectures on current research in plant biology, presented by visitors and staff.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3499, "title": "Problems in Plant Biology", "code": "PLBIO 7410", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Introduction to the research literature in plant biology through weekly problem sets and discussions.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3500, "title": "Current Papers in Plant Biology", "code": "PLBIO 7420", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Students in this class read and discuss recently published papers in plant molecular biology. A faculty member from the Plant Biology section in the School of Integrated Plant Sciences will assign the reading material and will facilitate the student discussions. To enable in-depth review and discussion, the literature reading in each semester will have a common theme, which will generally be based on the research interests and expertise of the faculty mentor. The class is intended primarily for graduate students, but undergraduates may participate with the permission of the instructor.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3501, "title": "Graduate Research in Plant Biology", "code": "PLBIO 7440", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "After the first year, each student presents one seminar per year on his or her thesis research and then meets with the thesis committee members for evaluation. First-year students only attend the seminar series, they do not present. Second-year students give a 25-min. seminar, while students in their third and higher years present a 50-min. seminar.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3502, "title": "Graduate Research in Botany", "code": "PLBIO 7490", "subject": "PLBIO", "descr": "Intended for graduate students in Plant Biology who are working with faculty members on an individual basis towards a PhD thesis.", "tags": "PLBIO", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3503, "title": "Plant Genetics", "code": "PLBRG 2250", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Surveys fundamental plant genetics with a focus on applications in agriculture and plant sciences. Reviews and extends concepts from introductory biology for students with an interest in plants and their contributions to food, fiber, biofuels, ornamentals and ecology. Also preparation for advanced coursework in genetics for students considering graduate studies in a related field. Unique topics include polyploidy and organellar inheritance, pollination, seed saving and basic plant breeding. Companion lab exercises follow a generation of pea breeding and includes plant pollination techniques, DNA extraction and sequencing, molecular markers.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3504, "title": "Lectures in Plant Genetics", "code": "PLBRG 2253", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Surveys fundamental plant genetics with a focus on applications in agriculture and plant sciences. Reviews and extends concepts from introductory biology for students with an interest in plants and their contributions to food, fiber, biofuels, ornamentals and ecology. Also preparation for advanced coursework in genetics for students considering graduate studies in a related field. Unique topics include polyploidy and organellar inheritance, pollination, seed saving and basic plant breeding.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3505, "title": "Seminar", "code": "PLBRG 6220", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Plant Breeding and Genetics seminar series.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3506, "title": "Perspectives in Plant Breeding Strategies", "code": "PLBRG 7160", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Emphasizes critical discussion and evaluation of selected benchmark papers and current literature. Reviews and discusses conventional and molecular selection techniques and breeding objectives, methods, and strategies for both self- and cross-pollinated crops. Requires extensive outside reading. Grades are based on four papers demonstrating creative thinking and analysis of plant breeding concepts.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3507, "title": "Quantitative Genetics in Plant Breeding", "code": "PLBRG 7170", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Discusses quantitative genetics for more effective plant breeding.\u00a0 Topics include population genetics, linkage, components of variance; heritability; theoretical gain from selection; and genotypic and phenotypic correlation coefficients.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3508, "title": "Graduate-Level Dissertation", "code": "PLBRG 7900", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Thesis research for PhD candidates only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3509, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "PLBRG 8900", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Thesis research for master's candidates.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3510, "title": "Doctoral-Level Dissertation Research", "code": "PLBRG 9900", "subject": "PLBRG", "descr": "Thesis research for PhD candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "PLBRG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3511, "title": "Hands-On Horticulture for Gardeners", "code": "PLHRT 1102", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "The objective is to instill in students a lifelong appreciation for how gardening can enhance individual well-being through aesthetics, culinary experiences, and mastery of techniques. Emphasizes hands-on learning and practice of key gardening skills and techniques in the greenhouse and the field, such as landscape management, garden design, propagation, pruning, grafting, pest management, and flower arrangement. There is one Saturday field trip at the end of the semester to visit gardens in the local area.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3512, "title": "Foods of the Future", "code": "PLHRT 2020", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "The class is intended to provide insight and exposure to the unique challenges associated with the changing dynamics and markets of fresh produce. It is targeted at students with an interest in plants and food in general to better understand how current and future changes affect the availability, diversity and access of foods including the influence on, and creation of new markets. The class will focus on real world issues addressing changes in production environments, aesthetics, markets, postharvest quality and consumer demands. Among the diverse challenges involved in addressing future needs include the changing consumer quality and aesthetic expectations, changing market dynamics, year-round consistency, nutrition, production, global markets and targeting of new controlled environment production approaches.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3513, "title": "Coffee, Cloves, and Chocolate: Plant Explorers and Thieves", "code": "PLHRT 2150", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Few major food, medicinal, ornamental and industrial crops are native to North America. From coffee and tea, to rubber and quinine, this course explores the social, political, and economic factors associated with the movement of plants from their indigenous homes to the West, and the institutions most closely associated with those migrations.", "tags": "CA-AG|HA-AG|PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3514, "title": "Production and Marketing of Greenhouse Crops", "code": "PLHRT 4175", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Covers basics of establishing a greenhouse operation, growing crops in optimized environments, and serving niche or mass market. Discusses technology basics including structures and equipment, systems for heating and cooling, lighting, irrigating and fertilizing, material handling, environmental stewardship, integrated pest management, and production management. Also covers world centers of greenhouse crop production; culture of cut, pot, bedding, vegetable, and fruit crops in greenhouses, emphasizing predictive harvesting through environmental, physical, and chemical management of growth and development. Each student grows one or more crops.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3515, "title": "Postharvest Biology of Horticultural Crops", "code": "PLHRT 4250", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Study of the biological processes controlling physical and chemical changes in harvested yet living horticultural crops or their parts. Discusses the theoretical principles and fundamental processes underlying these changes. Also covers strategies and practical handling requirements/conditions for storage, transportation, and quality monitoring of harvested horticultural crops.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3516, "title": "Seed to Supper II: Community Facilitation Practicum", "code": "PLHRT 4271", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "In this spring-semester community facilitation practicum, students will revisit, reflect on and review the facilitator preparation strategy developed in the fall to prepare to offer garden educators the tools they need to lead others to grow in confidence and successfully raise a portion of their own food on a limited budget. Off-campus facilitation planned for and arranged during the fall will be implemented. Students will lead workshops and work with campus professionals to design methods to evaluate site host and facilitator responses and reflect with site hosts at key points to assess the approach as it is unfolds. Students with a grade of C or greater receive a certificate of completion, indicating their preparedness to lead Seed to Supper and similar garden-based facilitator preparation in communities.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3517, "title": "Ecological Orchard Management", "code": "PLHRT 4450", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "The ecology and technology of deciduous tree-fruit production. Topics include basic tree and fruit physiology; orchard renovation and design systems; nutrition, irrigation, and freeze protection practices; tree pruning and training; post-harvest fruit storage; marketing and economic spreadsheet models; monitoring and decision-making systems for integrated pest management; and efficient use of orchard equipment. Emphasizes the agroecology of perennial crop systems, with labs providing hands-on experience in orchard management.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3518, "title": "Public Garden Management", "code": "PLHRT 4850", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Explores the history of public gardens, types of contemporary public gardens, and the operation of public gardens including botanical gardens and arboreta. Includes separate units on administration and business management of gardens, collections curatorship, collections design, educational programs, research, and management of landscapes and natural areas.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3519, "title": "Creating the Urban Eden: Woody Plant Selection, Design, and Landscape Establishment", "code": "PLHRT 4920", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "This is the second half of course focusing on the winter identification, uses, and establishment of woody plants in urban and garden settings. Issues of site assessment and soil remediation are emphasized in addition to soil volume calculations, drainage and surface detailing, and planting techniques. Students critically assess potential planting sites and select appropriate trees, shrubs, vines, and ground covers for a given site. Design for specific sites followed by written specifications and graphic details are produced to implement these proposals. Students implement, in a hands-on manner, site remediation and planting techniques they have learned by creating new landscapes that serve to integrate theory, principles, and practices. Together, PLHRT 4910\u00a0and PLHRT 4920 constitute an integrated course.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3520, "title": "It's Just Grass: Grassing the Urban Eden", "code": "PLHRT 4931", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "This course explores the elements of sustainable design, establishment and management of sports, golf and lawn turf. Focus on practical aspects through field tours, hand-on activities and real-world case studies.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3521, "title": "Leadership Development for Officers in Plant Science Clubs", "code": "PLHRT 4975", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Being an officer of a club is an opportunity to learn about leadership and collaboration, as well as communication and the challenges of balancing diverse responsibilities. Preparation in this arena can serve a student for life, from learning how to engage in the work place to being involved in community organizations, and learning responsibilities ranging from managing conflict to serving as a fiscal steward. Opportunities in PLHRT 4975 will vary, based on specific club commitments; in general, leadership development includes, and is not limited to, learning how to: foster inclusiveness and a healthy, positive social atmosphere among members; promote an interest in the club's mission, vision and values; communicate and collaborate effectively with staff, faculty advisors, and other faculty, staff, administrators and students; and maintain the reputation, continuity and history of a Cornell organization.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3522, "title": "Seminar in Horticulture", "code": "PLHRT 6000", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Weekly seminars consisting of graduate student research project reports, faculty research topics, as well as guest speakers from other universities and/or industry.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3523, "title": "Individual Study in Horticulture", "code": "PLHRT 6970", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Graduate individual study in horticultural sciences under the direction of one or more faculty members.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3524, "title": "Thesis Research, Master of Science", "code": "PLHRT 8900", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3525, "title": "Doctoral Dissertation Research", "code": "PLHRT 9900", "subject": "PLHRT", "descr": "Dissertation research for Ph.D. candidates in the Graduate Field of Horticulture.", "tags": "PLHRT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3526, "title": "Molecular Biology of Plant-Microbe Interactions", "code": "PLPPM 4010", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "The co-evolutionary molecular battle between microbial pathogens and plants has game-like properties whose rules are emerging from recent genomic, biochemical, and cell biological advances. This course explores the molecular pieces and collective behaviors of pathogen virulence and plant immune systems, similarities between interaction mechanisms in plant and animal pathosystems, and the application of this knowledge to sustainable agriculture. The course emphasizes the development of professional skills, such as the management of scientific literature, creative design and critical evaluation of research, communication of complex scientific concepts to diverse audiences, and discussion of environmental issues associated with transgene-based disease management strategies. Students write and peer review research proposals.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3527, "title": "Systems Epidemiology for Plant Pathology", "code": "PLPPM 4020", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Systems Epidemiology for Plant Pathology offers an expansion of plant pathology concepts into quantitative epidemiology and population biology. The course is taught as two inter-related seven-week modules. The epidemiology module explores the concepts of disease and crop loss and social, economic, and ecological consequences. Students will gain underpinning theory and hands-on experience with measuring disease, crop loss modeling, spatial and temporal attributes of epidemics. The population biology module focuses on biological processes that affect plant pathogen populations and communities in natural and agronomic settings, and how these processes affect disease development and control. These concepts include, but are not limited to, pathogen and virulence diversity, host-pathogen interaction at the population level, selection pressure, super-races, pathogen sexual vs. clonal reproduction, invasive species, quorum-sensing, etc. Although this course is organized into two modules, the over-arching theme of a systems approach will intertwine through all material.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3528, "title": "DNA Targeting: Applications, Reagents, and Impact", "code": "PLPPM 4250", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Recent advances in our capacity to direct molecules to specific DNA sequences in vitro and in living cells give us an unprecedented ability to probe and modify the genetic material. Through primary literature, this course considers applications of DNA targeting, ranging from systems biology to genome editing; reagents, including zinc finger proteins, TAL effectors, the CRISPR/Cas9 complex and others; and impact, reaching basic science, agriculture, and medicine. Regulatory, ethical, intellectual property, and public perception considerations are also discussed.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3529, "title": "Diagnostic Lab Experience", "code": "PLPPM 6610", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "For graduate students and advanced undergraduates with a special interest in diagnosing plant diseases. Students work in the Diagnostic Laboratory (section of Plant Pathology and Plant-Microbe Biology) under supervision of the diagnostician.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3530, "title": "Plant Pathology and Plant-Microbe Biology Seminar", "code": "PLPPM 6810", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Weekly presentations of contemporary topics delivered by invited speakers or students completing their Ph.D.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3531, "title": "PPPMB Seminar Series II", "code": "PLPPM 6811", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "The course consists of weekly seminars delivered by graduate students and invited speakers from Academia and Industry on research and extension topics relevant to the fields of plant pathology and plant microbe biology.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3532, "title": "Graduate Student Research Updates", "code": "PLPPM 6820", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Weekly graduate student seminar series. Guests with an interest in plant pathology research are welcome to attend. Classes meet simultaneously in Geneva and Ithaca and are linked by teleconference.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3533, "title": "Graduate-Level Thesis Research", "code": "PLPPM 7990", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. students only before \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3534, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "PLPPM 8900", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3535, "title": "Doctoral-Level Thesis Research", "code": "PLPPM 9900", "subject": "PLPPM", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "PLPPM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3536, "title": "FWS: Writing in the Life Sciences", "code": "PLSCI 1107", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Writing is an incredibly important skill to develop as a scientist, yet students are often left to develop their scientific writing skills without much guidance. This class will give students a supportive and low-stakes environment to learn about and practice scientific writing. The emphasis in this class will be on increasing your flexibility and confidence as a writer. You will learn how to use your existing strengths as a writer while also exploring different methods and tools you can use to compose scientific literature. Students will have the opportunity to explore the literature surrounding a scientific topic of their choosing. With their readings and class materials, students will develop the knowledge and tools needed to produce a review article, which they may eventually submit for publication.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3537, "title": "The Nature of Plants", "code": "PLSCI 1115", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "An introductory course that examines plant diversity, function, and adaptation. Topics include an introduction to plant community structure, relationships between plants and other organisms, how plants cope in their environments, and plant-human interactions.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|OPHLS-AG|PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3538, "title": "CSI: Forensic Botany", "code": "PLSCI 1150", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Plant-based evidence has been an important component in solving crimes for centuries. Modern techniques and facilities have made plant evidence more important and useful than ever, and there are some stunning examples of trials where plant evidence played a critical roles in the outcomes. We will blend criminal cases and plant science in this course. We will review important cases that have involved and even depended upon significant plant-based evidence. Along the way, students will learn, at the introductory level, the plant science needed to appreciate the importance of plant-based evidence in crime solving. An overriding but intrinsic theme will be how the scientific method is useful and integral to applying logic to a body of plant-based evidence in specific cases.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3539, "title": "Functional Plant Biology", "code": "PLSCI 1420", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "This course is an overview of basic plant structure and function. We will survey the basic cell types, tissues and organs that make up the plant body as related to the physiology (functions) of a plant. The goal is to provide a sound foundation in basic plant biology and preparation for higher-level coursework. The laboratory portion of this course is designed to review the material covered in lecture, as well as introduce students to the investigative nature of scientific research. Students will get experience in experimental design, scientific method, and analysis of data collected through experimentation.", "tags": "BIOLS-AG|PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3540, "title": "Magical Mushrooms, Mischievous Molds", "code": "PLSCI 2010", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Presentation of the fungi and how they shape our civilizations and the natural world in which we live. Fungi play important roles in pressing issues in agriculture, food security, climate, disease, and environment. This class emphasizes the significance of fungi as decayers of organic matter, as pathogens and symbionts of plants and animals, as food, and as sources of mind-altering chemicals.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3541, "title": "Mushrooms, Molds and More", "code": "PLSCI 2013", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Presentation of the fungi and their roles in nature and in shaping past and present civilizations. Emphasizes the historical and practical significance of fungi as decayers of organic matter, as pathogens of plants and animals, as food, and as sources of mind-altering chemicals. Lectures and exams for this course are the same as those in PLSCI 2010. However, students in this course also participate in a weekly 55-minute discussion section where they grow mushrooms and other fungi in culture, learn about contemporary classification of fungi, see examples of major taxa growing on natural substrates, and determine whether suspect pathogens really can kill agricultural crops. Students also teach their peers about the fungus world with presentations of their own creation.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3542, "title": "Introduction to Research Methods in Plant Science", "code": "PLSCI 2990", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Intended for students who are new to undergraduate research. Students enrolled in PLSCI 2990 may be reading scientific literature, learning research techniques, or assisting with ongoing research. The faculty supervisor determines the work goals and the form of the final report.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3543, "title": "Skills for Public Engagement", "code": "PLSCI 3940", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Community engagement provides exciting opportunitiesfor students to learn about the needs of our communities. This course will expose students to the history and importance of public engagement, at Cornell and beyond, and provide practical, hands-on instruction of skills used in public engagement. These skills include public speaking, writing, branding, as well as training in video production and social media. The course will explore strategies for engaging with different community partners including growers, K-12 students and teachers, international communities, and governmental/political/NGO engagement, as well as generational differences and diversity challenges faced within different communities. Colleagues from Cornell Cooperative Extension and across the University with expertise in specific engagement areas will be involved in the course.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3544, "title": "Plant Behavior and Biotic Interactions, Lecture", "code": "PLSCI 4460", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "How do plants respond to antagonists, such as herbivores and pathogens? What are the checks and balances that keep mutualist organisms in their tight interactions? How are symbioses organized on molecular, metabolic and ecological levels? What are the molecular, plant hormonal, and metabolic mechanisms mediating plant biotic interactions with other organisms? What ecological and evolutionary consequences do these interactions have for the fitness of the plants and their interactors? This course provides an overview of plants' myriad interactions with antagonists and mutualists, from microbes to multicellular organisms, and explains the underlying ecological and evolutionary concepts. It gives an introduction to the study of induced plant responses in the light of a behavioral biology framework.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3545, "title": "Plant Behavior and Biotic Interactions, Laboratory", "code": "PLSCI 4461", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Laboratory course covering topics presented in BIOEE 4460/BIONB 4460/PLSCI 4460.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3546, "title": "Museum and Park Interpretation", "code": "PLSCI 4825", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "This class is for students who are interested in receiving an overview of interpretive planning. Interpretation is a mission-based communication process that forges emotional and intellectual connections between the interests of the audience and meanings inherent in the resource. This theory-driven process can be applied to a wide variety of opportunities to communicate to the public. Professionals who apply this communication process develop interpretive materials for museums, science centers, historic sites, zoos, aquaria, botanic gardens, national and state parks and other cultural attractions. In this course, students will collaborate with staff at Cornell Botanic Gardens to create interpretive media including but not limited to signage, exhibits, written material, or self-guided tours.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3547, "title": "Reflection on Plant Sciences Experiential Learning", "code": "PLSCI 4900", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "This course is designed to guide Plant Sciences majors in developing career goals around an out-of-classroom experience, in reflecting on that experience, and in recording that experience in the student's ePortfolio. To that end, students will draw up a set of learning outcomes for an internship, research opportunity or extension experience in the Plant Sciences, which must be approved by the course advisor before the experience begins. The student must then develop a critical reflection on that experience and upload it into one's ePortfolio.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3548, "title": "Plant Sciences Senior Portfolio", "code": "PLSCI 4925", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to demonstrate that Plant Sciences students will have met all learning outcomes in the major prior to graduation by documenting relevant in-class and co-curricular activities. Preparatory work will include observing and learning from a diversity of presentations in preparation for taking PLSCI 4950. The basis for evaluation will be an ePortfolio that the student develops. It will contain the following elements: a personal profile, career goals and exploration, leadership experiences, a current resume, examples of how the learning outcomes for the major have been met, and summaries of 14 plant-related seminars that the student has attended while at Cornell. The evaluation and assignment of a grade will be made by the student's advisor using a common rubric across the major. Ideally, students will enroll in this course in the second-to-last semester so any deficiencies can be addressed prior to graduation.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3549, "title": "Senior Seminar in Plant Sciences", "code": "PLSCI 4950", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Students in the Plant Sciences major are required to complete a research experience, extramural internship or extension experience. It is critical for students to be able to explain their work to both scientific audiences and the general public. This course will walk students through the steps needed to produce a quality presentation for each audience, and students will practice giving these presentations. The presentations will be based on research or extension experiences the students have had as part of their Plant Sciences degree program. The course will culminate in an end-of-semester symposium in which students present their experience in a 10-minute talk.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3550, "title": "Undergraduate Internship in Plant Sciences", "code": "PLSCI 4960", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "In this experiential learning opportunity, students participate in a plant science-related work and learning experience equivalent to a minimum of six weeks of full-time effort. Specific learning goals for the experience are arranged by the student with an internship faculty advisor and the internship host.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3551, "title": "Individual Study in Plant Sciences", "code": "PLSCI 4970", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "An opportunity for undergraduate individual study of a special topic in plant sciences under the direction of a faculty member.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3552, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching Experience in Plant Sciences", "code": "PLSCI 4980", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Designed to give qualified undergraduate students teaching experience through actual involvement in planning and teaching plant sciences courses under the supervision of SIPS faculty members. May include leading discussion sections; preparing, assisting in, or teaching laboratories; and tutoring.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3553, "title": "Independent Undergraduate Research in Plant Science", "code": "PLSCI 4990", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Affords opportunities for students to carry out independent research under appropriate supervision. Each student is expected to review pertinent literature, prepare a project outline, conduct the research, and prepare a report.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3554, "title": "Hemp Breeding and Genetics", "code": "PLSCI 5030", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "This course will cover the foundations of plant genetics and plant breeding with a focus on the breeding of hemp for different market classes. topics for discussion will include; reproductive mechanisms, germplasm diversity, genomics of cannabinoid production, and genetic control of flowering. The class will include a mixture of lecture format and small group discussions of current literature.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3555, "title": "Chemistry and Pharmacology of Cannabis", "code": "PLSCI 5045", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Cannabis sativa is a psychoactive plant used for medical or recreational purposes. Its primary psychoactive component, THC, is one of the >400 known compounds, including at least 65 cannabinoids. CBD, the other major compound, is currently studied for its potential in a variety of medical disorders (e.g., treatment of anxiety, seizure, loss of appetite, chronic pain, etc.). In this course, we will learn past and current uses of cannabis in different cultures. We will become familiar with the chemistry, pharmacology, toxicology, mode of action and safety of cannabis. Furthermore, we will review the biosynthesis and distribution of plant secondary metabolites, the techniques used in their isolation and structure elucidation, the value of biological assays, and the steps involved in drug production and approval.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3556, "title": "Hemp Processing", "code": "PLSCI 5060", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "This course covers the principles and practices used to process industrial hemp into a diverse array of food, extract and fiber products. Lectures will describe key products and production practices, highlighting how hemp products compare to those produced from other materials. Discussion sections will review scientific studies relevant to industrial hemp products and processing. Lab sections will give student hands-on experience using a broad array of processing equipment. To facility student access to the broadest array of processing equipment, many lab meetings will involve visits to nearby commercial production facilities.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3557, "title": "Skills for Public Engagement", "code": "PLSCI 5940", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Community engagement provides exciting opportunitiesfor students to learn about the needs of our communities. This course will expose students to the history and importance of public engagement, at Cornell and beyond, and provide practical, hands-on instruction of skills used in public engagement. These skills include public speaking, writing, branding, as well as training in video production and social media. The course will explore strategies for engaging with different community partners including growers, K-12 students and teachers, international communities, and governmental/political/NGO engagement, as well as generational differences and diversity challenges faced within different communities. Colleagues from Cornell Cooperative Extension and across the University with expertise in specific engagement areas will be involved in the course.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3558, "title": "Graduate Teaching Experience in Plant Sciences", "code": "PLSCI 7980", "subject": "PLSCI", "descr": "Designed to give graduate students teaching experience through involvement in planning and teaching courses under the supervision of SIPS faculty members. May include leading discussion sections; preparing, assisting in, or teaching lectures and laboratories; and tutoring.", "tags": "PLSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3559, "title": "Soil and Crop Management for Sustainability", "code": "PLSCS 3210", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Students learn about agronomy and recent advances in sustainable soil and crop management, and gain a lot of practical farming knowledge. Integrated perspectives on the physical, biological, and chemical aspects of soil management in the broader context of agroecosystems are explored. Soil and crop management practices and resulting interactions between soil, water, organisms, and organic and chemical inputs form the basis for discussions on diverse cropping systems, soil health, water quality and quantity, bioenergy, greenhouse gases, and sustainability. Lab sessions elaborate through case studies, hands-on activities, and discussion of current topics.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3560, "title": "Environmental Chemistry: Soil, Air, and Water", "code": "PLSCS 3650", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Overview of the chemistry of the biosphere and biogeochemical processes that control the fluxes, concentrations, and bioavailability of essential elements and pollutants in soil, air, and water. Gives particular attention to soil's function as a filter for contaminants. Describes the history of environmental contamination by xenobiotics and heavy metals, with emphasis on behavior and properties of pollutants that pose the greatest risk to human and ecological health.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3561, "title": "Traditional Agriculture in Developing Nations", "code": "PLSCS 4030", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Half the world's arable land is farmed by traditional farmers who have produced food and fiber for millennia with few outside inputs. Many of these practices are forgotten but some are still used by farmers in developing countries. This course examines the pros and cons of some of these traditional systems through the lens of various Cornell faculty who have experiences with traditional agriculture in developing countries.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3562, "title": "Geographic Information Systems (GIS): Concepts and Application", "code": "PLSCS 4200", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Principles and applications of geographic information systems for characterizing and assessing agronomic and environmental systems. Emphasizes accessing, updating, analyzing, and mapping geo-spatial data and information. Considers information needs assessment; spatial data accession; coordinate systems; spatial database design, construction, and maintenance; modeling and analysis; map accuracy assessment; and digital cartography.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3563, "title": "Mineral Nutrition: From Plants to Humans", "code": "PLSCS 4420", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Plants provide almost all essential minerals for humans and therefore plants are critical components of the human diet. Plant biologists address challenges of meeting the nutritional needs of the increasing world's population by studying plants' ability to uptake, translocate and accumulate mineral nutrients in edible tissues. By integrating basic plant biology with molecular breeding and genomics approaches, fundamental discoveries are utilized to have the greatest impact on solving biofortification of plant-based foods. This team-taught course explores the mechanisms of acquisition of mineral nutrients from the soil, translocation and accumulation in plant tissues, strategies to prevent mineral element deficiencies while avoiding their overload, and toxicity of noxious metals. Selected lectures focus on the relation between the nutrient status of plants and human nutrition and health.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3564, "title": "Integrated Pest Management", "code": "PLSCS 4440", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Lectures integrate the principles of pest control, ecology, and economics in the management of pests across multiple systems. Labs consist of exercises to reinforce concepts presented in lecture and demonstrate pest monitoring techniques and the application of computer technology to management problems.", "tags": "OPHLS-AG|PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3565, "title": "Soil Ecology", "code": "PLSCS 4660", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Discover the wonder of life underground. In this course, students study the amazing diversity of soil organisms along with their multifaceted functions in terrestrial ecosystems. The fundamental principles and features of biologically mediated processes in the soil and the functions of soil biota in both managed and unmanaged ecosystems are highlighted. Special topics include beneficial symbioses, biological control of plant pathogens, biogeochemistry of unique habitats, bioremediation and composting of organic wastes, among others. Laboratory focuses on molecular activities and traditional methods for assessing the abundance, activity, and diversity of soil organisms.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3566, "title": "Weed Ecology and Management", "code": "PLSCS 6140", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Examines plant ecological principles governing weed population dynamics and weed-crop competitive interactions in crop and non-crop ecosystems. Development of sustainable weed management strategies.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3567, "title": "Spatial Modeling and Analysis", "code": "PLSCS 6200", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Theory and practice of applying geo-spatial data for resource inventory and analysis, biophysical process modeling, and land surveys. Emphasizes use and evaluation of spatial analytical methods applied to agronomic and environmental systems and processes. Laboratory section is used to process, analyze, and visualize geo-spatial data of interest to the student, ending in a comprehensive student project.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3568, "title": "Mineral Nutrition: From Plants to Humans", "code": "PLSCS 6420", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Plants provide almost all essential minerals for humans and therefore plants are critical components of the human diet. Plant biologists address challenges of meeting the nutritional needs of the increasing world's population by studying plants' ability to uptake, translocate and accumulate mineral nutrients in edible tissues. By integrating basic plant biology with molecular breeding and genomics approaches, fundamental discoveries are utilized to have the greatest impact on solving biofortification of plant-based foods. This team-taught course explores the mechanisms of acquisition of mineral nutrients from the soil, translocation and accumulation in plant tissues, strategies to prevent mineral element deficiencies while avoiding their overload, and toxicity of noxious metals. Selected lectures focus on the relation between the nutrient status of plants and human nutrition and health. Graduate students will have assignments for in-depth learning of each topic. Examination questions will differ for graduate students to evaluate assigned material. Graduate students will write a paper for one of the topics and present it in class.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3569, "title": "Remote Sensing Fundamentals", "code": "PLSCS 6600", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Introduction to the principles, equipment, and methods used in obtaining information about earth resources and the environment from aircraft or satellite sensors. Topics include: basic interactions of electromagnetic radiation with the earth, sensors, sensor and grounddata acquisition, data analysis and interpretation, and project design in the form of a proposal to use remote sensing for a specific application.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3570, "title": "Pedology", "code": "PLSCS 6630", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Covers weathering, reactions, and processes of soil genesis; principles of soil classification and the rationale and use of soil taxonomy; development and significance of major groups of soils of the world.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3571, "title": "Perspectives in International Development", "code": "PLSCS 6960", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "A variety of speakers present seminars on international development topics relating to sustainable development throughout the world. Students attend each seminar and submit a five-page essay at the end of the semester reflecting on the speakers' presentations and analyzing connections between topics.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3572, "title": "Seminar in Soil and Crop Sciences", "code": "PLSCS 6970", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Covers current research and selected topics in the crop and soil sciences and related fields.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3573, "title": "Graduate Individual Study in Soil and Crop Sciences", "code": "PLSCS 7970", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Graduate individual study in soil and crop sciences under the direction of one or more faculty members.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3574, "title": "Master's Level Thesis Research", "code": "PLSCS 8900", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Thesis research for Master's candidates.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3575, "title": "Doctoral-Level Dissertation Research", "code": "PLSCS 9900", "subject": "PLSCS", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates after \"A\" exam has been passed.", "tags": "PLSCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3576, "title": "FWS: The Personal is Political: Feminist Performance 1900-Now", "code": "PMA 1154", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3577, "title": "FWS: Avant-garde Performances: Experiment in Theaters", "code": "PMA 1156", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3578, "title": "FWS: Just Gals Being Pals. Queer Female Fandom Since 2016", "code": "PMA 1159", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3579, "title": "FWS:Wonderlands and Other Worlds", "code": "PMA 1160", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3580, "title": "FWS: Food and the Media", "code": "PMA 1161", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3581, "title": "Rehearsal and Performance", "code": "PMA 1611", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Perform in a departmental theatre production or dance concert. Research a role, develop a character, and perform for a live audience in a faculty supervised production. Explore choreography and perform in a departmental dance concert.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3582, "title": "Student Laboratory Theatre Company", "code": "PMA 1670", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "The Student Laboratory Theatre Company (SLTC) is a group of student-actors who earn credit by acting in three scenes directed by students taking PMA 4880. Students enrolling in SLTC for credit earn 1 credit for two projects and 2 credits for three projects. SLTC also meets with directors once a week.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3583, "title": "Laughter", "code": "PMA 1700", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "What makes us laugh, and what doesn't? How does laughter vary from person to person, place to place, and across time? What work does laughter perform? Is it contagious? What does it mean to have (or lack) a sense of humor? What is laughter's relationship to pleasure and pain, health and wellness? In this course, we will experiment with the art of \"making funny.\" Students will explore the science and psychology of humor, construct laughter through language and the body, analyze jokes (to learn how to tell them), and investigate the role of humor in a democratic society.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3584, "title": "Media Studies Minor Colloquium", "code": "PMA 2000", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "The Colloquium provides opportunities for exchange, reflection, discussion of relevant concepts, and extended engagement with the media objects made in a variety of Making Media courses.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3585, "title": "Reading Cinematic Horror", "code": "PMA 2407", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3586, "title": "Japanese Pop Culture", "code": "PMA 2460", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Japanese pop culture\u2014anime, manga, video games, music and more\u2014has been a major phenomenon with massive worldwide popularity for the last three decades. In this course, we will explore a wide range of Japanese pop cultural forms, exploring the interactions between different media, Japanese pop culture as global pop culture, and a variety of modes of analyzing visual and audio materials. We will also see how pop cultural works themselves, in their content and form, engage with questions of gender, technology, fandom, nation, and the environment. No prior knowledge of Japanese language, culture, or history required. All readings and screenings will be available in English or with English subtitles.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3587, "title": "Jewish Films and Filmmakers: Hollywood and Beyond", "code": "PMA 2490", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "What does it mean to call a film is \"Jewish\"? Does it have to represent Jewish life? Does it have to feature characters identifiable as Jews? If artists who identify as Jews\u2014actors, directors, screenwriters, composers\u2014play significant roles in a film's production does that make it Jewish? Our primary point of entry into these questions will be Hollywood, from the industry's early silent films, through the period generally considered classical, down to the present day. We will also study films produced overseas, in countries that may include Israel, Egypt, France, Italy, and Germany. Our discussions will be enriched by contextual material drawn from film studies, cultural studies, Jewish studies, American studies, and other related fields. Students will be expected to view a significant number of films outside of class\u2014an average of one per week\u2014and engage with them through writing and in-class discussion. The directors, screenwriters, composers, and actors whose work we will study may include: Charlie Chaplin, Irving Berlin, Al Jolson, Fanny Brice, Billy Wilder, Barbra Streisand, Woody Allen, Mel Brooks, Aviva Kempner, Joan Micklin Silver, the Marx Brothers, and the Coen Brothers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3588, "title": "Film Festival Production Lab", "code": "PMA 2510", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Learn the skills necessary to produce/curate/mount a film festival from planning to execution. The Centrally Isolated Film Festival (CIFF) involves students in all aspects of film festival organization, and welcomes students with skills in particular areas: publicity, design, administration, management, fundraising, solicitation of films, invitation of guests, reviewing films, curating the program, running the event itself. The course may span 2 semesters. There will be an informational meeting each fall semester to plan the coming year's events and time schedule.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3589, "title": "Production Crew Laboratory", "code": "PMA 2610", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Learn what it means to run a live show. Participate as part of a team to ensure all the elements work together and on time. Learn the intricacies of collaborating with a production group to create a unified artistic vision. Program lighting, sound, or video boards, or participate as a dresser, stage crew member, or assistant stage manager.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3590, "title": "Performing Death and Desire: Vampires on Stage and Screen", "code": "PMA 2620", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Why are the undead so long-lived? This course hunts the dangerous and subversive figure of the vampire across a variety of pages, stages and screens. From campy melodramas and raucous stage comedies, to lush cinematic epics and politically savvy television---and all the Draculas that have come and gone in between--we will explore how the vampire changes with medium, period, and genre. Using a variety of critical approaches we will consider why this most persistent cultural metaphor emerges in particular cultural moments, and what social anxieties and desires it articulates. We will interrogate the vampire's relationship to race and gender and analyze how the vampire is constructed, appropriated, adapted, reinvented, and performed in its many contexts, asking what it means for us to consume these texts.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3591, "title": "Music as Drama: An Introduction to Opera", "code": "PMA 2633", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Opera has been enthralling audiences for 400 years; this course explores the multiple facets of its appeal. Using seven operas as the focus-chosen from different periods, national traditions, and styles-the class will examine the texts that have been turned into operas, the musical conventions that have guided composers (or against which they have worked), and the decisions directors make when they put operas on stage. Each work will be seen as well as heard-either in a special screening or, at least once in the semester, in a live performance. Students who have a strong background in music may wish to also enroll in MUSIC 3901, which involves an extra class-period per week where the music is discussed in greater detail. Permission of the instructor is required for this one-credit addition.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3592, "title": "Desire", "code": "PMA 2680", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "\"Language is a skin,\" the critic Roland Barthes once wrote: \"I rub my language against the other. It is as if I had words instead of fingers, or fingers at the tip of my words. My language trembles with desire.\" Sexual desire has a history, even a literary history, which we will examine through an introductory survey of European dramatic literature from the Ancient Greeks to the present, as well as classic readings in sexual theory, including Plato, Freud, Foucault, and contemporary feminist and queer theory.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3593, "title": "Shakespeare in the Twenty-First Century", "code": "PMA 2681", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "More than 400 years after his death, Shakespeare remains an inescapable part of world culture.\u00a0His influence can be traced at every level, from traditional art forms like theater, poetry, and opera to popular genres like Broadway musicals, science fiction, crime thrillers, and romcoms. Contemporary adaptations and bold re-stagings of his plays abound that reflect his deep understanding of sexual and gender fluidity, racial and class antipathy, and the complex workings of political power.\u00a0In this course, we'll focus on five plays that continue to generate creative responses across many media: Romeo and Juliet, A Midsummer Night's Dream, Much Ado about Nothing, Julius Caesar, and Macbeth.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3594, "title": "American Shakespeare", "code": "PMA 2683", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "What is distinctive about American Shakespeare? Is it merely a less confident cousin of its more prestigious UK relative; or does it have a character of its own? What is currently happening with 'American Shakespeare' that is not happening anywhere else? This course is designed explicitly to exploit the wide variety of human and material resources of the DC and surrounding area, such as the Folger Shakespeare Library and Theatre, the Shakespeare Theatre and the Blackfriars Playhouse at Staunton. While encountering a number of plays, students will have the opportunity to see at least three live performances and numerous movies, consider the history of Shakespeare in America and learn from actors, directors, scholars and designers.", "tags": "LA-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3595, "title": "Thinking Media", "code": "PMA 2703", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "From hieroglyphs to HTML, ancient poetry to audiotape, and Plato's cave to virtual reality, \"Thinking Media\" offers a multidisciplinary introduction to the most influential media formats of the last three millennia. Featuring an array of guests from across Cornell, including faculty from Communication, Comparative Literature, English, German Studies, Information Science, Music, and Performing & Media Arts, the course will present diverse perspectives on how to think with, against, and about media in relation to the public sphere and private life, archaeology and science fiction, ethics and aesthetics, identity and difference, labor and play, knowledge and power, expression and surveillance, and the generation and analysis of data.", "tags": "ALC-AS|CA-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3596, "title": "Introduction to Latina/o/x Performance", "code": "PMA 2720", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Latina/o/x Performance investigating the historical and contemporary representations of Latina/o/xs in performance and media. Throughout the semester, students will critically examine central themes and issues that inform the experiences and (re) presentations of Latina/o/xs in the United States. How is latinidad performed? In situating the class around \"Latina/o/x,\" as both an umbrella term and an enacted social construction, we will then turn our attention to (re) presentations of latinidad within different genres of cultural expressions.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3597, "title": "Introduction to Humanities", "code": "PMA 2750", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "These seminars offers an introduction to the humanities by exploring the historical, cultural, social and political themes. Students will explore themes in critical dialogue with a range of texts and media drawn from the arts, humanities, and/or humanistic social sciences. Guest speakers, including Cornell faculty and Society for the Humanities Fellows, will present from different disciplines and points of view. Students will make field trips to local sites relevant to the theme, and visit Cornell special collections and archives. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in additional programming related to the Society's annual focus theme and the Humanities Scholars Program for undergraduate humanities research.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3598, "title": "Desire and Modern Drama", "code": "PMA 2762", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3599, "title": "Introduction to Acting", "code": "PMA 2800", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "An introduction to the actor's technique and performance skills, exploring the elements necessary to begin training as an actor, i.e., observation, concentration, and imagination. Focus is on physical and vocal exercises, improvisation, and text and character. There is required play reading, play attendance, and some scene study.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ETM-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3600, "title": "The Expressive Voice", "code": "PMA 2830", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3601, "title": "Millennial Jewish Stars: Race, Gender and Sexuality", "code": "PMA 2985", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "The rap superstar Drake, comedian Ilana Glazer, and muscleman Zac Efron are just three of the millennial Jewish stars examined in this course. We will ask how millennial Jewish stars depict Jewishness in terms of race, gender, sexuality. For instance, why has the rapper Lil Dicky chosen such an emasculating stage name, and why does Ilana Glazer embrace the outdated racial term \"Jewess?\" How do these names use historical Jewish stereotypes to fuel present-day comedy? We will trace racial, gendered, and sexual tropes about Jews from 19th-century theater to the newest YouTube sketches. We'll cluster these media around themes like women's pleasure, Jewish identity, cultural appropriation, anti-Semitism, and millennial financial struggles. We'll laugh hard, learn a lot, and see today's media through new eyes.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3602, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "PMA 3000", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Independent study allows students the opportunity to pursue special interests not treated in regularly scheduled courses. A faculty member, who becomes the student's instructor for the course, must approve the student's program of study and agree to provide continuing supervision of the work.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3603, "title": "Dance Technique III - Classical", "code": "PMA 3210", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Intermediate Western classical dance technique. Work is done on strengthening the body through a movement technique emphasizing presence and musicality based on harmonic muscular control.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3604, "title": "Introduction to Hip Hop", "code": "PMA 3213", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3605, "title": "Dance in America: Cultures, Identities, and Fabrication", "code": "PMA 3214", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This class explores dance across multiple stages\u2014TikTok videos, concert halls, streets\u2014to assess how people create, sustain, and challenge markers of difference (race, gender, sexuality, ability, and class).\u00a0How is dance appreciation different from appropriation? What are dancing\u00a0avatars\u00a0in\u00a0video games allowed to do that real persons are not? We will examine genres such as k-pop, hip hop, salsa, modern dance, and ballroom as we develop the tools necessary for viewing dance, analyzing it, and understanding its place\u00a0in\u00a0larger social, cultural, historical, and political structures. We will explore how markers of difference affect the practice and the reception of dance forms, and,\u00a0in\u00a0turn, how dance helps shape representations of identities. This is a seminar course. Previous performance experience is not necessary.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3606, "title": "Dance Technique III - Modern", "code": "PMA 3220", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Intermediate modern technique focusing on rhythm, placement, and phrasing for students who are prepared to refine the skills of dancing. Students are challenged by complex phrases and musicality.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3607, "title": "Technology and the Moving Body I", "code": "PMA 3350", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Formally titled \"technosomakinesics,\" this class works to expand the specific aesthetics related to dance as embodied performance. Included in the process is the analysis of built environments that both inspire and are designed to be inhabited by these disciplines. This studio course explores the resulting neoperformance forms being created within the range of digital media processing; such as gallery installations, multimedia dance-theatre, personal interactive media (games and digital art) and web projects. Computer-imaging and sound-production programs are examined and used in the class work (human form-animation software, vocal recording and digital editing, digital-imaging tools. The new context of digital performance raises questions concerning the use of traditional lighting, set, costume, and sound-design techniques that are examined as they are repositioned by digital-translation tools with the goal of creating experimental and/or conceptual multimedia performance and/or installation work. Theoretical texts on dance and theatrical performance, film studies, the dynamic social body, architecture, and digital technology are also used to support conceptual creative work.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3608, "title": "Transpositioning the Body I", "code": "PMA 3351", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course will cultivate collaborations between the practice and study of dance with fields such as architecture, engineering, landscape architecture, painting, digital arts, and other design and creative fields. The process of movement creation, spatial definition, and spatial analyses will be paralleled and interchanges will be made on a continual basis between chosen fields for each semester. Transposing between two, three, and four dimensional representations, concepts of framing, language (vocabulary), historical processes, concepts of performance and performativity, and concepts of audience are some of the topics that will be examined.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3609, "title": "Screening Cosa Nostra: The Mafia and the Movies from Scarface to The Sopranos", "code": "PMA 3410", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "From Al Capone to Tony Soprano, the mafia has been the subject of numerous films over the course of 70 years, so many in fact that one might well speak of a \"mafia obsession\" in American popular culture. Drawing upon a large number of American and Italian films, this course examines the cultural history of the mafia through film. We will explore issues related to the figure of the gangster, the gender and class assumptions that underpin it, and the portrayal-almost always stereotypical-of Italian-American immigrant experience that emerges from our viewings. The aim will be to enhance our understanding of the role of mafia plays in American and Italian culture in the 20th and 21st centuries. Film screenings will include Little Caesar, Scarface, Shame of the Nation, The Godfather Parts I and II, Goodfellas, The Funeral, Donnie Brasco, episodes from The Sopranos, and Gomorrah.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3610, "title": "Literary Theory on the Edge", "code": "PMA 3421", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Without literary theory, there is no idea of literature, of criticism, of culture. While exciting theoretical paradigms emerged in the late 20th century, including structuralism and poststructuralism, this course extends theoretical inquiry into its most exciting current developments, including performance studies, media theory and cinema/media studies, the digital humanities, trauma theory, transgender studies, and studies of the Anthropocene. Taught by two Cornell professors active in the field, along with occasional invited guests, lectures and class discussions will provide students with a facility for close textual analysis, a knowledge of major currents of thought in the humanities, and an appreciation for the uniqueness and complexity of language and media. This course may involve presentation of performance art.\u00a0 Course open to all levels; no previous knowledge of literary or cultural theory required.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3611, "title": "Contemporary Television", "code": "PMA 3463", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course considers issues, approaches, and complexities in the contemporary television landscape. As television has changed drastically over the past fifteen years, this course provides students with a deeper understanding of the changes in narratives, technologies, forms, and platforms that structure/restructure the televisual world. Students will grapple with how \"new media\" forms such as web-series and on-demand internet streaming services have changed primetime television. We will balance our look at television shows with nuanced readings about the televisual media industry. By watching, analyzing, and critiquing the powerful medium of television, students will situate their understanding within a broader consideration of the medium's regulation, production, distribution, and reception in the network and post-network era.", "tags": "CA-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3612, "title": "Video and New Media: Art, Theory, Politics", "code": "PMA 3515", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "The course will offer an overview of video art, alternative documentary video, and digital installation and networked art. It will analyze four phases of video and new media: (1) the development of video from its earliest turn away from television; (2) video's relation to art and installation; (3) video's migration into digital art; (4) the relation of video and new media to visual theory and social movements. Screenings will include early political and feminist video (Ant Farm, Rosler, Paper Tiger TV, Jones), conceptual video of the '80s and '90s (Vasulka, Lucier, Viola, Hill), gay and multicultural video of the '90s (Muntadas, Riggs, Piper, Fung, Parmar), networked and activist new media of the 21st century (Critical Art Ensemble, Electronic Disturbance Theater, SubRosa, Preemptive Media). Secondary theoretical readings on postmodernism, video theory, multicultural theory, and digital culture will provide students with a cultural and political context for the discussion of video and new media style, dissemination, and reception.", "tags": "LA-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3613, "title": "Screenwriting", "code": "PMA 3531", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course explores the fundamentals of writing for the screen. The class format will include creative writing assignments, class discussion, screenings and workshop. Students will produce short film scripts, film analysis papers and feedback on student work. The semester will culminate in a revision of a longer film script and presentation.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3614, "title": "Global Cinema II", "code": "PMA 3551", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Global Cinema I and II together offer an overview of international film history from the late nineteenth century to today. Through a focus on key films and significant epochs, the course traces the evolution of form, style and genre, the medium's changing technologies and business models, as well as film's relation to broader cultural, social and political contexts. Screenings of narrative, documentary and experimental films will be accompanied by readings in film theory and history.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3615, "title": "Film and Video Production I", "code": "PMA 3570", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "An introduction to filmmaking, students will learn to create compelling characters, as well as develop strong storytelling skills through basic character and story development and breakdown, cinematography, lighting, sound and editing. Over the course of the semester, students will deconstruct and analyze visual culture in an effort to learn effective techniques in visual storytelling. Students will write, shoot and edit a series of dramatic narrative exercises, participating in the preproduction to post production processes. Students will collaborate and rotate through various roles. The course will culminate with the screening of the various course projects, in a public, open-campus event at the end of the semester.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3616, "title": "Documentary Filmmaking", "code": "PMA 3571", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Documentary Filmmaking will equip. students with the knowledge to produce quality short, socially and culturally conscious, documentaries that express an interesting story. This course covers the aesthetic and technical fundamentals of directing and producing documentaries. It provides working tools to plan and tell your stories creatively, collaboratively, artistically and professionally. The goal is to produce quality productions designed as a stepping stone to more advanced projects. In the process, we will deeply discuss the principles, history, and ethics of documentary filmmaking.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3617, "title": "Making Theatre and Performance", "code": "PMA 3608", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This experiential learning class offers performance opportunities in the Department of Performing and Media Arts.\u00a0 Students selected for 3609 projects will learn how to think about and realize artistic choices, appreciate the discipline and demands of performance craft, be exposed to the uncertainty required to experiment and explore in rehearsal, and understand more fully the strategies of artistic collaboration. Students will be assessed on their participation in the collaboration process, their ability to reflect upon and articulate their role and growth in that process, and their contribution to a public performance. Students must commit to a minimum schedule of 5-6 weeks of rehearsal and live public performance.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3618, "title": "Making Theatre: Rehearsal and Production Techniques", "code": "PMA 3609", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This experiential learning class offers performance opportunities in the Department of Performing and Media Arts.\u00a0 Students selected for 3609 projects will learn how to think about and realize artistic choices, appreciate the discipline and demands of performance craft, be exposed to the uncertainty required to experiment and explore in rehearsal, and understand more fully the strategies of artistic collaboration. Students will be assessed on their participation in the collaboration process, their ability to reflect upon and articulate their role and growth in that process, and their contribution to public performance. Students must commit to a minimum schedule of 5-6 weeks of rehearsal and 2 weeks of live public performance.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3619, "title": "Creative Apprenticeship", "code": "PMA 3610", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Based on previous coursework and experience, students may be offered the opportunity to participate as an apprentice in a mentored PMA creative project.\u00a0 The apprentice experience and number of credits will be defined by the needs of the project, the area of study, and the mentor.\u00a0 Apprentice roles may include Assistant Director, Assistant Designer, Assistant Choreographer, Dramaturg, or others, as determined by the mentor.\u00a0 Successful completion of this course is necessary for application to the AUPR program.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3620, "title": "Creative Character Design", "code": "PMA 3614", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "A studio course working on the creation and development of characters on paper. The character designs explored will not be bound by the limits of the human body or physical costumes, but rather will push the limits of character imagery to that which could ultimately be achieved in print illustration, sequential art, traditional animation, digital special effects and animation, video gaming, various forms of puppetry and animatronic forms, depending on the student's area of interest. (Students will not engage in animation, or three-dimensional crafting of characters, but rather will develop the design content that could then be applied to these forms). Confident drawing skill is expected.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3621, "title": "Project: Terrarium Imagined; World Building Through Allegory", "code": "PMA 3631", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "The storyteller is a master of their own universe. In this course, students will design a fictional society starting from the ground up. From terra forma to the rise of religions and governments, societies and cultures are shaped by the world that surrounds them.\u00a0 Natural resources, biological evolution, socio-economics, religion, family dynamics, and cultural mores all play a roll in story development. The goal of this course is to explore allegorical thinking processes as they relate to social matrixes useful for telling \"human\" stories in performance and media. Social diagrams, relatable research, written allegories, concept artwork, and detailed visual representations will be used to express each individual student's unique universe.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3622, "title": "Production Design for Film, Television and Contemporary and Digital Media Studio I", "code": "PMA 3632", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "The production designer is responsible for creating, controlling, and managing 'the look' of narrative films, television & contemporary and digital media from page to screen. This hands-on, project-based course explores the processes of production design, art direction, and lighting direction as related to design for these arenas. From initial Production Design sketches, Storyboards, and 'Feel-Boards' to accommodating desired cinematographic angles and looks when designing a studio set, a designer needs to shape an entire visual world while keeping in mind the story as a whole. The goal of this course is to provide an initial understanding of the Production Design process in practice through studio work and instruction.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3623, "title": "Costume Design Studio", "code": "PMA 3660", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Design of costumes for theatre and film, concentrating on script and character analysis, period research, design elements, figure drawing and rendering skills, and an understanding of production style.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3624, "title": "Sound Design", "code": "PMA 3680", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Covering the basics of digital audio, bioacoustics, psychoacoustics and sound design, as they apply to theatre, film and music production.\u00a0 Students create soundscapes for text and moving image using ProTools software.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3625, "title": "Playing God: Medieval and Early Renaissance Drama", "code": "PMA 3720", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "After Rome's collapse, drama was gradually re-created from many sources: school-room debates, popular festivals, and, especially, religious liturgy. By the 17th century it was one of the most polished literary arts (and one of the sleaziest). This long span allows us to consider what happened in the middle. This course traces the residues of Roman drama and some \"rebeginnings\" of European drama, 10th to 13th centuries, then focuses mainly on late medieval drama in English in the 15th century, following that into the drama of the early Renaissance. We'll consider what became \"modern\"-and what was utterly unlike anything later. Discussion, lecture, regular writing, some experiments with production. English texts will be read in Middle English with lots of help; no previous knowledge required. This class counts as one of the three pre-1800 courses required of English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3626, "title": "Staging Faith: Contemporary Theatre and Lived Religions", "code": "PMA 3747", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Religious beliefs, practices, and conflicts shape our world and influence global politics.\u00a0 Yet mediatized depictions of religion can be reductive and polarizing.\u00a0 Moreover, these depictions may be different from what people experience in their everyday lives.\u00a0 In the contemporary theatre, we have the opportunity to consider representations of individuals' lived religion, the complex questions of belief, and challenges to faith from within and outside religious communities.\u00a0 Through close readings of plays and related materials engaging with Christian, Jewish, Muslim, Sikh and other faith traditions, we will explore and discuss together the religious motivations, tensions, and dilemmas facing us today.\u00a0 Our texts include, among others, Jesus Christ Superstar, Indecent, Angels in America, and Heroes of the Fourth Turning.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3627, "title": "Global Stages II", "code": "PMA 3751", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to a range of historical, cross-cultural, and transnational performance texts, theories, and practices; to motivate students to examine the broad social, political, cultural, and economic contexts in which performances take place; and to familiarize students with the major methodologies and paradigms for the creation, spectatorship, and interpretation of embodied performances. Our investigations of these issues will be routed through three organizing concepts: conquest, commerce, and community.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3628, "title": "Acting II", "code": "PMA 3800", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Practical exploration of the actor's craft through exercises in physical and psychological action, improvisation and scene study.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3629, "title": "Intermediate Studies in Acting Techniques", "code": "PMA 3801", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Class members can expect to expand their acting skills via specific projects, approaches and methodologies of the instructors' choosing to develop scripted and/or original material for in-class study and presentation.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3630, "title": "Public Speaking: Contexts, Techniques and Analysis", "code": "PMA 3814", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course introduces students to public speaking as a pragmatic endeavor, through tools and types both historical and contemporary. Students will focus on analyzing speech contexts and developing presentational techniques, paired with practical exercises and critical analysis. Students will learn to: harness physical presence, develop vocal production & range, facilitate effective eye contact and gesture in order to present themselves and their material clearly, confidently, and persuasively. Investigating a variety of public speaking modes and situations, this course is designed as a practicum in public speaking skill-sets.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3631, "title": "Special Topics", "code": "PMA 3900", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "An intensive study of a particular dramatist, period, form or problem in drama and/or performance. Topics, prerequisites and formats will vary from year to year. Topic for Spring: Power Plays: Contemporary Drama Womxn: This course explores questions of power in contemporary drama written by playwrights identifying as women. Taking feminisms as our main critical lenses, we'll look at plays from the UK, Canada, the USA, India, Australia, and South Africa, asking how these plays stage marginalized bodies and voices, and call in to question hierarchies of power. We'll also interrogate assumptions about canon formation and consider the place of womxn in contemporary theatre and in the cultural hierarchies to which theatre responds and in which it participates. Our reading list will be partly informed by student interests.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3632, "title": "Advanced Dance Technique", "code": "PMA 4222", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Advanced and pre-professional advanced ballet and modern technique. This class meets 4 days per week. This course is a combination of PMA 3210\u00a0and PMA 3220\u00a0in the same semester.\u00a0 Attendance to concerts and related presentations, and short critical analysis of those events are required.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3633, "title": "Transpositioning the Body II", "code": "PMA 4351", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course continues the work done in PMA 3351. At an advanced level, this course will further explore the choreographic and design principles of contemporary choreographer, William Forsythe, who began his tenure as an A.D. White Professor-at-Large in 2010. The course will begin by using tools developed by Forsythe in his CD ROM, Improvisation Technologies and will continue to be structured through student and faculty consultation. The long term goal is to establish curriculum that can continue to develop new performance and installation work based on Forsythe's philosophies in his various fields of interests and how they relate to concert dance. Collaborations between fields such as dance, architecture, engineering and other design fields will be cultivated.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3634, "title": "Media Theory and Japan", "code": "PMA 4406", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "In this seminar we will be exploring media theory in relation to Japan: how media has been thought about, written about, and created within Japan, and how media theorists from across the world have used \"Japan\" and its cultural products as a key element in their thinking. We will investigate media in Japan in relation to language, nation, gender, technology, disability, the environment, and more, and will both examine and produce creative works (film, poetry, visual art, sound, programming) as a form of critical practice. No Japanese language knowledge required, as all the core readings will be in English; some Japanese-language supplemental readings will be available for graduate students with sufficient language ability.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3635, "title": "Genres, Platforms, Media", "code": "PMA 4461", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "How do questions of genre persist and evolve in the digital age? To what extent do we choose our genres, and in what ways do they choose us? How do genres, platforms, and media intersect and inform one another? What hierarchies do they establish, and to what purposes? What are the implications of such questions for what Jacques Ranciere has called the \"distribution of the sensible,\" for democratic consensus and dissensus? Moving among websites, social media, and streaming services, from Poetry Foundation and PennSound to podcasts and serial TV, from FaceBook and Twitter to Instagram and YouTube, from Netflix and Amazon to Roku and Hulu, this course will explore the accelerating interplay of genres, platforms, and media and their impact in contemporary culture and politics.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3636, "title": "Film and Media Festivals", "code": "PMA 4502", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Film festivals are important entry spaces for young filmmakers, but also spaces of cultural politics that promote the year's new films and provide a meeting ground for market forces and cinephilia. This course seeks to understand what cultural work festivals do: What were the political reasons for the foundation of well-known festivals such as Cannes, Venice, and Berlin? How did Sundance become the premier festival for independent film? What significance do festivals have for LGBT and other minority audiences? How do festivals participate in discourses about human rights? How do they negotiate changing exhibition formats (from streaming to virtual reality)? Do they have the power to change the film industry? Possible fieldtrip (e.g. to the Tribeca Film Festival), and participation in Cornell's student film festival.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3637, "title": "Playwriting II", "code": "PMA 4505", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course builds on skills developed in Playwriting I. Focusing on the development of longer scripts and the process of getting them to the stage, students will write a long one act play, and the materials to market it. The class will involve daily exercises, lessons on various issues of craft and the business of playwriting, and substantial workshopping and revision. Students will learn how to research opportunities for sending their work out and will leave the class with a polished script, a sense of themselves as writers, and the skills to take their play into production.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3638, "title": "Advanced Screenwriting", "code": "PMA 4532", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Focuses on the structure and style of the original web-series and\u00a0long-form short screenplay, and incorporates extensive peer feedback, workshop, and revision. Students will produce and revise an original mid-length short film and/or show\u00a0pilot,\u00a0in addition to crafting a log-line, treatment, and pitch for their film.\u200b", "tags": "LA-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3639, "title": "Film and Video Production II", "code": "PMA 4585", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "A continuation of\u00a0PMA 3570, Introduction to Visual Storytelling, students will dive deeper into creating story driven short form narratives. Students will have the opportunity to develop and produce a short film over the course of the semester. The expectation is the follow through of the filmmaking process, from story development, preproduction, production, post production and distribution. Students are expected to collaborate heavily and crew on each other's film productions, in various roles. Final film projects will be screened in a public, open-campus event at the end of the semester.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3640, "title": "Adaptation: Text/Theatricality", "code": "PMA 4660", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3641, "title": "Shakespeare's Hamlet: The Seminar", "code": "PMA 4670", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3642, "title": "Cages and Creativity: Arts in Incarceration", "code": "PMA 4681", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This class explores the increasing presence of all the arts in prisons throughout the country and examines the increasing scholarship surrounding arts programs and their efficacy for incarcerated persons. The course uses video's, archival material, reading material and in-person or Zoom interviews to investigate how and why art is taught in prisons. The class will also look at art produced by incarcerated artists as well as art by those who are still practicing after going home. And finally, the class will explore the increasing scholarship around the impact practicing the arts while incarcerated has on recidivism rates and preparation for re-entry.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SSC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3643, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "PMA 4701", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday,\u00a0alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3644, "title": "Fundamentals of Directing II", "code": "PMA 4880", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Builds on the directing techniques learned in Fundamentals of Directing I. In this course each student directs actors from the Student Laboratory Theatre Company in a series of projects and public presentations focusing on specific directorial challenges.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3645, "title": "Honors Research Tutorial I", "code": "PMA 4950", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "First of a two-semester sequence (the second is PMA 4951) for seniors engaged in an honors project.\u00a0 Honor guidelines and form.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3646, "title": "Honors Research Tutorial II", "code": "PMA 4951", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Second of a two-semester sequence (the first is PMA 4950) for students engaged in an honors project.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3647, "title": "Media Theory and Japan", "code": "PMA 6406", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "In this seminar we will be exploring media theory in relation to Japan: how media has been thought about, written about, and created within Japan, and how media theorists from across the world have used \"Japan\" and its cultural products as a key element in their thinking. We will investigate media in Japan in relation to language, nation, gender, technology, disability, the environment, and more, and will both examine and produce creative works (film, poetry, visual art, sound, programming) as a form of critical practice. No Japanese language knowledge required, as all the core readings will be in English; some Japanese-language supplemental readings will be available for graduate students with sufficient language ability.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3648, "title": "Genres, Platforms, Media", "code": "PMA 6461", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "How do questions of genre persist and evolve in the digital age? To what extent do we choose our genres, and in what ways do they choose us? How do genres, platforms, and media intersect and inform one another? What hierarchies do they establish, and to what purposes? What are the implications of such questions for what Jacques Ranciere has called the \"distribution of the sensible,\" for democratic consensus and dissensus? Moving among websites, social media, and streaming services, from Poetry Foundation and PennSound to podcasts and serial TV, from FaceBook and Twitter to Instagram and YouTube, from Netflix and Amazon to Roku and Hulu, this course will explore the accelerating interplay of genres, platforms, and media and their impact in contemporary culture and politics.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3649, "title": "Film and Media Festivals", "code": "PMA 6502", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3650, "title": "Advanced Screenwriting", "code": "PMA 6532", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course focuses on the structure and style of the original, long-form short screenplay and web-series (approximately 25-35 pages), and incorporates extensive peer feedback, workshop, and revision. Students will produce and revise an original short script or two episodes of a show pilot, in addition to crafting a log-line, treatment, and pitch for their film.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3651, "title": "Global Cinema II", "code": "PMA 6551", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Global Cinema I and II together offer an overview of international film history from the late nineteenth century to today. Through a focus on key films and significant epochs, the course traces the evolution of form, style and genre, the medium's changing technologies and business models, as well as film's relation to broader cultural, social and political contexts. Screenings of narrative, documentary and experimental films will be accompanied by readings in film theory and history.\nGlobal Cinema II covers the period from 1960 to the present. Precise topics will vary from year to year, but may include: \"New Waves\" in Italy, France, Germany, Japan; cinematic modernism; new modes of documentary; changing technologies of sound and image; avant-garde and experimental cinema; \"New\" Hollywood; \"counter-cinema\" and underground film; feminist film theory and practice; Hollywood's enduring importance; popular cinema in China, India, Brazil; the impact of television, video and the digital revolution.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3652, "title": "Theorizing Media and Performance", "code": "PMA 6610", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This graduate seminar takes a global approach to understanding the influential ways in which live and mediated performances have been theorized. Focusing on late twentieth- and early twenty-first-century texts, we will explore the ways in which different aestheticians, historians, activists, and other philosophically motivated thinkers have conceived such phenomena as kinesthetic performance, embodied spectatorship, (mnemo)technics, spectacularity, liveness, identification, and ludic play. Close analyses of a variety of art objects will complement our intensive readings of dense theoretical texts.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3653, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "PMA 6701", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday, alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3654, "title": "Independent Study for Graduate Students in Theatre", "code": "PMA 7000", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Independent study in theatre allows graduate students the opportunity to pursue special interests not treated in regularly scheduled courses. A faculty member, who becomes the student's instructor for the course, must approve the student's program of study and agree to provide continuing supervision of the work.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3655, "title": "The Pedagogy of Performing and Media Arts", "code": "PMA 7100", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Provides graduate students in the field of Performing and Media Arts an opportunity to work directly with a faculty member to explore pedagogical theory and practice for undergraduate theatre classes in all areas of the curriculum.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3656, "title": "Thesis and Research Projects", "code": "PMA 9900", "subject": "PMA", "descr": "Graduate student course while working on thesis and research for dissertation.", "tags": "PMA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3657, "title": "Elementary Polish I", "code": "POLSH 1131", "subject": "POLSH", "descr": "In this course, students work on their ability to speak, write, read, and understand contemporary Polish. Students will also develop their intercultural competency. The instructor uses communicative language teaching with emphasis on structured input. Students use the textbook and workbook \"Hurra! Po polsku 1\" supplemented by Polish-English chapter dictionaries. This class covers chapters 0-9. If a student is not sure of his or her language level, he or she can contact the Polish instructor, Ewa Bachminska, at eb583@cornell.edu.", "tags": "POLSH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3658, "title": "Elementary Polish II", "code": "POLSH 1132", "subject": "POLSH", "descr": "In this course, students work on their ability to speak, write, read, and understand contemporary Polish. Students will also develop their intercultural competency. The instructor uses communicative language teaching with emphasis on structured input. Students use the textbook and workbook \"Hurra! Po polsku 1\" supplemented by Polish-English chapter dictionaries. This class covers chapters 10-20. If a student is not sure of his or her language level, he or she can contact the Polish instructor, Ewa Bachminska, at eb583@cornell.edu.", "tags": "POLSH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3659, "title": "Intermediate Polish I", "code": "POLSH 2033", "subject": "POLSH", "descr": "In this course, students continue working on their ability to speak, write, read, and understand contemporary Polish.\u00a0 Students will also enhance their intercultural competency.\u00a0 The instructor uses communicative language teaching with emphasis on structured input.\u00a0 Students use the textbook and workbook \"Hurra!\u00a0 Po polsku 2\" supplemented by Polish-English chapter dictionaries.\u00a0 This class covers chapters 1-10.\u00a0 If a student is not sure of his or her language level, he or she can contact the Polish instructor, Ewa Bachminska, at eb583@cornell.edu.", "tags": "POLSH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3660, "title": "Intermediate Polish II", "code": "POLSH 2034", "subject": "POLSH", "descr": "In this course, students continue working on their ability to speak, write, read, and understand contemporary Polish.\u00a0 Students will also enhance their intercultural competency.\u00a0 The instructor uses communicative language teaching with emphasis on structured input.\u00a0 Students use the textbook and workbook \"Hurra!\u00a0 Po polsku 2\" supplemented by Polish-English chapter dictionaries.\u00a0 This class covers chapters 11-20.\u00a0 If a student is not sure of his or her language level, he or she can contact the Polish instructor, Ewa Bachminska, at eb583@cornell.edu.", "tags": "POLSH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3661, "title": "Advanced Polish II", "code": "POLSH 2104", "subject": "POLSH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "POLSH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3662, "title": "Intermediate Brazilian Portuguese for Spanish Speakers II", "code": "PORT 2020", "subject": "PORT", "descr": "Intended for students who have already taken the first level of Portuguese, or as an intensive introductory course for those who are native/near native speakers of Spanish.* An all-skills course with particular emphasis on Brazilian Portuguese spoken within the contexts of its culture, it presents a fast-paced review focused on improving grammatical accuracy, pronunciation and on enriching vocabulary.", "tags": "PORT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3663, "title": "Perspectives on Brazil", "code": "PORT 2800", "subject": "PORT", "descr": "This course provides an introduction and overview of Brazilian culture. It will study different periods of Brazilian history, through the analysis of films, literature, essays, visual arts, and music. Students will explore different definitions of Brazilian identity and \"Brazilianness\" focusing on key topics including the formation of the colonial Brazil\u00a0 and the emergence of the nation of Brazil as a tropical paradise; slavery and abolition; the particularities century; and the contradictions of the modernization process throughout the 20th century. We will consider elements of Brazilian popular culture such as Carnival, Samba, and \"telenovels,\" and some of the most important cultural movements of the 20th century, such as \"Modernismo,\" \"Cinema Novo,\" and \"Tropicalia.\" The primary objective of the course is to provide students with the relevant background to understand Brazilian cultural history.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|PORT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3664, "title": "Advanced Portuguese I", "code": "PORT 3100", "subject": "PORT", "descr": "This course provides intermediate level students with the opportunity to advance their oral and written fluency, proficiency, and understanding of the grammar of Portuguese. In addition, students will be introduced to several cultural aspects of the Lusophone world, including regionalisms of Portuguese language. This goal will be achieved with the aid of literary and journalistic texts. Students will be expected to give individual and group presentations, as well as to write short pieces in the target language. The course is tailored to bridge language learning and content-based courses and research in Portuguese.", "tags": "PORT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3665, "title": "Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "PSYCH 1102", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to the science of the mind.\u00a0 Everyone knows what it's like to think and perceive, but this subjective experience provides little insight into how minds emerge from physical intities like brains.\u00a0 To address this issue, cognitive science integrates work from at least five disciplines: Psychology, Neuroscience, Computer Science, Linguistics, and Philosophy.\u00a0 This course introduces students to the insights these disciplines offer into the workings of the mind by exploring visual perception, attention, memory, learning, problem solving, language, and consciousness.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3666, "title": "WIM: Introduction to Cognitive Science", "code": "PSYCH 1104", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This section is highly recommended for students who are interested in learning about the topics covered in the main course through writing and discussion.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3667, "title": "FWS: Perception, Cognition & Development", "code": "PSYCH 1140", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3668, "title": "Developmental Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 2090", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "One of four introductory courses in cognition and perception. A comprehensive introduction to current thinking and research in developmental psychology that approaches topics from both psychobiological and cognitive perspectives. We will use a comparative approach to assess principles of development change. The course focuses on the development of perception, action, cognition, language, and social understanding in infancy and early childhood.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3669, "title": "WIM: Developmental Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 2091", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This section is highly recommended for students who are interested in learning about the topics covered in the main course through writing and discussion.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3670, "title": "Psychology of Language", "code": "PSYCH 2150", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Provides an introduction to the psychology of language. The purpose of the course is to introduce students to the scientific study of psycholinguistic phenomena. Covers a broad range of topics from psycholinguistics, including the origin of language, the different components of language (phonology, morphology, syntax, and semantics), processes involved in reading, computational modeling of language processes, the acquisition of language (both under normal and special circumstances), and the brain bases of language.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3671, "title": "Introduction to Moral Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 2415", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course is an introduction to the moral mind from philosophical and psychological perspectives. Many traditional philosophical problems about morality are being illuminated by current work in cognitive science. In this course, we will look at several of these problems. In each case, we will begin with a presentation of the philosophical problems, and we will proceed to examine recent empirical work on the topic. A wide range of topics will be covered, including moral judgment, agency, the self, and punishment.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3672, "title": "Six Pretty Good Books: Explorations in Social Science", "code": "PSYCH 2580", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course is modeled after \"Great Books\" literature courses in the humanities, but with two important differences: we read non-fiction books in the social sciences rather than the humanities, written by highly prominent contemporary social scientists. The course title refers to the fact that the books are new, hence their potential greatness has yet to be confirmed by the test of time. We choose living authors to give students a unique opportunity: to interact with each of the six authors in Q&A sessions in person or via video conferencing. This fall some of the authors will appear in person for Q&A and the others will Skype with the class.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3673, "title": "Introduction to Social Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 2800", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Introduction to research and theory in social psychology. Topics include social influence, persuasion, and attitude change; social interaction and group phenomena; altruism and aggression; stereotyping and prejudice; everyday reasoning and judgment.", "tags": "SBA-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3674, "title": "Introduction to Social Psychology: Writing in the Majors", "code": "PSYCH 2801", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Writing in the Majors section of PSYCH 2800. In addition to attending all the lectures in PSYCH 2800, students will attend an additional weekly seminar and all assessment is based on writing instead of exams. This course is an introduction to research and theory in social psychology, covering the same material as in PSYCH 2800\u00a0(social influence, persuasion, and attitude change; social interaction and group phenomena; altruism and aggression; stereotyping and prejudice; everyday reasoning and judgment).", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3675, "title": "Better Decisions for Life, Love and Money", "code": "PSYCH 2940", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Effective judgments and decisions are critical to success in every avenue of life. This course will explore research on the principles of sound judgment and decision making, and on the ways in which people's judgments and decisions are prone to bias and error. The course aims to improve students' critical thinking skills and to enable them to make better judgments and decisions in an increasingly complicated world. The course is taught by a team of psychologists and economists who draw on recent research in psychology and behavioral economics that can benefit the lives of students.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3676, "title": "Computational Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 3140", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course states and motivates the observation that cognition is fundamentally a computational process and explores the implications of this idea. Students are introduced to a variety of conceptual tools for thinking about cognitive information processing, including statistical learning from experience and the use of patterns distilled from past experience in guiding future actions. They learn to apply these tools to gain understanding of perception, memory, motor control, language, action planning, problem solving, decision making, reasoning, intelligence, and creativity.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3677, "title": "Obesity and the Regulation of Body Weight", "code": "PSYCH 3150", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Multidisciplinary discussion of the causes, effects, and treatments of human obesity. Topics include the biopsychology of eating behavior, the genetics of obesity, the role of activity and energy metabolism, the psychosocial determinants of obesity, anorexia nervosa, therapy and its effectiveness, and social discrimination.", "tags": "PBSS-AS|BIO-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3678, "title": "Auditory Perception: The Music Lab", "code": "PSYCH 3160", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Lab course designed to introduce students to experimental methods in auditory perception and cognition. Students complete a short computer-based course on experimental design and statistical analysis. Each student conducts an independent research project. This includes a review of the relevant literature, the collection and analysis of data, and a presentation of the findings. The projects are most frequently on a topic related to music but may also be related to speech or environmental sounds.", "tags": "KCM-AS|SSC-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3679, "title": "Adult Psychopathology", "code": "PSYCH 3250", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A theoretical and empirical approach to the biological, psychological, and social (including cultural and historical) aspects of adult psychopathology. Readings range from Freud to topics in psychopharmacology. The major mental illnesses are covered, including schizophrenia as well as mood, anxiety, and personality disorders. Childhood disorders are not covered.", "tags": "SBA-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3680, "title": "Field Practicum II", "code": "PSYCH 3280", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Continues the field practicum experience from PSYCH 3270.", "tags": "SBA-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3681, "title": "Biopsychology of Learning and Memory", "code": "PSYCH 3320", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Surveys the approaches that have been or are currently being used in order to understand the biological bases for learning and memory. Topics include invertebrate, \"simple system\" approaches, avian song learning, hippocampal and cerebellar function, research using MRI in humans. Many of the readings are from primary literature.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3682, "title": "Human Perception: Application to Computer Graphics, Art, and Visual Display", "code": "PSYCH 3420", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Our present technology allows us to transmit and display information through a variety of media. To make the most of these media channels, it is important to consider the limitations and abilities of the human observer. The course considers a number of applied aspects of human perception with an emphasis on the display of visual information. Topics include \"three-dimensional\" display systems, color theory, spatial and temporal limitations of the visual systems, attempts at subliminal communication, and \"visual\" effects in film and television.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3683, "title": "On Being Social", "code": "PSYCH 3450", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Humans are said to be \"social animals.\" This seminar provides an in-depth exploration of what it means to be social. Examples of topics to be covered include the fundamental need to belong and the affiliative system underlying cooperation; attachment and the proclivity to form strong affective ties throughout the life span; the biological bases of attraction and relationship formation; and the various consequences of thwarted relational needs, including the end of relationships through break-up, divorce, or death, and social alienation and chronic loneliness. We will focus on people's most intimate relationships \u2013 with partners, parents, and close friends \u2013 but will explore how our social nature is expressed in diverse ways \u2013 with unknown others, in social networks, and with political leaders, celebrities, and objects. These topics will be considered from diverse theoretical perspectives including work from social neuroscience, social, personality, developmental, cognitive, and evolutionary psychology, as well as drawing from work in communications, information science, sociology, and political science. Articles will be a combination of theoretical, review, or perspective pieces as well as empirical papers.", "tags": "SBA-AS|ETM-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3684, "title": "Navigation, Memory, and Context: What Does the Hippocampus Do?", "code": "PSYCH 4230", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Although the hippocampus has been the subject of intense scrutiny for nearly 50 years, there remains considerable disagreement about functional contributions the hippocampus makes to learning and memory process. This seminar will examine the diverse functions attributed to the hippocampus with an eye toward integrating the differing viewpoints in the literature. After a brief historical overview, students will discuss cutting-edge literature on the hippocampal role in spatial navigation, learning, and memory, and context processing.", "tags": "SBA-AS|BIO-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3685, "title": "Topics in Cognitive Science", "code": "PSYCH 4320", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A seminar series examining current and classical ideas in human sciences and the humanities.\u00a0 Themes vary from semester to semester", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3686, "title": "Neural Circuits for Social Behavior", "code": "PSYCH 4390", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3687, "title": "The Science of Social Behavior", "code": "PSYCH 4580", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This is a capstone seminar for seniors who are interested in graduate or professional study in scientific disciplines that focus on human behavior and social interaction. The intent is to provide seniors with an opportunity to summon, integrate, and apply insights that they have acquired over the course of their undergraduate education, and give prospective graduate students the opportunity to lead discussions in\u00a0a large introductory lecture course, \"Six Pretty Good Books\". Each seminar member is part of a two or three-person team that leads the discussion together, under the supervision of a graduate teaching assistant. Seminar meetings are devoted to building lesson plans for leading an effective discussion of each of the six books. The authors vary from year to year but include Malcolm Gladwell, Michelle\u00a0Alexander, Nate Silver, and Nicholas Christakis. All authors have agreed to participate in a \"Q&A\" session with the students which seminar members are required to attend.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3688, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 4700", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Practice in planning, conducting, and reporting independent laboratory, field, and/or library research.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3689, "title": "Advanced Undergraduate Research in Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 4710", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Advanced experience in planning, conducting, and reporting independent laboratory, field, and/or library research. One, and preferably two, semesters of PSYCH 4700\u00a0is required. The research should be more independent and/or involve more demanding technical skills than that carried out in PSYCH 4700.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3690, "title": "Quantitative Methods II", "code": "PSYCH 4760", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course builds on the first graduate statistics class for social sciences offered in falls. It will cover the general linear model as a data analytic tool. The focus will be on applied regression models.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3691, "title": "Social Psychology of Race & Racism", "code": "PSYCH 4800", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3692, "title": "Research Methods in Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 4910", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Research methods are the tools that allow psychologists to test the validity of hypotheses. This course provides a survey of the methods used by scientists in personality and social psychology as well as related behavioral sciences to empirically test hypotheses. Specifically, this course will discuss the following topics: (1) philosophy of science; (2) research designs and methods; (3) data collection, analysis, and validity; (4) report writing; and (5) recurrent and emerging trends and issues in the field of research methods and quantitative analysis. The final project consists of writing a research proposal and giving a short oral presentation.", "tags": "SDS-AS|PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3693, "title": "General Research Seminar", "code": "PSYCH 6000", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce first-year graduates to the Psychology Department faculty through a weekly series of presentations of current research.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3694, "title": "Computational Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 6140", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course states and motivates the observation that cognition is fundamentally a computational process and explores the implications of this idea. Students are introduced to a variety of conceptual tools for thinking about cognitive information processing, including statistical learning from experience and the use of patterns distilled from past experience in guiding future actions. They learn to apply these tools to gain understanding of perception, memory, motor control, language, action planning, problem solving, decision making, reasoning, intelligence, and creativity.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3695, "title": "Behavioral and Brain Sciences", "code": "PSYCH 6210", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Graduate seminar coupled with the Psychology Colloquium series. For 6-8 of the speakers, we read readings designated by the speaker in advance of their arrival, and meet with the speaker in the Thursday seminar. Intended for graduate students in the Field of Psychology who may register for this course without permission, all others please ask for permission from the instructor. Registration in both semesters is required.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3696, "title": "Navigation, Memory, and Context: What Does the Hippocampus Do?", "code": "PSYCH 6230", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Although the hippocampus has been the subject of intense scrutiny for nearly 50 years, there remains considerable disagreement about functional contributions the hippocampus makes to learning and memory process. This seminar will examine the diverse functions attributed to the hippocampus with an eye toward integrating the differing viewpoints in the literature. After a brief historical overview, students will discuss cutting-edge literature on the hippocampal role in spatial navigation, learning, and memory, and context processing.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3697, "title": "Topics in Biopsychology", "code": "PSYCH 6271", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Course explores current issues in Psychology.\u00a0 Topics vary by section.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3698, "title": "Human Perception: Applications to Computer Graphics, Art, and Visual Display", "code": "PSYCH 6420", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Our present technology allows us to transmit and display information through a variety of media. To make the most of these media channels, it is important to consider the limitations and abilities of the human observer. The course considers a number of applied aspects of human perception with an emphasis on the display of visual information. Topics include \"three-dimensional\" display systems, color theory, spatial and temporal limitations of the visual systems, attempts at subliminal communication, and \"visual\" effects in film and television.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3699, "title": "Quantitative Methods II", "code": "PSYCH 6760", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "This course builds on the first graduate statistics class for social sciences offered in falls. It will cover the general linear model as a data analytic tool. The focus will be on applied regression models.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3700, "title": "Social Psychology of Race & Racism", "code": "PSYCH 6800", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3701, "title": "Research Methods in Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 6910", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Research methods are the tools that allow psychologists to test the validity of hypotheses. This course provides a survey of the methods used by scientists in personality and social psychology as well as related behavioral sciences to empirically test hypotheses. Specifically, this course will discuss the following topics: (1) philosophy of science; (2) research designs and methods; (3) data collection, analysis, and validity; (4) report writing; and (5) recurrent and emerging trends and issues in the field of research methods and quantitative analysis. The final project consists of writing a research proposal and giving a short oral presentation.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3702, "title": "Research in Biopsychology", "code": "PSYCH 7000", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A graduate research seminar in biopsychology.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3703, "title": "Developmental Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 7090", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "One of four introductory courses in cognition and perception. A comprehensive introduction to current thinking and research in developmental psychology that approaches problems from both psychobiological and cognitive perspectives. We will use a comparative approach to assess principles of development change. The course focuses on the development of perception, action, cognition, language, and social understanding in infancy and early childhood.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3704, "title": "Research in Human Experimental Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 7100", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A graduate research seminar in human experimental psychology.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3705, "title": "Auditory Perception: The Music Lab", "code": "PSYCH 7160", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Lab course designed to introduce students to experimental methods in auditory perception and cognition. Students complete a short computer-based course on experimental design and statistical analysis. Each student conducts an independent research project. This includes a review of the relevant literature, the collection and analysis of data, and a presentation of the findings. The projects are most frequently on a topic related to music.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3706, "title": "Research in Social Psychology and Personality", "code": "PSYCH 7200", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A graduate research seminar in social psychology and personality.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3707, "title": "Proseminar in Social Psychology II", "code": "PSYCH 7760", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "Second semester of a year-long discussion-seminar course intended to give graduate students an in-depth understanding of current research and theory in social psychology. Emphasizes social cognition, but other topics, such as group dynamics, social influence, the social psychology of language, and emotional experience are covered.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3708, "title": "Doctoral Thesis Research in Biopsychology", "code": "PSYCH 9000", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A graduate seminar on doctoral thesis research in biopsychology.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3709, "title": "Doctoral Thesis Research in Human Experimental Psychology", "code": "PSYCH 9100", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A graduate seminar on doctoral thesis research in human experimental psychology.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3710, "title": "Doctoral Thesis Research in Social Psychology and Personality", "code": "PSYCH 9200", "subject": "PSYCH", "descr": "A graduate seminar on doctoral thesis research in social psychology and personality.", "tags": "PSYCH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3711, "title": "Elementary Punjabi II", "code": "PUNJB 1122", "subject": "PUNJB", "descr": "This course introduces students to Punjabi, a major language of northern India and Pakistan. Beginning with the study of the Gurmukhi script, the course offers an intensive study of the speaking, reading, and writing of the language.\u00a0 This is approached through the theme-based syllabus, a discussion in small groups and paired activities on the cultural background of Punjab and Punjabi culture.", "tags": "PUNJB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3712, "title": "Intermediate Punjabi II", "code": "PUNJB 2202", "subject": "PUNJB", "descr": "Further develops students' skills in Punjabi, a major language of northern India and Pakistan. Continuing with the study of the Gurmukhi script, the course offers an intensive study of the speaking, reading, and writing of the language.\u00a0 This is approached through the theme-based syllabus, a discussion in small groups and paired activities on the cultural background of Punjab and Punjabi culture.", "tags": "PUNJB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3713, "title": "Introduction to Quranic Arabic", "code": "RELST 2204", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course is designed for students who are interested in reading the language of the Qur'an with accuracy and understanding. The first week (4 classes) will be devoted to an introduction of the history of the Qur'an: the revelation, collection, variant readings, and establishment of an authoritative edition. The last week will be devoted to a general overview of \"revisionist\" literature on the Qur'an. In the remaining 12 weeks, we will cover all of Part 30 (Juz' 'Amma, suuras 78-114) and three suuras of varying length (36, 19, and 12).", "tags": "LA-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3714, "title": "Controversy and Debate in Islam", "code": "RELST 2247", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Whether it is politics, society, the law, sexuality, popular culture or minorities' rights, the media are saturated with news on Islam. This course introduces topical issues in Islam as a religious, historical, cultural and political phenomenon. We will discuss this religion's manifold interpretations and investigate its multiple manifestations across the globe, giving special attention to Asia (from Iran to China, Indonesia, Afghanistan, India, Thailand, etc.). Key themes include religious devotion, the arts, Islamic law, gender, statehood, jihad, and sectarianism. No previous knowledge of Islam is required as the course covers the fundamentals of Islam as a religious system as well as a historical phenomenon.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3715, "title": "Introduction to Asian Religions", "code": "RELST 2250", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course will explore religious traditions in South Asia (Pakistan, India, and Sri Lanka) and East Asia (China, Japan, and Korea) including Hinduism, Buddhism (South Asian and East Asian), Sikhism, Confucianism, Daoism, and Shint\u014d. We will also encounter a wide range of religious expressions, including myth, ritual, pilgrimage, mysticism, meditation, and other spiritual technologies.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3716, "title": "Chinese Mythology", "code": "RELST 2279", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Students will study Chinese myths from the earliest times. Focus will be on understanding how people have used myth to create and convey meaning, on examining the form Chinese myths take, and on considering how they are related to religion, literature, historical accounts, and intellectual trends.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3717, "title": "Medicine, Magic and Science in the Ancient Near East", "code": "RELST 2599", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course explores the history of medicine and other sciences in the ancient Near East, broadly defined. In addition to medicine, the other scientific disciplines covered in this course include mathematics, astrology, astronomy, alchemy, zoology, among others. Geographically, the course traces the transmission of scientific knowledge in ancient Babylonia, Iran, Egypt, Israel, Turkey, and beyond. As such, the course offers students a tour of different ancient civilizations and corpora. Students read selections from cuneiform Akkadian tablets, Egyptian Christian Coptic spellbooks, rabbinic sources such as the Talmud, among many other works. At the same time, students will be required to critically engage recent scholarship in the history of science and medicine as a way to help frame their analyses of the ancient materials. The course interrogates how ancient civilizations transmitted and received scientific knowledge, as well as the relationship between what we today tend to call science, medicine, magic, and religion. This course is intended not only for students in the Humanities and Social Sciences, but also for those majoring in science or medicine.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3718, "title": "Introduction to Judaism", "code": "RELST 2644", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Jewish identities, values, and practices from the ancient to modern era. Organized thematically, it examines Judaism as a religious phenomenon, with a particular emphasis on its cultural and textual diversity across three millennia. Themes covered include creation, Sabbath, prayer, Jerusalem, pious customs, magic, reincarnation, revelation, among others. Throughout the semester students perform close readings of a wide selection of Jewish texts from the Bible, Talmud, kabbalah (mysticism), philosophy, liturgy, and modern Jewish thought. In what ways are these various traditions of Judaism interrelated and/or in tension with one another? In the face of the Jewish history's tremendous diversity, what is it that has unified Judaism and the Jewish people over the centuries? By exploring these types of questions, this course examines the appropriateness of defining Judaism as a religion, an ethnicity, a civilization, and/or a culture. Readings include introductory-level textbooks and essays, as well as a range of primary source materials in translation.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3719, "title": "Introduction to Christian History", "code": "RELST 2695", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course offers an introduction to the history of Christianity from the first century through the seventeenth and perhaps a bit beyond. Our emphasis will be on the diversity of Christian traditions, beliefs, and practices throughout history. We will explore the origins of Christianity within the eastern Mediterranean world, the spread of Christianity, the development of ecclesiastical institutions, the rise and establishment of monasticism, and the various controversies that occupied the church throughout its history. Throughout the course, we will supplement our reading of primary texts with art, archaeology, music, and manuscripts.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3720, "title": "Gendering Enlightenment: Attitudes toward Women in Buddhist Traditions", "code": "RELST 3374", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Women have from the beginning been integral members of Buddhist traditions. But their voices have often been silenced by male clergy. This course will explore ways in which images of women and the feminine have been manipulated within normative literature to serve a variety of ends. We will also look at the lives of real Buddhist women in premodern and contemporary times as we think about the complex ways women have made space for their own interests.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3721, "title": "Myth, Ritual, and Symbol", "code": "RELST 3420", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course approaches the study of religion, symbols, and myth from an anthropological perspective.\u00a0The centrality and universality of religion and myth-making in social and symbolic life has been fundamental in the development of cultural theory.\u00a0Our aim is to understand with this is so. We begin by examining the classic theories of religion in the works of Durkheim, Marx, Weber, Mauss, and Freud, among others, followed by an exploration of how these theories have been influential in anthropological studies of symbolism, cosmology, ritual, selfhood, myth, sorcery, witchcraft, and pilgrimage.\u00a0We conclude by examining the apparent persistence, revival and transformation of religious and magical beliefs and practices within modern, modernizing, and postcolonial states.\u00a0We ask whether an increasing politicization and globalization of religious ideology through technological mediation poses significant challenges to the anthropological analysis of religion.\u00a0In so doing, we also try to understand better the human experience of and identification with the spiritual, mythical, and religious in the contemporary moment.\u00a0This, in turn, leads us to investigate the inherent volatility of such identifications and experiences within the larger national and global framework of cultural politics.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3722, "title": "Moses to Modernity", "code": "RELST 3535", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course is an introduction to Jewish philosophy \u2013 from Biblical texts to 20th century work. Our inquiries will span metaphysics, epistemology, ethics, philosophy of religion, and political philosophy. We will reflect on questions such as the relation between philosophy or reason on the one hand, and religion and ethics on the other, on the possibility of knowledge of God, the ethics of human relations, the nature of suffering, and finally the nature of a tolerant and just society. We will read works by Maimonides, Spinoza, Mendelssohn, Marx, Buber, Rosenzweig, Cohen, Arendt, Levinas, and Butler, among others.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3723, "title": "Identity in the Ancient World", "code": "RELST 3738", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Have you ever been asked 'who are you' or 'which group do you belong to'? You would have noted how the answer shifts according to who is asking, in which context, etc. While everyone is unique, the possible replies in any one situation are largely defined at the level of society. What is less often realized, however, is that identity shows in particular in ways of doing: what and how one eats; what one wears and when; how one moves in a space. Archaeology is in a unique position to investigate these questions, and the Greek and Roman worlds offer a fruitful test ground, both because of their varied evidence, and because of their peculiar echoing in the modern world and its manifold identities. This course will address current theories about identity and its formation, discuss the various facets of identity (e.g. gender, citizenship, ethnicity) in the Greek and Roman worlds, and introduce tools for studying identity in the past.", "tags": "CA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3724, "title": "Staging Faith: Contemporary Theatre and Lived Religions", "code": "RELST 3747", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Religious beliefs, practices, and conflicts shape our world and influence global politics.\u00a0 Yet mediatized depictions of religion can be reductive and polarizing.\u00a0 Moreover, these depictions may be different from what people experience in their everyday lives.\u00a0 In the contemporary theatre, we have the opportunity to consider representations of individuals' lived religion, the complex questions of belief, and challenges to faith from within and outside religious communities.\u00a0 Through close readings of plays and related materials engaging with Christian, Jewish, Muslim, Sikh and other faith traditions, we will explore and discuss together the religious motivations, tensions, and dilemmas facing us today.\u00a0 Our texts include, among others, Jesus Christ Superstar, Indecent, Angels in America, and Heroes of the Fourth Turning.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3725, "title": "Understanding Uprising: The Iranian Revolution", "code": "RELST 3887", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This class analyzes the phenomenon of political uprising through the case study of the Iranian Revolution.\u00a0 Undoubtedly one of the watershed moments of the twentieth century, it was declared by political scientist Richard Cottam as one of \"the most popular revolutions in the history of mankind.\" Rather than employing a strictly historiographical approach, we will utilize a diverse set of methodologies \u2013 anthropological, sociological, feminist, neo-Marxist, etc -- in order to better understand not only the Revolution itself, but what unique perspective these disparate schools of thought may offer. Major themes include the relationship between religion and politics, class struggle, economic inequalities, foreign influence and colonialism, the use of violence, the impact of intellectuals, the role of women, tactics of political mobilization, comparisons with the Arab Spring, and more.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3726, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "RELST 4100", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3727, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "RELST 4310", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3728, "title": "Projects of Modernity in Asia", "code": "RELST 4480", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Idea(l)s of modernity across the Global South have been largely rooted in Euro-American projections of \"civilization\", and \"civilizational\" projects. The colonial worldview in which only Western(ized) experiences could be modern is foundational to the multifarious ways in which scholarship and nation-builders have engaged with progress, whether aspiring to it, rejecting it, or appropriating it. In this seminar we explore how imperial authorities, nationalists, and scholars/intellectuals have interfaced with idea(l)s of progress and modernity in Asia, reading works (\"one book a week\") grounded in multiple disciplines and cultural settings. Core themes will include: health and hygiene, consumption, technology, gender, piety and devotion, imperialism and race, and nationalism.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3729, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: The Beginnings of Islam: 600-750", "code": "RELST 4618", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3730, "title": "Gnosticism and Early Christianity", "code": "RELST 4628", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "What is \"Gnosticism\" and why has it come to be so hotly debated among scholars and in our contemporary media? What is the Gospel of Judas and are its ideas \"heretical\"? Who wrote the Gospel of Thomas and the Gospel of Mary and why were these Gospels not included in the New Testament canon? To what extent did Dan Brown's The Da Vinci Code draw from ancient Christian gnostic sources? This seminar will explore answers to these questions and many others by focusing on the complex array of literary sources from late antiquity-primarily from a cache of manuscripts found at Nag Hammadi, Egypt, in 1945-that have long been associated with a so-called \"Christian Gnosticism\". Church Fathers condemned the \"movement\" on a variety of grounds, but in this course we will not simply read the condemnations written by the opponents of gnostic thought; rather, we will focus our attention on reading (in English translation) substantial portions of the \"gnostic\" texts written by the adherents themselves. We will give special attention to the ways in which conflicts about Gnosticism connected with conflicts about gender, heresy, power, and authority. To set these texts within a socio-historical context, we will discuss the possible Jewish and hellenistic roots of early Christian Gnosticism and ties to Stoic and other ancient philosophical movements.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|SCD-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3731, "title": "Religion, Emotion, and Imagination", "code": "RELST 4656", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "We tend to think of emotions as private, unlearned, and biological. Though in much of antiquity, the emotions were primarily seen as public, performative, and cognitive. The cultivation and control of emotions were key concerns in ancient education, moral formation, gender roles, and ritual life in Mediterranean antiquity. This seminar focuses on Greco-Roman and Christian efforts to describe, direct, mix, and control the emotions in late antique moral philosophy and religious instruction. Following an introduction to ancient Greek, Roman, and Jewish writings on the emotions, we shall turn our attention to ancient Christian efforts to foster, adapt, and redescribe emotions. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3732, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "RELST 4659", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3733, "title": "Directed Study", "code": "RELST 4991", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "For undergraduates who wish to obtain research experience or do extensive reading on a special topic. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3734, "title": "Senior Honors Essay I", "code": "RELST 4995", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "RELST 4995 is the first course in the Honors two-part sequence. The Honors Program is open to Religious Studies majors who have done superior work and who wish to devote a substantial part of their senior year to advanced, specialized, independent research and writing of a thesis. Successfully completing an honors thesis will require sustained interest, exceptional ability, diligence, and enthusiasm. While admissions to the Honors Program and completion of a thesis do not guarantee that students will be awarded honors in Religious Studies, most students find the experience as intellectually rewarding as it is rigorous.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3735, "title": "Senior Honors Essay II", "code": "RELST 4996", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "RELST 4996 is the second course in the Honors two-part sequence. The Honors Program is open to Religious Studies majors who have done superior work and who wish to devote a substantial part of their senior year to advanced, specialized, independent research and writing of a thesis. Successfully completing an honors thesis will require sustained interest, exceptional ability, diligence, and enthusiasm. While admissions to the Honors Program and completion of a thesis do not guarantee that students will be awarded honors in Religious Studies, most students find the experience as intellectually rewarding as it is rigorous.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3736, "title": "Latin Philosophical Texts", "code": "RELST 6020", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Reading and translation of Latin philosophical texts.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3737, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "RELST 6310", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3738, "title": "Seminar in Islamic History: 600-750", "code": "RELST 6618", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "An examination of Islamic history from 600-750, with special attention to historiography and interpretive issues. Topics to be discussed will include: Arabia and the Near East before Islam; the collection of the Qur'an, the biography of Muhammad, the Arab conquests, the Umayyad caliphs, and the Abbasid takeover.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3739, "title": "Religion, Emotion, and Imagination", "code": "RELST 6656", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "We tend to think of emotions as private, unlearned, and biological. Though in much of antiquity, the emotions were primarily seen as public, performative, and cognitive. The cultivation and control of emotions were key concerns in ancient education, moral formation, gender roles, and ritual life in Mediterranean antiquity. This seminar focuses on Greco-Roman and Christian efforts to describe, direct, mix, and control the emotions in late antique moral philosophy and religious instruction. Following an introduction to ancient Greek, Roman, and Jewish writings on the emotions, we shall turn our attention to ancient Christian efforts to foster, adapt, and redescribe emotions. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3740, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "RELST 6659", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the\u00a0Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3741, "title": "Projects of Modernity in Asia", "code": "RELST 6678", "subject": "RELST", "descr": "Idea(l)s of modernity across the Global South have been largely rooted in Euro-American projections of \"civilization\", and \"civilizational\" projects. The colonial worldview in which only Western(ized) experiences could be modern is foundational to the multifarious ways in which scholarship and nation-builders have engaged with progress, whether aspiring to it, rejecting it, or appropriating it. In this seminar we explore how imperial authorities, nationalists, and scholars/intellectuals have interfaced with idea(l)s of progress and modernity in Asia, reading works (\"one book a week\") grounded in multiple disciplines and cultural settings. Core themes will include: health and hygiene, consumption, technology, gender, piety and devotion, imperialism and race, and nationalism.", "tags": "RELST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3742, "title": "FWS: The Craft of Storytelling", "code": "ROMS 1102", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "We tell stories for many reasons: to entertain; to seduce; to complain; to\u00a0think. This course draws upon the literatures and cultures\u00a0of the romance languages to\u00a0explore\u00a0the role of narrative in our\u00a0construction\u00a0and understanding of\u00a0the world.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3743, "title": "FWS:Cultural Identities/Cultural Differences", "code": "ROMS 1108", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "What is a culture, and how do we know one when we see it?\u00a0 This course draws upon the histories and texts of French, Spanish, Italian, and/or Portuguese speaking worlds to discuss issues of identity, difference, politics, place, and community.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3744, "title": "FWS: Image and Imagination", "code": "ROMS 1109", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "What kind of information do images - in photography, painting, and/or film - convey?\u00a0 What kind of impact do they have on the minds and the bodies of their audiences?\u00a0 This course foregrounds the role of visual culture in the societies where Spanish, French, Portuguese, and/or Italian is spoken, and it asks students to dwell upon how visual material interacts with spoken and written language.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3745, "title": "FWS: Thinking and Thought", "code": "ROMS 1113", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "Some of the most important and intriguing thinkers, from the Middle Ages to postmodernity, have done their thinking in the romance languages.\u00a0 This course explores a body of work that would be called philosophical by some, theoretical by others, and that, beyond these names, struggles to articulate fundamental concepts, problems, discourses, and situations.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3746, "title": "FWS: Semiotics", "code": "ROMS 1114", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "What allows us to make assumptions about people based on the way they speak or dress? How can we understand the deeper meaning of a fairy tale or an episode of The Simpsons? What does macaroni and cheese mean, and why is it not on the menu at most upscale Manhattan eateries? This seminar introduces semiotics, the study of signs and the meaning-bearing sign systems they form; sign systems that include not only human language but also literature, painting, sculpture, film, music, dance and also such aspects of popular culture as advertising, fashion, food, and television, to name just a few. The diversity of semiotic systems provides many possibilities for thinking and writing critically about the world we live in.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3747, "title": "FWS: Animals in Global Cinema: Human and Nonhuman", "code": "ROMS 1120", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "In this class, students will learn about animal welfare and conservation through international films. We will discuss wildlife, companion and farm animals in conjunction with human cultures and politics. The course will cover various animal species, e.g. pangolins, dogs and sheep in fiction films, documentaries and animated movies. Students will learn how to compose film reviews, do research and write a research assignment. The class includes guest speakers, a visit to Cornell barn, library and museum. All films are available for streaming through Blackboard for students to watch them in their free time.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3748, "title": "Video and New Media: Art, Theory, Politics", "code": "ROMS 3115", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "The course will offer an overview of video art, alternative documentary video, and digital installation and networked art. It will analyze four phases of video and new media: (1) the development of video from its earliest turn away from television; (2) video's relation to art and installation; (3) video's migration into digital art; (4) the relation of video and new media to visual theory and social movements. Screenings will include early political and feminist video (Ant Farm, Rosler, Paper Tiger TV, Jones), conceptual video of the '80s and '90s (Vasulka, Lucier, Viola, Hill), gay and multicultural video of the '90s (Muntadas, Riggs, Piper, Fung, Parmar), networked and activist new media of the 21st century (Critical Art Ensemble, Electronic Disturbance Theater, SubRosa, Preemptive Media). Secondary theoretical readings on postmodernism, video theory, multicultural theory, and digital culture will provide students with a cultural and political context for the discussion of video and new media style, dissemination, and reception.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3749, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "ROMS 3560", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "Psychoanalysis considers the human being not as an object of treatment, but as a subject who is called upon to elaborate an unconscious knowledge about what is disrupting her life, through analysis of dreams, symptoms, bungled actions, slips of the tongue, and repetitive behaviors.\u00a0 Freud finds that these apparently irrational acts and behavior are ordered by the logic of the fantasy, which provides a mental representation of a traumatic childhood experience and the effects it unleashes in the mind and body-effects he called drives.\u00a0 As \"unbound\" energies, the drives give rise to symptoms, repetitive acts, and fantasmatic stagings that menace our health and sometimes threaten social coexistence, but that also rise to the desires, creative acts, and social projects we identify as the essence of human life.\u00a0 Readings will include fundamental texts on the unconscious, repression, fantasy, and the death drive, as well as case studies and speculative essays on mythology, art, religion, and group psychology.\u00a0 Students will be asked to keep a dream journal and to work on their unconscious formations, and will have the chance to produce creative projects as well as analytic essays.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3750, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "ROMS 4370", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3751, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "ROMS 4715", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relations of politics to art in general and the cultural politic of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers, and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape culture and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rule) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others; with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of the situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say post autonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3752, "title": "Pleasure and Neoliberalism", "code": "ROMS 4948", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3753, "title": "Methodology of Romance Language Learning and Teaching", "code": "ROMS 5070", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "Focuses on language teaching as facilitation of learning, thus on the learner's processing of language acquisition and the promotion of reflective teaching. Pedagogical approaches will be addressed from a learner-centered perspective involving effective language learning strategies and analysis.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3754, "title": "Pedagogy Practicum", "code": "ROMS 5080", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "This practicum is designed to better enable the TAs to meet the needs of their students in the understanding and acquisition of the linguistic forms, notions, and functions covered in their course.", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3755, "title": "The Holocaust and History Writing", "code": "ROMS 6370", "subject": "ROMS", "descr": "In the last decades, \"Holocaust Studies\" witnessed an extraordinary expansion, covering different fields of scholarship, from history to literature, from philosophy to aesthetics.\u00a0 This seminar will retrace the major steps of Holocaust history writing.\u00a0 It will analyze the classical debates between \"intentionalism\" and \"functionalism,\" the discrepancies between the analytical approaches focused on the perpetrators and those focused on the victims, the inscription of the Holocaust into the broader context of war violence, and its comparison with the genocidal violence of colonialism.\u00a0 Finally, it will investigate some methodological problems concerning the place of testimony in history writing and the permanent connections, both fruitful and problematic, between history and memory.\u00a0 This means taking into account the entanglement of the most productive areas of Holocaust scholarship (Germany, France and the United States) as well as the relationship between the historiography of the Holocaust and other disciplines (memory studies, postcolonial studies, etc.).", "tags": "ROMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3756, "title": "Conversation Practice", "code": "RUSSA 1104", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Reinforces the speaking skills learned in RUSSA 1122. \u00a0Homework includes assignments that must be done in the language lab or on the students' own computer. Class meeting times will be chosen at the organizational meeting (usually the second or third day of the semester) so as to accommodate as many students as possible. The time and place of the organizational meeting will be announced at russian.cornell.edu", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3757, "title": "Elementary Russian through Film", "code": "RUSSA 1122", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Gives a thorough grounding in all the language skills: listening, speaking, reading, and writing. Course materials include clips from original Russian films and television programs. Homework includes assignments that must be done in the language lab or on the students' own computers. Note the RUSSA 1104\u00a0option. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3758, "title": "Reading Russian Press", "code": "RUSSA 1126", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "The emphasis is on reading unabridged articles on a variety of topics from current Russian web pages and translating them into English; a certain amount of discussion (in Russian) may also be undertaken. Detailed description at\u00a0russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3759, "title": "Self-Paced Elementary Russian II", "code": "RUSSA 1132", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "RUSSA 1131\u00a0and RUSSA 1132 cover the standard Cornell first-year Russian language curriculum at a slower (or faster) pace than RUSSA 1103\u00a0-RUSSA 1104\u00a0and RUSSA 1121\u00a0-RUSSA 1122, the pace to be chosen by each individual student in consultation with the instructor. Somewhat larger homework reading, writing, and online assignments with fewer and shorter meetings with the instructors, one-on-one or in very small groups.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3760, "title": "Intermediate Composition and Conversation", "code": "RUSSA 2204", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Guided conversation, translation, reading, pronunciation, and grammar review, emphasizing the development of accurate and idiomatic expression in the language. Course materials include video clips from an original Russian feature film and work with Russian web sites, in addition to the textbook. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3761, "title": "Directed Studies", "code": "RUSSA 3300", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Taught on a specialized basis for students with special projects (e.g., to supplement a non-language course or thesis work).", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3762, "title": "Advanced Composition and Conversation", "code": "RUSSA 3304", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Reading, writing, and conversation: current Russian films (feature and documentary), newspapers, television programs, Russian web sites, and other materials are used. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3763, "title": "Creative Writing for Heritage Speakers", "code": "RUSSA 3306", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Creative writing for heritage speakers of Russian. Writing short (one page for each class) texts in Russian in a variety of genres: personal letters, blog entries, news articles, technical descriptions, official documents, short stories, and the like. Two meetings per week if taken for 2 credits hours. An optional third weekly meeting when taken for 3 credit hours has short reading assignments from contemporary literary and non-literary texts. The course is a continuation of RUSSA 3305\u00a0but may also be taken by qualified students who have not completed RUSSA 3305. Issues of style and grammar are discussed in every class. The course is primarily for students who learned to speak Russian at home, but students with other backgrounds may be eligible as well. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3764, "title": "Advanced Reading", "code": "RUSSA 3310", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Designed to teach advanced reading and discussion skills. In seminar 101, weekly reading assignments include 20-40 pages of unabridged Russian, fiction or non-fiction. In seminar 102, the weekly assignments are 80-100 pages. This course may be taken as a continuation of RUSSA 3309, but it may also be taken by itself. Discussion of the reading is conducted entirely in Russian and centered on the content and analysis of the assigned selection. Detailed description on the\u00a0Russian Langage Program website.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3765, "title": "Reading about the Cold War", "code": "RUSSA 3312", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Read and discuss texts for\u00a0GOVT 3837. The course may also support student research for the\u00a0GOVT 3837\u00a0final paper. This 1-credit course aims to expand the students' vocabulary, and advance their speaking and reading skills as well as enhance their knowledge and deepen their understanding of certain aspects of the Cold war. Course materials may include archival documents, newspaper articles, songs and poetry, urban folklore, etc. The course is taught entirely in Russian. Native speakers of Russian as well as advanced non-native speakers with moderate to advanced reading skills are eligible.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3766, "title": "Modern Russia: Past and Present II", "code": "RUSSA 4414", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Involves discussion, in Russian, of authentic Russian texts and films (feature or documentary) in a variety of non-literary styles and genres. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3767, "title": "Reading Course: Russian Literature in the Original Language", "code": "RUSSA 4491", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "To be taken in conjunction with any Russian literature course at the advanced level. Students receive 1 credit for reading and discussing works in Russian in addition to their normal course work. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3768, "title": "Russian for Russian Specialists", "code": "RUSSA 6634", "subject": "RUSSA", "descr": "Designed for students whose areas of study require advanced active control of the language. Fine points of translation, usage, and style are discussed and practiced. Syllabus varies from year to year. Maybe taken more than once. Detailed description at russian.cornell.edu.", "tags": "RUSSA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3769, "title": "Demons and Witches in Russian Literature and Film", "code": "RUSSL 2500", "subject": "RUSSL", "descr": "A paranoid husband believes that his wife is a witch. A man rejects vehemently the very idea of the Devil's existence, unwittingly doing so right in his face. From outright horrifying to eerily funny, always dangerous, but at times benevolent, demons, witches, and other mysterious and elusive creatures of Russian lore inhabit people's imagination and figure prominently in a number of Russian books and films. In this course, we will read and discuss fairy tales, pieces of poetry, short stories, and one of the greatest novels in Russian twentieth century literature. We will also watch several feature and animated films.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|RUSSL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3770, "title": "Pushkin's Fictions", "code": "RUSSL 3351", "subject": "RUSSL", "descr": "Alexander Pushkin (1799-1837) is considered the greatest of Russian writers and a central figure in Russian culture. In a short life \u2013 he was killed in a duel at 37 \u2013 he wrote in a wide variety of forms. He is best known as a poet, but his fiction \u2013 prose and verse \u2013 marks the beginning of the great tradition of the Russian novel; to understand Tolstoy and Dostoevsky, we need to read Pushkin. Among the fictions we will read are stories, including the Tales of Belkin and \"The Queen of Spades,\" the novella The Captain's Daughter, the novel in verse Eugene Onegin, and Pushkin's history of his African ancestor, The Moor of Peter the Great. We will also read selected short poems.", "tags": "ALC-AS|LA-AS|RUSSL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3771, "title": "Supervised Reading in Russian Literature", "code": "RUSSL 4492", "subject": "RUSSL", "descr": "Independent reading course in topics not covered in regularly scheduled courses. Students select a topic in consultation with the faculty member who has agreed to supervise the course work.", "tags": "RUSSL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3772, "title": "Supervised Reading and Research", "code": "RUSSL 6611", "subject": "RUSSL", "descr": "Independent study.", "tags": "RUSSL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3773, "title": "Elementary Sanskrit II", "code": "SANSK 1132", "subject": "SANSK", "descr": "An introduction to the essentials of Sanskrit grammar. Designed to enable the student to read classical and epic Sanskrit as soon as possible.", "tags": "SANSK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3774, "title": "Intermediate Sanskrit II", "code": "SANSK 2252", "subject": "SANSK", "descr": "Readings from Sanskrit dramas and literary commentary.", "tags": "SANSK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3775, "title": "Advanced Sanskrit II", "code": "SANSK 3302", "subject": "SANSK", "descr": "Selected readings in Sanskrit literary and philosophical texts.", "tags": "SANSK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3776, "title": "A Global History of Love", "code": "SHUM 1930", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "By posing seemingly simple questions such as what is love and who has the right to love, this introductory-level lecture course surveys how love has been experienced and expressed from the pre-modern period to the present. Through case studies of familial and conjugal love in Africa, Asia, the US, Europe, and South and Latin America, the course will examine the debates about and enactment's of what constitutes the appropriate way to show love and affection in different cultures and historical contexts. Among the themes we will explore are questions of sexuality, marriage, kinship, and gender rights. A final unit will examine these themes through modern technologies such as the Internet, scientific advances in medicine, and a growing awareness that who and how we love is anything but simple or universal.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3777, "title": "Controversy and Debate in Islam", "code": "SHUM 2247", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Whether it is politics, society, the law, sexuality, popular culture or minorities' rights, the media are saturated with news on Islam. This course introduces topical issues in Islam as a religious, historical, cultural and political phenomenon. We will discuss this religion's manifold interpretations and investigate its multiple manifestations across the globe, giving special attention to Asia (from Iran to China, Indonesia, Afghanistan, India, Thailand, etc.). Key themes include religious devotion, the arts, Islamic law, gender, statehood, jihad, and sectarianism. No previous knowledge of Islam is required as the course covers the fundamentals of Islam as a religious system as well as a historical phenomenon.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3778, "title": "Literature and Medicine", "code": "SHUM 2350", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "How does literary language depict the experience of physical suffering? Can a poem or a novel palliate pain, illness, even the possibility of death? From darkly comic narratives of black plague to the rise and fall of hysteria to depictions of the AIDS crisis, this course examines literature centered on medical practices from the early modern period through the twentieth century. Why have medical practices changed, and how do writers address their political, social, and ideological implications? Readings will include a broad range of genres, including poetry (Dickinson, Whitman, Keats), fiction (McEwan, Chekhov, Gilman, Kafka, Camus), theater (Kushner), nonfiction prose (Woolf, Freud), and critical theory (Foucault, Scarry, Canguilhem, Sontag).", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3779, "title": "Introduction to African American Literature", "code": "SHUM 2650", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course will introduce students to the African American literary tradition. Through aesthetic and contextual approaches, we will consider how African American life and culture has defined and constituted the United States of America. From slave narratives to Hip-Hop music, we will trace the range of artistic conventions and cultural movements while paying close attention to broader historical shifts in American life over the past three centuries. We will ask: How do authors create and define a tradition? What are some of the recurring themes and motifs within this tradition? Authors will include: David Walker, Frederick Douglass, Ida B. Wells-Barnett, W.E.B. DuBois, Zora Neale Hurston, Lorraine Hansberry, James Baldwin, Toni Morrison, Claudia Rankine, and Chimamanda Adichie.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3780, "title": "Cultures of the Cold War", "code": "SHUM 2675", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This class aims to approach the literature and culture of the Cold War as the birth of the present \"Age of Information,\" as well as the origin of modern notions of privacy that are now being superseded. We will begin with Hiroshima and the several forms of American anti-communism, and proceed from \"containment culture\" to the beginning of the counterculture, and from atomic weapons to the start of the environmental movement. Units of study will include intelligence (espionage), advertising (publicity), civil rights, and the public questioning of gender roles.\u00a0 We will also view a few films and discuss music and painting of the period. Authors include James Baldwin, Sylvia Plath, Marshall McLuhan, John Okada, Jack Kerouac, Frank O'Hara, Patricia Highsmith, and Rachel Carson.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3781, "title": "Music and Digital Gameplay", "code": "SHUM 2701", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course considers both music and digital games in light of their playability. It aims to provide students with critical frameworks for addressing the diverse roles played by music in digital games as well as the ways in which playing digital games can be\u00a0considered a musical activity. Focusing on games across an array of genres from first-person shooters to rhythm-action titles, the course will introduce students to recent scholarship on digital games from multiple disciplinary angles. No formal\u00a0musical training is necessary, but suitably qualified students may take the course as a 3000-level elective by signing up for MUSIC 3901 and completing additional research components involving the creation and/or analysis of specific soundtracks or performances.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3782, "title": "Introduction to Humanities", "code": "SHUM 2750", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "These seminars offers an introduction to the humanities by exploring the historical, cultural, social and political themes. Students will explore themes in critical dialogue with a range of texts and media drawn from the arts, humanities, and/or humanistic social sciences. Guest speakers, including Cornell faculty and Society for the Humanities Fellows, will present from different disciplines and points of view. Students will make field trips to local sites relevant to the theme, and visit Cornell special collections and archives. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in additional programming related to the Society's annual focus theme and the Humanities Scholars Program for undergraduate humanities research.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3783, "title": "Monuments, Museums, and Memory: An Introduction to Public History", "code": "SHUM 2792", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "In this course we will examine how we have come to narrate social, cultural, and political history in the United States, investigating the ways scholarly, curatorial, archival, and creative practices shape conceptions of the American past, in particular understandings of racial, gender, sexual, and class oppression and resistance. Students will build skills in historical interpretation and archival research and explore possibilities and challenges in preserving and presenting the past in a variety of public contexts\u2014monuments, memorials, museums, historical sites, movies and television, and community-based history projects. For their final project, students will conduct original research in a digital or material archive, chosen in consultation with the instructor, to produce a draft of an exhibit, providing popularly accessible historical context and interpretation.", "tags": "HA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3784, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "SHUM 2812", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3785, "title": "Humans and Animals", "code": "SHUM 3230", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Human-animal relationships are often seen in utilitarian, nutritional terms, particularly in archaeology. But animals and meat have significance far beyond their economic value. This course focuses on a broad range of these non-dietary roles of animals in human societies, past and present. This includes the fundamental shift in human-animal relations associated with domestication; the varied meanings of wild and domestic animals; as well as the importance of animals as wealth, as objects of sacrifice, as totems or metaphors for humans, and as symbols in art. Meat can be used in feasting and meat sharing to create, cement, and manipulate social relationships. This course is open to students of archaeology, cultural anthropology, and other disciplines with an interest in human-animal relations.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3786, "title": "Music and Money", "code": "SHUM 3315", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "From the 1720 South Sea Bubble to the 2008 global financial crisis, from Handel's operas to Spotify's algorithms, music has chronicled the booms and busts of markets. This course investigates how music and money are entwined in discourse and practice by tracing an origin story of capitalism that began in eighteenth-century Europe. We will ask how music has captured the spirit of capitalism since its inception, stoking its fantasies and attuning to its effects. In turn, we will contemplate how systems of economic thought reckon with shifting ways of creating and consuming music. In allowing music ranging from broadside ballads to commercial jingles to illuminate mutually the writings of such thinkers as Smith, Marx, Adorno, and Graeber, our discussions will unravel varied musical lives through themes including credit and debt, labor and property, media and interest, trade and slavery, nature and environment.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3787, "title": "Dissent and Protest in U.S. History", "code": "SHUM 3620", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "What is dissent, and what is its relationship to American Democratic principles? This course will examine the various forms of dissent and counter dissent in U.S. history from the Colonial phase to the present. Organized by a thematic structure, each week the course will consider a different group from the earliest to the most contemporary protests of Indigenous People, Abolitionists and anti-slavery tactics, Women's and Environmental movements, etc. Our explorations will consider a variety of primary sources, literature, film, and secondary scholarship. For a longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "HA-AS|SCD-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3788, "title": "Women in New Media Art", "code": "SHUM 3651", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "The work of women artists\u00a0has been central to the development of new media art. These rich and varied practices include installation, virtual reality environments, net art, digital video, networked performance, tactical media, video games, remix and robotics. This course will begin with an overview of feminist art and early experiments in performance and video art to then investigate multiple currents of digital media. Discussions will focus primarily on works by women artists from Europe, the Americas and Australia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3789, "title": "Minorities of the Middle East", "code": "SHUM 3655", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course examines the historic diversity of the modern Middle East, exploring histories of inter-communal contact and conflict. We begin by investigating the legacy of the Ottoman Empire and the impact of its dissolution. We will focus our attention on commercial centers that fostered inter-communal relations, as well as investigating sites of strife and cases of minority repression. We will read histories, memoirs, and fiction, and view films that help us better understand inter-communal relations, tensions, and conflict. We will also interrogate the terms for exploring a range distinctions among majority and minority populations including: religious difference (Muslims, Christians, and Jews); divisions of religious rite (Sunni and Shi'a); entho-linguistic minorities (Armenians and Kurds); national identities (Israelis and Palestinians); cultures of origin (Mizrahi, Sephardi, and Ashkenazi Jews). We will explore how these divisions inform urgent current conflicts: the civil war in Syria and the refugee crisis; the civil war in Iraq and the campaign by ISIS against minorities; as well as tensions between Saudi Arabia and Iran.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3790, "title": "Playing God: Medieval and Early Renaissance Drama", "code": "SHUM 3721", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "After Rome's collapse, drama was gradually re-created from many sources: school-room debates, popular festivals, and, especially, religious liturgy. By the 17th century it was one of the most polished literary arts (and one of the sleaziest). This long span allows us to consider what happened in the middle. This course traces the residues of Roman drama and some \"rebeginnings\" of European drama, 10th to 13th centuries, then focuses mainly on late medieval drama in English in the 15th century, following that into the drama of the early Renaissance. We'll consider what became \"modern\"-and what was utterly unlike anything later. Discussion, lecture, regular writing, some experiments with production. English texts will be read in Middle English with lots of help; no previous knowledge required. This class counts as one of the three pre-1800 courses required of English majors.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3791, "title": "Africans and African Americans in Literature", "code": "SHUM 3742", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "When an African and an African American meet, solidarity is presumed, but often friction is the result. In this course, we will consider how Africans and African Americans see each other through literature. What happens when two peoples suffering from double consciousness meet? We will examine the influence of historical forces including slavery, colonialism and pan-Africanism on the way writers explore the meeting between Africans and African Americans. Specifically we will look at how writers such as W.E.B DuBois, Maya Angelou, NoViolet Bulawayo, Chimamanda Adichie, Richard Wright, Eugene Robinson, Philippe Wamba, Teju Cole, and Malcolm X have understood the meeting.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3792, "title": "Staging Faith: Contemporary Theatre and Lived Religions", "code": "SHUM 3747", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Religious beliefs, practices, and conflicts shape our world and influence global politics.\u00a0 Yet mediatized depictions of religion can be reductive and polarizing.\u00a0 Moreover, these depictions may be different from what people experience in their everyday lives.\u00a0 In the contemporary theatre, we have the opportunity to consider representations of individuals' lived religion, the complex questions of belief, and challenges to faith from within and outside religious communities.\u00a0 Through close readings of plays and related materials engaging with Christian, Jewish, Muslim, Sikh and other faith traditions, we will explore and discuss together the religious motivations, tensions, and dilemmas facing us today.\u00a0 Our texts include, among others, Jesus Christ Superstar, Indecent, Angels in America, and Heroes of the Fourth Turning.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3793, "title": "Humanities Scholars Research Methods", "code": "SHUM 3750", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course explores the practice, theory, and methodology of humanities research, critical analysis, and communication through writing and oral presentation. We will study the work and impact of humanists (scholars of literature, history, theory, art, visual studies, film, anthropology, gender and sexuality studies), who pose big questions about the human condition. By reading and analyzing their scholarship\u2014critiquing them and engaging their ideas\u2014we will craft our own methods and voices. Students will refine their research methods (library research, note taking, organizing material, bibliographies, citation methods, proposals, outlines, etc.) and design their own independent research project. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in the Humanities Scholars Program.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3794, "title": "Free Speech, Censorship, and the Age of Global Media", "code": "SHUM 3778", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course will help us understand how our ideas about free speech are shifting in an age of global information by surveying the history of censorship from the late 16th-century to the present day. In democratic societies, freedom of expression is both a cultural value and protected right, and yet governments also routinely regulate speech through a variety of mechanisms: from direct censorship, to licensing and copyright laws, to high court decisions about what qualifies as \"speech\". We will consider how the categories of dangerous speech\u2014blasphemy, pornography, treason, libel\u2014and thresholds of toleration, have changed over time. And we will also consider forms of censorship that have sought to protect freedoms and ensure civil discourse, such as restrictions on hate speech, genocide denial, and \"fake news\". Authors and subjects may include Milton, Defoe, Freud, Foucault, Joyce, MacKinnon, Butler, Wiki-Leaks, campus speech debates, Anonymous, social media, net neutrality and the economic determinants of free speech.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3795, "title": "Body Politics in African Literature, Cinema, and New Media", "code": "SHUM 3977", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course examines how African writers, filmmakers, and internet media content creators engage with and revise public images of bodies\u2014specifically pleasure, gender, queerness, genital surgeries, sex strike, etc. Our inquiry also surveys African theorists' commitment in highlighting forms of agency on the continent in addition to troubling longstanding and problematic colonialist tropes of pathologization of Africans. These topical explorations will be achieved through analyses of storytelling, digitality, the aestheticization of violence, and social change theories. Through contemporary films, digital platforms, novels, and essays, we will reflect on the precarious, yet empowering, nature of the body in the post-independence African experience. Public speaking (class discussions, student presentation) and deep attention to writing (reaction papers, an abstract, and annotated bibliography, and a final paper) will help you to refine your understanding of body politics.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3796, "title": "Latinx Popular Culture Matters", "code": "SHUM 3980", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course examines several areas of Latinx popular culture that influence U.S. politics and society, artistic productions, and aesthetic sensibilities, as well as popular and civic cultures. Mapping a historical trajectory of Chicanidad and Latinidad in art, music, film, and popular media in the twentieth century, the course also engages contemporary art practices that are rooted in 1960s and 1970s civil rights and community art movements. Topics include Latinx people in film and TV, muralism and street art, music, spoken word as well as close examinations of representations of Latinx people in American mainstream culture.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3797, "title": "Media Theory and Japan", "code": "SHUM 4406", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "In this seminar we will be exploring media theory in relation to Japan: how media has been thought about, written about, and created within Japan, and how media theorists from across the world have used \"Japan\" and its cultural products as a key element in their thinking. We will investigate media in Japan in relation to language, nation, gender, technology, disability, the environment, and more, and will both examine and produce creative works (film, poetry, visual art, sound, programming) as a form of critical practice. No Japanese language knowledge required, as all the core readings will be in English; some Japanese-language supplemental readings will be available for graduate students with sufficient language ability.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3798, "title": "Constructing Antiquity: The World the Slaves Made", "code": "SHUM 4655", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Scholars of slavery have typically considered five historical contexts to be \"slave societies\". Two of those are the principal societies of what is called \"classical antiquity\": democratic Athens (c. 500-300 BCE) and imperial Rome (c. 200 BCE-500 CE). In a slave society, slavery permeates every aspect of life, economy, and culture. This course examines the contrast between the representation of enslaved people in different genres and media and the reality of how enslaved people were exploited to construct the society that underpinned this cultural imagination. Topics will include: physical and skilled labor, literary and artistic production, sex work, actors, and gladiators. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3799, "title": "Religion, Emotion, and Imagination", "code": "SHUM 4656", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "We tend to think of emotions as private, unlearned, and biological. Though in much of antiquity, the emotions were primarily seen as public, performative, and cognitive. The cultivation and control of emotions were key concerns in ancient education, moral formation, gender roles, and ritual life in Mediterranean antiquity. This seminar focuses on Greco-Roman and Christian efforts to describe, direct, mix, and control the emotions in late antique moral philosophy and religious instruction. Following an introduction to ancient Greek, Roman, and Jewish writings on the emotions, we shall turn our attention to ancient Christian efforts to foster, adapt, and redescribe emotions. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3800, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "SHUM 4657", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "KCM-AS|SCD-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3801, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "SHUM 4658", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3802, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "SHUM 4659", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3803, "title": "Medieval Technologies of the Self", "code": "SHUM 4660", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Recent years have seen a boom in ways to use technology in order to learn about and improve the self. This course examines contemporary cultural orientations toward technology by exploring how medieval thinkers turned to language, images, books, and other tools and means of making in order to develop a sense of themselves in ethical relationship to others and to the world around them. We will place medieval work (such as Chaucer and Kempe) in conversation with resonant modern and contemporary writing (including Haraway, hooks, and Foucault). Advertisements and marketing for apps like \"Co-Star\", and \"Calm\" will supplement our discussions. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3804, "title": "Nightlife", "code": "SHUM 4701", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course explores nightlife as a temporality that fosters countercultural performances of the self and that serves as a site for the emergence of alternative kinship networks.\u00a0 Focusing on queer communities of color, course participants will be asked to interrogate the ways in which nightlife demonstrates the queer world-making potential that exists beyond the normative 9-5 capitalist model of production. Performances of the everyday,\u00a0alongside films, texts, and performance art, will be analyzed through a performance studies methodological lens.\u00a0 Through close readings and sustained cultural analysis, students will acquire a critical understanding of the potentiality of spaces, places, and geographies codified as \"after hours\" in the development of subcultures, alternative sexualities, and emerging performance practices.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3805, "title": "Rural Humanities Seminar", "code": "SHUM 4800", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This seminar will introduce students to the public humanities as both a disciplinary inquiry and a set of practices grounded in public and community engagement. It is intended to train cohorts of graduate students and advanced undergraduates in the various theories, methods, and practices of public humanities, to think collectively with and beyond disciplinary interests, and to bring these discipline-defined research agendas to much wider communities by first focusing on local rural communities. Students will produce a collaborative project related to or working with a community partner.", "tags": "CA-AS|SCD-AS|SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3806, "title": "Modern Chinese Art", "code": "SHUM 4916", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "China, a cultural giant of East Asia, made a passive entrance into modernity. With the advent of Western and American colonialism and imperialism, coupled with recent successes in westernization by the Japanese, Chinese artists had to redefine their roles as well as their visions. This turmoil bore witness to a vibrant beginning in modern Chinese art. Interactions between the Chinese themselves, and Chinese interactions with foreigners in the major cities of Shanghai and Beijing, fostered new directions in Chinese art and helped shape western visions of Chinese art history. Issues covered include: Chinese debates on western influence--their theoretical foundations and rationales; New visions for the future of Chinese art in the late 19th and early 20th centuries; Pluralistic approaches and arguments on \"Chinese identity\" in the modern era; Collecting art and the vision of history; The identity of traditional literati painters in the modern era-their roles, artworks, and deeds; Foreigners in China-the formation of major European collections of Chinese art, and the formation of \"Chinese art history\" in the West.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3807, "title": "Constructing Antiquity: The World the Slaves Made", "code": "SHUM 6655", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Scholars of slavery have typically considered five historical contexts to be \"slave societies\". Two of those are the principal societies of what is called \"classical antiquity\": democratic Athens (c. 500-300 BCE) and imperial Rome (c. 200 BCE-500 CE). In a slave society, slavery permeates every aspect of life, economy, and culture. This course examines the contrast between the representation of enslaved people in different genres and media and the reality of how enslaved people were exploited to construct the society that underpinned this cultural imagination. Topics will include: physical and skilled labor, literary and artistic production, sex work, actors, and gladiators. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanites website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3808, "title": "Religion, Emotion, and Imagination", "code": "SHUM 6656", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "We tend to think of emotions as private, unlearned, and biological. Though in much of antiquity, the emotions were primarily seen as public, performative, and cognitive. The cultivation and control of emotions were key concerns in ancient education, moral formation, gender roles, and ritual life in Mediterranean antiquity. This seminar focuses on Greco-Roman and Christian efforts to describe, direct, mix, and control the emotions in late antique moral philosophy and religious instruction. Following an introduction to ancient Greek, Roman, and Jewish writings on the emotions, we shall turn our attention to ancient Christian efforts to foster, adapt, and redescribe emotions. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3809, "title": "Making Equality", "code": "SHUM 6657", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This seminar inquires into the interrelations among three meanings of equality that initially appeared in the ancient world: equality of voice or participation, isegoria; equality before the law, isonomia; and equality of power, isokratia. Through legal, political theoretical, historical, philosophical, and poetic texts, we will explore how these different practices of equality circulate and interact in institutional settings marked by injustice, scarce resources, and asymmetries of wealth and power. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3810, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "SHUM 6658", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit\u00a0The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3811, "title": "The Fabrication of Biblical Israel", "code": "SHUM 6659", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This course examines the raw materials and discursive processes by which Biblical scribes fabricated a history of ancient Israel that featured static and defensible geographic and genealogical boundaries. We will bring the tools of biblical criticism (philological, archaeological, literary historical) to bear on biblical narrative traditions that in different ways were essential in the process of inventing biblical Israel. We will focus on the modes and materials of textual production and on how modern historians engage biblical narrative in fabricating their own narrative histories of ancient Israel. We will also consider how ancient and modern historical writing on ancient Israel has been put into the service of contemporary political discourse on boundaries and borders in Israel-Palestine. For longer description and instructor bio visit the\u00a0Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3812, "title": "Medieval Technologies of the Self", "code": "SHUM 6660", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Recent years have seen a boom in ways to use technology in order to learn about and improve the self. This course examines contemporary cultural orientations toward technology by exploring how medieval thinkers turned to language, images, books, and other tools and means of making in order to develop a sense of themselves in ethical relationship to others and to the world around them. We will place medieval work (such as Chaucer and Kempe) in conversation with resonant modern and contemporary writing (including Haraway, hooks, and Foucault). Advertisements and marketing for apps like \"Co-Star\", and \"Calm\" will supplement our discussions. For longer description and instructor bio visit the\u00a0Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3813, "title": "Rural Humanities Seminar", "code": "SHUM 6800", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "This seminar will introduce students to the public humanities as both a disciplinary inquiry and a set of practices grounded in public and community engagement. It is intended to train cohorts of graduate students and advanced undergraduates in the various theories, methods, and practices of public humanities, to think collectively with and beyond disciplinary interests, and to bring these discipline-defined research agendas to much wider communities by first focusing on local rural communities. Students will produce a collaborative project related to or working with a community partner.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3814, "title": "Urban Representation", "code": "SHUM 6819", "subject": "SHUM", "descr": "Urban Representation Labs are intended to bring students and faculty into direct contact with complex urban representations spanning a wide media spectrum and evoking a broad set of humanist discourses. Students will leverage archival materials at Cornell to launch new observations and explore unanticipated approaches to urban culture that derive from previously understudied archival materials. The goal is twofold: to demystify the representational technologies involved in presenting the city, and to unpack the political, cultural, and aesthetic values and priorities embedded in every form of presentation. Urban Representation Labs are offered under the auspices of Cornell University's Andrew W. Mellon Foundation Collaborative Studies in Architecture, Urbanism, and the Humanities grant. For current special topic seminar description and application instructions, visit our urban seminars page.", "tags": "SHUM", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3815, "title": "Elementary Sinhala II", "code": "SINHA 1122", "subject": "SINHA", "descr": "Semi-intensive introduction to colloquial Sinhala, intended for beginners. A thorough grounding is given in all the language skills; listening, speaking, reading, and writing.", "tags": "SINHA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3816, "title": "Intermediate Sinhala II", "code": "SINHA 2202", "subject": "SINHA", "descr": "This course further develops student competence in colloquial Sinhala, attending to all the language skills: listening, speaking, reading and writing. In addition, this course prepares students for the transition to literary Sinhala.", "tags": "SINHA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3817, "title": "Literary Sinhala II", "code": "SINHA 4400", "subject": "SINHA", "descr": "This one-semester course further develops students' comprehension of written Literary Sinhala, using sample materials from a variety of genres prepared by the instructor, as well as excerpts from texts relevant to graduate student research (when appropriate).", "tags": "SINHA", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3818, "title": "Topics in Sanskrit Literature II", "code": "SNLIT 6602", "subject": "SNLIT", "descr": "Advanced readings in Sanskrit poetic, philosophical, and grammatical literature.", "tags": "SNLIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3819, "title": "Introduction to Sociology", "code": "SOC 1101", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course is a broad introduction to the field of sociology.\u00a0 Course materials are designed to illustrate the distinctive features of the sociological perspective and to start you thinking sociologically about yourself and the broader social world.\u00a0 To think sociologically is to recognize that being embedded in the world constrains behavior, and that individuals are both social actors and social products.\u00a0 To think sociologically is also to recognize that our contemporary world, with its enduring cultural, political, and economic institutions, is as much a social product as we are.\u00a0 We will begin by covering theoretical and methodological foundations of the sociological perspective.\u00a0 We will go on to explore the concept of social stratification and will survey primary axes of social difference.\u00a0 In the second half of the course we will look more closely at how individuals relate to each other, how social inequality is enacted and reinforced in everyday life, and at the way in which the organization of social life shapes individuals and groups, such as through social networks, residential neighborhoods, schooling, families, and on-line communication.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3820, "title": "FWS: Writing Computers and Society", "code": "SOC 1110", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3821, "title": "American Society through Film", "code": "SOC 1290", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Introduces students to the sociological analysis of American society through the lens of film. Major themes involve race, class, and gender; upward and downward mobility; incorporation and exclusion; small town vs the big city; and cultural conflicts over individualism, achievement, and community. We match a range of movies like American Graffiti (Lucas), Ace in the Hole (Wilder), The Asphalt Jungle (Houston), Do the Right Thing (Lee), The Heiress (Wyler), High Noon (Zinnemann), Mean Streets (Scorsese), Nashville (Altman), The Philadelphia Story (Cukor), and A Streetcar Named Desire (Kazan). Each film is paired with social scientific research that examines parallel topics, such as analyses of who goes to college, the production of news, deviant careers, urban riots, the gendered presentation of self, and the prisoner's dilemma.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3822, "title": "Population and Public Policy", "code": "SOC 2030", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Population and Public Policy exposes students to the logic and skills of demographic research and policy analysis. The course emphasizes the nature, collection, and interpretation of demographic data, the application of demographic techniques, the major components (i.e., fertility, mortality, and migration) of national and global population change, and contemporary population problems (e.g., population aging, teen childbearing, the rise in non-marital childbearing, immigrant adaptation). The course also emphasizes public policies that can influence demographic change. The format primarily involves lectures and class discussion. Students are expected to attend each class and be prepared to discuss assigned materials.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3823, "title": "Introduction to Economic Sociology", "code": "SOC 2190", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Economic sociology extends the sociological approach to the study of the economy.\u00a0The goal is to understand the relationship between social structure and economic action. We explore how people find jobs, rely on networks to share knowledge and information, acquire and utilize cultural, social and political capital, why individual actors cooperate with strangers; and the question of rational action in economic life. At the macro-level, the course addresses the question of why and how institutions enable, motivate and guide economic action; the social dynamics of institutional change; and explore the role of norms and networks in the capitalism of the United States and China.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3824, "title": "Population Dynamics", "code": "SOC 2202", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Introduction to population studies. The primary focus is on the relationships between demographic processes (fertility, mortality, and immigration) and social and economic issues. Discussion covers special topics related to population growth and spatial distribution, including marriage and family formation, population aging, changing roles and statuses of women, labor force participation, immigrations, urban growth and urbanization, resource allocation, and the environment.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3825, "title": "Social Inequality", "code": "SOC 2208", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course reviews contemporary approaches to understanding social inequality and the processes by which it comes to be seen as legitimate, natural, or desirable. We address questions of the following kind: what are the major forms of stratification in human history? Are inequality and poverty inevitable? How many social classes are there in advanced industrialism societies? Is there a \"ruling class\"? Are lifestyles, attitudes, and personalities shaped fundamentally by class membership? Can individuals born into poverty readily escape their class origins and move upward in the class structure? Are social contacts and \"luck\" important forces in matching individuals to jobs and class positions? What types of social processes serve to maintain and alter racial, ethnic, and gender discrimination in labor markets? Is there an \"underclass\"? These and other questions are addressed in light of classical and contemporary theory and research.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3826, "title": "Six Pretty Good Books: Explorations in Social Science", "code": "SOC 2580", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course is modeled after \"Great Books\" literature courses in the humanities, but with two important differences: we read non-fiction books in the social sciences rather than the humanities, written by highly prominent contemporary social scientists. The course title refers to the fact that the books are new, hence their potential greatness has yet to be confirmed by the test of time. We choose living authors to give students a unique opportunity: to interact with each of the six authors in Q&A sessions in person or via video conferencing. This fall some of the authors will appear in person for Q&A and the others will Skype with the class.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3827, "title": "Latinos in the United States", "code": "SOC 2650", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Exploration and analysis of the Hispanic experience in the United States. Examines the sociohistorical background and economic, psychological, and political factors that converge to shape a Latino group identity in the United States. Perspectives are suggested and developed for understanding Hispanic migrations, the plight of Latinos in urban and rural areas, and the unique problems faced by the diverse Latino groups. Groups studied include Mexican Americans, Dominicans, Cubans, and Puerto Ricans.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3828, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "SOC 2710", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course is a blending of the Sociology of Education and Public Policy. Front and center in this course is the question of why consistent differential educational and economic outcomes exists in American society. We explore the broad sociological functions of schooling (socialization, sorting, caretaking, training) as well as local, state, and federal policies and court decisions.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3829, "title": "Migration: Histories, Controversies, and Perspectives", "code": "SOC 2810", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This introductory course introduces students to issues and debates related to international migration and will provide an interdisciplinary foundation to understanding the factors that shape migration flows and migrant experiences. \u00a0We will start by reviewing theories of the state and historical examples of immigrant racialization and exclusion in the United States and beyond. \u00a0We will critically examine the notions of borders, citizenship/non-citizenship, and the creation of diasporas. \u00a0Students will also hear a range of perspectives by exposing them to Cornell guest faculty who do research and teach on migration across different disciplines and methodologies and in different world areas. Examples include demographic researchers concerned with immigrant inequality and family formation, geographic perspectives on the changing landscapes of immigrant metropolises, legal scholarship on the rights of immigrant workers, and the study of immigrant culture from a feminist studies lens. \u00a0Offered each fall semester.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3830, "title": "High Tech Regions in Comparative Perspectives", "code": "SOC 3060", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3831, "title": "Research Design, Practice, and Policy", "code": "SOC 3150", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Examines systematic approaches for addressing questions about poverty, family life, racial inequality, and a range of other issues central to public policy. It emphasizes the logic and methods of social science research, including the measurement of social phenomena, generalizing results to groups of interest, establishing cause and effect, social experiments, survey research, and qualitative methods. It develops skills to critically evaluate the research of others and provides hands-on experience applying research methods to policy-related problems.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3832, "title": "Environmental Sociology", "code": "SOC 3240", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Humans have fraught relationships with the animals, plants, land, water\u2014even geological processes\u2014around us. We come together to revere, conserve, protect the things many call nature. We struggle over who gets to use what, which resources to use or to keep intact, which scientific claims are true and worthy of action. Every environmental concern is on some level a social concern, and more social concerns than we often realize are environmental concerns. In this course, we will examine how people make and respond to environmental change and how groups of people form, express, fight over, and work out environmental concerns. We will consider how population change, economic activity, government action, social movements, and changing ways of thinking shape human-environmental relationships. The fundamental goal of this course is to give you knowledge, analytical tools, and expressive skills that make you confident to address environmental concerns as a social scientist and a citizen.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3833, "title": "Schooling, Racial Inequality, and Public Policy in America", "code": "SOC 3570", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "After examining alternative explanations for why individuals obtain different amounts and types of educational training, the course focuses on how an individual's family background and race affect his or her trajectory through the educational system. The course covers the specific challenges that have confronted urban schooling in America since the 1960s, including the classic literature on the effects of school and community resources on student achievement as well as the development and later evaluation of school desegregation policies. The course also considers case studies of current policy debates in the US, such as housing segregation and school resegregation, voucher programs for school choice, the motivation for the consequences of the establishment of state-mandated testing requirements, and the prospects of charter schooling.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3834, "title": "Big Data on the Social World", "code": "SOC 3580", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course showcases frontier research that uses big data and graphical analysis to understand our social world. Topics include inequality and opportunity, success in higher education, the gender wage gap, taxing the rich, Chinese censorship, the spread of false news, online dating, and other issues relevant to contemporary society. Although this is not a statistical methods course, prior training in data science (e.g., CS 1380/ORIE 1380/STSCI 1380) or quantitative methods for the social sciences is highly recommended.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SDS-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3835, "title": "Comparative Corruption", "code": "SOC 3680", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Corruption, and the perception of corruption, pervades many aspects of society and has become a source of political protest around the world. This course focuses on the similarities and differences between forms, causes, and effects of corruption in various environments. The course starts with a discussion of the definitions, causes, and effects of corruption across countries, and then turns to particular forms and contexts where corruption is observed: for example, developed and developing countries, conflict-ridden societies, and international investment. We will also discuss some of the potential solutions to corruption and their costs and benefits for political and civil society.", "tags": "SBA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3836, "title": "Comparative Social Inequalities", "code": "SOC 3710", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course offers a sociological understanding of social inequality and the social construction of difference. Designed from the perspective of comparative historical analysis, we will examine the ways in which class, gender, race/ethnicity, religion, and sexuality differences work across place and time within a shared set of global dynamics. The course will pay special attention to how difference is constructed, institutionalized, and experienced. Thus, the course will not only address inequality based on economic and labor relations, but also emphasize complicated notions of difference and identity to offer an analysis that links inequality to power and forms of rule.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3837, "title": "Classical Sociological Theory", "code": "SOC 3750", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Introduction to the classics in sociology, primarily works by Karl Marx, Max Weber, Emile Durkheim, and Georg Simmel. Students also study the works of Alexis de Tocqueville, Montesquieu, and Joseph Schumpeter. Special emphasis is put on the concepts, ideas, and modes of explanation that characterize the classics. Students also look at these writers' empirical material, and what may be termed the social construction of the classics. Course requirements include active class participation and three tests in class.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3838, "title": "Diasporic and Indigenous Health", "code": "SOC 4010", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Rates of chronic disease and other health conditions, including mental illness and substance use disorders, have surged over the past three decades, owing largely to structural factors associated with the fragmentation of national healthcare systems, diminished social support networks, and government subsidization of unhealthy foods and hazardous pharmaceuticals. These issues are especially amplified in ethnoracial communities: for example, Blacks and Latinos typically have higher rates of disease in comparison to their non-Black counterparts, even after adjusting for factors such as income and education level. This course investigates the complex political, economic and cultural forces which contribute to health inequities. Students will be exposed to case studies throughout various diasporas\u2014from Harlem to Cape Town\u2014to understand the intricate ways in which race and health interact.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3839, "title": "Health and Social Context", "code": "SOC 4120", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course examines how the social world gets \"under the skin.\" We'll examine the associations between various aspects of social context \u2013 including stratification and inequality, social networks and support, and social environments \u2013 and physical health. There are two main components of this course. First, we'll read and discuss previous research on the health effects of social status, patient-physician interactions, employment/work, stress, social networks, social support, loneliness, culture and religion, and the neighborhood context. We'll consider both qualitative and quantitative research on social life and health, with an eye toward identifying the strengths and weaknesses of various methodological approaches and gaps in current knowledge. The second component of this course is focused on the development of your own research regarding the relationship between social context and health. You'll explore this using data from a population-based social survey. Class instruction for this portion of the course will cover research question development, the statistical analysis of survey data, and social scientific writing. Three research reports written during the semester will provide you with a foundation from which you will write and present a final paper that considers how health is shaped by the social world.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SDS-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3840, "title": "The Ethnography of Poverty and Inequality", "code": "SOC 4160", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course explores poverty and inequality in American society through the lens of ethnographic and other field-based research. We will read classic and contemporary texts which have shaped our understanding of how social inequality and exclusion constrain people's daily lives and how groups develop innovative responses to these constraints.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3841, "title": "Seminar in Economy and Society", "code": "SOC 4330", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Economic sociology extends the sociological perspective to the study economic life. The seminar examines the view that social networks, norms, beliefs and rules motivate and enable economic action in market and nonmarket settings. It integrates the study of ideas and theory in economic sociology with a practicum providing training in the craft of research. Designed for advanced undergraduates interesting in research and graduate students who seek training in economic sociology, the seminar offers a year-long workshop environment enabling and guiding independent and collaborative research.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3842, "title": "The Science of Social Behavior", "code": "SOC 4580", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This is a capstone seminar for seniors who are interested in graduate or professional study in scientific disciplines that focus on human behavior and social interaction. The intent is to provide seniors with an opportunity to summon, integrate, and apply insights that they have acquired over the course of their undergraduate education, and give prospective graduate students the opportunity to lead discussions in\u00a0a large introductory lecture course, \"Six Pretty Good Books\". Each seminar member is part of a two or three-person team that leads the discussion together, under the supervision of a graduate teaching assistant. Seminar meetings are devoted to building lesson plans for leading an effective discussion of each of the six books. The authors vary from year to year but include Malcolm Gladwell, Michelle\u00a0Alexander, Nate Silver, and Nicholas Christakis. All authors have agreed to participate in a \"Q&A\" session with the students which seminar members are required to attend.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3843, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "SOC 4910", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This is for undergraduates who wish to obtain research experience or to do extensive reading on a special topic.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3844, "title": "Honors Research", "code": "SOC 4950", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Students choose a sociology faculty member to work with on research to write an honors thesis. Candidates for honors must maintain a cumulative GPA at least an A- in all sociology classes.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3845, "title": "Honors Thesis: Senior Year", "code": "SOC 4960", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Continuation of SOC 4950.\u00a0 Continue to work with honors supervisor and work on and write an honors thesis.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3846, "title": "Basic Problems in Sociology II", "code": "SOC 5020", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Continuation of SOC 5010. Emphasis is on the logical analysis of theoretical perspectives, theories, and theoretical research programs shaping current sociological research. The course includes an introduction to basic concepts used in the logical analysis of theories and examines their application to specific theories and theoretical research programs. Theoretical perspectives include functionalism, social exchange, and interactionism.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3847, "title": "Organizational Research", "code": "SOC 5400", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This seminar focuses on contemporary sociological research on organizations. It centers theoretically on the interplay of institutional, ecological, and choice-theoretic accounts of organizational structure and action. Subjects include organizational founding and mortality, change in organizational practices over time, the relationship between organizations and their legal, social, and cultural environment, and stratification and mobility within organizations.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3848, "title": "America's Promise: Social and Political Context of American Education", "code": "SOC 5710", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Examines the goals, roles, inputs, and outcomes of schooling in American society, and the policy environment in which schools operate. Analyzes controversies and tensions (e.g., equity, market forces, state control) surrounding public education at local, state, and federal levels. Includes current and historical, urban, and rural issues and problems.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3849, "title": "Doing Research With Marginalized Populations", "code": "SOC 6000", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course covers the basic epistemology for social sciences research, integrating an explicit focus on\u00a0applied\u00a0mixed methods approaches (quantitative and qualitative) for conducting original \"real world\" research on humans. While these cognates will be approached theoretically, the course's primary concentration will be on the praxis of quantifying and contextualizing the experiences, attitudes, and social/health outcomes of historically marginalized and \"hidden\" populations, including people who are Black, Latino and indigenous, LGBTQ+, and individuals with a disability, mental illness or substance use disorder, with an intersectional lens. While not offering an exhaustive review of individual quantitative or qualitative methodologies, students will learn the fundamentals of curating a substantive research framework on marginalized and hidden populations, ethically engaging and recruiting people into their studies, collecting and analyzing data, and meaningfully disseminating research findings.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3850, "title": "Intermediate Statistics for Sociological Research", "code": "SOC 6020", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course provides the second part of a two-semester introduction to quantitative methods in sociological research. It is designed for first-year graduate students in sociology. The course covers intermediate topics in linear regression, and provides an introduction to models for categorical and count data, the analysis of time data, and longitudinal data. We'll also discuss data-related issues such as missing data and weighting, and data that are complicated by issues of non-random design. While statistical modeling is the focus of the course, we proceed with the assumption that models are only as good as the theoretical and substantive knowledge behind them. Thus, in covering the technical material, we will spend considerable time discussing the link between substantive knowledge and statistical practice.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3851, "title": "Graduate Research Practicum", "code": "SOC 6030", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course is designed to assist the student's professional development on a \"learning by doing and feedback\" basis. The course is organized around presentation and discussion of ongoing research projects. The course is suitable for second and third year students who are writing or expanding their qualifying papers and for advanced graduate students who have dissertation results to share, as well as a venue for independent research pursued by individual or collaborating students. Weekly meetings are typically organized around a student paper draft distributed to the group. As a general rule the course welcomes auditors and all members of the sociology community interested in the variety of research being pursued at Cornell, though participation is with the permission of the instructor(s). In most semesters, two faculty members will jointly lead the course.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3852, "title": "Proseminar in Sociology", "code": "SOC 6080", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Discussion of the current state of sociology and of the research interests of members of the graduate field; taught by all members of the field.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3853, "title": "Social Networks Theory and Applications", "code": "SOC 6110", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Social Network Analysis (SNA), or the mathematical analysis of webs of relationships, is a thriving part of sociology and an active research area for numerous other disciplines. This course is intended to introduce students to the basics of SNA and help them apply it to a variety of research questions. We will discuss the theoretical underpinnings of the area, basic concepts used in SNA analyses, and finally methods for describing and interpreting network data. At the completion of this course students should have a basic understanding of social networks and be able to carry out a variety analyses on their own.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3854, "title": "Gender, Sexuality and Religion", "code": "SOC 6250", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3855, "title": "Cultural Sociology", "code": "SOC 6300", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3856, "title": "Neighborhoods, Schools and Education", "code": "SOC 6450", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "This course will examine the literature on social context effects on educational outcomes in the United States. Specifically, students will learn how residential neighborhoods, schools, and peer networks independently affect educational outcomes as well as explore the connections between these spheres of influence. The class will provide an overview of the most robust findings on educational outcomes such as ability scores, school dropout, and college application and enrollment. Students will also apply the major lessons from the literature to their own empirical\u00a0 assessment of an educational outcome of their choice.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3857, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "SOC 6910", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "For graduates who wish to obtain research experience or to do extensive reading on a special topic. Permission to enroll for independent study is granted only to students who present an acceptable prospectus and secure the agreement of a faculty member to serve as supervisor for the project throughout the semester.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3858, "title": "Graduate Research", "code": "SOC 8920", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Work with a faculty member on a project that is related to your dissertation work.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3859, "title": "Thesis Research", "code": "SOC 8960", "subject": "SOC", "descr": "Work with chair of your committee on your dissertation work.", "tags": "SOC", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3860, "title": "Elementary Spanish II", "code": "SPAN 1220", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "While building language proficiency and accuracy through communicative activities, the course encourages students to actively interact with one another. The instructor facilitates communication and provides feedback and language learning strategies that guide students to take responsibility of their own learning and become active participants in the process. The course also introduces students to the many peoples and cultures of the Spanish-speaking world, prompting them to make comparisons with their own culture. Additionally, lectures provide students with opportunities to reflect on relevant grammar topics and assist students in developing language learning strategies. Class discussions are conducted entirely in Spanish. After 1220, students may take SPAN 1230,\u00a0SPAN 2070, or\u00a0SPAN 2090\u00a0depending on their LPS score.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3861, "title": "Continuing Spanish", "code": "SPAN 1230", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "The goal of this low-intermediate course is to achieve a higher level of comprehension as well as to advance oral and written expression in a cultural context. Classes are in Spanish and the language is actively used in communicative and creative activities. Students engage in linguistic and literary analysis of texts to acquire new vocabulary, complete analytical exercises, and develop reading strategies. Students continue developing writing skills through composition, and review grammatical structures independently with some clarification by the instructor as needed. After this course, students may take SPAN 2000, SPAN 2070, or SPAN 2090.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3862, "title": "FWS:Narrating the Spanish Civil War", "code": "SPAN 1305", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3863, "title": "Strategies for Spanish Abroad", "code": "SPAN 1501", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This innovative course focuses on oral communication in Spanish for students who will do special projects abroad or short term study abroad trips.\u00a0 Emphasis is placed on developing speaking and listening skills and strategies in a culturally relevant context.\u00a0 It is intended for students with limited or no knowledge of Spanish and active class participation is required.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3864, "title": "Intermediate Spanish for the Medical and Health Professions", "code": "SPAN 2070", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Provides a conversational grammar review, with dialogues, debates, compositions, and authentic readings on health-related themes. Special attention is given to relevant cultural differences and how cultural notions may affect medical care and communication between doctor and patient. The objective of 2070 is to provide practice in real-life application, such as taking a medical history, calming a patient, and how to speak to a Hispanic patient in a culturally acceptable manner. After this course, a student may take or\u00a0SPAN 2095.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3865, "title": "Intermediate Spanish I (Composition and Conversation)", "code": "SPAN 2090", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This intermediate course develops accurate and idiomatic oral and written expression in a cultural context. Students achieve a higher level of syntactical and lexical competence through reading and discussing literary texts and viewing films. Particular emphasis is on writing and editing academic essays with peer/instructor feedback. Classes are in Spanish and the language is actively used in oral presentations and communicative, creative, and critical-thinking activities. Students review grammar structures on their own, with clarification and support of the instructor. After this course, students may take SPAN 2095.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3866, "title": "Spanish Intermediate Composition and Conversation II", "code": "SPAN 2095", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This advanced-intermediate course is designed to prepare students for study abroad and is required for any Cornell CASA program in a Spanish speaking country.\u00a0 It also serves as an entryway into the major, and advanced-level courses. Students study stylistics, analyze and discuss texts, view films, and acquire advanced reading strategies. Continued emphasis is on writing and editing academic essays with peer and instructor feedback. Classes are in Spanish, and the language is actively used in oral presentations and communicative, creative, and critical-thinking activities. Students review grammar structures on their own, although the instructor may clarify as needed. Check with the instructor if you intend to take this course concurrently with SPAN 2140, SPAN 2150, or SPAN 2170.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3867, "title": "Advanced Spoken Spanish", "code": "SPAN 2130", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This advanced course will focus on spoken Spanish in its formal and informal registers, regional dialects, and pronunciations.\u00a0 Authentic texts from across different genres of film, newspapers, fiction, songs, and essays will be used to develop all skills with emphasis on oral production, as well as intercultural and pragmatic competence.\u00a0 Students will further their fluency and accuracy by engaging in activities that might include debates, oral presentations, and interviews.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3868, "title": "Modern Spanish Survey", "code": "SPAN 2140", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Introductory survey of modern Spanish literature. Students develop their analytical skills and learn basic literary concepts such as genre (drama, lyric, short story, and novel) and style (romanticism, realism, etc.) as well as male/female perspectives and the translation of literature to film language. The survey introduces students to Spain's cultural complexity through readings of works by authors representative of its diverse linguistic and literary traditions.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|GLC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3869, "title": "Contemporary Latin American Survey", "code": "SPAN 2150", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Readings and discussion of representative texts of the 19th and 20th centuries from various regions of Latin America. Among the authors considered are Sarmiento, Hern\u00e1ndez, Mart\u00ed, Dar\u00edo, Agustini, Cort\u00e1zar, Garc\u00eda M\u00e1rquez, Poniatowska, and Valenzuela.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3870, "title": "Early Modern Iberian Survey", "code": "SPAN 2170", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course explores major texts and themes of the Hispanic tradition from the 11th to the 17th centuries. We will examine general questions on literary analysis and the relationship between literature and history around certain events, such as medieval multicultural Iberia, the creation of the Spanish Inquisition in the 15th century and the expulsion of the Jews in 1492; the encounter between the Old and the New Worlds; the 'opposition' of high and low in popular culture, and of the secular and the sacred in poetry and prose. Readings may be drawn from medieval short stories and miracle collections; chivalric romances, Columbus, Lazarillo de Tormes, Cervantes, Lope de Vega, Calder\u00f3n, and Sor Juana In\u00e9s de la Cruz, among others.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3871, "title": "Advanced Spanish Writing Workshop", "code": "SPAN 2180", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course, which is required for the major, is designed to help the learner develop increased accuracy and sophistication in writing in Spanish for academic purposes and continued oral practice in Spanish. To this end, there will be ample writing and revising practice, with a focus on specific grammatical and lexical areas, customized to the needs of the students enrolled in the course.\u00a0 All writing will be based on a particular theme relating to Latin America with a focus on film, literary texts, newspaper readings and conducting an interview.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3872, "title": "Perspectives on Latin America", "code": "SPAN 2200", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Interdisciplinary course offered every spring. Topics vary by semester, but readings always focus on current research in various disciplines and regions of Latin America. The range of issues addressed include the economic, social, cultural, and political trends and transitions in the area. In the weekly meetings, instructors and guest lecturers facilitate student discussions. Students taking the course are required to participate in all class discussions and write a research paper in their chosen focus area.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3873, "title": "Perspectives on Latin America in Spanish", "code": "SPAN 2205", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Interdisciplinary course offered every spring.\u00a0 Topics vary by semester, but readings always focus on current research in various disciplines and regions of Latin America. The range of issues addressed include the economic, social, cultural, and political trends and transitions in the area.\u00a0 In the weekly meetings, instructors and guest lecturers facilitate student discussions.\u00a0 Students taking the course are required to participate in all class discussions and write a research paper in their chosen focus area.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3874, "title": "Contemporary Narratives by Latina Writers", "code": "SPAN 2460", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course will provide an introduction to some of the most important fictional work by US Latina writers, including short stories, novel, and film, with a particular focus on social justice, gender advocacy work, and work by Afro Latinx writers.\u00a0 We will begin with discussion of canonical figures like Gloria Anzald\u00faa and Cherr\u00ede Moraga, to provide a basis for our focus on more recent writers like Angie Cruz, Elizabeth Acevedo, Linda Yvette Ch\u00e1vez, and Carmen Maria Machado.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3875, "title": "Spanish Foreign Language Across the Curriculum (FLAC)", "code": "SPAN 3020", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This 1-credit optional course aims to expand the students' vocabulary, and advance their speaking and reading skills as well as enhance their knowledge and deepen their cultural understanding by supplementing non-language courses throughout the University.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3876, "title": "Creative Writing Workshop (in Spanish)", "code": "SPAN 3170", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Focuses on the practice of narrative writing in Spanish. Explores what makes a novel and a short story work, paying close attention to narrative structure, plot, beginnings/endings, character development, theme, etc. Students read classic novels and short stories as points of departure for the discussion. Because the course is a workshop, students are expected to write their own fiction.", "tags": "ALC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3877, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "SPAN 3335", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3878, "title": "Race and Immigration in Spain", "code": "SPAN 3580", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course provides an overview of historical and contemporary notions of racial identity, particularly in relation to 21st century waves of immigration in Spain.\u00a0 We will examine how racial identity, nationality, and a sense of belonging has been represented in contemporary fiction, film, and media.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3879, "title": "Poetry and Poetics of the Americas", "code": "SPAN 3800", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "As globalization draws the Americas ever closer together, reshaping our sense of a common and uncommon American culture, what claims might be made for a distinctive, diverse poetry and poetics of the America? How might we characterize its dominant forms and alternative practices? What shared influences, affiliations, concerns and approaches might we find and what differences emerge? Ranging across North and South America, Central America and the Caribbean, this course will place in conversation such figures as Poe, Stein, Eliot, Pound, Williams, Neruda, Vallejo, Borges, Parra, C\u00e9saire, Walcott, Bola\u00f1o, Espada, Waldrop, Vicu\u00f1a, Hong, and Rankine.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3880, "title": "Special Topics in Spanish Literature", "code": "SPAN 4200", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Guided independent study of special topics. For undergraduates interested in special problems not covered in courses.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3881, "title": "Honors Work II", "code": "SPAN 4300", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Consult director of undergraduate studies for more information.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3882, "title": "Oil, Ghosts, and Beauty Queens", "code": "SPAN 4374", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Benedict Anderson famously argued that nations are \"imagined political communities.\" Following Anderson's claim, this course explores the different mechanisms at play in the act of imagining the nation and the ways in which art defines how a nation imagines itself. We will focus on Venezuela, and on the images that have historically defined its national identity: oil, ghosts, and beauty queens. As we discuss contemporary works of Venezuelan literature, film, and performance, we will ask: How do natural resources shape a nation's identity? What role does the past play in the coming together and coming apart of revolutions? How do notions of masculinity, femininity, and beauty define political power? And, finally, who gets to participate in the imagining of the nation, and who gets excluded?", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3883, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "SPAN 4570", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3884, "title": "Labor and the Arts", "code": "SPAN 4710", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course, offered entirely in English, is open to advanced undergraduates and graduates who want to learn more about the relations of politics to art in general and the cultural politic of \"autonomia\" more specifically. This movement, primarily associated with Italy, continues to have widespread influence around the globe. During the 1960s and 70s in Italy and elsewhere, workers, and intellectuals began to think collectively about a social terrain outside of dominant structures such as the State, the political party or the trade union. How does their \"refusal to work\" shape culture and vice versa? What kinds of cultural productions can come \"outside of the State\" or from constituent power? We will begin the course by tracing the term autonomy (self-rule) from antiquity to the modern period with emphasis on its relation to culture. We will then focus on the period of the 1960s and 70s, with experimental and mainstream cinema of Antonioni, Bertolucci, Pasolini, Petri and others; with writers such as Italo Calvino, Pier Paolo Pasolini, Nanni Balestrini; with arte povera as one \"origin\" of contemporary conceptual art; architecture and the reformation of public space in the wake of the situationism; and critics or theorists including Giorgio Agamben, Hannah Arendt, Franco Berardi (Bifo), Michael Hardt, Antonio Negri, Mario Tronti, Paolo Virno and so on. We will conclude with the potential relevance of autonomist-or-some might say post autonomist-thought for the present and future.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3885, "title": "Latin American Horror", "code": "SPAN 4855", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "The fantastic and the supernatural are the fundamental elements of this course, in which we will analyze Latin American short stories, novels, and films featuring ghosts, vampires, monsters, witches, zombies, haunted houses, and ecological horror.\u00a0 We will explore issues relating to colonialism, feminism, hybridity, and miscegenation.\u00a0 The texts range from the 19th century to the present.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3886, "title": "Latin American Literature and Mass Media", "code": "SPAN 4910", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course examines Latin American literature in the context of the visual and auditory of the twentieth century and early twenty-first century, in which mass media such as photography, film, and the Internet have threatened writing's \"representational privilege\" as a technology of information processing and storage.\u00a0 We will analyze how literature has been able to sustain its visibilty in the competitive media ecology: the power of mass media fantasies to mold the individual's subjectivity, and of the visual image to manipulate reality; the relationship between literature and popular culture and the market place: and the young writers' engagement with the new technologies of the information age.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3887, "title": "Border Environments", "code": "SPAN 6335", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This course focuses on a place and a concept where two of the most urgent issues of our times - migration and environmental degradation - converge, collide, and shape each other. It examines borders not as abstract lines on the map, but as dynamic hubs that connect human societies, politics, and cultures with the natural and built environments that we inhabit and transform. Through scholarly and creative work from an array of borders around the world, we will develop new theoretical approaches and methodological toolkits for rethinking and re-visioning borders in an era of climate change, toxic pollution, and mass extinction. The course encourages multi- and inter-disciplinary projects from students and will feature guests from diverse areas, disciplines, and practices.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3888, "title": "Special Topics in Spanish Literature", "code": "SPAN 6400", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Guided independent study for graduate students. For graduates interested in special problems not covered in courses.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3889, "title": "Methods in Medieval", "code": "SPAN 6590", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "Topic: The Late Medieval Devotional Image. A commonplace in the scholarly literature surrounding late medieval visual culture in Spain is that it was always \"late\".\u00a0 The Spaniards lagged behind the Italians -- so the story goes -- in getting a handle on perspective, and trailed after van Eyck and van der Weyden in mastering the niceties of oil painting and realistic effects.\u00a0 Spain's visual production, in other words, is generally treated from a standpoint of connoisseurship and \"history of styles,\" producing predictable results:\u00a0 evaluations of how it does (or does not) conform to the models established for other European contexts whose appropriateness to late medieval Iberia is doubtful to say the least.\u00a0 We will examine, through the contextually based study of the introduction of the retablo (altarpiece) into Iberian churches, chapels and palaces (these contexts, of course, included a significant consciousness, and often presence, of Jews, Muslims, or recent converts to Christianity from those latter two religions) in the early 15th century, both the problems enumerated above and the problematic culture of the religious image in Iberia.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3890, "title": "Deceleration: Politics, Poetics, Cinema", "code": "SPAN 6710", "subject": "SPAN", "descr": "This seminar explores the concept of deceleration through cinematic experience.\u00a0 The poetics of deceleration can be traced back to early cinema when filmmakers were fascinated by the inherent immobility and photographic statis of moving pictures and by slow motion techniques of the \"cinema of attractions.\"\u00a0 Subsequent reminations on \"dead time\" and unorthodox experimentation's with duration have come to define \"contemplative\" of \"slow\" cinema.\u00a0 Why does slowness persist as an aesthetic form?\u00a0 Could deceleration today be considered a political, cultural and aesthetic response to the ever increasingly accelerated and homogenizing effects of global capitalism?\u00a0 To what extent does a decelerated aesthetic enable a re-valuing of time?\u00a0 How might slowness be linked to new modes of perception and imagination?\u00a0 Could we think about slowness as a form of refusal and oppositional poetics?\u00a0 These are some of the questions we will consider in our weekly film screenings and class discussions.", "tags": "SPAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3891, "title": "Histories of the Future", "code": "STS 1102", "subject": "STS", "descr": "From Frankenstein to The Matrix, science fiction and film have depicted contemporary science, technology, and medicine for almost two centuries. This course introduces students to historical and social studies of science and technology using science-fiction films and novels, as well as key readings in science and technology studies. What social questions can fictional accounts raise that factual ones can only anticipate? How have \"intelligent machines\" from Babbage's Analytical Engine to Hal raised questions about what it means to be human? What can Marvel Comics teach us about changes in science and technology? When can robots be women and, in general, what roles did gender play in scientific, technological, and medical stories? How was the discovery that one could look inside the human body received? How do dreams and nightmares of the future emerge from the everyday work of scientific and technological research?", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3892, "title": "FWS: Technology and Society Topics", "code": "STS 1123", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This seminar explores the ways in which Technology and Society shape one another and provides the opportunity to write extensively about this mutual shaping. Topics vary by section.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3893, "title": "FWS: Science and Society Topics", "code": "STS 1126", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This seminar explores the ways in which Science and Society shape one another and provides the opportunity to write extensively about this mutual shaping. Topics vary by section.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3894, "title": "Ethics and the Environment", "code": "STS 2061", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Politicians, scientists, and citizens worldwide face many environmental issues today, but they are neither simple nor straightforward. Moreover, there are many ways to understand how we have, do, and could value the environment from animal rights and wise use to deep ecology and ecofeminism. This class acquaints students with some of the challenging moral issues that arise in the context of environmental management and policy-making, both in the past and the present. Environmental concerns also highlight important economic, epistemological, legal, political, and social issues in assessing our moral obligations to nature as well as other humans. This course examines various perspectives expressed in both contemporary and historical debates over environmental ethics by exploring four central questions: What is nature? Who counts in environmental ethics? How do we know nature? Whose nature?", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3895, "title": "Introduction to the History of Medicine", "code": "STS 2071", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course offers an introductory survey of the history of medicine (principally in Europe and the United States) from classical antiquity to the early twentieth century. Using a combination of both primary and secondary sources, students will learn about the \"Hippocratic Heritage\" of contemporary western medicine; medicine in late antiquity; faith and healing in the medieval period; medicine and knowledge in the Islamic world; medicine during the Renaissance (particularly the rise of the mechanical philosophy); medicine in the age of Enlightenment; professionalization, women-doctors and midwives, and battles over 'quackery' in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries; the role of medicine in colonialism and empire; and the promises and perils of modern medicine (dramatic decreases in mortality on the one hand, the rise of Eugenics and the importance of Medicine to the National Socialist State on the other). As well as this temporal survey, we will consider a number of ongoing themes: race, bodily difference, and medicine; medicine and the environment; women, gender, and medicine; the history of the body; the history of sexuality; and the close connections between forms of social order and forms of medical knowledge. The course meets three times a week (for two lectures and a section) and is open to all.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3896, "title": "Ten Technologies That Shook the World?", "code": "STS 2381", "subject": "STS", "descr": "In 1919, journalist John Reed published Ten Days That Shook the World about the 1917 Russian Revolution. Some events are so transformative, Reed argued, they change the course of history. This class examines ten technologies that \"shook\" the world over the past half millennium. Or did they? Can technology drive history? How should we think about the relationship between technology and culture, society, politics, and the environment? This course challenges many popular understandings of technology and technological change, introducing students to major concepts in the history and social studies of technology, including technological determinism, systems, infrastructure, skill, technopolitics, envirotech, users, and maintenance and repair. Technologies addressed will vary, but may include the slave ship, factory, climate control, atomic bomb, and plastic.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3897, "title": "Medicine, Culture, and Society", "code": "STS 2468", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Medicine has become the language and practice through which we address a broad range of both individual and societal complaints. Interest in this medicalization of life\u00a0may be one of the reasons that medical anthropology is currently the fastest-growing subfield in anthropology. This course encourages students to examine concepts of disease, suffering, health, and well-being in their immediate experience and beyond. In the process, students will gain a working knowledge of ecological, critical, phenomenological, and applied approaches used by medical anthropologists. We will investigate what is involved in becoming a doctor, the sociality of medicines, controversies over new medical technologies, and the politics of medical knowledge. The universality of biomedicine, or hospital medicine,\u00a0will not be taken for granted, but rather we will examine the plurality generated by the various political, economic, social, and ethical demands under which biomedicine has developed in different places and at different times. In addition, biomedical healing and expertise will be viewed in relation to other kinds of healing and expertise. Our readings will address medicine in North America as well as other parts of the world. In class, our discussions will return regularly to consider the broad diversity of kinds of medicine throughout the world, as well as the specific historical and local contexts of biomedicine.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SCD-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3898, "title": "Introduction to Humanities", "code": "STS 2750", "subject": "STS", "descr": "These seminars offers an introduction to the humanities by exploring the historical, cultural, social and political themes. Students will explore themes in critical dialogue with a range of texts and media drawn from the arts, humanities, and/or humanistic social sciences. Guest speakers, including Cornell faculty and Society for the Humanities Fellows, will present from different disciplines and points of view. Students will make field trips to local sites relevant to the theme, and visit Cornell special collections and archives. Students enrolled in this seminar will have the opportunity to participate in additional programming related to the Society's annual focus theme and the Humanities Scholars Program for undergraduate humanities research.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3899, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "STS 2812", "subject": "STS", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3900, "title": "Communication, Environment, Science, and Health", "code": "STS 2851", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Environmental problems, public health issues, scientific research-in each of these areas, communication plays a fundamental role. From the media to individual conversations, from technical journals to textbooks, from lab notes to the web, communication helps define scientifically based social issues and research findings. This course examines the institutional and intellectual contexts, processes, and practical constraints on communication in the sciences.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3901, "title": "Life Sciences and Society", "code": "STS 3011", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Biology and biotechnology are major influences on modern life. In addition, socio-political and historical conditions have shaped biological research and its applications in medicine, agriculture, environmental science, etc. Life science research is itself a social process involving complex human dynamics, different kinds of work and an array of social and natural systems. The course aims to introduce students to critical science and technology studies (S&TS) perspectives on the knowledge and practices of life sciences. The course is designed to prepare students for more advanced courses in the Biology & Society and S&TS majors, but students who do not plan to take further courses in those subjects can get critical insight into biology's profound role in both science and society.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3902, "title": "The Politics of Technology", "code": "STS 3042", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course will examine the politics of technology, with an emphasis on dual use technologies such as social media, artificial intelligence, and facial recognition. It will look at political consequences of those technologies, including the way that social media can be manipulated in an electoral context, how AI and automation can affect public policies (e.g., predictive policing) and ways to mitigate algorithmic biases embedded in these technologies, and questions of whether the United States and China are locked in a technology arms race and if global governance proposals can defuse the adverse consequences of great power competition over technology.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3903, "title": "Living in an Uncertain World: Science, Technology, and Risk", "code": "STS 3181", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course explores the history, sociology, and ethics of risk. In particular, we will focus on the complex and often ambiguous relationship between science, technology, and risk. A historical perspective shows how science and technology have generated risks while they have also played key roles in managing and solving those very risks. By examining several case studies, including 19th-century mining, the 1911 Triangle fire, nuclear science, the space shuttle disasters, asbestos litigation, Hurricane Katrina, and the contemporary financial crisis, we will consider how risk and ideas about risk have changed over time. By exploring different historical and cultural responses to risk, we will examine the sociopolitical dimensions of the definitions, perceptions, and management of risk both in the past and the present.", "tags": "HA-AS|HST-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3904, "title": "Environmental Sociology", "code": "STS 3241", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Humans have fraught relationships with the animals, plants, land, water\u2014even geological processes\u2014around us. We come together to revere, conserve, protect the things many call nature. We struggle over who gets to use what, which resources to use or to keep intact, which scientific claims are true and worthy of action. Every environmental concern is on some level a social concern, and more social concerns than we often realize are environmental concerns. In this course, we will examine how people make and respond to environmental change and how groups of people form, express, fight over, and work out environmental concerns. We will consider how population change, economic activity, government action, social movements, and changing ways of thinking shape human-environmental relationships. The fundamental goal of this course is to give you knowledge, analytical tools, and expressive skills that make you confident to address environmental concerns as a social scientist and a citizen.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3905, "title": "Data Science and Society Lab", "code": "STS 3440", "subject": "STS", "descr": "The next generation of thinkers will need a firm grasp on the practices and values implicated in designing and using data science tools. The class will sensitize students from the social sciences, humanities, and STEM to the complexities of data science as both a social and a technical project. We will conduct group research, mapping data flows and frictions within the university while\u00a0engaging in critical discussion about our findings at Cornell and what we see in the larger social world. Through this immersive and hands-on learning experience: we will lay the groundwork for future coursework and critical engagement with data science, examine data science concepts, track the expansion of data science into several areas of daily life, and engage in social, ethical, and policy analysis.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3906, "title": "Computing Cultures", "code": "STS 3561", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Computers are powerful tools for working, playing, thinking, and living. Laptops, PDAs, webcams, cell phones, and iPods are not just devices, they also provide narratives, metaphors, and ways of seeing the world. This course critically examines how computing technology and society shape each other and how this plays out in our everyday lives. Identifies how computers, networks, and information technologies reproduce, reinforce, and rework existing cultural trends, norms, and values. Looks at the values embodied in the cultures of computing and considers alternative ways to imagine, build, and work with information technologies.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3907, "title": "Ethical Issues in Engineering Practice", "code": "STS 3601", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Studies ethical issues involved in engineering practice. Explores the engineer's role in technical decision-making in organizations. Considers the engineer's relationship to the uses of technology in society, especially emerging technologies. Case studies covered include the Space Shuttle Challenger, the Space Shuttle Columbia, The\u00a0Macondo Well Blowout, The Ford Pinto Case, The VW Emissions scandal, the Tesla Automatic Driving accident, Three Mile Island, Chernobyl, Fukushima, and the Bhopal case, among others. Technology topics considered include brain-machine interface, human enhancement, genetic engineering, intelligent autonomous systems,\u00a0privacy and surveillance,\u00a0energy\u00a0technologies, and environmental issues, among others. Codes of ethics in engineering, ethical theory, philosophical models of knowledge production, and sociological models of human and technological agency are introduced to analyze these issues.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3908, "title": "Freud and the Invention of Psychoanalysis", "code": "STS 3651", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Psychoanalysis considers the human being not as an object of treatment, but as a subject who is called upon to elaborate an unconscious knowledge about what is disrupting her life, through analysis of dreams, symptoms, bungled actions, slips of the tongue, and repetitive behaviors.\u00a0 Freud finds that these apparently irrational acts and behavior are ordered by the logic of the fantasy, which provides a mental representation of a traumatic childhood experience and the effects it unleashes in the mind and body-effects he called drives.\u00a0 As \"unbound\" energies, the drives give rise to symptoms, repetitive acts, and fantasmatic stagings that menace our health and sometimes threaten social coexistence, but that also rise to the desires, creative acts, and social projects we identify as the essence of human life.\u00a0 Readings will include fundamental texts on the unconscious, repression, fantasy, and the death drive, as well as case studies and speculative essays on mythology, art, religion, and group psychology.\u00a0 Students will be asked to keep a dream journal and to work on their unconscious formations, and will have the chance to produce creative projects as well as analytic essays.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3909, "title": "Undergraduate Independent Study", "code": "STS 3991", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Applications for research projects are accepted by individual STS faculty members. Students may enroll for 1\u20134 credits in STS 3991 with written permission of the faculty supervisor and may elect either the letter grade or the S\u2013U option. Information on faculty research, scholarly activities, and undergraduate opportunities are available in the Science & Technology Studies office, 303 Morrill Hall. Independent study credits may not be used in completion of the major requirements.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3910, "title": "Due Process Clinic", "code": "STS 4040", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Automated scoring systems play an increasingly important role in ordering our lives. Whether we want to obtain a loan, rent an apartment, be found in search results, qualify for government assistance, or make the shortlist for a job \u2013 all of these decisions involve a range of computational techniques, including large-scale data analytics and predictive algorithms. So what to do when things go wrong and individuals feel mistreated by these systems? The Due Process Clinic is a semester-long, 4-credit course that focuses on the capacities of ordinary people to cope with, understand, and challenge automated scoring systems. It involves a mixture of hands-on fieldwork and seminar discussions, ranging from social and technical analyses of scoring practices to the ethical challenges of representing data subjects.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3911, "title": "Information Policy: Applied Research and Analysis", "code": "STS 4200", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course will address a wide range of information policy issues such as privacy, security, antitrust, intellectual property, algorithmic fairness, net neutrality, risk mitigation strategies, and other legal and policy compliance concerns in a simulated project management environment. Patterned on life cycle project management for products and services in contemporary large-scale technology companies, students will adopt specific topic areas for applied research and analysis working dynamically with other team members.\u00a0 Course outcomes include conducting upper-level research in specific information policy domains, experiential group dynamics, persuasive analytic presentations, fundamentals of project management in the technology sector, and insights into corporate hierarchies, organization, and functionalities.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3912, "title": "Designing Technology for Social Impact", "code": "STS 4240", "subject": "STS", "descr": "The social impact of technologies is typically thought about fairly late, if ever, in the design process. Indeed, it can be difficult at design time to predict what effects technologies will have. Nevertheless, design decisions can inadvertently \"lock in\" particular values early on. In this course, we will draw on science & technology studies, technology design, and the arts to analyze the values embodied in technology design and to design technologies to promote positive social impact. What social and cultural values do technology designs consciously or unconsciously promote? To what degree can social impact be \"built into\" a technology? How can we take social and cultural values into account in design?", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3913, "title": "Health and Environmental Justice", "code": "STS 4280", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Human bodies are inescapably enmeshed in our environments: human health and environmental health are inseparable. But human bodies are not equally impacted by environmental degradation and toxicity. Environmental injustice physically reproduces structures of power along lines of race, gender, global position, and wealth disparity. This upper-level seminar examines global and US case studies of environmental injustice and public health. Topics include waste flows, dump and industrial siting, environmental monitoring, and agriculture and aquaculture. We will also examine the politics of environmental health knowledge and movements for environmental justice.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SCD-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3914, "title": "Making Science Policy: The Real World", "code": "STS 4451", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course focuses on what happens when science meet the policy-making world. We will discuss theoretical and empirical studies in Science & Technology Studies that analyze the interactions between science, society and politics. We will specifically investigate the mechanisms by which science may impact policy-making by focusing on: the rise of science diplomacy, initiatives to use science in order to further development goals, and efforts to produce evidence-based foreign policy. We will also focus on currently hotly debated political issues in government affairs, including the politization and militarization of space, the rise of big data, the politics of climate change, and the construction of border walls. As part of this course we will hear from experts in the federal government on how they attempt to integrate science into the everyday workings of governance.", "tags": "SBA-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3915, "title": "Advanced Topics in Clinical Ethics", "code": "STS 4650", "subject": "STS", "descr": "In this advanced course, students will use their knowledge and analytical skills to explore complex value-laden issues in contemporary healthcare and health policy debate.\u00a0 Case studies and news stories will springboard discussion around topics including the changing professional-patient relationship,\u00a0medical decision-making, emerging technologies,\u00a0contemporary health concerns, evolving care-delivery systems,\u00a0and the healthcare experience of vulnerable populations.\u00a0\u00a0Discussions will emphasize contextual issues and vantage point at the individual and societal levels, as well as the interconnections between bedside ethical dilemmas and broader health system, health policy, and sociocultural/political issues.\u00a0Topics will encompass the life span from maternal-fetal to end-of-life. We will utilize speakers/field trips to enhance exposure to different voices.\u00a0 Readings will be selected from the popular press and healthcare, ethics, social science, and law literatures.", "tags": "CA-AS|ETM-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3916, "title": "Public Communication of Science and Technology", "code": "STS 4661", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Explores the structure, meanings, and implications of \"public communication of science and technology\" (PCST). Examines the contexts in which PCST occurs, looks at motivations and constraints of those involved in producing information about science for nonprofessional audiences, and analyzes the functions of PCST. Ties existing ideas about PCST to general communication research, and leads to developing new knowledge about PCST. Format is primarily seminar/discussion.", "tags": "SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3917, "title": "Food, Agriculture, and Society", "code": "STS 4691", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Multidisciplinary course dealing with the social and environmental impact of food production in the United States and developing countries. Agroecosystems of various kinds are analyzed from biological, economic, and social perspectives. The impacts of traditional, conventional, and alternative agricultural technologies are critically examined in the context of developed and developing economies. Specific topics include biodiversity and ecosystem services in agriculture, transgenic crops, biofuels, urban agriculture, and sustainable development.", "tags": "PBS-AS|BIO-AS|GLC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3918, "title": "Medieval Technologies of the Self", "code": "STS 4699", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Recent years have seen a boom in ways to use technology in order to learn about and improve the self. This course examines contemporary cultural orientations toward technology by exploring how medieval thinkers turned to language, images, books, and other tools and means of making in order to develop a sense of themselves in ethical relationship to others and to the world around them. We will place medieval work (such as Chaucer and Kempe) in conversation with resonant modern and contemporary writing (including Haraway, hooks, and Foucault). Advertisements and marketing for apps like \"Co-Star\", and \"Calm\" will supplement our discussions. For longer description and instructor bio visit the Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3919, "title": "Peace Building in Conflict Regions: Case Studies Sub-Saharan Africa Israel Palestinian Territories", "code": "STS 4721", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course focuses on issues of conflict, peace, and reconciliation in Israel and the Palestinian Territories as well as Sub-Saharan Africa. Both regions exemplify how issues ranging from nationalism and ethnocentrism to land, water and resource management, climate change and migration, as well as socio-psychological dynamics, can exacerbate conflicts. At the same time, these regions also exemplify how trans-border collaboration and regional integration, civilian peace building efforts, strategies for achieving historical justice, as well as science education and science diplomacy can become crucial tools for long-term peace-building, reconciliation and development. In this course we will work with and discuss issues of peace and conflict with policy-makers and local stakeholders involved in peace-building efforts.", "tags": "CA-AS|GLC-AS|SSC-AS|STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3920, "title": "Honors Project I", "code": "STS 4991", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Students must register for 4 credits each semester (4991-4992) for a total of 8 credits. After the first semester, students receive a letter grade of \"R\"; a letter grade for both semesters is submitted at the end of the second semester whether or not the student completes a thesis or is recommended for honors. Minimally, an honors thesis outline and bibliography should be completed during the first semester. In consultation with the advisors, the director of undergraduate studies will evaluate whether the student should continue working on an honors project. Students should note that these courses are to be taken in addition to those courses that meet the regular major requirements. If students do not complete the second semester of the honors project, they must change the first semester to independent study to clear the \"R\" and receive a grade. Otherwise, the \"R\" will remain on their record and prevent them from graduating.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3921, "title": "Honors Project II", "code": "STS 4992", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Students must register for the 4 credits each semester (BSOC 4991-BSOC 4992) for a total of 8 credits. After the first semester, students receive a letter grade of \"R\"; a letter grade for both semesters is submitted at the end of the second semester whether or not the student completes a thesis or is recommended for honors. Minimally, an honors thesis outline and bibliography should be completed during the first semester. In consultation with the advisors, the director of undergraduate studies will evaluate whether the student should continue working on an honors project. Students should note that these courses are to be taken in addition to those courses that meet the regular major requirements. If students do not complete the second semester of the honors project, they must change the first semester to independent\u00a0 study to clear the \"R\" and receive a grade. Otherwise, the \"R\" will remain on their record and prevent them from graduating.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3922, "title": "Seminar in the History of Technology", "code": "STS 6261", "subject": "STS", "descr": "A seminar on the global historiography of technology. Typical topics include industrialization; military science and technology; science and engineering in corporate settings; engineering as a profession; technology, colonialism, and development; race, gender, class, and technology; labor and technologies' users; urbanization, \"modernization,\" and technology in rural life; consumers of technology; technology and the nation-state; and environmental technologies.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3923, "title": "Social Theory", "code": "STS 6301", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Sociologist C. Wright Mills challenged his readers to develop their \"sociological imagination\" to understand the social and historical forces at work in seemingly individual events, such as the receipt of a pink slip, a draft card, or a drug prescription. Within science and technology studies, scholars have documented how social issues can become scientific, technological, or medical, often appearing to leave the social realm naturalized, normalized, or pathologized. This course introduces graduate students to classic texts and concepts in social theory with a focus on how scholars apply such theories to empirical research. It will consider major thinkers and schools of social thought, such as Marx, Weber, Durkheim, Mannheim, Foucault, and the Frankfurt School. It will also consider how a nuanced interplay of theory and empirical data can bring critically important insights to both theoretical and empirical understandings of the world. The course is relevant for students in sociology, history, and anthropology who are interested in social theory.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3924, "title": "Medieval Technologies of the Self", "code": "STS 6699", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Recent years have seen a boom in ways to use technology in order to learn about and improve the self. This course examines contemporary cultural orientations toward technology by exploring how medieval thinkers turned to language, images, books, and other tools and means of making in order to develop a sense of themselves in ethical relationship to others and to the world around them. We will place medieval work (such as Chaucer and Kempe) in conversation with resonant modern and contemporary writing (including Haraway, hooks, and Foucault). Advertisements and marketing for apps like \"Co-Star\", and \"Calm\" will supplement our discussions. For longer description and instructor bio visit the\u00a0Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3925, "title": "Graduate Independent Study", "code": "STS 6991", "subject": "STS", "descr": "Applications and information are available in 303 Morrill Hall.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3926, "title": "Studying Emerging Technologies", "code": "STS 7201", "subject": "STS", "descr": "This course will examine the peculiar speculative world of emerging technologies-a social and technical \"space,\" found at the edges of expanding technological systems, where new technologies are being most actively constructed and transformed. In this dynamic world, emerging technologies exist in a state of flux as a mixture of blueprint and hardware, plan and practice, the nearly on-line and the almost obsolete, surrounded by speculation and speculators, who make often-contested claims about their promises, perils, and possibilities. Among the characteristics of this space are:\u00a0 the frequent appearance of unverifiable claims about technologies that have yet to materialize; an entrepreneurial drive for commercial implementation; ongoing institutional innovation; frequent public controversies; and problems of political legitimacy. The course will examine the epistemic, discursive, institutional, and political dimensions of emerging technologies in an effort to understand the social worlds that shape technological change. Open to graduate students in the social sciences, sciences, and humanities.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3927, "title": "Proseminar in Peace Studies", "code": "STS 7937", "subject": "STS", "descr": "The Proseminar in Peace Studies offers a multidisciplinary review of issues related to peace and conflict at the graduate level. The course is led by the director of the Judith Reppy Institute for Peace and Conflict Studies and is based on the Institute's weekly seminar series, featuring outside visitors and Cornell faculty.", "tags": "STS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3928, "title": "Data Science for All", "code": "STSCI 1380", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to data science. Given data from economics, medicine, biology, or physics, collected from internet denizens, survey respondents, or wireless sensors, how can one understand the phenomenon generating the data, make predictions, and improve decisions? We focus on building skills in inferential thinking and computational thinking, guided by the practical questions we seek to answer. The course teaches critical concepts and skills in computer programming and statistical inference, in conjunction with hands-on analysis of real-world datasets including economic data, document collections, geographical data, and social networks. We will also consider social issues in data analysis such as privacy and design.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3929, "title": "Introductory Statistics", "code": "STSCI 2100", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Statistics is about understanding the world through data. We are surrounded by data, so there is a lot to understand. Covers data exploration and display, data gathering methods, probability, and statistical inference methods through contingency tables and linear regression. The emphasis is on thinking scientifically, understanding what is commonly done with data (and doing some of it for yourself), and laying a foundation for further study. Students learn to use statistical software and simulation tools to discover fundamental results. They use computers regularly; the test includes both multimedia materials and a software package. This course does not focus on data from any particular discipline, but will use real-world examples from a wide variety of disciplines and current events.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3930, "title": "Statistical Methods for the Social Sciences II", "code": "STSCI 2110", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "A second course in statistics that emphasizes applications to the social sciences. Topics include simple linear regression, multiple linear regression (theory, model building, and model diagnostics), and the analysis of variance. Computer packages are used extensively.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3931, "title": "Introductory Statistics for Biology", "code": "STSCI 2150", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to data analysis and statistical inference illustrated with biological applications. The computer labs will teach graphical analysis and statistical computation using R. Topics include graphical display, populations and sampling, probability distributions, expectation and variance, estimation, testing, correlation, regression, contingency tables, and the design of experiments. Emphasis is on concepts and the careful modeling of biological data, so that statistical methods are applied properly, pitfalls are avoided, and sound conclusions are reached.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3932, "title": "Probability Models and Inference", "code": "STSCI 3080", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to probability and parametric inference. Topics include: random variables, standard distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, likelihood-based estimation, sampling distributions and hypothesis testing, as well as an introduction to Bayesian methods. Some assignments may involve computation using the R programming language.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3933, "title": "Probability Models and Inference for the Social Sciences", "code": "STSCI 3110", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to probability and parametric inference. Topics include: random variables, standard distributions, the law of large numbers, the central limit theorem, likelihood-based estimation, sampling distributions and hypothesis testing.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|SMR-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3934, "title": "Biological Statistics II", "code": "STSCI 3200", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Applies linear statistical methods to quantitative problems addressed in biological and environmental research. Methods include linear regression, inference, model assumption evaluation, the likelihood approach, matrix formulation, generalized linear models, single-factor and multifactor analysis of variance (ANOVA), and a brief foray into nonlinear modeling. Carries out applied analysis in a statistical computing environment.", "tags": "MQR-AS|SDS-AS|SMR-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3935, "title": "Introduction to Engineering Stochastic Processes I", "code": "STSCI 3510", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Uses basic concepts and techniques of random processes to construct models for a variety of problems of practical interest. Topics include the Poisson process, Markov chains, renewal theory, models for queuing, and reliability.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3936, "title": "Python Programming and its Applications in Statistics", "code": "STSCI 4060", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "The first part of the course teaches basic Python programming knowledge and skills. The second part deals with Python application in statistics (e.g., data visualization and statistical analysis), Python-database integration (e.g., access, update and control an Oracle database), and Python web services (e.g., database-driven dynamic webpages using Python CGI scripts). These techniques are utilized in a comprehensive course project.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3937, "title": "Theory of Statistics", "code": "STSCI 4090", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Introduction to classical theory of parametric statistical inference that builds on the material covered in BTRY 3080. Topics include sampling distributions, principles of data reduction, likelihood, parameter estimation, hypothesis testing, interval estimation, and basic asymptotic theory.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3938, "title": "Applied Design", "code": "STSCI 4140", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course begins with a discussion of some general principles of experimental design. Classical designs are covered in detail, motivated by real data applications. These include completely randomized, randomized block, balanced incomplete block, split-plot, repeated measures and fractional factorial designs. If time permits rank-based nonparametric versions of the classical designs will also be covered.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3939, "title": "Statistical Computing", "code": "STSCI 4520", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course is designed to provide students with an introduction to statistical computing. The class will cover the basics of programming; numerical methods for optimization and linear algebra and their application to statistical estimation, generating random variables, bootstrap, jackknife and permutation methods, Markov Chain Monte Carlo methods, Bayesian inference and computing with latent variables.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3940, "title": "Applied Time Series Analysis", "code": "STSCI 4550", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Introduces statistical tools for the analysis of time-dependent data. Data analysis and application will be an integral part of this course. Topics include linear, nonlinear, seasonal, multivariate modeling, and financial time series.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3941, "title": "Data Mining and Machine Learning", "code": "STSCI 4740", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "We start off with a detailed refresher for Linear Regression. We then turn to popular methods for classification including Logistic Regression and Discriminant Analysis. Finally, we consider more advanced topics which may include - depending on the audience - Resampling Methods, Tree-based Methods, or Support Vector Machines. The statistics software R is introduced and used for applications.", "tags": "SDS-AS|STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3942, "title": "Undergraduate Supervised Teaching", "code": "STSCI 4970", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Students assist in teaching a course appropriate to their previous training. Students meet with a discussion or laboratory section and regularly discuss objectives with the course instructor.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3943, "title": "Tutorial in Actuarial Statistics", "code": "STSCI 4980", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Problem solving sessions to prepare students for the first four actuarial examinations (probability, financial mathematics, statistical modeling, and risk management).", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3944, "title": "Undergraduate Individual Study in Statistics", "code": "STSCI 4990", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Course consists of individual tutorial study selected by faculty. Because topics usually change year to year this course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3945, "title": "Undergraduate Dissertation Research", "code": "STSCI 4999", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Research at the undergraduate level.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3946, "title": "Big Data Management and Analysis", "code": "STSCI 5065", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Concepts, challenges, and industry trends of big data, with a focus on the Hadoop system. Topics include: basics of the Apache Hadoop platform and Hadoop ecosystem; the Hadoop distributed file system (HDFS); MapReduce or its alternative, a parallel programming model for distributed processing of large data sets; common big data tools, such as Pig (a procedural data processing language for Hadoop parallel computation), Hive (a declarative SQL-like language to handle Hadoop jobs), HBase (the most popular NoSQL database), and YARN; case studies; and\u00a0 integration of Hadoop with statistical software packages, e.g., SAS and R.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3947, "title": "Statistical Methods for the Social Sciences II", "code": "STSCI 5110", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Second course in statistics that emphasizes applications to the social sciences. Topics include simple linear regression, multiple linear regression (theory, model building, and model diagnostics), and the analysis of variance. Computer packages are used extensively.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3948, "title": "Statistics for Financial Engineering", "code": "STSCI 5640", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Regression, ARIMA, GARCH, stochastic volatility, and factor models. Calibration of financial engineering models, estimation of diffusion models, estimation of risk measures, multivariate models and copulas, bayesian statistics. Students are instructed in the use of R software; prior knowledge of R is helpful but not required. This course is intended for M.Eng. students in financial engineering and assumes some familiarity with finance and financial engineering. Students not in the financial engineering program are welcome if they have a suitable background. Students with no background in finance should consider taking ORIE 4630\u00a0instead.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3949, "title": "MPS Professional Development", "code": "STSCI 5953", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course will focus on specific career and professional development topics for Master of Professional Studies in Applied Statistics students. Through lectures, workshops and seminars from MPS Statistics and Cornell Career Services staff and alumni, you will learn job search strategies, effective resume writing, professional dining etiquette, the art of effective presentation, as well as the opportunity for you to choose a minimum of three workshops to further develop career related strategies according to your personal needs.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3950, "title": "Directed Studies in Applied Statistics", "code": "STSCI 5990", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "For individual or group research projects conducted under the direction of a member of STSCI faculty or instructors in a special area of statistical science that is not covered by regular course offerings.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3951, "title": "Applied Statistics MPS Data Analysis Project", "code": "STSCI 5999", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "It is a long-term, in-depth statistical analysis of real-world dataset using various statistical methods and computer packages (such as SAS, R, SPSS, etc.). Students work in teams (of maximum size 4) to solve business, managerial or scientific problems for clients. Projects are assigned by Dept. of Statistical Science to teams. Each team has a dedicated faculty adviser, who supervises the projects and assigns grades. Grades are assigned individually to team members. In special cases teams may collaborate with groups in other Departments, e.g., M.Eng. project teams.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3952, "title": "Computationally Intensive Statistical Methods", "code": "STSCI 6520", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Modern statistical methods routinely used in practice for analyzing large, complex datasets require intensive computation. This course covers topics in statistical computing, including numerical optimization and finding zeros (likelihood and related techniques), random number generation and Monte Carlo methods, bootstrap and subsampling, dimension reduction, nonlinear predictive modeling and parallel computing. Programming will be done in R.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3953, "title": "Mathematical Statistics I", "code": "STSCI 6730", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course will focus on the finite sample theory of statistical inference, emphasizing estimation, hypothesis testing, and confidence intervals.\u00a0 Specific topics include: uniformly minimum variance unbiased estimators, minimum risk equivariant estimators, Bayes estimators, minimax estimators, the Neyman-Pearson theory of hypothesis testing, and the construction of optimal invariant tests.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3954, "title": "Probability II for Statistics", "code": "STSCI 6750", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "This course will discuss several probabilistic results and techniques that are useful in mathematical statistics. Limit theorems and stochastic inequalities are two key components of the course. Topics to be covered include complements of basic limit theorems (Skorohod representation theorem, Berry-Esseen bound, Delta method), empirical distribution and quantile functions, U-statistics, bootstrap (and subsampling if time permits), stochastic convergence in metric spaces, and some elements of modern empirical process theory.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3955, "title": "Graduate Special Topics in Statistics", "code": "STSCI 6940", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Topics are arranged at the beginning of the semester for individual study or for group discussions. Or, students may elect to undertake a project in statistics. The work is supervised by a professor in this subject area.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3956, "title": "Graduate Level Dissertation Research", "code": "STSCI 7999", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Research at the Ph.D. Level.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3957, "title": "Doctoral Level Dissertation Research", "code": "STSCI 9999", "subject": "STSCI", "descr": "Doctoral Level Dissertation Research.", "tags": "STSCI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3958, "title": "Elementary Swahili II", "code": "SWAHL 1101", "subject": "SWAHL", "descr": "Elementary Swahili provides a foundation in listening, speaking, reading, and writing the basic grammatical structures and vocabulary. No prior knowledge of the language is required. Swahili (Kiswahili) is spoken in the East and Central parts of Africa. It is an official and national language in Tanzania, and in Kenya. During a first semester course, students engage in short conversation and communicative tasks, such as, greetings, introduction, daily routines, shopping, etc. Students learn to comprehend short and simple utterances about topics pertaining to basic personal information and immediate setting in day to day life. A Swahili second semester increases your oral fluency, grammar, vocabulary, writing, reading, and listening skills. All listening exercises will aim at preparing students to speak. Be ready to actively participate in conversations, to express yourself orally, and write stories/compositions. Literature and Cultural materials are incorporated into the course, along with audio, video, and web-based materials.", "tags": "SWAHL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3959, "title": "Elementary Swahili for Global Health", "code": "SWAHL 1107", "subject": "SWAHL", "descr": "This course is intended for students whom will be spending the summer in Tanzania for the Global Health Program.\u00a0 To prepare students to live and learn in Tanzania, this course will provide an introduction to and foundation in basic Kiswahili.\u00a0 Students will develop the capacity to communicate with Tanzanian peers and homestay families, as well as develop the competency to navigate community life in Tanzania. Since this is a one credit seminar, this course does NOT fulfill a language requirement for colleges or majors.This course is intended for students whom will be spending the summer in Tanzania for the Global Health Program.\u00a0 To prepare students to live and learn in Tanzania, this course will provide an introduction to and foundation in basic Kiswahili.\u00a0 Students will develop the capacity to communicate with Tanzanian peers and homestay families, as well as develop the competency to navigate community life in Tanzania. Since this is a one credit seminar, this course does NOT fulfill a language requirement for colleges or majors.", "tags": "SWAHL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3960, "title": "Intermediate Swahili II", "code": "SWAHL 2102", "subject": "SWAHL", "descr": "Intermediate Swahili levels I and II in general impart speaking, listening, reading, and writing skills beyond Swahili elementary level to participate with ease and confidence in familiar topics and exchange information on unfamiliar topics. Students are assigned communicative tasks such as respond to a situation with a short text and take part in a discussion after viewing short video clips and prompts to elicit speaking and listening competence and cultural awareness responses beyond elementary level. The language and cultural scenarios practiced are designed to help students demonstrate language responses beyond familiar topics, and to feel comfortable conversing with Swahili native speakers, as well as to blend in and feel\u00a0welcomed as part of the community while exploring different topics such as acquaintanceship, relationships, health, festivals, education, sports, housing, politics, commerce, travel, etc. Short stories are used to depict cultural aspects such as cultural expressions, proverbs, sayings, and riddles. Literature and cultural materials are incorporated into the course, along with audio-visual and web-based material. In this course, students have an opportunity to participate in language conversation outside the classroom and explore the opportunities for study abroad in East Africa. Swahili Elementary I and II are prerequisite for this course. By the end of this course, students should be able to reach proficiency level Intermediate High according to the American Council on the Teaching of Foreign Languages (ACTFL) www.actfl.org.", "tags": "SWAHL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3961, "title": "Elementary Swedish II", "code": "SWED 1220", "subject": "SWED", "descr": "This course is a continuation of Elementary Swedish I. Students have an opportunity to practice listening, speaking, reading and writing in Swedish. Students learn to provide information about their opinions and feelings, their families, their immediate environment and their daily activities.", "tags": "SWED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3962, "title": "Systems Engineering Project for Freshmen", "code": "SYSEN 1900", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Project experience for students who want to pursue a particular analytical, computational, or experimental project experience outside of regular courses. An engineering report on the project is required of each student. Intended for freshmen on project teams and for project team members performing non-technical tasks.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3963, "title": "Systems Engineering Project for Undergraduates", "code": "SYSEN 4900", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Project experience for students who want to pursue a particular analytical, computational, or experimental project experience outside of regular courses, or for informal instruction supplementing that given in regular courses. An engineering report on the project is required of each student. Students are expected to spend 3-4 hours per week per credit hour working on the project. Intended for sophomores, juniors, and seniors on project teams performing technical\u00a0tasks.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3964, "title": "Service System Modeling and Design", "code": "SYSEN 5130", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Service systems arise primarily from the service sector of the economy. Examples are contact centers\u00a0(also known as call centers), airlines, insurance and healthcare. This course describes techniques that are useful in the analysis and design of such systems. The class is structured around a number of cases. The emphasis is on modeling, solving the models, and interpreting the results. Both operational and strategic decisions are covered through appropriate examples.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3965, "title": "Economic and Financial Decisions for Engineers", "code": "SYSEN 5140", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This course aims at empowering engineers with training in accounting, finance and engineering economics needed to make financial decisions concerning capital investments that have prolonged monetary impacts. These methods are suitable for problems involving capital allocations and investments as well as evaluation and selection of engineering projects. Students learn how to define and select appropriate economic criteria for the evaluation of alternatives as well as how to use proper methods for evaluating alternatives under deterministic conditions.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3966, "title": "Systems Analysis Behavior and Optimization", "code": "SYSEN 5200", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This is an advanced course in the application of analytical methodologies and tools to the analysis and optimization of complex systems. On completion of this course, students should be able to use probability and statistics as a modeling and analysis tool for systems exhibiting uncertainty; be able to use algorithms and dynamic programming to model and optimize systems with a recursive structure; be able to use optimization tools to optimize complex systems and tune parameters.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3967, "title": "Software Systems Engineering", "code": "SYSEN 5330", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3968, "title": "Digital Twins of Future Systems", "code": "SYSEN 5340", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "In this course students learn how to setup a mathematical simulation model to predict the system outcomes based on variable data. To be an expert in DT one need to know about data science, predictive analytics, machine learning, and artificial intelligence. Digital Twin can be thought of as a bridge between the physical and digital system. The virtual presentation of a physical system enables us to link all steps of a process including input supply, production process, performance evaluation, and customer satisfaction. DT allows us to analyze the data and monitor a system, so to head off problems before they occur. Thus, mangers will be able to consistently improve efficiency of a system by reducing its failure rates. This can open up new business opportunities.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3969, "title": "Theory and Practice of Systems Architecture", "code": "SYSEN 5400", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Every system has an architecture (its essence, or DNA), i.e., a high-level abstraction of its design that provides a unifying concept for detailed design and commits most of the system's performance and lifecycle cost. This course presents the frameworks, methods, and tools required to analyze and synthesize system architectures. The course has a theory part that emphasizes synergies between humans and computers in the architecture process, and a practical part based on a long project and guest lectures by real system architects. The theory part covers topics such as architecture views, layers and projections, stakeholder networks, dealing with fuzziness, automatic concept generation, architecture space exploration, patterns and styles, heuristics, and knowledge engineering. The practice part focuses on special topics such as commonality, platforming, reuse, upstream and downstream influences, and software architecture.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3970, "title": "Systems Modeling Language: Fundamentals and Practice", "code": "SYSEN 5500", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Fundamentals and practice of Systems Modeling Language (SysML) for graphically specifying, analyzing, designing, and verifying complex systems. The focus and vision is on building unambiguous and computable models of systems behavior and structure that capture systems requirements and specifications.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3971, "title": "Special Topics in Systems Engineering", "code": "SYSEN 5700", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Supervised study by individuals or small groups of one or more specialized topics not covered in regular courses.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3972, "title": "Design Thinking for Complex Systems", "code": "SYSEN 5740", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "In this project-based class, interdisciplinary teams will combine design thinking and systems engineering techniques to define and solve complex systems and organization problems.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3973, "title": "Quantum Computing and Artificial Intelligence", "code": "SYSEN 5860", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Introduces the current status of quantum computing and its applications for artificial intelligence. Topics include Qubit states, entanglement, quantum circuits, Ising model, basics of quantum algorithms, adiabatic quantum computing and quantum annealing, noisy intermediate scale quantum (NISQ) computing, quantum optimization, quantum machine learning and quantum neural network. Learn how to access and use quantum computing resources, set up optimization and machine/deep learning problems to be solved with quantum computing, and develop quantum algorithms for artificial intelligence applications.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3974, "title": "Industrial Big Data Analytics and Machine Learning", "code": "SYSEN 5880", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This course covers the basic concepts, models and algorithms of Bayesian learning, classification, regression, dimension reduction, clustering, density estimation, artificial neural networks, deep learning, and reinforcement learning. Application and methodology topics include process monitoring, fault diagnosis, preventive maintenance, root cause analysis, soft sensing, quality control, machine learning for process optimization, data-driven decision making under uncertainty, missing data imputation, data de-noising, and anomaly/outlier detection.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3975, "title": "Systems Engineering Design Project", "code": "SYSEN 5900", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "A design project that incorporates the principles of systems engineering for a complex system. Projects are performed by teams of students working together to meet the requirements of the project.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3976, "title": "Systems Seminar Series", "code": "SYSEN 6100", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This is a weekly seminar course designed to give graduate students experience in improving their skills in presenting their research, judging peers' and field experts' research, as well as learning to accurately dissect and summarize the main points of a research talk. Being part of the Systems Engineering program, this course will strongly focus on developing the ability to present research in a broader context or as it relates to a larger system or process, and communicate the importance of the students' work to a more varied audience; a particularly important skill for both future \"job talks\" and grants' \"importance paragraphs.\" Students' presentations will also include some research depth as part of developing stronger conference talks and to aid classmates in expanding their knowledge.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3977, "title": "Theory and Practice of Systems Architecture", "code": "SYSEN 6400", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "Every system has an architecture (its essence, or DNA), i.e., a high-level abstraction of its design that provides a unifying concept for detailed design and commits most of the system's performance and lifecycle cost. This course presents the frameworks, methods, and tools required to analyze and synthesize system architectures. The course has a theory part that emphasizes synergies between humans and computers in the architecture process, and a practical part based on a long project and guest lectures by real system architects. The theory part covers topics such as architecture views, layers and projections, stakeholder networks, dealing with fuzziness, automatic concept generation, architecture space exploration, patterns and styles, heuristics, and knowledge engineering. The practice part focuses on special topics such as commonality, platforming, reuse, upstream and downstream influences, and software architecture.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3978, "title": "Applied Model Based Systems Engineering II", "code": "SYSEN 6610", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This course introduces fundamental ideas of Systems Engineering and their application to the design and development of various types of engineered systems.&nbsp; The systems engineering technical design process is emphasized, following the entire Vee-diagram process from initial problem definition and defining of system requirements, thru systems design & architecture, to implementation planning, and & testing and evaluation. The course also provides an applied introduction to a variety of areas that are commonly a part of Systems Engineering including creating effective project teams, customer needs evaluation, mathematical tools for system analysis, control & optimization, risk analysis and mitigation, decision making strategies, project organization & management, and the system life cycle. The course requires students to combine their work in this course with an outside-of-course MEng project", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3979, "title": "Applied Model Based Systems Engineering III", "code": "SYSEN 6620", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This course introduces fundamental ideas of Systems Engineering and their application to the design and development of various types of engineered systems.&nbsp; The systems engineering technical design process is emphasized, following the entire Vee-diagram process from initial problem definition and defining of system requirements, thru systems design & architecture, to implementation planning, and & testing and evaluation. The course also provides an applied introduction to a variety of areas that are commonly a part of Systems Engineering including creating effective project teams, customer needs evaluation, mathematical tools for system analysis, control & optimization, risk analysis and mitigation, decision making strategies, project organization & management, and the system life cycle. The course requires students to combine their work in this course with an outside-of-course MEng project.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3980, "title": "Industrial Big Data Analytics and Machine Learning", "code": "SYSEN 6880", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This course covers the basic concepts, models and algorithms of Bayesian learning, classification, regression, dimension reduction, clustering, density estimation, artificial neural networks, deep learning, and reinforcement learning. Application and methodology topics include process monitoring, fault diagnosis, preventive maintenance, root cause analysis, soft sensing, quality control, machine learning for process optimization, data-driven decision making under uncertainty, missing data imputation, data de-noising, and anomaly/outlier detection.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3981, "title": "Systems Seminar Series - PhD", "code": "SYSEN 8100", "subject": "SYSEN", "descr": "This is a weekly seminar course designed to give graduate students experience in improving their skills in presenting their research, judging peers' and field experts' research, as well as learning to accurately dissect and summarize the main points of a research talk. Being part of the Systems Engineering program, this course will strongly focus on developing the ability to present research in a broader context or as it relates to a larger system or process, and communicate the importance of the students' work to a more varied audience; a particularly important skill for both future \"job talks\" and grants' \"importance paragraphs.\" Students' presentations will also include some research depth as part of developing stronger conference talks and to aid classmates in expanding their knowledge.", "tags": "SYSEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3982, "title": "Elements of Tagalog-Filipino Language and Culture", "code": "TAG 1100", "subject": "TAG", "descr": "The course will introduce very basic functional uses of Tagalog/Filipino language and elements of Filipino culture to interested students like heritage learners and those who are planning to travel briefly to the Philippines to participate in a short project or study abroad program in the country.", "tags": "TAG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3983, "title": "Elementary Tagalog-Filipino II", "code": "TAG 1122", "subject": "TAG", "descr": "Gives a thorough grounding in basic speaking and listening skills with an introduction to reading and writing.", "tags": "TAG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3984, "title": "Intermediate Tagalog-Filipino II", "code": "TAG 2202", "subject": "TAG", "descr": "Develops all four skills: listening, speaking, reading, and writing.", "tags": "TAG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3985, "title": "Advanced Tagalog-Filipino II", "code": "TAG 3302", "subject": "TAG", "descr": "Continuing instruction on conversational skills but with emphasis on reading and writing. Selected core readings in contemporary Tagalog literature are used, but students, in consultation with the instructor, may select some of the class materials.", "tags": "TAG", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3986, "title": "Elementary Tamil II", "code": "TAMIL 1122", "subject": "TAMIL", "descr": "Introduces students to the basic grammatical and syntactical skills required to function adequately in a Tamil-speaking environment. Of particular interest to students planning to conduct scholarly research or fieldwork in that region of the world. Introduces students to the rich culture of the Indian subcontinent where Tamil is spoken.", "tags": "TAMIL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3987, "title": "Values at Play in Digital Technologies", "code": "TECH 5010", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Digital technologies have raised important ethical questions. Although often the focus is how ethical issues arise from ways people have used these technologies, there is growing interest in ethical values associated with the design and development of digital systems and devices. The study of values in, or values embodied in technology, has grown in importance as engineers and computer and data scientists have acknowledged that sound ethical practice is a responsibility alongside technical. This course introduces students to the latter. After providing a background to this way of thinking -- about ethics as a dimension of technology design and development \u2013 it introduces students to Values at Play, one particular approach to putting these ideas into practice.\u00a0Students are encouraged to apply this learning to their own projects.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3988, "title": "Early Adopters", "code": "TECH 5110", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Students will learn a set of methodologies that support identifying and onboarding early adopters as customers. Upon completion of the course, students will have a set of tools and examples of real contracts, frameworks, and system and process designs that can be used to help support them in acquiring their first customer. In addition to the tools to support customer acquisition, students will make an attempt at acquiring their first customer for a real or hypothetical startup that is being built in the Studio at Cornell Tech.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3989, "title": "Product Management", "code": "TECH 5200", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "This hands-on course helps students learn about and develop product management (PM) skills by putting those skills immediately to use in the context of in class-scenarios and\u00a0other projects at Cornell Tech they might be working on (Startup Studio, Specialization, etc.).\u00a0In each class, students learn about a different aspect of product management, product design, or technology development, and practice applying it in a group setting.\u00a0By the end of the semester, students will have developed and practiced many of the fundamental product management skills required to develop new technology products.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3990, "title": "Visual and Interaction Design for Digital Products", "code": "TECH 5220", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Product Design introduces students to the concepts, methods, techniques, and theory of visual design in the context of creating digital products. Students will analyze examples, past and present, of form in relationship to content on web and mobile. From there, they will learn and practice basic principles for typography, color, and composition through prototyping, visual iteration, and critique. Brand elements, UX principles, accessibility, user research, and pattern libraries will be discussed.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3991, "title": "Data Storytelling to Add Value & Build Better", "code": "TECH 5230", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Studies suggest that stories are 22 times more influential than facts and figures alone. In this course, we'll break down the steps required to move from data to information to influence in the context of real world problems of your choice. Gathering data is one thing but how to use it is another thing entirely. Using data from user research, social media, and the public web, along with simple open source technologies, you will learn techniques to garner more meaningful insights while building a compelling narrative. At the end of this course, you will feel better equipped to focus on what matters, open people's minds & change behavior using data in simple and intuitive ways. Master this art because like the Native American proverb says, \"those who tell the stories, rule the world\".", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3992, "title": "Interface is the Brand", "code": "TECH 5240", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "In a world gone digital, your product's interface is the gateway - and often, the main experience - for your customer, making the interface the most critical aspect of your brand. Every professional in the digital age must know how to build good products. And every product lives and dies with the interface. In this course, you will learn the principles of good user experience (UX) and interface (UI) design; integrate design, data, and technology in order to balance function and emotion; and understand how to make your product useful, usable, and desirable. A picture might be worth a thousand words. But an interface can be worth a thousand pictures. \"Once you get there,\" said Steve Jobs, \"you can move mountains\". Students with no design training or background are encouraged to join.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3993, "title": "Technology for Artistic Practice", "code": "TECH 5250", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "This studio course provokes new opportunities to create or apply digital technology for artistic practice, from making, showing, selling, and preserving art; to the artist's studio, subject matter, systems, and tools; to the art ecosystem, art & technology collaborations, and more. Students will read and discuss critical thought on artistic practice, and ultimately prototype (paper, computer, or otherwise) and demo a novel use of digital technology for any aspect of artistic practice.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3994, "title": "Fundamentals of Modern Software", "code": "TECH 5300", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "This is a crash course in how software works and what it can do. It covers the basics of programming, databases, and web applications. There is a strong emphasis on learning by doing and the course includes weekly programming assignments in Python.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3995, "title": "Law for Non-Lawyers", "code": "TECH 5320", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "This class introduces the principal legal issues involved in starting, managing and operating a technology-oriented business by entrepreneurs. It is intended to provide non-law students with an understanding of many of the laws and regulations to which developing businesses in the United States tech sector are typically subject\u2014from the time an entrepreneur conceives and begins to build a business, implements a business plan, and obtains financing, to when she begins operations in anticipation of managing a mature company and considering possible exit strategies.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3996, "title": "Startup Studio", "code": "TECH 5910", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Students cofound their own startups, developing their ideas, products, and pitches, learning to create and tell a compelling startup story, and test their product with users. Students participate in three 24-hour \"studio sprints\" where they focus on developing their product and final presentation at the end of the semester.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3997, "title": "BigCo Studio", "code": "TECH 5920", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Most people who work in the tech industry will start and perhaps spend their careers in established companies. The companies\u2014we call \"BigCos\"\u2014have complex org structures, unique market dynamics, and different ways of getting things done. In this class, students will learn how to successfully navigate the opportunities and challenges of a BigCo and build products in a complex environment at scale from practitioners with extensive experience and prominent guest speakers. Students will also learn about how business development, M&A, and other corporate activities complement and sometimes compete with larger strategic initiatives. Students will work in teams matched with a real-world opportunity and advisor from a BigCo. Teams will build and pitch a product in three sprints culminating in a final presentation and demo.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3998, "title": "PiTech Studio", "code": "TECH 5930", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "Public Interest Tech is defined by the deployment of technological expertise in service of the common good, often with a focus on under-resourced communities and needs. This course will address how leaders might use digital technology to:\n\u25cf Assist communities in adapting and deploying digital tools to meet local public health priorities, such as food insecurity, social isolation, and healthcare access.\n\u25cf Support public school systems in addressing pedagogical, equity, and privacy gaps of the software platforms they depend upon.\n\u25cf Enable community participation in data collection and decision making\n\u25cf Collaborate with stakeholders to apply digital tools and models in support of a more equitable and effective criminal justice system.\n\u25cf Advise local policy makers on the externalities of emerging safety and surveillance technologies.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":3999, "title": "Independent Study", "code": "TECH 5999", "subject": "TECH", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "TECH", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4000, "title": "Elementary Thai II", "code": "THAI 1122", "subject": "THAI", "descr": "This beginning level course provides a solid grounding in all four language skills (listening, speaking, reading, and writing) with an emphasis on reading and writing. The aim is to enable learners to continue the process of thinking in Thai and learning to converse and \"get around\" in certain basic situations in daily life with an additional of basic literacy skill.", "tags": "THAI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4001, "title": "Intermediate Thai II", "code": "THAI 2202", "subject": "THAI", "descr": "Continues to develop and comprehensively extends the four language skills acquired at the Elementary level (listening, speaking, reading, and writing).", "tags": "THAI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4002, "title": "Intermediate Thai Composition and Conversation II", "code": "THAI 2204", "subject": "THAI", "descr": "Develops conversational skill along with reading and writing skills at a High Intermediate level.", "tags": "THAI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4003, "title": "Advanced Thai II", "code": "THAI 3302", "subject": "THAI", "descr": "Develops advanced speaking skill with emphasis on selected readings in Thai from various fields, for example, History, Anthropology, Government, Economics, Agriculture, as well as other professional schools. \u00a0The readings are supplemented with visual materials such as video clips and films.", "tags": "THAI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4004, "title": "Thai Literature II", "code": "THAI 3304", "subject": "THAI", "descr": "Reading of significant novels, short stories, and poetry written since 1850 and other classical works.", "tags": "CA-AS|THAI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4005, "title": "Elementary Modern Tibetan II", "code": "TIBET 1112", "subject": "TIBET", "descr": "This is an introductory course and no previous knowledge is required. It focuses on developing basic abilities to speak as well as to read and write in modern Tibetan, Lhasa dialect. Students are also introduced to modern Tibetan studies through selected readings and guest lectures.", "tags": "TIBET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4006, "title": "Elementary Classical Tibetan II", "code": "TIBET 1122", "subject": "TIBET", "descr": "Introduces students to the grammar of Classical Literary Tibetan as found in Indian treatises translated from Sanskrit into Tibetan, as well as indigenous Tibetan philosophical works. The course progresses through a sequence of the basic rudiments of the language, including an introduction to the script and its romanization, pronunciation (central Lhasan dialect), normative dictionary order, and the basic categories of grammar. Following these preliminaries, students proceed to guided readings in Tibetan literature designed to introduce them to the formal approach of Tibetan lexical semantics with an emphasis on the role of verbs in determining argument realization options. Over the duration of the course, students encounter new vocabulary (and associated Buddhist concept hierarchies) and increasingly complex sentence structures. This course thus provides a solid foundation for the later exploration of other genres of literature and styles of composition.", "tags": "TIBET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4007, "title": "Intermediate Classical Tibetan II", "code": "TIBET 2202", "subject": "TIBET", "descr": "This two-semester class is designed to assist students who already have the equivalent of at least two-years of Tibetan language study. The course is intended to build on this foundation so that students gain greater proficiency in reading a variety of classical Tibetan writing styles and genres, including (especially in the second semester) texts relevant to their research.", "tags": "TIBET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4008, "title": "Intermediate Modern Tibetan II", "code": "TIBET 2212", "subject": "TIBET", "descr": "For those whose knowledge is equivalent to a student who has completed the first-year course. The course focuses on the further development of their skills in using the language to engage with practical topics and situations, such as seeing a doctor, reading news, writing letters, and listening to music.", "tags": "TIBET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4009, "title": "Advanced Modern Tibetan II", "code": "TIBET 3312", "subject": "TIBET", "descr": "For those whose knowledge is equivalent to a student who has completed the second-year course. The course develops students' reading comprehension skills through reading selected modern Tibetan literature. Tibetan is used as the medium of instruction and interaction to develop oral fluency and proficiency.", "tags": "TIBET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4010, "title": "Master's Thesis and Research", "code": "TOX 8900", "subject": "TOX", "descr": "Thesis research for master's students.", "tags": "TOX", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4011, "title": "Doctoral Thesis and Research", "code": "TOX 9900", "subject": "TOX", "descr": "Thesis research for Ph.D. candidates.", "tags": "TOX", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4012, "title": "Elementary Turkish II", "code": "TURK 1331", "subject": "TURK", "descr": "In this course, learners will continue to develop their reading, listening, speaking, and writing beyond the foundation established in Elementary Turkish I. In this semester, learners will advance towards the Intermediate level as well as beginning to feel comfortable and confident getting around in Turkey, undertaking very basic research, and communicating with native Turkish speakers. The format will continue to focus on introducing subjects through receptive skills (reading/listening/watching) with learners then working on projects and longer writing in order to master applicable language.", "tags": "TURK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4013, "title": "Intermediate Turkish II", "code": "TURK 2332", "subject": "TURK", "descr": "At this level, learners will be working on understanding and expressing complex ideas. They will delve into Turkish culture, society, history, and other academic subjects in depth. Upon finishing the course successfully, learners will be able to express themselves clearly and develop arguments both in writing and speaking, as well as understanding films, and reading articles on a wide variety of academic topics.", "tags": "ALC-AS|TURK", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4014, "title": "Elementary Ukrainian II", "code": "UKRAN 1122", "subject": "UKRAN", "descr": "The purpose of this course is for the students to develop elementary proficiency in speaking, reading, listening, and writing in Ukrainian, while acquiring some basic knowledge of Ukrainian culture, history, geography, and way of life.\nUpon completion of the course, students who have attended classes on a regular basis, successfully completed all assignments and all tests and exams with a minimum grade of B- should be able to:\n- master Ukrainian pronunciation and grammatical accuracy well enough to be understood by a native speaker of Ukrainian.\n- provide basic information in Ukrainian, both orally and in writing, about themselves, their family, likes and dislikes, everyday activities, studying, as well as some immediate needs, such as ordering food and making simple purchases;\n- understand and participate in simple exchanges on everyday topics (e.g., meeting people, school, shopping, etc.) in most common informal settings;\n- use and understand a range of essential vocabulary related to everyday life (e.g., days of the week, numbers, months, seasons, numbers, telling the time and date, family, food, transportation, common objects, colors, etc.).", "tags": "UKRAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4015, "title": "Intermediate Ukrainian II", "code": "UKRAN 1134", "subject": "UKRAN", "descr": "The course starts with a review and subsequent reinforcement of grammar fundamentals and core vocabulary pertaining to the most common aspects of daily life. Principal emphasis is placed on further development of students' communicative skills (oral and written) on such topics as the self, family, studies and leisure, travel, meals and others. A number of Ukrainian language idiosyncrasies like numeral + noun phrases, verbal aspect, impersonal verbal forms, verbs of motion and others receive special attention. Course materials are selected with the aim of introducing students to some functional and stylistic differences in modern Ukrainian as well as distinctions between the Kyiv and Lviv literary variant.", "tags": "UKRAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4016, "title": "Advanced Ukrainian II", "code": "UKRAN 3134", "subject": "UKRAN", "descr": "This content-based modular course aims to develop students' capacity to use the Ukrainian language as a research and communication tool in a variety of specialized functional and stylistic areas that include literary fiction, scholarly prose, printed and broadcast journalism. It is designed for students with interest in the history, politics, literature, culture and other aspects of contemporary Ukraine, as well as those who plan to do their research, business or reporting about Ukraine. The course is taught in Ukrainian.", "tags": "ALC-AS|LA-AS|UKRAN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4017, "title": "Far from Hollywood: The Representation of Youth in Contemporary World Cinema", "code": "UNILWYL 1122", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to give students the opportunity to explore the international field of film studies by watching, discussing, and writing about films that depict youth from a global perspective. This introduction to movie analysis will help students acquire basic analytical tools to critically approach a movie. We will examine the cultural elements of each film as well as some elements of film forms and explore how these elements come together to create meaning and film esthetics and how they are culturally relevant to the background the film is set in.", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4018, "title": "Mindful Intercultural Communication Practices", "code": "UNILWYL 1128", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "Students will learn a series of meditation routines, including both basic breathing techniques and practices that conscientiously cultivate such positive emotions as gratitude, joy, compassion, empathy, equanimity, and forgiveness. Through regular practices students will grow their attentiveness, compassion, and empathy that are vital for effective intercultural and interpersonal communication.", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4019, "title": "The Art and Science of Birds", "code": "UNILWYL 1130", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "Art and science have always been fundamentally linked. Before the invention of photography, illustration was the main documentation tool in science; even now, artistic representations are used to communicate important scientific discoveries. This course is led by the staff biological illustrator at the Cornell Lab of Ornithology with visiting professional illustrator and ornithology guest lecturers, to showcase how art can be an invaluable part of explaining science, and conversely how bird studies can inform and promote artistic expression. You will learn about the basics of bird anatomy to inform your drawings, as well as techniques in sketching to foster an appreciation of how science and art can reinforce each other in enriching your life. No prior art experience is required or expected. Beginning with the fundamentals of observational drawing, the course blends art instruction with ornithology science covering a range of interconnected topics", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4020, "title": "It's the Small Things that Rule the World - Viruses Infect Everything", "code": "UNILWYL 1132", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "Viruses are the most abundant living things in our biosphere. This course will introduce you to the enormity and diversity of the viral world, the important roles that viruses have played in history and in our lives today, and the useful and amazing things that we humans can use viruses to do.", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4021, "title": "And Injustice for All", "code": "UNILWYL 1412", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "This LWYL course is designed to explore the foundational causes of and responses to racial and social injustice in the United States. It will feature leading experts in five primary areas: democracy and voting rights, incarceration and criminal (in)justice, educational institutions, climate justice, and urban housing policies and segregation. This course will bring together two or three speakers exploring structural injustices in these different institutional contexts. Discussions of policy and social activism will alternate with sessions by leading artists, poets, musicians, and curators who will explore related artistic interventions and arts activism. There will be five sessions each semester (approximately one every three weeks). These seminars will be followed up by in-house discussion groups.", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4022, "title": "Pathways to Career Success", "code": "UNILWYL 1414", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "This course is designed to expose students to potential career paths in the fields of public policy, banking, consulting, healthcare, and tech startup. The course is centered around bi-weekly, hour-long interviews with mid-career Cornell Alumni working in these fields. Students will get the opportunity to research the field as a potential career path, identify the nature of work carried out in the field, talk with executives about their career paths, and learn skills for internship application writing and resume building in that field. Between class meetings, small groups of students will meet with the instructors for an hour to work on gathering information about the field, and then conduct informal zoom interviews with the executives to prepare a set of interview questions.", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4023, "title": "Toxic Inequality: Environmental Justice in America", "code": "UNILWYL 1450", "subject": "UNILWYL", "descr": "This course explores social justice in the environmental context and will engage students in the theory and practice of environmental justice with a particular focus on inequality. Students should have a strong interest in learning about the history and challenges of environmentally overburdened communities \u2014 often communities of color and low-income communities\u2014while also exploring strategies for addressing inequalities as they relate to the environment. Students will learn and practice critical reflection as an essential component of this course and we will employ visual, oral, and narrative forms of reflection to appeal to a variety of learning styles.", "tags": "UNILWYL", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4024, "title": "Introduction to Urdu Script", "code": "URDU 1125", "subject": "URDU", "descr": "This class is an introductory class for beginners. This course will teach students how to listen, speak, read and write Urdu through vocabulary, grammar, oral and written activities, with an emphasis on reading and writing basic Urdu. The course begins by introducing the alphabet and their combinations. In addition to learning the script we will also introduce the basic knowledge and background on Urdu culture.", "tags": "URDU", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4025, "title": "Intermediate Urdu Reading and Writing II", "code": "URDU 2226", "subject": "URDU", "descr": "This course is designed to develop competence in Urdu reading and writing for students with a first-year knowledge of Hindi and knowledge of Urdu script. The goal of this course is to improve listening, speaking, reading and writing abilities in Urdu. By the end of the course, students will have the ability to read articles, write short stories and translate Urdu writings. This course may be taken concurrently with Intermediate Hindi.", "tags": "URDU", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4026, "title": "Topics in Pre-Clinical Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VETCS 6896", "subject": "VETCS", "descr": "This course introduces select topics of veterinary medicine for visiting students from City University. Course material is presented on a system - oriented basis and provides a sound foundation for clinical rotations. Specific course objectives and course content will be tailored to meet the educational and curriculum requirements of the selected student participants.", "tags": "VETCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4027, "title": "Advanced Veterinary Anesthesiology I", "code": "VETCS 7100", "subject": "VETCS", "descr": "This course is taught with the participation of all members of the Section of Anesthesiology and Pain Medicine. It is designed to prepare house staff for the American College of Veterinary Anesthesia and Analgesia certifying examination. The course is comprised of a mixture of seminars, discussion sessions in which reading assignments are reviewed, and wet laboratories designed to allow residents to practice clinical skills. It is suitable for interns and for residents training in other specialties, such as surgery, internal medicine, emergency medicine, critical care, and laboratory animal medicine. Some seminars are useful for graduate students with interests in applied physiology and pharmacology. Speakers may be either internal or invited from other institutions. Topics include the basic sciences as they apply to anesthesiology, such as physics and engineering, anatomy and physiology, applied pharmacology, and pathophysiology. Clinically-oriented lectures\u00a0 concerning specific anesthetic techniques and species-specific differences are also given.", "tags": "VETCS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4028, "title": "Independent Study in Immunology", "code": "VETMI 5000", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "This course will allow students to gain an in-depth knowledge of basic immunology through independent study under the guidance of faculty on individual topics.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4029, "title": "Research Fellowship in Microbiology and Immunology", "code": "VETMI 6200", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Offered by individual faculty members in the Department of Microbiology and Immunology for DVM students undertaking research in Research Fellowship.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4030, "title": "Biomedical Sciences: Foundations of the PhD", "code": "VETMI 7030", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "This course is designed to support the comprehensive success of PhD students in the Biological and Biomedical Sciences. Preference given to those in the Initiative for Maximizing Student Development (IMSD) program. Enrollment in this course is by instructor permission only.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4031, "title": "Advanced Work in Bacteriology, Virology, and Immunology", "code": "VETMI 7070", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Designed primarily for graduate students with a background in pathogenic microbiology and immunology. May be elected by veterinary students who are properly prepared.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4032, "title": "Seminars in Infection and Immunity", "code": "VETMI 7120", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Invited speakers in immunology and infection biology to acquaint students with current advances in the field. \u00a0 For seminar schedule and speaker list, see the web site via the links at https://infectionbiologyprogram.cornell.edu/events.html", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4033, "title": "Current Topics in Immunology and Infectious Disease", "code": "VETMI 7230", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Discussion group in which students present research papers from the contemporary scientific literature encompassing immunology and infectious diseases.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4034, "title": "Advanced Work in Animal Parasitology", "code": "VETMI 7370", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Intended for advanced undergraduate, graduate, and veterinary students with interests in parasitology research.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4035, "title": "Apicomplexa", "code": "VETMI 7401", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "In-depth look at Apicomplexa of major importance in domestic animals. Emphasis on parasites common in North America and Europe. Presents details of taxonomy, biology, epidemiology, disease, and preventative and curative treatment. As relevant, susceptibility and resistance to available parasiticides highlighted. Information from primary literature will be reviewed.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4036, "title": "Mites", "code": "VETMI 7403", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "In-depth look at mites of major importance in domestic animals. Emphasis on parasites common in North America and Europe. Details of taxonomy, biology, epidemiology, disease, and preventative and curative treatment. Consideration of susceptibility and resistance to available parasiticides. Information from primary literature will be reviewed where applicable.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4037, "title": "Internal Parasites of Cats", "code": "VETMI 7407", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "In-depth look at feline endoparasites of major importance in North America and Europe. Details of taxonomy, biology, epidemiology, pathology, host immunity, clinical presentation, and preventative and curative treatment. Consideration of efficacy of available parasiticides. Information from studies reported in primary literature will be reviewed where applicable.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4038, "title": "Internal Parasites of Sheep", "code": "VETMI 7410", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "In-depth look at ovine and caprine endoparasites of major importance in North America and Europe. Details of taxonomy, biology, epidemiology, pathology, host immunity, clinical presentation, and preventative and curative treatment. Consideration of efficacy of available parasiticides. Information from studies reported in primary literature will be reviewed where applicable.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4039, "title": "Organisms as Lab Models", "code": "VETMI 7417", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Laboratory animals have their own parasites and are used as hosts of parasites of other animals that are adapted for biological study.\u00a0 They are critical as models for human and animal disease and are often used for drug discovery or initial testing.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4040, "title": "Cases with Specimens Laboratory- Large Animal", "code": "VETMI 7423", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Cases from all major large animal hosts will have the students work through a series each laboratory from presentation, samples, diagnostic testing, and suggestion of treatment, therapy, and follow up.\u00a0 The course will utilize\u00a0fixed and prepared samples, and living materials when available.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4041, "title": "Cases with Specimens Laboratory- Small Animal", "code": "VETMI 7424", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Cases from all major small\u00a0animal hosts will have the students work through a series each laboratory from presentation, samples, diagnostic testing, and suggestion of treatment, therapy, and follow up.\u00a0 The course will utilize\u00a0fixed and prepared samples, and living materials when available.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4042, "title": "Imaging of Parasites in Vivo", "code": "VETMI 7425", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "This course will examine imaging methodology and its usefulness in the diagnosis of and possibly inclusion in the assessment of various modalities for parasite identification and counting.\u00a0 New methods and procedures are making it possible to examine living parasites in living hosts in ways that were once impossible.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4043, "title": "Early Drug Discovery", "code": "VETMI 7428", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "The course will describe the system by which molecules move up the system to actually become a product and the myriad pitfalls that can end a products development early in the process and very late in the process of development.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4044, "title": "Antiparasitic Drugs", "code": "VETMI 7429", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "In-depth look at drugs for prevention and control of parasitic infections/infestations of domestic animals with emphasis on products commercially available in North America and Europe, including: discovery & development, modes of action for classes of compounds, differences between drugs within the same class, targeted parasitic life stages, and on/off-label use.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4045, "title": "Statistics for Efficacy Studies", "code": "VETMI 7433", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Introduction to statistics as it relates to both experimental and observations studies will allow students to be able to interpret statistics and understand the need for statistical testing in study design.\u00a0 Students will obtain practice with data collection, entry, and analysis.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4046, "title": "Regulatory Approval", "code": "VETMI 7434", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Introduction to the concepts, considerations and processes involved in acquisition of FDA, EPA, and USDA approvals and registrations for parasiticides: \u00a0responsibilities of study directors and monitors, guidelines, discovery, research and product development, etc. Sample protocols and FDA, EPA, and USDA registrations will be examined.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4047, "title": "Capstone Project I", "code": "VETMI 7436", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "In this course students will develop a topic for their literature-review dealing directly with a subject in veterinary parasitology and will be assigned a faculty mentor. \u00a0Students will identify their academic sources and will be expected to submit an annotated bibliography for review. This course will assess a student's ability to read, evaluate and integrate the research literature into the design of a veterinary parasitology investigation.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4048, "title": "Parasites of People", "code": "VETMI 7439", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "A Survey of the parasites of people: protist, helminth, and arthropod. Covers their biology, transmission, and importance in human medicine. Includes the common parasites of people in the developed and developing world, but also presents information on the many parasites that are rarely observed but sometimes of major medical consequence.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4049, "title": "Molecular Parasitology", "code": "VETMI 7444", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "This course describes the central dogma of biology and its applications to veterinary parasitology, including: the history of molecular biology; PCR; sequencing techniques, uses, and data analysis; use of transcription, translation and other 'omics' to elucidate host-parasite interactions and as targets for treatment & control; and immunological concepts and applications.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4050, "title": "Capstone Project II", "code": "VETMI 7446", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Critical evaluation and integration of the research literature is a critical tool of the modern parasitologist. This course will provide students with the ability to read, understand, evaluate and integrate the research literature in veterinary parasitology. Students will enhance their writing and presentation skills in the preparation of the project. Students will prepare a literature-review based project dealing directly with a subject in veterinary parasitology.\u00a0 This project is an in depth and extensive review of the literature, culminating in the preparation of an hour-long lecture to be presented at the end of the course, and submit a final copy of the required paper. This course is intended for students enrolled in their final semester of the Masters of Professional Studies in Veterinary Medical Sciences.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4051, "title": "Parasite Identification in Histologic Sections", "code": "VETMI 7448", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Live on-line instruction presenting the morphologic features of major parasite groups and important species to allow parasite, protozoa, helminths, and arthropod, identification in histologic section. It will be presented as a 5 day lab course presented with presentation of the material live on line with ZOOM or equivalent.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4052, "title": "Advanced Work in Aquatic Animal Diseases", "code": "VETMI 7720", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "This course involves hands-on work in fish disease research and the latest diagnostic tools. \u00a0Identification of parasites, fungal, bacterial and viral pathogens by classical and molecular techniques will be emphasized.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4053, "title": "Seminars in Parasitology", "code": "VETMI 7830", "subject": "VETMI", "descr": "Seminar series designed to acquaint students with current research in the field of parasitology. The range of topics is determined, in part, by the interests of those participating and may include such topics as the ecology of parasitism, parasite systematics, wildlife parasitology, and parasitic diseases of plants and animals, including humans.", "tags": "VETMI", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4054, "title": "Introduction to Wines and Vines", "code": "VIEN 1104", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Broad introduction to grape cultivation and wine fermentations. Topics include history of winemaking, viticultural regions, vineyard and winery practices, wine flavor chemistry and microbiology, and wine flavor perception. Tasting wines in class illustrates the components that determine wine quality.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4055, "title": "Introduction to Wines and Vines Laboratory", "code": "VIEN 1105", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Students learn in the vineyard, teaching winery, laboratory, and on a winery field trip. Includes practice of techniques relevant to growing grapes, making and evaluating wines, and writing scientific papers.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4056, "title": "Fermentation of Food", "code": "VIEN 2206", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Fermentation of food changed the course of human history. This course will help interested students learn about fermentations, generally, and concentrate on examples within major categories of fermented foods: fruit, vegetable, dairy, soybean, and grain. We will describe the cultures that developed and consume different fermented foods, and how microbes interact with their environments and with each other during food fermentations. Students in the course will develop an overview of the scientific principles and practices behind fermentation, and gain practical experience in sensory evaluation while increasing their enjoyment of foods.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4057, "title": "The Science and Technology of Beer", "code": "VIEN 2310", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "This course uses beer and brewing science as a starting point to explore topics in fermentation biology, food chemistry, food processing, and sensory perception. Students will learn to recognize the major sensory and chemical features that distinguish different beer styles or defects, and understand how raw materials and choices during production lead to these outcomes. Several guest lectures, including brewers and producers of raw materials, will also be included.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4058, "title": "Cider Production: Apples and Fermented Juice", "code": "VIEN 2340", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Hard cider consumption has expanded rapidly over the last decade. Want to learn why? This course covers the scientific basis of cider production from orchard to bottle and provides an overview of the history and culture of cider. We will also review the current market trends and the economics of growing hard cider apples and producing cider. The suitability of producing cider will be contrasted with wine production in NYS. Each class will include tastings so that students receive a robust overview of typical cider flavors, an introduction to different cider styles, and gain an ability to determine the cause of off-flavors and other faults.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4059, "title": "Distillation Principles and Practices", "code": "VIEN 2360", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "As an introduction to the science of distillation this course uses the study of pre-fermentation and fermentation biology, phase separation and vapor-liquid equilibrium, and sensory perception as a vehicle to explore the role of science and technology in the production and enjoyment of distilled beverages. Sensory samples and commercial samples of spirits will be used to illustrate the sensory properties and chemical components which define different types of distilled spirits, with the goal of understanding how different raw materials, processing, and aging impact these sensory properties.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4060, "title": "Wines and Grapes: Composition and Analysis", "code": "VIEN 2400", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Investigates the composition of grapes and wine and the most common analytical tools used in their evaluation. Both the theoretical and practical aspects of grape and wine analyses are considered.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4061, "title": "Spring Vineyard Practicum", "code": "VIEN 2620", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "This course is designed to develop the relevant skills required for Winter and Spring vineyard management, as well as budget and business plan formation. Focused on hands-on, active learning, students will spend significant time in the Cornell University vineyards.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4062, "title": "The Science and Technology of Beer Laboratory", "code": "VIEN 4310", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "An introduction to the practical application of brewing. Students will make several different styles of beer in a laboratory setting to understand how raw materials and processing technologies influence the production of recognizable beer styles. Emphasis will be placed on sanitation, raw material selection, yeast selection, and the manipulation of process variables to control product outcomes. Students will also learn the alternatives in current practice for finishing, carbonation, and packaging.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4063, "title": "Distillation Principles and Practices Laboratory", "code": "VIEN 4360", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "As an introduction to the science of distillation this course uses the study of pre-fermentation and fermentation biology, phase separation and vapor-liquid equilibrium, and sensory perception as a vehicle to explore the role of science and technology in the production and enjoyment of distilled beverages. Sensory samples and commercial samples of spirits will be used to illustrate the sensory properties and chemical components which define different types of distilled spirits, with the goal of understanding how different raw materials, processing, and aging impact these sensory properties.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4064, "title": "Advanced Viticulture Topics", "code": "VIEN 4460", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "This course is designed to delve in-depth into the scientific literature that should drive decision making in vineyard production systems. We will critically evaluate studies from around the world and discuss their applicability to winegrape production systems in a range of climates.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4065, "title": "Winemaking Theory and Practice II", "code": "VIEN 4700", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Winemaking Theory and Practice II specifically addresses the non-fermentation aspects of wine production. This area includes fining, stabilization, adjustments, clarification, filtration, bottling, general sanitation, government regulations, oxidation, aging, contributions of oak, and production equipment and materials.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4066, "title": "Winemaking Theory and Practice II Laboratory", "code": "VIEN 4710", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "In the laboratory of part II of the Winemaking Theory and Practice courses, students continue working with wines produced in the preceding fall term, focusing on aging options, stabilization, fining, and packaging. The laboratory also provides advanced training in wine chemical and sensory analysis.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4067, "title": "Viticulture and Enology Internship", "code": "VIEN 4960", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Internships provide experiential learning opportunities in real-life winery and vineyard circumstances where classroom knowledge is applied and evaluated. Students are able to master new skills, compare pilot-scale with commercial-scale winemaking practices, solve problems, interact in workplace situations, and build networks for future career opportunities. While working with industry mentors, students apply classroom knowledge, critical thinking, and self-directed learning skills to work effectively. Learning contract and documentation required for credit. May be taken twice.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4068, "title": "Individual Study in Viticulture and Enology", "code": "VIEN 4970", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Undergraduate individual study in viticulture and enology under the direction of one or more faculty members. Since topics vary, the course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4069, "title": "Undergraduate Teaching Experience", "code": "VIEN 4980", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Students assist in teaching a course appropriate to their previous training and experience. TA duties are determined by student and instructor(s) of course. Since topics vary, the course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4070, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Viticulture and Enology", "code": "VIEN 4990", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "Undergraduate individual study or research in viticulture and enology under the direction of one or more faculty members. Since topics vary, the course may be repeated for credit.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4071, "title": "Wine and Grapes: Composition and Analysis", "code": "VIEN 5400", "subject": "VIEN", "descr": "VIEN 5400 is a 2-credit course (1 credit lecture, 1 credit lab) with an emphasis on understanding the practice and theory behind analytical techniques routinely used in the wine and grape industries, and the statistical tools used to evaluate the effectiveness of both analyst and assay. The course is designed to provide practical skills complementary to other courses. VIEN 5400 is restricted to graduate students; undergraduates should enroll in VIEN 2400.", "tags": "VIEN", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4072, "title": "Elements of Vietnamese Language and Culture", "code": "VIET 1100", "subject": "VIET", "descr": "This course is designed for anyone wishing to gain some basic Vietnamese language skills and learn various elements of Vietnamese culture. Those who are planning to take short trips to Vietnam will find this course particularly useful.\u00a0 Due to the flip classroom nature of the course, it is intended for sophomores and up.", "tags": "VIET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4073, "title": "Elementary Vietnamese II", "code": "VIET 1122", "subject": "VIET", "descr": "This course gives a thorough grounding in basic speaking, listening, reading, and writing skills in Vietnamese.", "tags": "VIET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4074, "title": "Intermediate Vietnamese II", "code": "VIET 2202", "subject": "VIET", "descr": "Continuing instruction in spoken\u00a0 and written Vietnamese with special emphasis on expanding vocabulary and\u00a0 reading ability.", "tags": "VIET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4075, "title": "Advanced Vietnamese II", "code": "VIET 3302", "subject": "VIET", "descr": "Continuing instruction in spoken and written Vietnamese. The course emphasizes on enlarging vocabulary and increasing reading speed by reading various genres and styles of prose.", "tags": "VIET", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4076, "title": "Introduction to Visual Studies", "code": "VISST 2000", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "This course provides an introduction to modes of vision and the historical impact of visual images, visual structures, and visual space on culture, communication, and politics. It examines all aspects of culture that communicate through visual means, including 20th-century visual technologies\u2014photography, cinema, video, etc., and their historical corollaries. The production and consumption of images, objects, and events is studied in diverse cultures. Students develop the critical skills necessary to appreciate how the approaches that define visual studies complicate traditional models of defining and analyzing art objects.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|ETM-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4077, "title": "Introduction to Latin American Art", "code": "VISST 2550", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce students to Latin American art from the pre-Columbian period to the present.\u00a0 It will cover the arts of ancient civilizations including the Olmec, Maya, Aztec, Moche, and Inca, as well as the colonial, modern, and contemporary arts of Latin America and the Latino/a diaspora.\u00a0 Major themes include the relationship between art and religion, innovations and transformations in Latin American art across time, art and identity, as well as Indigenous and Afro-Latin American contributions to the visual arts.\u00a0 This course examines the societal relevance of images across Latin American cultures by paying close attention to the historical and political contexts in which they were created.\u00a0 Course readings are drawn from the disciplines of art history, anthropology, and history, along with theoretical perspectives on colonialism, postcolonialism, identity, race, and ethnicity.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4078, "title": "Jewish Films and Filmmakers: Hollywood and Beyond", "code": "VISST 2790", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "What does it mean to call a film is \"Jewish\"? Does it have to represent Jewish life? Does it have to feature characters identifiable as Jews? If artists who identify as Jews\u2014actors, directors, screenwriters, composers\u2014play significant roles in a film's production does that make it Jewish? Our primary point of entry into these questions will be Hollywood, from the industry's early silent films, through the period generally considered classical, down to the present day. We will also study films produced overseas, in countries that may include Israel, Egypt, France, Italy, and Germany. Our discussions will be enriched by contextual material drawn from film studies, cultural studies, Jewish studies, American studies, and other related fields. Students will be expected to view a significant number of films outside of class\u2014an average of one per week\u2014and engage with them through writing and in-class discussion. The directors, screenwriters, composers, and actors whose work we will study may include: Charlie Chaplin, Irving Berlin, Al Jolson, Fanny Brice, Billy Wilder, Barbra Streisand, Woody Allen, Mel Brooks, Aviva Kempner, Joan Micklin Silver, the Marx Brothers, and the Coen Brothers.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4079, "title": "Hieroglyphs to HTML: History of Writing", "code": "VISST 2812", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "An introduction to the history and theory of writing systems from cuneiform to the alphabet, historical and new writing media, and the complex relationship of writing technologies to human language and culture. Through hands-on activities and collaborative work, students will explore the shifting definitions of \"writing\" and the diverse ways in which cultures through time have developed and used writing systems. We will also investigate the traditional divisions of \"oral\" vs. \"written\" and consider how digital technologies have affected how we use and think about writing in encoding systems from Morse code to emoji.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|HST-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4080, "title": "Video and New Media: Art, Theory, Politics", "code": "VISST 3115", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "The course will offer an overview of video art, alternative documentary video, and digital installation and networked art. It will analyze four phases of video and new media: (1) the development of video from its earliest turn away from television; (2) video's relation to art and installation; (3) video's migration into digital art; (4) the relation of video and new media to visual theory and social movements. Screenings will include early political and feminist video (Ant Farm, Rosler, Paper Tiger TV, Jones), conceptual video of the '80s and '90s (Vasulka, Lucier, Viola, Hill), gay and multicultural video of the '90s (Muntadas, Riggs, Piper, Fung, Parmar), networked and activist new media of the 21st century (Critical Art Ensemble, Electronic Disturbance Theater, SubRosa, Preemptive Media). Secondary theoretical readings on postmodernism, video theory, multicultural theory, and digital culture will provide students with a cultural and political context for the discussion of video and new media style, dissemination, and reception.", "tags": "LA-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4081, "title": "Global Cinema II", "code": "VISST 3176", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Global Cinema I and II together offer an overview of international film history from the late nineteenth century to today. Through a focus on key films and significant epochs, the course traces the evolution of form, style and genre, the medium's changing technologies and business models, as well as film's relation to broader cultural, social and political contexts. Screenings of narrative, documentary and experimental films will be accompanied by readings in film theory and history.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4082, "title": "Human Perception: Application to Computer Graphics, Art, and Visual Display", "code": "VISST 3342", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Our present technology allows us to transmit and display information through a variety of media. To make the most of these media channels, it is important to consider the limitations and abilities of the human observer. The course considers a number of applied aspects of human perception with an emphasis on the display of visual information. Topics include \"three-dimensional\" display systems, color theory, spatial and temporal limitations of the visual systems, attempts at subliminal communication, and \"visual\" effects in film and television.", "tags": "KCM-AS|ETM-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4083, "title": "Contemporary Television", "code": "VISST 3463", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "This course considers issues, approaches, and complexities in the contemporary television landscape. As television has changed drastically over the past fifteen years, this course provides students with a deeper understanding of the changes in narratives, technologies, forms, and platforms that structure/restructure the televisual world. Students will grapple with how \"new media\" forms such as web-series and on-demand internet streaming services have changed primetime television. We will balance our look at television shows with nuanced readings about the televisual media industry. By watching, analyzing, and critiquing the powerful medium of television, students will situate their understanding within a broader consideration of the medium's regulation, production, distribution, and reception in the network and post-network era.", "tags": "CA-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4084, "title": "Computing Cultures", "code": "VISST 3560", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Computers are powerful tools for working, playing, thinking, and living. Laptops, PDAs, webcams, cell phones, and iPods are not just devices, they also provide narratives, metaphors, and ways of seeing the world. This course critically examines how computing technology and society shape each other and how this plays out in our everyday lives. Identifies how computers, networks, and information technologies reproduce, reinforce, and rework existing cultural trends, norms, and values. Looks at the values embodied in the cultures of computing and considers alternative ways to imagine, build, and work with information technologies.", "tags": "CA-AS|SSC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4085, "title": "Women in New Media Art", "code": "VISST 3651", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "The work of women artists\u00a0has been central to the development of new media art. These rich and varied practices include installation, virtual reality environments, net art, digital video, networked performance, tactical media, video games, remix and robotics. This course will begin with an overview of feminist art and early experiments in performance and video art to then investigate multiple currents of digital media. Discussions will focus primarily on works by women artists from Europe, the Americas and Australia.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4086, "title": "Technology and the Moving Body I", "code": "VISST 3758", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Formally titled \"technosomakinesics,\" this class works to expand the specific aesthetics related to dance as embodied performance. Included in the process is the analysis of built environments that both inspire and are designed to be inhabited by these disciplines. This studio course explores the resulting neoperformance forms being created within the range of digital media processing; such as gallery installations, multimedia dance-theatre, personal interactive media (games and digital art) and web projects. Computer-imaging and sound-production programs are examined and used in the class work (human form-animation software, vocal recording and digital editing, digital-imaging tools. The new context of digital performance raises questions concerning the use of traditional lighting, set, costume, and sound-design techniques that are examined as they are repositioned by digital-translation tools with the goal of creating experimental and/or conceptual multimedia performance and/or installation work. Theoretical texts on dance and theatrical performance, film studies, the dynamic social body, architecture, and digital technology are also used to support conceptual creative work.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4087, "title": "Topics in Feminist Media Arts", "code": "VISST 4153", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Topic: Feminist Posthumanisms in the Visual Arts. While some feminist works of art in new media address traditional feminist concerns such as the female body, identity, representation, feminist history, and consumerism, others directly engage with recent theoretical currents on the Anthropocene, posthumanism and new materialisms that view humans and non-humans as co-dependent. Non-humans include environmental factors, animals, plants, bacteria, and machines. This seminar will examine work by contemporary artists engaged with posthumanist perspectives in relation to a body of relevant theoretical texts and previous feminist media arts.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|SCD-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4088, "title": "Topics in Colonial Encounters", "code": "VISST 4160", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "The colonial period in Latin America (circa 1521-1820s) witnessed the formation of one of the most diverse societies in the world.\u00a0 Labor regimes, religious activities, marriage alliances, and commercial contacts engendered by the Spanish colonial enterprise brought Spaniards, Africans, and Indigenous peoples into dynamic contact.\u00a0 This cross-fertilization of cultures resulted in the construction of new cultural categories and colonial identities whose reverberations continue to be felt into the present day.\u00a0 This seminar explores the role that visual culture played in the articulation of identity in Latin America.\u00a0 For the purposes of this seminar, \"identity\" can be loosely defined as the overlapping allegiances to which one ascribes, whether racial, cultural, gendered, religious, or community-based.\u00a0 The visual culture of colonial Latin America can reveal multitudes on the construction of self and community across temporal and geographical contexts.\u00a0 We will explore a variety of colonial Latin American objects and images, including paintings, textiles, and material culture.\u00a0 Our discussions of images will be guided by readings on hybridity, coloniality, cross-cultural exchange, and the early modern Atlantic world.", "tags": "LA-AS|ALC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4089, "title": "Adaptation: Text/Theatricality", "code": "VISST 4260", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4090, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "VISST 4658", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "CA-AS|ALC-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4091, "title": "Film and Video Production II", "code": "VISST 4793", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "A continuation of\u00a0PMA 3570, Introduction to Visual Storytelling, students will dive deeper into creating story driven short form narratives. Students will have the opportunity to develop and produce a short film over the course of the semester. The expectation is the follow through of the filmmaking process, from story development, preproduction, production, post production and distribution. Students are expected to collaborate heavily and crew on each other's film productions, in various roles. Final film projects will be screened in a public, open-campus event at the end of the semester.", "tags": "LA-AS|VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4092, "title": "Fabricating Race: Art, Clothing, Resistance", "code": "VISST 6658", "subject": "VISST", "descr": "Often referred to as a \"second skin\", aesthetic representations of clothing open the possibility of reimagining the visual economy of race\u2014the belief that race can be located in the body's visible features and characteristics. Bringing together the research methods of visual culture, material culture, and literary studies, and moving among photographic, painted, and literary portrayals by and of African Americans, we will explore fashion and clothing as aesthetic practices of everyday life that defy racism's flattening and objectifying effects. The course will pay particular attention to artwork that explores the multiple valences of \"fabrication\"\u2014working with materials, making and fictionalizing\u2014to reveal and reconfigure the psychic consequences of living under the gaze of white dominance. For longer description and instructor bio visit\u00a0The Society for the Humanities website.", "tags": "VISST", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4093, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Biomedical Sciences", "code": "VTBMS 2990", "subject": "VTBMS", "descr": "Mentored research apprenticeship program designed to give laboratory experience in applied epidemiology to qualified unmatriculated high school students (participating in Cornell Summer College) or Cornell underclassmen.\u00a0\u00a0\nStudents are placed in a research laboratory with a designed project under the direct supervision of a research associate (upper-level graduate student, post-doc, or faculty member).\u00a0 \u00a0Students are graded on preparation participation in laboratory academic life and appropriate acquisition of techniques.\u00a0 At the end of the six-week session, they are expected to give a brief (15 to 20 minute) oral presentation on their work and submit a manuscript in a form suitable for publication.\u00a0 The faculty director of the laboratory has ultimate responsibility for evaluating each student's work and assigning the grade.", "tags": "VTBMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4094, "title": "Special Projects in Anatomy", "code": "VTBMS 6000", "subject": "VTBMS", "descr": "Students work individually with a faculty member to pursue an area of particular interest that, typically, is not part of the established curriculum.", "tags": "VTBMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4095, "title": "The Practice of Laboratory Animal Medicine", "code": "VTBMS 7020", "subject": "VTBMS", "descr": "A laboratory animal veterinarian must be trained in the regulatory aspects of research and teaching utilizing animals; in addition they must understand the principles of facility management and design.\u00a0 Also, to work with researchers, a lab animal veterinarian must have knowledge of basic research methodologies and animal welfare issues.\u00a0 This course may also be of interest to other veterinarians, veterinary students, and researchers who wish to understand the workings of the specialized field that oversees and enables the use of animals in research and teaching.\u00a0 The topics covered include:\u00a0 Laboratory Animal Medicine: Laws, Regulations, and Policies; Design and Management of Animal Facilities; Anesthesia, Analgesia, and Euthanasia; Techniques of Experimentation; Control of Biohazards used in animal research; Selected zoonoses/xenozoonoses; Genetic monitoring; Transgenic and knock-out mice; Factors influencing animal research; Animal models in biomedical research; Research in Lab Animal and Comparative Medicine; Lab Animal Behavior.\u00a0 The course will meet for 1 hour weekly and will extend over the course of two years, though each term is independent and can be taken separately.", "tags": "VTBMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4096, "title": "The Biology and Diseases of Laboratory Animals", "code": "VTBMS 7030", "subject": "VTBMS", "descr": "Intended for veterinarians entering the field of laboratory animal medicine.\u00a0 It may also be of interest to other veterinarians, veterinary students, and researchers with a basic knowledge of anatomy and pathology who use animals in research or teaching.\u00a0 This course will cover the main laboratory animal species (rodents, rabbits, non-human primates, ruminants, swine, dogs, cats, ferrets, reptiles, amphibians, and fish).\u00a0 The biology, husbandry, diseases, pathology, and main research uses of these species will be covered.\u00a0 The course will meet for 2 hours weekly and will extend over the course of two years.", "tags": "VTBMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4097, "title": "Biomedical and Biological Sciences Seminar", "code": "VTBMS 7200", "subject": "VTBMS", "descr": "Designed to train graduate students in public presentation of scientific data. Students are required to give a seminar on their research, and provide constructive feedback to others on the quality of their presentation and data.", "tags": "VTBMS", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4098, "title": "Neuroanatomy", "code": "VTMED 5220", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course introduces students to the anatomy and clinically relevant functioning of the nervous system, with a strong emphasis on the central nervous system. Students begin by studying the gross anatomy of the brain, spinal cord, cranial cavity and vertebral canal including the meninges and vasculature associated with the CNS. Clinical applications in anesthesia and radiology, such as epidural anesthesia, myelography and MRI are covered. As the course progresses, students learn how the nervous system functions in various contexts including spinal and cranial nerve reflexes, autonomic regulation, somatosensory and visual pathways\u00a0 and motor control. Clinical applications covered include anatomical localization of nervous system lesions based on neurological exam findings and the effects of pain and stress on aspects of physiology via CNS pathways.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4099, "title": "Function and Dysfunction: Part I (Foundation Course IIIa)", "code": "VTMED 5300", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Designed to develop students' understanding of how an animal maintains itself as a functional organism; how the maintenance of function is achieved through the integration of different organ systems; how tissue structure relates to tissue function; how injury alters structure and leads to dysfunction, manifested as clinical signs; how organ function can be assessed; and how organ function can be modulated pharmacologically.\u00a0 The course incorporates aspects of physiology, biochemistry, cell biology, histology, pathology and histopathology, clinical pathology and pharmacology.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4100, "title": "Animal Health and Disease: Part I (Foundation Course V)", "code": "VTMED 5500", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Commencing with sections on Clinical Pathology and Fluid and Electrolyte Disorders, the course progresses to population medicine, introduction to surgery lectures and labs, respiratory, anesthesiology, radiology, cardiology, ophthalmology, dermatology, with relevant aspects of applied pharmacology included in some sections. The course is presented on a system - oriented basis, focusing on clinical signs of alteration in function, pathophysiology of clinical signs, and strategies for diagnosis and treatment of the most important veterinary diseases. This course provides a sound foundation for clinical rotations in Foundation Course VI.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4101, "title": "Diagnostic Imaging", "code": "VTMED 5520", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Diagnostic imaging is an integral part of the management of clinical veterinary patients; from screening for breeding selection or racing prospects, to diagnosis of disease, to evaluation of therapeutic interventions. While there are multiple modalities available, the majority of imaging studies performed are radiographs (70% or more) and ultrasound examinations; these modalities will be the focus of the course. Currently, most veterinary diagnostic imaging studies are interpreted by general practitioners, not specialized radiologists.\u00a0 As such, this course exists to train veterinary students for success at the level of the general practitioner. This is an 8 week course consisting of weekly lectures, labs, and imaging case file study. These activities will include large and small animal patients and are designed to optimize the students' development of visual pattern recognition, retention of material, and ability to correctly interpret imaging findings in light of clinical presentation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4102, "title": "Ambulatory and Production Medicine/Dermatology", "code": "VTMED 5600", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "WEEK 1 During Ambulatory rotation, students accompany clinicians on farm and stable calls to learn skills and procedures necessary for operation of a modern veterinary practice offering primary care to large animal clients. Routine herd health visits are conducted for cattle, horses, sheep, and goats. In addition to assisting with routine scheduled work, students participate in diagnosis and medical or surgical treatment of ill or injured animals. This includes rotating assignments for night duty.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4103, "title": "Small Animal Community Practice", "code": "VTMED 5601", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Our community practice, housed in a stand-alone facility as of June 2018, offers full services for our patients of all life stages including preventive medicine, radiology, dentistry, and surgery. Our primary care practice is designed to provide our clinical year students with experience in appointments, procedures, surgery, client communications, and cloud-based electronic medical records to prepare them as entry level veterinarians upon graduation from the CUCVM. The goals and design of the Small Animal Community Practice is to mimic a non-academic general practice setting where students act as primary case clinicians collecting histories, performing physical exams, assessing their patients, and creating diagnostic and therapeutic plans individualized to a given patient and client. Student clinicians are supervised by rotation faculty and supported by licensed veterinary technicians.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4104, "title": "Small Animal Medicine", "code": "VTMED 5602", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Structured to provide supervised clinical experience in the practice of companion small animal medicine.\u00a0 The course is conducted in the Companion Animal Hospital of the Cornell University Hospital for Animals.\u00a0 Students interact directly with clients presenting their pets for primary or referral medical care.\u00a0 Under the supervision of the clinical faculty and staff, the students are expected to formulate and carry out plans for the diagnostic evaluation and medical management of these patients.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4105, "title": "Small Animal Soft Tissue Surgery Service/Small Animal Orthopedic Surgery", "code": "VTMED 5603", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This rotation exposes student to the practice of both soft tissue and orthopedic surgery under hospital conditions. Students participate in office hours; diagnostic techniques; planning of therapy, daily care of dogs and cats under the direction of an intern, surgical residents in training, and faculty. Students assist experienced surgeons in the operating room. Client communications and the basics of practice are emphasized. Students are expected to be able to successfully perform an orthopedic examination and localize the lameness by the end of the rotations. On soft tissue, students are expected to be able to formulate appropriate diagnostic, surgical, and post operative management plans for common soft tissue procedures by the end of the rotation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4106, "title": "Large Animal Medicine Service/Large Animal Surgery", "code": "VTMED 5604", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "WEEK 1: During Large Animal Medicine Service, students assist faculty, technicians, and residents in the diagnosis and care of patients. The goal is for students to acquire knowledge and skills in history taking, physical examination, selection and completion of appropriate ancillary tests, diagnosis, treatment and patient care. Daily rounds and discussions are used to monitor patient progress and further educate students. If time allows, sit-down rounds to discuss medical disorders are provided.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4107, "title": "Large Animal Surgery/Large Animal Medicine Service", "code": "VTMED 5605", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "WEEK 1 Provides supervised clinical experience in the practice of large animal surgery. Under the direction of faculty and house staff, students participate in the diagnosis, surgical treatment, and care of patients presented to the Equine and Farm Animal Hospital. Training through patient care is supplemented by formal rounds and didactic instruction.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4108, "title": "Anesthesiology Service", "code": "VTMED 5606", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Designed to provide clinical experience in the use of anesthetics in small companion animals, horses, and some farm animals.\u00a0 Students participate in selecting suitable anesthetic techniques for patients in the Cornell University Hospital for Animals and then implement those techniques under the supervision of faculty and residents.\u00a0 The goal is for students to learn the skills and thDesigned to provide clinical experience in the use of anesthetics in small companion animals, horses, and some farm animals. Students planning to enter equine, production, or mixed animal practice who are taking their second anesthesia rotation can choose to spend this rotation exclusively in the Equine and Nemo Farm Animal Hospitals if desired. Students participate in selecting suitable anesthetic techniques for patients in the Cornell University Hospital for Animals and then implement those techniques under the supervision of faculty, residents, and technicians and residents. The goal is for students to learn the skills and thought processes necessary to perform safe anesthesia in a modern veterinary practice.\u00a0ought processes necessary to perform safe anesthesia in a modern veterinary practice.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4109, "title": "Dermatology Service/Ambulatory and Production Medicine", "code": "VTMED 5607", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "WEEK 1 During Dermatology rotation, students participate in the diagnosis and management of skin disorders in small and large animals. Patients are examined by appointment and through consultation with other hospital services. Mandatory rounds are conducted either in-person or through recordings as determined by the rotation's service chief.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4110, "title": "Ophthalmology Service", "code": "VTMED 5608", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "A large inpatient and outpatient referral case load plus numerous inpatient consultations for other hospital services allow students to become confident acquiring the beginning skills needed for diagnostic ophthalmology. Students perform many routine ophthalmic diagnostic tests (Schirmer tear testing, fluorescein staining, tonometry) and learn and gain confidence using indirect ophthalmoscopes, slit lamps, and tonometers.\u00a0 Students are introduced to other ocular diagnostic tests, including culture, cytology, ultrasound, as well as more advanced diagnostic modalities according to the caseload. The rotation provides students an opportunity to observe common and uncommon therapeutic and surgical procedures. Many of the ophthalmology cases are complex referral cases but adequate routine case material is presented to prepare students for the common eye problems seen in veterinary practice.\u00a0 A competent ocular examination is the goal of this rotation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4111, "title": "Pathology Service/Radiology Service", "code": "VTMED 5609", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "WEEK 1 Students will work with the faculty and residents of the Section of Anatomic Pathology to perform necropsies and prepare written reports. Students will also spend time with faculty and/or residents in Parasitology, the Veterinary Support Service, and Section of Clinical Pathology. Instruction will focus on diagnostic testing, to include collection and submission of samples and interpretation of results.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4112, "title": "Radiology Service/Pathology Service", "code": "VTMED 5610", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "WEEK 1 Clinical experience in the imaging section of the Cornell University Hospital for Animals. Students will gain hands-on experience acquiring radiographic and ultrasonographic images of patients under treatment in the Cornell University Hospital for Animals, and in laboratory exercises. Students also will participate in virtual cases rounds and use on-line teaching materials relative to radiographic and ultrasonographic technology.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4113, "title": "Small Animal Clinical Emergency and Critical Care Medicine", "code": "VTMED 5611", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Management of both emergent and critical cases represents a significant component of the practice of veterinary medicine. The focus of this clinical rotation will be the development of a knowledge base and a comprehensive set of skills necessary for a veterinarian to perform adequately in these areas, within a structured format. These skills will include the appropriate evaluation (triage) and stabilization of emergency patients, the management of post-operative and other critical patients, and sensitive and effective client communication. Participants access relevant information from various sources related to emergency and critical care medicine and understand and apply these principles to clinical cases. Students will participate in the management of incoming emergency cases as well as having primary patient care responsibilities in both intensive care and intermediate care units. Students will work closely with interns, residents, technicians, and faculty on the Emergency & Critical Care Service to become familiar with technical and nursing procedures as well as to develop clinical skills and a systematic approach to clinical cases.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4114, "title": "Fourth-Year Seminar", "code": "VTMED 5612", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Gives the student the responsibility and opportunity of selecting and studying a disease entity on the basis of a case or series of cases, or to conduct a short-term, clinically oriented research project under the direction of a faculty member.\u00a0 In either case, an oral report will be presented at a weekly seminar.\u00a0 A written report is also submitted within 2 weeks after the seminar.\u00a0 All participants are encouraged to foster an atmosphere in which discussion, exchange of ideas, and the airing of controversial opinions might flourish. Fourth year students and all faculty and staff members are also invited and encouraged to attend.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4115, "title": "Small Animal Orthopedic Surgery Service/Small Animal Soft Tissue Surgery Service", "code": "VTMED 5613", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This rotation exposes student to the practice of both soft tissue and orthopedic surgery under hospital conditions. Students participate in office hours; diagnostic techniques; planning of therapy, daily care of dogs and cats under the direction of an intern, surgical residents in training, and faculty. Students assist experienced surgeons in the operating room. Client communications and the basics of practice are emphasized. Students are expected to be able to successfully perform an orthopedic examination and localize the lameness by the end of the rotations. On soft tissue, students are expected to be able to formulate appropriate diagnostic, surgical, and postoperative management plans for common soft tissue procedures by the end of the rotation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4116, "title": "Veterinary Practice: Ethics and Animal Care (Foundation Course VIIb)", "code": "VTMED 5702", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Consists of lectures, small group discussion sessions, and PE labs. Lectures average 2 hours each week, covering a variety of topics with some ethical dimension of importance to professional veterinarians.\u00a0 Students participate in two small group discussion sessions in which they discuss topics of interest and work through provided scenarios.\u00a0 In addition, each student chooses a topic to investigate in depth and writes a research paper.\u00a0 Laboratories review physical examination of the four major species.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4117, "title": "Veterinary Practice: Communication Skills (Foundation Course VIIc)", "code": "VTMED 5703", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course introduces students to medical record keeping and to the communication and leadership skills and techniques necessary for effective communication with clients, professional colleagues, and co-workers. In addition, students participate in small group communication exercises working with actors (simulated clients). Core career development and personal financial planning material is introduced in this course, through talks on interview skills, personal finance and loan repayment, and preparing a professional resume and cover letter. The laboratory portion of the course includes clinical skills labs in which students are introduced to basic procedures including IV, SQ and IM injection performed on small animals, cows, and horses. In addition, students participate in a core surgical skills lab; content includes review material and introduction of new suture patterns.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4118, "title": "Veterinary Practice: Public Health (Foundation Course VIIe)", "code": "VTMED 5705", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Complements and augments material learned in VTMED 5400. Emphasizes veterinary public health through topics including food safety, routes of disease transmission, rabies control programs, zoonotic diseases, and emerging infectious diseases.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4119, "title": "Anatomy of the Carnivore", "code": "VTMED 6100", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Students study carnivore anatomy by detailed systematic and regional dissection of the cat, with comparison to the dog.\u00a0 Student dissection is supplemented with prosections, radiographs, palpation of live cats, and exercises focusing on surgical approaches.\u00a0 There are opportunities to dissect other carnivores, such as the ferret and the fox, depending on availability of specimens.\u00a0 The lectures augment the laboratory dissection, and introduce the student to clinical anatomy of the cat and functional morphological comparative features in the Order Carnivora, as well as introduce topics in feline medicine and surgery.\u00a0 Students do an independent research project on the carnivore species of their choice, and give an oral presentation on this to the class.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4120, "title": "Anatomy of the Horse", "code": "VTMED 6101", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Organized as a traditional anatomy course that relies primarily on students learning the anatomy of horses through hands-on dissection laboratories augmented by lectures and highlighted by clinical correlations. An understanding of anatomy that provides the foundation for surgery and medicine. Its relevance to clinical practice is emphasized by the regional approach to dissection. Most lectures emphasize structural-functional correlations that are unique or important in the horse. Student dissection cadavers will be supplemented by skeletal materials, radiographs, models, preserved pre-dissected specimens, and fresh specimens when they are available.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4121, "title": "Anatomy of the Ruminant", "code": "VTMED 6102", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Covers the regional anatomy of several ruminant species using dissection laboratories and lectures. Emphasizes the functional consequences of structural modifications and anatomical features relevant to clinical practice. Microscopic anatomy is correlated with gross anatomy when appropriate to relate structure to function and to provide a foundation for later study in pathology. Student dissection material is supplemented by skeletal materials, radiographs, models, predissected specimens, and postmortem specimens. Students are required to complete an independent study project on a relevant subject of their choice. Assessment includes practical examination.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4122, "title": "Comparative Anatomy: Pattern and Function", "code": "VTMED 6103", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The goal of this course is to study anatomical variability among amniotes (mammals, birds, and reptiles) and anamniote (amphibian & fish) species.\u00a0 This is accomplished by relating the anatomy of major organ systems in each species to a common basic pattern and considering the differences in a functional perspective.\u00a0 Five major systems are explored (integumentary, locomotory, cardiorespiratory, digestive, and urogenital) in a variety of species as available.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4123, "title": "Anatomy and Histology of Fish", "code": "VTMED 6120", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides an overview of the diversity of anatomy and histology of fish. Students participate in lecture, discussion, and laboratory exercises to review the major organ systems. Extensive use of virtual microscopy and assigned readings is expected. Each student prepares a term project and makes one oral presentation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4124, "title": "Applied Pharmacology with an Emphasis on Antimicrobial Therapy", "code": "VTMED 6324", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Familiarizes students with antimicrobial drugs used in veterinary practice.\u00a0 Builds on fundamental pharmacological and microbiological principles covered in Foundation Courses III and IV and considers antibacterial, antifungal, antiparasitic, and antiviral drugs from the point of view of unique pharmacokinetic properties, indications for clinical use, and potential toxicities as the basis for rational use.Recent cases in the teaching hospital will be used as the basis to discuss drug protocols and potential alternatives.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4125, "title": "Veterinary Clinical Toxicology", "code": "VTMED 6328", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides veterinary students with a solid introduction to concepts and principles of toxicology and how they are applied in the clinical setting.\u00a0 Students learn about specific common toxicants, clinical signs in affected animals, and treatment protocols for the toxicants in question.\u00a0 Students also gain an understanding of the clinical approach to suspected or unknown toxicoses, sample collection and handling, and resources available for clinical toxicologic problems.\u00a0 The course is conducted with three one-hour lectures per week and one hour-long large group discussion per week.\u00a0 Grades are based on weekly homework assignments, a midterm and a final exam.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4126, "title": "Basic Nutrition for Veterinary Students", "code": "VTMED 6330", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Introduction to nutrition, including basic concepts in metabolism from a comparative aspect.\u00a0 This class will focus primarily on monogastric nutrition with some comparisons to hindgut and foregut fermenters.\u00a0 Lifestage nutrition and common ailments including osteoarthirits, obesity, immunology and cognitive dysfuntion will be highlighted as common ailments for nutritional intervention in companion animals (dogs, cats, horses).", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4127, "title": "Transboundary and Emerging Diseases of Animals", "code": "VTMED 6420", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Describes the etiology, epidemiology, clinical signs, gross pathology, differential diagnosis, methods of spread, reservoir hosts, and control of the most important foreign and emerging animal diseases that present serious economic threats to the United States. Several foreign and emerging animal diseases are also important zoonoses affecting public health. The impact of foot-and mouth disease, avian influenza virus, bovine spongiform encephalopathy, and chronic wasting disease are good examples of the need to emphasize the importance of these diseases to practicing veterinarians so they in turn can educate producers, consumers, and the public in general.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4128, "title": "Epidemiology of Infectious Diseases", "code": "VTMED 6421", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Introduces the epidemiologic methods used in infectious disease investigations.\u00a0 Also discusses the importance of surveillance systems in detecting modern epidemics and in the development of effective disease prevention and control strategies.\u00a0 Emphasizes understanding the relationships between the host, the agent and the environment as they relate to disease causation.\u00a0 Explores contemporary epidemiologic methods applicable to old diseases that remain real or potential problems, newly emerging infectious diseases, and nosocomial infections.\u00a0 Selected diseases are discussed to clarify the role of epidemiology in understanding the pathogenesis of infectious processes in individuals and groups of animals.\u00a0 The students have the opportunity to apply the methods learned to actual disease problems and write an epidemiologic report that might lead to a publication in a peer reviewed scientific journal.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4129, "title": "Clinical Diagnostic Parasitology", "code": "VTMED 6423", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The course is intended to give students experience in diagnosing parasitic infections by performing appropriate parasitological testing methods on clinical samples from patients on their rotation. Students evaluate the test results in terms of treatment or management of the infections. If clinical specimens are not available, appropriate materials are provided for study and evaluation. Ambulatory students typically do qualitative and quantitative flotations on samples from large animal cases they have encountered that week. In CPS, one hour is spent testing samples from current dog and cat patients, while a second hour is devoted to a discussion of the treatment of common endo-and ecto-parasites. Pathology students typically examine and identify intact parasites they retrieved from various organs at necropsy. This course is considered to be a logical extension to Foundation Course IV, Host, Agent, and Defense, and is expected to build on the didactic material presented in Large and Small Animal Parasitology.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4130, "title": "Introduction to Shelter Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6425", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The course will cover 8 hours of lecture on very basic shelter medicine principles, to include the history of sheltering and humane organizations, issues with pet overpopulation and free roaming companion animals, animal cruelty, an overview of preventive medicine and population health in shelters, sanitation and disinfection, and population management.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4131, "title": "Timely Topics in Veterinary Parasitology: Large-Animal", "code": "VTMED 6426", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "In-depth look at one or a few parasites of special interest relative to large-animal medicine.\u00a0 Presents details of taxonomy, biology, epidemiology, clinical presentation, and preventative and curative treatment.\u00a0 Efforts are made to discuss those aspects of the disease as it relates to the practical control of these and in-depth coverage of primary literature relating to the parasite being discussed.\u00a0 Topics vary annually.\u00a0 The course is presented in a lecture/discussion format.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4132, "title": "Timely Topics in Veterinary Parasitology: Small-Animal", "code": "VTMED 6427", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "In-depth look at one or a few parasites of special interest relative to small-animal medicine.\u00a0 Presents details of taxonomy, biology, epidemiology, clinical presentation, and preventative and curative treatment.\u00a0 Efforts are made to discuss those aspects of the disease as it relates to the practical control of these and in-depth coverage of primary literature relating to the parasite being discussed.\u00a0 Topics vary annually.\u00a0 The course is presented in a lecture/discussion format.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4133, "title": "Vaccines: Theory and Practice", "code": "VTMED 6428", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Broad overview of veterinary vaccines and vaccine programs used in contemporary small and large animal medicine, the poultry industry, aquaculture and equine practice.\u00a0 Considers general guidelines for vaccine use, and the process underlying vaccine development from an industry and scientific perspective.\u00a0 Addresses fundamental mechanisms governing vaccine efficacy, as well as recent advances in the use of carriers, adjuvants and immunostimulants; attenuated pathogens; recombinant subunit vaccines; viral and bacterial vectors for vaccine delivery; and genetic immunization with \"naked\" DNA.\u00a0 Novel applications of vaccine use in the prevention of cancer and neurological disease are also considered.\u00a0 Finally, the ethics and public perception of vaccine use is discussed.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4134, "title": "Veterinary Perspectives on Pathogen Control in Animal Manure", "code": "VTMED 6430", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "In-depth look at the management of pathogens in animal manures. Reviews the pathogens involved, the role of governing agencies, the survival of pathogens in the field, and methods of pathogen destruction. Discusses commercial methods of manure processing for the control of these pathogens for the protection of other animals and the human population. Concludes with class discussions with major stakeholders representing the dairy, beef, pork, and poultry industries and their understanding of the problem as it relates to veterinary students.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4135, "title": "Microbial Safety of Animal-Based Foods", "code": "VTMED 6431", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The course will cover the main issues and pathogens relevant to the safety of animal-based foods. The course will consist of lectures and discussions on topics of pre-and post-harvest food safety and various pathogenic microorganisms of importance.\u00a0 Instructor-led discussions will focus on emerging new issues in food safety and approaches that can be used to assure the safety of animal-based foods.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4136, "title": "Fish Health Management", "code": "VTMED 6432", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This lecture and laboratory course provides an overview of fish health management in commercial aquaculture, aquarium systems, and natural waters. The laboratory is designed to provide students with a knowledge base and hands-on fish necropsy, diagnostic, anesthesia, blood collection, and fish health management in large and small aquariums. Students will maintain and manage small aquarium systems to gain an appreciation for the science behind the operation of those systems. This course requires time outside the normal scheduled class sessions for management of the aquariums and for an external visit to the Syracuse zoo an aquatic facility. Student evaluation will be comprised of four parts: (1) participation to labs, (2) maintenance of aquariums and lab report, (3) a written assignment on a topic related to fish health, and (4) presentation of this paper written assignment in class.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4137, "title": "Advanced Shelter Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6434", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The course will cover more advanced topics in shelter medicine practice: management of common infectious diseases, facilities and housing, quality of life and humane euthanasia, behavioral programs, high quality high volume spay neuter, veterinary forensics and pathology, shelter neonates, community cats, safety net programs, and regulatory matters affecting shelters and shelter practice.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4138, "title": "Directing Community Practice", "code": "VTMED 6436", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The format is a both peer-mentored and service-learning which takes place in a clinical setting. Eight student directors organize and supervise bimonthly healthy pet clinics where they mentor other, less experienced students to provide preventative veterinary care to animals of under served citizens in the Ithaca community.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4139, "title": "Infectious Diseases and Management of Poultry", "code": "VTMED 6437", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "An introductory course covering poultry diseases, general health, and management. Emphasis is placed on diseases of economic importance and the most common viral, mycoplasma, bacterial, fungal, parasitic and nutritional diseases of poultry species. Students learn about the etiology, transmission, clinical signs, lesions, diagnosis, treatment, prevention and control of the diseases. Cases from diagnostic lab accessions are used for class exercises.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4140, "title": "Advanced Work in Animal Parasitology", "code": "VTMED 6438", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Intended for veterinary students with interests in parasitology research. In-depth training in aspects of animal parasitology tailored to their interests, e.g., improved fecal diagnostics, methods for diagnostics of parasites in skin scrapings, in vitro cultivation of parasites, training in running MATs for toxoplasmosis, egg-hatch assays, PCR for specific agents, etc.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4141, "title": "Small Animal Clinical Nutrition", "code": "VTMED 6526", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course will cover nutritional intervention in disease (cardiac, LUTD, renal, hepatic, osteoarthritis, critical care, immunonutrition, GI diseases, allergic disease, cognition, sarcopenia, endocrine diseases, obesity). Each lecture will cover a different topic starting with the mechanism of disease and then focus on the basic medical and in depth nutrition treatment of the disease process including the therapeutic diets available to help ameliorate the medical condition.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4142, "title": "Veterinary Aspects of Captive Wildlife Management", "code": "VTMED 6527", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course will review principles of captive zoo and wild animal management. Students will be challenged to learn and integrate a variety of disciplines that are essential to managing these animals successfully in a captive or semi-free-ranging environment. These disciplines include but are not limited to species-specific: (1) behavior and behavioral requirements, (2) nutritional requirements and problems, (3) natural history, (4) zoonotic and toxicological problems, (5) manual restraint and anesthesia, (6) preventive medicine, and (7) medical and legal ethics. The most common species will be presented in lectures, student presentations and special activities.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4143, "title": "Llama Tutorial", "code": "VTMED 6530", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Autotutorial or group tutorial course covering common problems of llamas and alpacas. Participants are provided with study guides consisting of brief case descriptions and sample study questions. Reference is made to textbooks and journal articles to assist students in finding the answers to the questions efficiently. Grading is based on an oral exam.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4144, "title": "Advanced Equine Lameness", "code": "VTMED 6533", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Designed to teach students the methodology of equine lameness diagnosis.\u00a0 Places a strong emphasis on a hands-on approach to learning and is primarily laboratory-based.\u00a0 During laboratories, students work in small groups on live horses to diagnose the cause of their lameness.\u00a0 To this end, students learn both the practical skills, such as perineural and intra-particular blocks, as well as the methodology necessary to systematically work up a lameness case.\u00a0 Laboratories also provide students with the opportunity to practice field radiography and gain ultrasound skills as they pertain to equine lameness.\u00a0 Additionally, students have the opportunity to practice basic farrier skills.\u00a0 Lecture topics are intended to round out the students' understanding of lameness by providing them with a knowledge base of the common causes of lameness, organized by response to local anesthesia.\u00a0 \u00a0Imaging interpretation is emphasized through case discussions.\u00a0 The course is recommmended for students anticipating entry into equine practice.\u00a0 Students seeking hands-on experience with horses are also welcome.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4145, "title": "Equine Reproduction", "code": "VTMED 6534", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The goal of this course is to provide the fundamental knowledge and skills necessary for application of routine and advanced practices in equine reproduction.\u00a0 This will be accomplished through hands-on experiences during laboratory sessions as well as lectures focused on the reproductive anatomy, physiology, behavior, and management of mares, stallions, and neonatal foals.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4146, "title": "Advanced Dairy Reproduction", "code": "VTMED 6536", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Offers lectures and labs that provide both theoretical and practical training in current approaches to the veterinary aspects of dairy cow reproductive care and management.\u00a0 The aim is to empower the student with entry level, current knowledge and skills for the reproductive aspects of any modern dairy practice.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4147, "title": "Special Problems in Equine Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6538", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Intended for students anticipating equine practice. In-depth study of important diseases, review of recent literature, health management presented by private practitioners,demonstrations on complementary medicine, and talks on specialty equine practice are the core of this course.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4148, "title": "Disorders of Large-Animal Neonates", "code": "VTMED 6539", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Introductory neonatology course.\u00a0 The emphasis is on the wellness examinations and preventative care for neonatal calves, crias, lambs, kids and foals in the first few days of life.\u00a0 Followed by exploration of the medical and surgical problems of neonates with an emphasis on the foal.\u00a0 Students also spend several hours in the neonatal intensive care unit providing nursing care of hospitalized patients under staff supervision.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4149, "title": "Surgical Pathology", "code": "VTMED 6541", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides hands-on experience in the Surgical Pathology Service of the Department of Biomedical Sciences. Working with the attending pathologist, students examine tissue specimens histologically, propose diagnoses, and discuss their interpretations. Students may enroll in this course only through the Office of Student Records within the official add/drop period. All requests to enroll must be accompanied by the Supplemental Enrollment Form indicating Dr. McDonough's approval of the enrollment and the amount of credit to be awarded. Second-year students should not enroll for any term other than summer unless they have actually reserved a January or spring-break slot through Dr. McDonough.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4150, "title": "Medical and Surgical Problems of Dairy Cattle: Emphasis on the Individual Animal", "code": "VTMED 6542", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This lecture-based course provides students in-depth material on special problems in bovine medicine and surgery.\u00a0 The course covers the most common diseases of dairy cattle with a focus on the diagnosis and treatment of individual animals.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4151, "title": "Advanced Small Animal Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6543", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The course expands on core knowledge gained in Foundation Course V through lectures and/or case discussions. The material will focus on current \"hot\" topics of controversies in small animal medicine, or expand on complicated or unusual presentations of material not covered in Foundation Course V. This course aims to both reinforce basic concepts and introduce more advanced topics to help prepare students for entry into small animal practice.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4152, "title": "Sheep and Goat Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6545", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Discusses diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of medical and surgical problems of individual small ruminants and of sheep and goat herds. Basic information on breeds, behavior, nutritional requirements, and management systems is supplied. Economically important contagious or metabolic diseases are discussed in depth. The diagnostic evaluation and differential diagnoses for common clinical presentations such as skin disease, neurologic disease, lameness, and mastitis are considered. Herd monitoring of economically important parameters and necropsy diagnosis of abortions and neonatal losses are addressed. Breeding systems, pregnancy diagnosis methods, correction of dystocias, and common surgical procedures are discussed and demonstrated in laboratory sessions. Also offered as an autotutorial during summer and distribution periods in spring.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4153, "title": "Sheep and Goat Medicine: Lab", "code": "VTMED 6546", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The laboratory sessions will provide the opportunity for students to visit and evaluate local sheep and goat herds and to learn about the economics and health problems associated with their operation. Milk, meat, and fiber production will be discussed as will infectious and parasitic diseases.\u00a0 Additional laboratory sessions will address neonatal care and necropsy, reproduction and dystocia management, parasite diagnostic and control measures, and routine surgeries such as disbudding, dehorning, docking, castration, and vasectomy using cadaver specimens.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4154, "title": "Clinical Pharmacology", "code": "VTMED 6550", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Offered after Foundation Courses I-V and formal exposure to pharmacology course work is completed. The course is designed to familiarize students with drug use in the clinical setting. Pharmacological concepts are emphasized, with a focus on the rationale for drug choice, alternative drug choices available, pharmacokinetic considerations, and potential drug interactions/toxicities. This course is offered at the time students are about to embark on their clinical rotations. It is designed to emphasize practical aspects of pharmacology in the clinical setting, using basic concepts obtained during formal course work. The onus is placed on the student to explain/rationalize drugs currently employed clinically.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4155, "title": "Topics in Veterinary Emergency and Critical Care Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6551", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course builds upon the foundation built in Block V.\u00a0 It will consist of a combination of lecture and case discussion sections.\u00a0 Although all of the discussions will center on small animal medicine, the same principles often apply to both small animal and large animal situations.\u00a0 Topics that MIGHT be covered include a selection from the following list: shock, trauma, stabilization, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, respiratory emergences, cardiac emergencies, endocrine emergencies, acute renal failure, hematologic emergencies, transfusion medicine, respiratory monitoring, hemodynamic monitoring, acute abdomen, emergency surgical procedures and sepsis.\u00a0 The class will focus on both emergency stabilization and management of critically ill patients.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4156, "title": "Advanced Small Animal Clinical Oncology", "code": "VTMED 6558", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Cancer is among the leading causes of morbidity and mortality in companion animals.\u00a0 Prevention, diagnosis and management of cancer in companion animals represents a significant component of small animal clinical practice both in academia and the private sector.\u00a0 The course will provide information on the biological behavior and management of additional types of cancers in dogs and cats not covered in the core material.\u00a0 This information will also be supplemented by more information about new cancer therapies that are being introduced in to veterinary oncology, as well as information about managing chemotherapy complications.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4157, "title": "Applied Dairy Nutrition for Practitioners", "code": "VTMED 6559", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides a foundation in the principles of dairy cattle nutrition for veterinary students interested in dairy production medicine.\u00a0 Emphasizes integration of the principles of dairy cattle nutrition with practical rational formulation and with troubleshooting on dairy farms, both preventive and curative.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4158, "title": "Small Animal Veterinary Dentistry Distribution Course", "code": "VTMED 6560", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This is an introductory level course in small animal dentistry. Students will complete an online self-tutorial course that covers the basics of oral examination, intraoral radiography, oral pathology, periodontology, endodontics, orthodontics, restorative dentistry, and prosthodontics.\u00a0 This will be complemented by one mandatory three-hour laboratory covering regional analgesia techniques, and simple and surgical dental extractions.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4159, "title": "Animal Pain", "code": "VTMED 6562", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This elective course will build on the knowledge of pain in veterinary patients acquired in Block V. We will address the prevention, recognition, and treatment of pain in a variety of species, including dogs, cats, horses, production animals, and non-traditional species. Species-specific pain scoring systems will be introduced. Both pharmacologic (including locoregional analgesic/ anesthetic techniques) and non-pharmacologic treatment of acute pain (e.g., surgical, traumatic) and chronic pain (e.g., cancer, degenerative diseases, laminitis, and other pathologies) will be presented. Attaining a grade of \"satisfactory\" will be dependent upon class attendance and completion of a weekly computer module that will allow students to work through actual pain medicine cases.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4160, "title": "Avian Biomedicine and Diseases", "code": "VTMED 6565", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course is designed to introduce third year veterinary students to avian biology, anatomy, physiology and diseases. The first half of the course includes lectures and laboratories covering avian anatomy, physiology, and natural history. The second half of the course covers basic and practical aspects of the most common infectious and non-infectious diseases affecting a variety of avian species. The course emphasizes the development of a strong foundation in avian biology and diseases that will be applied in Clinical Aspects of non-traditional species' distribution courses and Zoological Medicine clinical rotation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4161, "title": "Canine and Feline Dermatology", "code": "VTMED 6566", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Dogs and cats with skin diseases account for 25 to 50% of the patients seen in general companion animal practice. This course will emphasize the approach to diagnosis, treatment, and prognosis for common and often frustrating canine and feline cutaneous reaction patterns. Attendance in class is mandatory. Attendance and final grade (S/U) determined by in-class quizzes given at the end of each lecture.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4162, "title": "Equine Dermatology", "code": "VTMED 6567", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Horses with skin diseases account for 25% of the patients seen in general equine practice. This course will emphasize the approach to diagnosis, treatment, and prognosis for common and often frustrating equine cutaneous reaction patterns. Attendance in class is mandatory. Attendance and final grade (S/U) determined by in-class quizzes given at the end of each lecture.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4163, "title": "Dairy Herd Epidemiology and Economics", "code": "VTMED 6568", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Veterinarians serving the dairy industry need a sophisticated understanding of population medicine, epidemiology and economics. This course will build on concepts covered in foundation courses and provide practice in applying epidemiology and economics principles to dairy production medicine. While focused on dairy cattle, the skills learned are applicable to other food animal production systems. The course will include lectures and computer laboratories; attendance and participation in group discussions and team problem solving is a key part of the course.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4164, "title": "Clinical Aspects of Non-Traditional Species", "code": "VTMED 6569", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course will provide instruction in the clinical management of birds, reptiles, amphibians, and exotic small mammals for students entering a variety of practice situations including private practice, zoo medicine and wildlife medicine. The lectures discuss the diagnosis, treatment and management of these species including anesthesia, surgery, diagnostics, therapeutics, and common diseases for each group. The lab\u00a0provides hands on practice of some common clinical skills needed for avian practice. Information will be covered both by species and related to work discussed in previous courses and the core-curriculum.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4165, "title": "Veterinary Clinical Immunology", "code": "VTMED 6571", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Clinical immunology applies the knowledge of basic immunology to clinical conditions, allowing better understanding of pathophysiology of diseases, improvement of diagnosis, and treatment of modalities. The course will consist of topic lectures and peer-reviewed manuscript discussions on autoimmunity and allergy, immunodeficiency, immunologic testing and immunotherapy, inflammation; immunology of infectious diseases and vaccinology, immunology of cancer, and immunogenetics. Both small and large animal conditions will be discussed.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4166, "title": "Equine Sports Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6572", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course targets the equine-focused 4th year veterinary student (but is open to any 4th year student) and will build on previous equine courses, the block VI experience and the lameness course (offered concurrently).\u00a0 \u00a0With the course being close to graduation, the format will be interactive with case presentations and hands on laboratories. The course will provide an in depth evaluation of the performance horse on topics such as advanced equine lameness, tendon disorders, neck and back issues, gait abnormalities, respiratory conditions, cardiac disease, and regenerative medicine. The focus will be on providing the student with the the tools to obtain an accurate diagnosis and then manage and treat the various disorders.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4167, "title": "Veterinary Perspectives for the Health and Welfare of the Domestic International Donkey", "code": "VTMED 6573", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The objective of this rotation is to prepare students for their future encounters with all types of donkeys in all types of settings and to provide a thorough understanding of appropriate welfare for these donkeys. This course will emphasize anatomical, physiological, behavioral and other differences between the donkey and the horse. It will also highlight the differences between the typical domestic donkey, the U.S. \"wild burros,\" working donkeys abroad and those involved in production systems. The goal is to provide the tools necessary for practitioners in equine, mixed or other fields to have successful, productive encounters with donkeys whether those encounters occur in their veterinary lives or their personal travels. This course will utilize both internal and external experts in all things donkey-related. Emphasis will be placed on conveying practical knowledge utilizing lectures, labs and one-on-one interactions with guest speakers.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4168, "title": "NYSCHAP", "code": "VTMED 6577", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Herd Health and Biosecurity Risk Evaluation Using the NYS Cattle Health Assurance Program Model Introduces students to the identification of disease risk and evaluation of cattle operations, focusing on animal/herd health, food safety, and the environment. The course combines information on risk assessment, identification of priority issues, creation of herd plans, biosecurity, herd diseases such as Johne's, standard operating procedures, and environmental issues. Additionally, four local farms will be visited to provide students the opportunity to implement knowledge gained in lectures.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4169, "title": "Theriogenology Service", "code": "VTMED 6600", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Exposure to clinical procedures in theriogenology as provided by Cornell University Hospital for Animals patient load and augmented by teaching herd animals. Exposure to clinical procedures in theriogenology as provided by Cornell University Hospital for Animals patient load and augmented by teaching herd animals. Clinical techniques taught include palpation and ultrasound evaluation, artificial insemination and pregnancy diagnosis in mares; semen collection and evaluation in stallions; and foaling monitoring and neonatal foal care. Additionally, students get exposure to breeding management and assisted reproduction in mares at the Equine Park and to theriogenology clinical cases and emergencies in CUHA comprising all equine, camelid, canine and bovine species.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4170, "title": "Cardiology Service", "code": "VTMED 6601", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides students with the opportunity to put into practice what they have learned in the foundation years.\u00a0 The management of the most common cardiac diseases are emphasized including congestive heart failure, arrhythmias, and secondary cardiac diseases.\u00a0 All species are examined, large and small, although the majority are small animals.\u00a0 Diagnostics including cardiovascular physical examination, electrocardiography, radiography, and echocardiography are taught.\u00a0 The rotation includes clinical work, didactic teaching, and self-initiated digging for information.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4171, "title": "Laboratory Animal Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6602", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Laboratory animal medicine is a diverse field in which veterinarians directly impact on the well-being of animals used in research, teaching and testing. Lab animal veterinarians assist researchers in achieving their goals, while encouraging replacement, reduction, and refinement of animal use. Treatment of animals and preparation of preventive medicine programs requires the laboratory animal veterinarian to have knowledge of the biology and comparative medicine of a wide variety of species. It is also essential for laboratory animal veterinarians to have knowledge of research methodologies, and animal models of disease as well as a good understanding of state and federal regulations, and guidelines governing the use of animals. In addition, occupational health and safety, and animal facility design are important parts of an institutional animal care program, to which laboratory animal veterinarians have input. The diversity of species, and the novel circumstances that arise regularly in this field make laboratory animal medicine an exciting and unique discipline of veterinary medicine.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4172, "title": "Clinical Wildlife, Exotic, and Zoo-Animal Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6603", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Introduces students to primary medical care of non-traditional pet species, zoo animals, and native wildlife.\u00a0 Students, directly supervised by the attending clinician, are responsible for the assessment, physical examination, and medical management of exotic animal species presented to the Cornell University Hospital for Animals.\u00a0 Other opportunities available to assist in the development of clinical skills in wildlife-, zoo- and exotic- animal medicine include the wildlife health center cases, ongoing wildlife research and service projects, and trips to the Rosamond Gifford Zoo during the rotation.\u00a0 Successful completion of the course requires satisfactory performance during this 14-day clinical rotation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4173, "title": "Special Opportunities in Clinical Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6605", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides opportunities for students who have completed the prerequisites to explore professional areas of clinical interest not available in the regular curriculum.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4174, "title": "Clinical Oncology", "code": "VTMED 6608", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Management and prevention of cancer in companion animals represents a significant component of the practice of veterinary medicine.\u00a0 The focus of this clinical rotation is the development of a comprehensive set of skills necessary for a veterinarian to become an advocate for the client/patient with cancer.\u00a0 These skills include appropriate initial evaluation of animals with cancer; sensitive and effective client and referring veterinarian communication; ability to access relevant information from numerous sources related to cancer management;and ability to\u00a0 understand and apply principles of surgical, medical and radiation oncology as well as techniques specifically related to minimize pain and treatment-related side effects in cancer patients.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4175, "title": "Large Animal Emergency and Critical Care", "code": "VTMED 6614", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The evaluation and management of critical patients and other emergency problems represents a significant component of the practice of large animal veterinary medicine.\u00a0 As emergency cases are frequently presented to these practitioners, it is imperative such veterinarians are well prepared.\u00a0 The focus of this clinical rotation is for students to acquire the knowledge, skills and thought processes necessary to triage large animal emergencies and manage critical patients.\u00a0 These skills include the appropriate evaluation, stabilization and treatment of emergency patients, and the management of post-operative cases and other critical patients.\u00a0 Participants access relevant information from various sources related to emergency and critical care medicine and surgery in an effort to understand and apply these principles to clinical cases.\u00a0 Participants primarily have patient care responsibilities in the Large Animal Intensive Care Unit of the Cornell University Hospital for Animals and work closely with technicians and clinicians to develop familiarity with technical and nursing procedures.\u00a0 In addition, students will learn common veterinary skills and techniques using teaching animals when time permits.\u00a0 The large animal emergency and critical care rotation is primarily an after-hours rotation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4176, "title": "Special Topics in Ambulatory and Production-Animal Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6615", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Provides specialized opportunity in Production Medicine.\u00a0 Consists of participation in an experience designed to improve knowledge and skills regarding producation systems. Examples of focus areas include livestock production medicine, poultry and fish farming, milk quality assessment, small ruminant medicine, herd management experience, and specialized diagnostic testing. This course is availble in 2 week increments after application to the course leader at least one month in advance of the rotation. Presentation of the completed expereince to a student club or in Ambulatory rounds is required.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4177, "title": "Small Animal Dentistry and Oral Surgery", "code": "VTMED 6616", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This rotation is designed to introduce students to clinical small animal dentistry and oral surgery.\u00a0 By the end of the rotation, students are expected to be capable of:\u00a0 performing a thorough oral examination, obtaining and interpreting intraoral radiographs, discussing appropriate therapeutic options, performing basic periodontal procedures and simple and surgical extractions, and administering pertinent regional nerve blocks.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4178, "title": "Clinical Neurology", "code": "VTMED 6618", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The Neurology/Neurosurgery (NNS) clinical rotation at Cornell University's College of Veterinary Medicine is a 2 week time period in which the student is directly involved in the diagnosis, management and treatment of animals with a diverse array of neurologic disorders.\u00a0Gait evaluation and the neurological examination are skills that can be applied to any species and these are\u00a0emphasized over the rotation. During the rotation students will\u00a0have multiple\u00a0opportunities to practice and get feedback on their neurological examinations as we are often busy. This allows students time and practice so that they can apply what they\u00a0have learned to whichever species they intend to work with following graduation. We have previously discussed other species with neurological conditions and examinations when students have made their interests known. Although clinics is primarily devoted to dogs and cats, we occasionally consult with other services such as large animal medicine and surgery and exotics.\u00a0The student is expected to assist in all aspects of the rotation, including case rounds, patient receiving, medical and surgical treatments, client communication, and record-keeping. In addition to learning through clinical exposure, the student will be taught principles of clinical neurology during \"sit-down\" topic rounds. The primary goal of the rotation for the student is for the student to become comfortable and confident in performing and correctly interpreting the neurologic examination in a clinical setting. \u00a0A secondary goal is the accumulation and application of practical clinical knowledge pertaining to neurologic diseases of companion animals.\u00a0To do this effectively we discuss our clinical approach to cases so that students can practice their clinical decision making skills and approach to neurological patients.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4179, "title": "Clinical Pathology Rotation", "code": "VTMED 6619", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This two-week course consolidates principles of clinical pathology and provides students with additional experience in using clinical pathology data to help with interpretation, diagnosis and management of clinical cases, through the use of archived and current clinical cases. Students will become more experienced and confident in examining blood and cytology smears, interpreting electrophoretogram results and working through clinical case material. Students are required to interpret a \"mystery\" slide (hematology or cytology) and case with clinical pathologic data in the last week of the rotation. There is substantial interaction with clinical pathology faculty, staff and residents. The case material can be somewhat tailored to the students' areas of interest.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4180, "title": "Clinical Rotation in Shelter Medicine: Principles and Practice", "code": "VTMED 6623", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Shelter medicine is a relatively new discipline within the practice of veterinary medicine and requires the application of herd health principles within a small animal setting. This clinical rotation will expose students to the principles and practice of veterinary medicine in a shelter setting. While much time will be spent providing direct veterinary medical care to individual shelter animals, there will be a directed focus on introducing students to population-level principles. Topics include but are not limited to infectious disease diagnosis, treatment, and management; shelter wellness protocols; high-quality, high-volume spay-neuter; shelter data management; behavioral assessments in shelters, animal welfare, and population and capacity planning. Other aspects will be covered depending on shelter activities and needs at the time. The daily schedule will include clinical work, daily shelter rounds, and daily topic rounds. Students will also be expected to complete several on-line webinars, as well as homework assignments to round out their learning.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4181, "title": "Primary Care Surgery Service", "code": "VTMED 6624", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The Primary Care Surgery Service is a two week hospital rotation which provides the opportunity for student clinicians to spay and castrate adoptable shelter and rescue dogs. Emphasis is on the development of surgical competence, confidence, and efficiency within the limits of accepted technique. Students are encouraged to think for themselves and to integrate their Cornell training with experiences they may have had elsewhere. Student surgeons are in charge of the pre-operative, operative, and post-operative care of their patients and the\njudgment used in providing that care. Anesthesia support is provided by LVT's from the Anesthesia Service. Rounds focus on common clinical situations, pragmatic solutions, ethical issues, and the integration of professional and personal life.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4182, "title": "Farrier Skills for Veterinarians", "code": "VTMED 6627", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course will provide an opportunity for veterinary students with an equine background and interest to work with Cornell University Resident Farrier learning proper hoof trimming and balancing for conformation, horse shoe selection, fabrication, modification, and attachment modalities. Causes of lameness and underperformance relating to shoeing will be covered. Practical skills will be emphasized.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4183, "title": "Clinical Sports Medicine and Rehabilitation", "code": "VTMED 6628", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The Clinical Sports Medicine and Rehabilitation Service focusses heavily on mobility and function and sees a variety of patients including primary lameness workups, post-surgical rehabilitation, sport dog conditioning, and geriatric care.\u00a0 Foundation coursework in both physiology and musculoskeletal anatomy are applied to clinical cases from movement to healing to pain control.\u00a0 Lameness workups include orthopedic and neurological examinations as well as functional assessment, objective gait analysis, and pain scoring.\u00a0 Various modalities including but not limited to water therapy to neuromuscular electrical stimulation (NMES), therapeutic laser, acupuncture, extracorporeal shockwave, therapeutic ultrasound, and regenerative medicine will be introduced and incorporated as indicated.\u00a0 The course will foster a unique clinical thought processes as a physical therapist to identify impairments and functional deficits, allowing for the development of appropriate physiotherapy goals and exercises.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4184, "title": "Senior Seminar", "code": "VTMED 6724", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Attendance at 10 of the senior seminar sessions presented during the semester is required for completion of this course. Selected class members will serve as moderators for the senior seminar presentations. Other students will take brief on-line quizzes covering the information supplied in the seminars for the week.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4185, "title": "Behavior Problems of Small Animals", "code": "VTMED 6731", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The goal of this course is to give veterinary students the ability to treat common behavior problems of cats and dogs. Environmental management, behavior modification, and pharmacological treatments for behavior problems are described. History-taking, counseling, and follow-up methods also are presented.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4186, "title": "Veterinarians and Food-Animal Production Systems: An Introduction", "code": "VTMED 6733", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This seminar course uses an interactive format and multiple experts from their fields to introduce future veterinarians to various food animal production systems, how veterinarians interact with them, and the synergy between these systems and veterinarians in society.\u00a0 Each week the production structure of the dairy, beef, swine, poultry, or aquaculture industry, veterinarians' role in them, and career opportunities and expectations will be discussed.\u00a0 The offering is intended for first- or second-year students so that they can plan appropriately to take additions courses or set up externships in the following years.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4187, "title": "Companion Animal Welfare Issues", "code": "VTMED 6734", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Despite significant improvement being made over the last 10 years, homelessness remains one of the largest welfare issues for dogs and cats in this country with an estimated 3-4 million dogs and cats entering US animal shelters annually. While puppies and kittens and healthy adult dogs and cats are still euthanized in some shelters, euthanasia rates have dropped remarkably in the last decade. However, many animals are still bred and sold in the US in less than ideal conditions. The large population of free-roaming and feral cats is both a cause and effect of feline overpopulation; approaches to cat control are controversial and emotionally charged. Animal cruelty, abuse and neglect, including animal fighting and hoarding, represent issues with which veterinarians are becoming increasingly engaged in their communities.\u00a0\u00a0As our community expands globally, welfare issues from abroad are also becoming more apparent. Other controversial issues that impact companion animal welfare include cosmetic/elective surgery, access to veterinary care, and quality of life measures with advancing technologies in veterinary medicine.\u00a0The objective of the course is to provide information for veterinary students that enables them assume leadership roles with regards to these issues in their future communities.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4188, "title": "Conservation Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6735", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Conservation Medicine will introduce students to the basic concepts of free-ranging and captive wildlife conservation and will engage veterinary students in issues of sustainable development relating to wildlife. The course will present information not included in other courses within the curriculum that is fundamental for veterinarians contemplating a career in Conservation Medicine, Wildlife Health, or Zoological Medicine. Students will learn how wildlife populations are regulated by their environment, and how such populations are managed and assessed. Various habitat preservation strategies will be presented and discussed. Conversely, for critically endangered species, the focus will be on ex situ recovery programs. One goal of the course is to introduce students to the many career paths available to them that are related to wildlife conservation. Grades will be based both on individual student papers and group presentations.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4189, "title": "Pet Loss and Bereavement Counseling Course", "code": "VTMED 6736", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course introduces veterinary students to the key issues related to the loss of a companion animal and bereavement counseling. The course provides a structured background to assist students in developing the necessary skills to deal with clients and the grieving process. Students will participate in Cornell University's Pet Loss Support Hotline, a telephone-based community outreach program designed to provide support to callers grieving the loss of a companion animal.\u00a0 Students actively participate in the prerequisite 9 hours of training in the Fall Semester, followed by hands-on experience staffing the Pet Loss Support Hotline. Requirements include attendance at both a Pet Loss Support Hotline sponsored lecture (usually scheduled in the evening) and a rounds discussion session, a case log of calls received and a one page case report.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4190, "title": "Overview of Complementary Therapies in Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6739", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course will introduce the veterinary student to numerous complementary and alternative modalities currently being offered by veterinarians or requested by clients. Concerns and controversies will be discussed for each modality, along with how training can be acquired. Topics will include acupuncture, chiropractic, herbal medicine, rehabilitation and physical therapy, philosophies of energy medicine, homeopathy, integrative nutrition and nutraceuticals. Critical evaluation of the evidence for efficacy of these treatments will be emphasized, along with the current understanding of the contribution of the placebo effect to apparent response to treatment.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4191, "title": "Seminar in Topics of Global Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6740", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This seminar course that allows students to present their work in international veterinary medicine, and to discuss aspects of interest of global or international veterinary medicine among their peers. It will be a forum to present previous works and generate ideas for future international projects. Students will create and deliver presentations describing their experiences in projects in areas abroad during veterinary school. These presentations may be summaries of their clinical work or research, or presentations of topics such as animal welfare issues or socioeconomic issues of veterinarians in countries abroad. Students who have not been on a trip abroad may write about a topic of interest in a geographic area of interest, such as emerging diseases and outbreaks, cultural issues regarding animal care.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4192, "title": "One Health: Conservation with Communities", "code": "VTMED 6743", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course integrates life sciences, social sciences, medical sciences, and the humanities to explore the concept of \"One Health\", the idea that the health of the environment, animals and people are all inextricably linked. The course provides a comprehensive framework that will enable students to critically examine their perspectives and expand their view of the world, skills that are essential to a career in interdisciplinary Conservation Medicine. This course is also offered to undergraduate students, and preparatory for a summer course under the Cornell's Engaged Learning Program.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4193, "title": "Food Animal Welfare", "code": "VTMED 6746", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This one credit S/U course will provide an overview of current topics in food animal welfare. Emphasis will be placed on veterinary issues and public perceptions of welfare of swine, poultry, fish, small ruminants, and beef and dairy cattle. Transport, slaughter, and euthanasia of all species will also be addressed. A welfare audit exercise will be conducted at the Veterinary College Teaching Dairy. Each student will be asked to do in-depth reading on a topic of importance to industry and veterinarians and to prepare a 3 to 5 page paper.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4194, "title": "Agile Innovation in Animal Health-Hackathon", "code": "VTMED 6749", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "The course is designed to complement the Animal Health Hackathon and will focus on the challenges and opportunities related to animal health entrepreneurship and innovation. Veterinary students will work in diverse teams with students from other programs on campus to gain a broader perspective of both the challenges (e.g., organizational and institutional) and opportunities (e.g., unmet customer needs and possibilities for future ventures) in this sector. Students will learn and apply team innovation processes, business model innovation, design thinking, creativity management, product pitches, data analysis, critical thinking, and product innovation.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4195, "title": "The Healer's Art", "code": "VTMED 6750", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Compassion fatigue in veterinary medicine has effected a broad search for etiologies and effective educational interventions. Recent research suggests that finding personal meaning in ones' daily work is highly correlated with diminished compassion fatigue (lack of meaning is considered a main cause of compassion fatigue). The Healer's Art is a nationally recognized curriculum that provides opportunities to explore meaning and helps participants to develop self-care and to establish a foundation for resilience. Through an interactive, process-based program, participants can create a supportive and judgment-free community, allowing inquiry between DVM students and graduate DVM facilitators. This course is scheduled in the evening to prevent conflict with other courses and to allow a more relaxed and stress free time for self-reflection, discovery and sharing.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4196, "title": "Topics in Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6896", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This course provides an opportunity for faculty to pilot a new course, or to offer a new course on a temporary basis and/or after the deadline for course submission has passed.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4197, "title": "Teaching Projects in Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6897", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "This is a variable credit course in which students contribute to the teaching of a course in the veterinary curriculum (VTMED). Student responsibilities may include providing instructional support in laboratories, preparing teaching material, giving presentations, providing feedback to students on assignments, grading, or performing other appropriate tasks. Students are assessed based on the quality of performance in their responsibilities. Students a required to submit a brief reflection summarizing what they have accomplished and learned as a result of the teaching project. Projects must be submitted via the online application process before the first day of the term.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4198, "title": "Special Projects in Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6898", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Students work individually with a CVM faculty member to pursue an area of particular interest that is not part of the established curriculum. Specific course objectives and course content should be relevant to career interests in veterinary medicine and should reflect the expertise of the faculty. Students are required to submit a brief reflection summarizing what they accomplished and learned as a result of the special project. Projects must be submitted via the online application process before the first day of the term.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4199, "title": "Research Projects in Veterinary Medicine", "code": "VTMED 6899", "subject": "VTMED", "descr": "Students work individually in the research environment of a CVM faculty member involved in veterinary or biomedical research. Specific course objectives and course content should be relevant to career interests in veterinary medicine and should reflect the expertise of the faculty. Students are required to submit a brief reflection summarizing what they accomplished and learned as a result of the research opportunity. Projects must be submitted via the online application process before the first day of the term.", "tags": "VTMED", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4200, "title": "Undergraduate Research in Epidemiology", "code": "VTPMD 2990", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Mentored research apprenticeship program designed to give laboratory experience in applied epidemiology to qualified unmatriculated high school students (participating in Cornell Summer College) or Cornell underclassmen. Students are placed in a research laboratory with a designed project under the direct supervision of a research associate (upper-level graduate student, post-doc, or faculty member). Students are graded on preparation, participation in laboratory, academic life, and appropriate acquisition of techniques. At the end of the six-week session, they are expected to give a brief (15- to 20-minute) oral presentation on their work and submit a manuscript in a form suitable for publication. The faculty director of the laboratory has ultimate responsibility for evaluating each student's work and assigning the grade.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4201, "title": "Public Health Foundations II", "code": "VTPMD 6102", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "This course will reinforce and expand upon learning from Public Health Foundations I by addressing drivers of health and behavior from genetic to individual, policy, institutional, cultural, and Planetary Health factors. Conceptually, the course is guided by the Health Impact Pyramid, social determinants of health and an expanded socio-ecologic model. We apply these concepts to impacts of climate change, infectious and vector-borne disease, One Health, and chronic/ noncommunicable disease. We draw on a lifecourse perspective, with particular attention to discrimination, health equity, and both generational and cumulative impacts on populations. This course includes a module on emergency preparedness applicable to infectious disease outbreaks, climate related disasters and other natural and manmade crises. The module emphasizes the leadership, communication, planning and public health expertise necessary to respond to, mitigate and when possible prevent such crises. Through lectures, guided in-class activities, guest speakers, mini-presentations, trainings and simulations, students will further develop their public health competence and apply key concepts and systems thinking to assess domestic and global public health issues.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4202, "title": "Policy, Leadership, and Ethics", "code": "VTPMD 6103", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "This course will help build a student's professional toolkit such that they have the tools to enter the public health workforce and excel in leadership and management roles, including evaluating and informing policy, engaging stakeholders,\u00a0navigating ethical situations and challenges, and leading change. The course will introduce students to the key elements of leadership and will characterize the elements within the public health practice context via case studies, guest speakers, and a policy analysis paper.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4203, "title": "Biostatistics for Health Sciences", "code": "VTPMD 6105", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Teaches statistical concepts and application for health related data analysis.\u00a0 The course will relate health and biological sciences data back to Gaussian, non-Gaussian, Poisson, Binomial, and other distributions. Topics in descriptive statistics include summary measures, measure of association, concepts related to data distribution, and confidence intervals. Topics related to analytical analysis include categorical data, parametric and non-parametric population comparisons and correlation, and regression techniques. Students will be exposed to a variety of software packages, but will also be expected to calculate the simple statistical approaches as well. Emphasizes the understanding of statistical concepts and application and the structure of health data.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4204, "title": "Applied Data Analysis", "code": "VTPMD 6108", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "This course serves to complement data-oriented public health courses to help students hone their data cleaning and analysis skills.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4205, "title": "Public Health Practice - Planning", "code": "VTPMD 6182", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Via this seminar, students will gain an understanding of the elements of needs\u2010 and evidence\u2010based public health program and/or response planning, and will design a public health project/response to address a defined need related to prevention, treatment, and/or care. This course will cover the core elements of program planning, including concept mapping, logic models, work plans, Gantt charts, and basic budgets and staffing plans. This will be practiced via in-depth discussion of real\u2010life cases, and by self\u2010directed research, planning, grant writing, and peer review.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4206, "title": "Applied Practice Experience in Public Health", "code": "VTPMD 6184", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "This course will allow students to (a) research and connect with public health organizations, conduct an informational interview, and refine a resume and cover letter; (b) develop an Applied Practice Work Plan with a public health organization; (c) submit project deliverables; and deliver a professional portfolio that demonstrates application of public health knowledge and skills were applied via real-life, hands-on public health projects in collaboration with a public health mentor.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4207, "title": "Public Health Integrated Learning Experience", "code": "VTPMD 6192", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "In this course, students develop a high-quality, substantial written \"capstone\" document that demonstrates applied competence integrated across concentration and foundational public health domains. In the penultimate semester, students develop a proposal, working with faculty, staff, and partners. The final document may take various forms, such as a policy analysis, grant proposal, project improvement plan, program evaluation report, scientific journal manuscript, etc.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4208, "title": "Special Topics in Public Health", "code": "VTPMD 6193", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "The department teaches \"trial\" courses under this number. Offerings vary by semester and are advertised by the department before the semester starts. Courses offered under the number will be approved by the department curriculum committee, and the same course is not offered more than twice under this number.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4209, "title": "Public Health Colloquium", "code": "VTPMD 6194", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Practitioners in the field of public health discuss current, cross-cutting issues affecting scholarship and practice.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4210, "title": "Study Designs", "code": "VTPMD 6650", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Design and interpretation of cross-sectional, case-control, and cohort studies (including controlled clinical trial). Design issues include sample size, bias, and relative advantages and disadvantages. Course objectives are to (1) know the difference between different epidemiologic study designs and relative advantages and disadvantages of each; (2) given a problem (usually a field situation), be able to design an appropriate epidemiologic study; (3) be able to effectively analyze and criticize published epidemiologic studies. Consists of lectures on the principles of epidemiologic study design and related issues (sample size calculations, validity and precision, and identification and minimizing of bias); basic analysis of epidemiologic data; and discussion of published epidemiologic studies. These include observational cohort studies (prospective and retrospective), crosssectional studies, case-control studies, and hybrid studies (ambidirectional and other hybrid designs).", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4211, "title": "Special Topics in Infectious Diseases", "code": "VTPMD 7020", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Offers a broad exposure to various aspects of infectious diseases.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4212, "title": "Epidemiology Seminar Series", "code": "VTPMD 7080", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Discusses advanced theoretical and analytical epidemiologic concepts and techniques.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4213, "title": "Graduate Research", "code": "VTPMD 7660", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "Enables students outside the section of epidemiology to receive graduate research credits for projects with epidemiological components.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4214, "title": "Independent Studies in Epidemiology", "code": "VTPMD 7990", "subject": "VTPMD", "descr": "The purpose of this course is to investigate an epidemiologic topic with one of the instructors. It provides experience in problem definition, research design, and the analysis of epidemiologic data.", "tags": "VTPMD", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4215, "title": "Elementary Wolof II", "code": "WOLOF 1118", "subject": "WOLOF", "descr": "Wolof is an African language. It is widely spoken in West Africa in countries such as Senegal, The Gambia and Mauritania. Wolof is the most widely spoken language in Senegal.\u00a0 There are strong historical and contemporary links between the African American experiences and West Africa. Senegal and Wolof are important links in these experiences.\u00a0\u00a0Wolof has some influence on some West European languages. Banana is a Wolof word and it is also an English word! Study Wolof, Know Africa and Know the world!", "tags": "WOLOF", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4216, "title": "Intermediate Wolof II", "code": "WOLOF 2119", "subject": "WOLOF", "descr": "The course is structured around IsiZulu Sanamuhla, a set of web-based learning materials that features Zulu-speaking students and families in South Africa.", "tags": "WOLOF", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4217, "title": "Advanced Wolof II", "code": "WOLOF 3114", "subject": "WOLOF", "descr": "No description available.", "tags": "WOLOF", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4218, "title": "Tutorial in Basic English and Composition", "code": "WRIT 1038", "subject": "WRIT", "descr": "This writing seminar is designed for students who need more focused attention to master the expectations of academic writing. The course emphasizes the analytic and argumentative writing and critical reading essential for university-level work.", "tags": "WRIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4219, "title": "FWS: Elements of Academic Writing", "code": "WRIT 1380", "subject": "WRIT", "descr": "The Writing 1380 classroom is a dynamic workspace where students assemble the scholarly tools necessary to explore complex, interdisciplinary questions. Because Writing 1380 is designed as a workshop, students develop the analytic and argumentative skills fundamental to interdisciplinary reading, research, and writing by collaborating with peers to pose questions, examine ideas, and share drafts. With smaller class sizes, two 50-minute class sessions and weekly student / teacher conferences, Writing 1380 provides an individualized setting for students to learn flexible and sustainable strategies for studying the essential elements of academic writing and for producing clear, precise academic prose that can address a variety of audiences and meet diverse rhetorical aims.", "tags": "WRIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4220, "title": "Special Topics in Writing", "code": "WRIT 1390", "subject": "WRIT", "descr": "These courses allow students the opportunity to resolve significant writing challenges that have interfered with their academic progress. Students must have ongoing writing projects on which to work. Instruction is in weekly tutorials. Interested students should go to 174 Rockefeller for more information.", "tags": "WRIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4221, "title": "FWS: Research and Rhetoric", "code": "WRIT 1420", "subject": "WRIT", "descr": "Drawing upon personal or academic experiences and interests, students select their own topics and design research portfolios that highlight significant analytic research. To do this, you will step through the Cornell Library gateway and receive a semester-long guided tour through one of the world's most amazing research libraries\u2013\u2013its vast search engines, its abundant print and electronic collections, its precious special collections and archives. This introduction to college research explores using data bases, evaluating information, and engaging both to produce effective academic writing. Study techniques of analysis for converting scholarly information into thesis, synthesizing and acknowledging sources, developing voice and style, crafting technically and rhetorically sophisticated prose.", "tags": "WRIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4222, "title": "Responding to Writing: Theory & Pedagogy", "code": "WRIT 2101", "subject": "WRIT", "descr": "This course introduces students to scholarship on writing pedagogy, requiring them to think critically about collaborative learning strategies, multilingual writing challenges, ethical considerations in peer tutoring, and the ways in which race and other facets of identity inform teaching and learning. The learning objectives include: develop an understanding of different theories of writing and the history of writing centers; practice reading and responding to a variety of different writing genres and student situations in ways that connect theory to practice; learn to question assumptions in specific pieces of writing, frameworks for writing, and in pedagogical interactions; self-reflect on individual writing processes, writing, and previous educational experiences; analyze the ways in which writer and tutor identities affect pedagogical interactions and learn strategies for equitable and ethical tutoring; develop confidence in suggesting interventions for other writers at various stages of their writing processes; and, gain flexibility in utilizing a variety of strategies for fostering writer agency and growth.", "tags": "WRIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4223, "title": "Writing in the Majors Seminar", "code": "WRIT 7101", "subject": "WRIT", "descr": "Teaching assistants assigned to Writing in the Majors projects enroll in a six-week course on teaching strategies in advanced instruction.", "tags": "WRIT", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4224, "title": "Introduction to Yoruba II", "code": "YORUB 1109", "subject": "YORUB", "descr": "A two-semester beginner's course in Yoruba Language and Culture. Organized to offer Yoruba language skills and proficiency in speaking, reading, listening, writing, and translation. Focus is placed on familiar informal and formal contexts, e.g., home, school, work, family, social situations, politics, etc. Course uses Yoruba oral literature, proverbs, rhetoric, songs, popular videos, and theater, as learning tools for class comprehension. First semester focuses on conversation, speaking, and listening.\u00a0 Second semester focuses on writing, translation and grammatical formation. Through the language course students gain basic background for the study of an African culture, arts, and history both in the continent and in the diaspora. Yoruba language is widely spoken along the west coast of Africa and in some African communities in diaspora.\u00a0 Yoruba video culture, theater, music, and arts has a strong influence along the west coast and in the diaspora.A two-semester beginner's course in Yoruba language and culture. Organized to offer Yoruba language skills and proficiency in speaking, reading, listening, writing, and translation. Focus is placed on familiar informal and formal contexts, e.g., home, school, work, family, social situations, politics. Course uses Yoruba oral literature, proverbs, rhetoric, songs, popular videos, and theater as learning tools for class comprehension. First semester focuses on conversation, speaking, and listening. Second semester focuses on writing, translation, and grammatical formation. Through the language course students gain basic background for the study of an African culture, arts, and history both on the continent and in the diaspora. Yoruba language is widely spoken along the west coast of Africa and in some African communities in diaspora. Yoruba video culture, theater, music, and arts have strong influence along the west coast and in the diaspora.", "tags": "YORUB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4225, "title": "Intermediate Yoruba II", "code": "YORUB 2111", "subject": "YORUB", "descr": "Intermediate Yoruba II is a follow-up to Intermediate Yoruba I. It is a fourth-semester Yoruba language course. The course assists students to acquire advanced level proficiency in reading, speaking, writing, and listening in Yoruba language. Students are introduced to grammatical and syntactic structures in the language that will assist them in describing, presenting, and narrating information in the basic tenses. At the end of the course, students will be able to listen to, process, and understand programs produced for native speakers in media such as television, radio, and films. They will be able to read and understand short stories, novels, and plays written for native speakers of the language.", "tags": "YORUB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4226, "title": "Advanced Yoruba II", "code": "YORUB 3111", "subject": "YORUB", "descr": "This course will help students expand their understanding of the Yoruba language through the communicative approach. We will focus on the four skills, speaking, listening, learning, and writing.", "tags": "YORUB", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4227, "title": "Elementary Zulu II", "code": "ZULU 1116", "subject": "ZULU", "descr": "IsiZulu is the most widely spoken language in the Southern African region and it is an official language of South Africa. This two-semester beginners' course emphasizes speaking and listening, and trains students to communicate in everyday situations.\u00a0 In acquiring this competence, students are introduced to the structure of the language and to the significant status of Zulu language and culture in contemporary multilingual South Africa.\u00a0 The course is structured around IsiZulu Sanamuhla, a set of web-based learning materials that features Zulu-speaking students and families in South Africa.IsiZulu is the most widely spoken language in the Southern African region and it is an official language of South Africa. This two-semester beginners' course emphasizes speaking and listening, and trains students to communicate in everyday situations.\u00a0 In acquiring this competence, students are introduced to the structure of the language and to the significant status of Zulu language and culture in contemporary multilingual South Africa.\u00a0 The course is structured around IsiZulu Sanamuhla, a set of web-based learning materials that features Zulu-speaking students and families in South Africa.", "tags": "ZULU", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4228, "title": "Intermediate Zulu II", "code": "ZULU 2117", "subject": "ZULU", "descr": "The course is structured around IsiZulu Sanamuhla, a set of web-based learning materials that features Zulu-speaking students and families in South Africa.", "tags": "ZULU", "ratings": 5}, {"_id":4229, "title": "Advanced Zulu II", "code": "ZULU 3114", "subject": "ZULU", "descr": "The course is structured around IsiZulu Sanamuhla, a set of web-based learning materials that features Zulu-speaking students and families in South Africa.", "tags": "ZULU", "ratings": 5}])